[]

[]

© 2011 David Graeber

First Melville House Printing: May 2011

Melville House Publishing
145 Plymouth Street
Brooklyn, New York 11201
mhpbooks.com

The Library of Congress has cataloged the hardcover edition as follows:

Graeber, David.
Debt : the first 5,000 years / David Graeber.
      p. cm.
Includes bibliographical references.
eISBN: 978-1-61219-098-3
1. Debt–History. 2. Money–History. 3. Financial crises–History. I.
Title.
HG3701.G73 2010
332–dc22
                                                                        2010044508

v3.1



CONTENTS


_Cover_

_Title Page_

_Copyright_

1  On The Experience of Moral Confusion

2  The Myth of Barter

3  Primordial Debts

4  Cruelty and Redemption

5  A Brief Treatise on the Moral Grounds of Economic Relations

6  Games with Sex and Death

7  Honor and Degradation, or, On the Foundations of Contemporary
Civilization

8  Credit Versus Bullion, And the Cycles of History

9  The Axial Age (800 BC-600 AD)

10  The Middle Ages (600 AD-1450 AD)

11  Age of the Great Capitalist Empires (1450–1971)

12  (1971-The Beginning of Something Yet to Be Determined)

Notes

Bibliography



CHAPTER ONE  ON THE EXPERIENCE OF MORAL CONFUSION


_debt_

• noun 1 a sum of money owed. 2 the state of owing money. 3 a feeling of
gratitude for a favour or service.

_—Oxford English Dictionary_

If you owe the bank a hundred thousand dollars, the bank owns you. If
you owe the bank a hundred million dollars, you own the bank.

—American Proverb

TWO YEARS AGO, by a series of strange coincidences, I found myself
attending a garden party at Westminster Abbey. I was a bit
uncomfortable. It’s not that other guests weren’t pleasant and amicable,
and Father Graeme, who had organized the party, was nothing if not a
gracious and charming host. But I felt more than a little out of place.
At one point, Father Graeme intervened, saying that there was someone by
a nearby fountain whom I would certainly want to meet. She turned out to
be a trim, well-appointed young woman who, he explained, was an
attorney—“but more of the activist kind. She works for a foundation that
provides legal support for anti-poverty groups in London. You’ll
probably have a lot to talk about.”

We chatted. She told me about her job. I told her I had been involved
for many years with the global justice movement—“anti-globalization
movement,” as it was usually called in the media. She was curious: she’d
of course read a lot about Seattle, Genoa, the tear gas and street
battles, but … well, had we really accomplished anything by all of that?

“Actually,” I said, “I think it’s kind of amazing how much we did manage
to accomplish in those first couple of years.”

“For example?”

“Well, for example, we managed to almost completely destroy the IMF.”

As it happened, she didn’t actually know what the IMF was, so I offered
that the International Monetary Fund basically acted as the world’s debt
enforcers—“You might say, the high-finance equivalent of the guys who
come to break your legs.” I launched into historical background,
explaining how, during the ’70s oil crisis, OPEC countries ended up
pouring so much of their newfound riches into Western banks that the
banks couldn’t figure out where to invest the money; how Citibank and
Chase therefore began sending agents around the world trying to convince
Third World dictators and politicians to take out loans (at the time,
this was called “go-go banking”); how they started out at extremely low
rates of interest that almost immediately skyrocketed to 20 percent or
so due to tight U.S. money policies in the early ‘80s; how, during the
’80s and ’90s, this led to the Third World debt crisis; how the IMF then
stepped in to insist that, in order to obtain refinancing, poor
countries would be obliged to abandon price supports on basic
foodstuffs, or even policies of keeping strategic food reserves, and
abandon free health care and free education; how all of this had led to
the collapse of all the most basic supports for some of the poorest and
most vulnerable people on earth. I spoke of poverty, of the looting of
public resources, the collapse of societies, endemic violence,
malnutrition, hopelessness, and broken lives.

“But what was _your_ position?” the lawyer asked.

“About the IMF? We wanted to abolish it.”

“No, I mean, about the Third World debt.”

“Oh, we wanted to abolish that too. The immediate demand was to stop the
IMF from imposing structural adjustment policies, which were doing all
the direct damage, but we managed to accomplish that surprisingly
quickly. The more long-term aim was debt amnesty. Something along the
lines of the biblical Jubilee. As far as we were concerned,” I told her,
“thirty years of money flowing from the poorest countries to the richest
was quite enough.”

“But,” she objected, as if this were self-evident, “they’d borrowed the
money! Surely one has to pay one’s debts.”

It was at this point that I realized this was going to be a very
different sort of conversation than I had originally anticipated.

Where to start? I could have begun by explaining how these loans had
originally been taken out by unelected dictators who placed most of it
directly in their Swiss bank accounts, and ask her to contemplate the
justice of insisting that the lenders be repaid, not by the dictator, or
even by his cronies, but by literally taking food from the mouths of
hungry children. Or to think about how many of these poor countries had
actually already paid back what they’d borrowed three or four times now,
but that through the miracle of compound interest, it still hadn’t made
a significant dent in the principal. I could also observe that there was
a difference between refinancing loans, and demanding that in order to
obtain refinancing, countries have to follow some orthodox free-market
economic policy designed in Washington or Zurich that their citizens had
never agreed to and never would, and that it was a bit dishonest to
insist that countries adopt democratic constitutions and then also
insist that, whoever gets elected, they have no control over their
country’s policies anyway. Or that the economic policies imposed by the
IMF didn’t even work. But there was a more basic problem: the very
assumption that debts _have_ to be repaid.

Actually, the remarkable thing about the statement “one has to pay one’s
debts” is that even according to standard economic theory, it isn’t
true. A lender is supposed to accept a certain degree of risk. If all
loans, no matter how idiotic, were still retrievable—if there were no
bankruptcy laws, for instance—the results would be disastrous. What
reason would lenders have not to make a stupid loan?

“Well, I know that sounds like common sense,” I said, “but the funny
thing is, economically, that’s not how loans are actually supposed to
work. Financial institutions are supposed to be ways of directing
resources toward profitable investments. If a bank were guaranteed to
get its money back, plus interest, no matter what it did, the whole
system wouldn’t work. Say I were to walk into the nearest branch of the
Royal Bank of Scotland and say ‘You know, I just got a really great tip
on the horses. Think you could lend me a couple million quid?’ Obviously
they’d just laugh at me. But that’s just because they know if my horse
didn’t come in, there’d be no way for them to get the money back. But,
imagine there was some law that said they were guaranteed to get their
money back no matter what happens, even if that meant, I don’t know,
selling my daughter into slavery or harvesting my organs or something.
Well, in that case, why not? Why bother waiting for someone to walk in
who has a viable plan to set up a laundromat or some such? Basically,
that’s the situation the IMF created on a global level—which is how you
could have all those banks willing to fork over billions of dollars to a
bunch of obvious crooks in the first place.”

I didn’t get quite that far, because at about that point a drunken
financier appeared, having noticed that we were talking about money, and
began telling funny stories about moral hazard—which somehow, before too
long, had morphed into a long and not particularly engrossing account of
one of his sexual conquests. I drifted off.

Still, for several days afterward, that phrase kept resonating in my
head.

“Surely one has to pay one’s debts.”

The reason it’s so powerful is that it’s not actually an economic
statement: it’s a moral statement. After all, isn’t paying one’s debts
what morality is supposed to be all about? Giving people what is due
them. Accepting one’s responsibilities. Fulfilling one’s obligations to
others, just as one would expect them to fulfill their obligations to
you. What could be a more obvious example of shirking one’s
responsibilities than reneging on a promise, or refusing to pay a debt?

It was that very apparent self-evidence, I realized, that made the
statement so insidious. This was the kind of line that could make
terrible things appear utterly bland and unremarkable. This may sound
strong, but it’s hard not to feel strongly about such matters once
you’ve witnessed the effects. I had. For almost two years, I had lived
in the highlands of Madagascar. Shortly before I arrived, there had been
an outbreak of malaria. It was a particularly virulent outbreak because
malaria had been wiped out in highland Madagascar many years before, so
that, after a couple of generations, most people had lost their
immunity. The problem was, it took money to maintain the mosquito
eradication program, since there had to be periodic tests to make sure
mosquitoes weren’t starting to breed again and spraying campaigns if it
was discovered that they were. Not a lot of money. But owing to
IMF-imposed austerity programs, the government had to cut the monitoring
program. Ten thousand people died. I met young mothers grieving for lost
children. One might think it would be hard to make a case that the loss
of ten thousand human lives is really justified in order to ensure that
Citibank wouldn’t have to cut its losses on one irresponsible loan that
wasn’t particularly important to its balance sheet anyway. But here was
a perfectly decent woman—one who worked for a charitable organization,
no less—who took it as self-evident that it was. After all, they owed
the money, and surely one has to pay one’s debts.

[]

For the next few weeks, that phrase kept coming back at me. Why debt?
What makes the concept so strangely powerful? Consumer debt is the
lifeblood of our economy. All modern nation-states are built on deficit
spending. Debt has come to be the central issue of international
politics. But nobody seems to know exactly what it is, or how to think
about it.

The very fact that we don’t know what debt is, the very flexibility of
the concept, is the basis of its power. If history shows anything, it is
that there’s no better way to justify relations founded on violence, to
make such relations seem moral, than by reframing them in the language
of debt—above all, because it immediately makes it seem that it’s the
victim who’s doing something wrong. Mafiosi understand this. So do the
commanders of conquering armies. For thousands of years, violent men
have been able to tell their victims that those victims owe them
something. If nothing else, they “owe them their lives” (a telling
phrase) because they haven’t been killed.

Nowadays, for example, military aggression is defined as a crime against
humanity, and international courts, when they are brought to bear,
usually demand that aggressors pay compensation. Germany had to pay
massive reparations after World War I, and Iraq is still paying Kuwait
for Saddam Hussein’s invasion in 1990. Yet the Third World debt, the
debt of countries like Madagascar, Bolivia, and the Philippines, seems
to work precisely the other way around. Third World debtor nations are
almost exclusively countries that have at one time been attacked and
conquered by European countries—often, the very countries to whom they
now owe money. In 1895, for example, France invaded Madagascar,
disbanded the government of then–Queen Ranavalona III, and declared the
country a French colony. One of the first things General Gallieni did
after “pacification,” as they liked to call it then, was to impose heavy
taxes on the Malagasy population, in part so they could reimburse the
costs of having been invaded, but also, since French colonies were
supposed to be fiscally self-supporting, to defray the costs of building
the railroads, highways, bridges, plantations, and so forth that the
French regime wished to build. Malagasy taxpayers were never asked
whether they wanted these railroads, highways, bridges, and plantations,
or allowed much input into where and how they were built.¹ To the
contrary: over the next half century, the French army and police
slaughtered quite a number of Malagasy who objected too strongly to the
arrangement (upwards of half a million, by some reports, during one
revolt in 1947). It’s not as if Madagascar has ever done any comparable
damage to France. Despite this, from the beginning, the Malagasy people
were told they owed France money, and to this day, the Malagasy people
are still held to owe France money, and the rest of the world accepts
the justice of this arrangement. When the “international community” does
perceive a moral issue, it’s usually when they feel the Malagasy
government is being slow to pay their debts.

But debt is not just victor’s justice; it can also be a way of punishing
winners who weren’t supposed to win. The most spectacular example of
this is the history of the Republic of Haiti—the first poor country to
be placed in permanent debt peonage. Haiti was a nation founded by
former plantation slaves who had the temerity not only to rise up in
rebellion, amidst grand declarations of universal rights and freedoms,
but to defeat Napoleon’s armies sent to return them to bondage. France
immediately insisted that the new republic owed it 150 million francs in
damages for the expropriated plantations, as well as the expenses of
outfitting the failed military expeditions, and all other nations,
including the United States, agreed to impose an embargo on the country
until it was paid. The sum was intentionally impossible (equivalent to
about 18 billion dollars), and the resultant embargo ensured that the
name “Haiti” has been a synonym for debt, poverty, and human misery ever
since.²

Sometimes, though, debt seems to mean the very opposite. Starting in the
1980s, the United States, which insisted on strict terms for the
repayment of Third World debt, itself accrued debts that easily dwarfed
those of the entire Third World combined—mainly fueled by military
spending. The U.S. foreign debt, though, takes the form of treasury
bonds held by institutional investors in countries (Germany, Japan,
South Korea, Taiwan, Thailand, the Gulf States) that are in most cases,
effectively, U.S. military protectorates, most covered in U.S. bases
full of arms and equipment paid for with that very deficit spending.
This has changed a little now that China has gotten in on the game
(China is a special case, for reasons that will be explained later), but
not very much—even China finds that the fact it holds so many U.S.
treasury bonds makes it to some degree beholden to U.S. interests,
rather than the other way around.

So what is the status of all this money continually being funneled into
the U.S. treasury? Are these loans? Or is it tribute? In the past,
military powers that maintained hundreds of military bases outside their
own home territory were ordinarily referred to as “empires,” and empires
regularly demanded tribute from subject peoples. The U.S. government, of
course, insists that it is not an empire—but one could easily make a
case that the only reason it insists on treating these payments as
“loans” and not as “tribute” is precisely to deny the reality of what’s
going on.

Now, it’s true that, throughout history, certain sorts of debt, and
certain sorts of debtor, have always been treated differently than
others. In the 1720s, one of the things that most scandalized the
British public when conditions at debtors’ prisons were exposed in the
popular press was the fact that these prisons were regularly divided
into two sections. Aristocratic inmates, who often thought of a brief
stay in Fleet or Marshalsea as something of a fashion statement, were
wined and dined by liveried servants and allowed to receive regular
visits from prostitutes. On the “common side,” impoverished debtors were
shackled together in tiny cells, “covered with filth and vermin,” as one
report put it, “and suffered to die, without pity, of hunger and jail
fever.”³

In a way you can see current world economic arrangements as a much
larger version of the same thing: the U.S. in this case being the
Cadillac debtor, Madagascar the pauper starving in the next cell—while
the Cadillac debtors’ servants lecture him on how his problems are due
to his own irresponsibility.

And there’s something more fundamental going on here, a philosophical
question, even, that we might do well to contemplate. What is the
difference between a gangster pulling out a gun and demanding you give
him a thousand dollars of “protection money,” and that same gangster
pulling out a gun and demanding you provide him with a thousand-dollar
“loan”? In most ways, obviously, nothing. But in certain ways there _is_
a difference. As in the case of the U.S. debt to Korea or Japan, were
the balance of power at any point to shift, were America to lose its
military supremacy, were the gangster to lose his henchmen, that “loan”
might start being treated very differently. It might become a genuine
liability. But the crucial element would still seem to be the gun.

There’s an old vaudeville gag that makes the same point even more
elegantly—here, as improved on by Steve Wright:

I was walking down the street with a friend the other day and a guy with
a gun jumps out of an alley and says “stick ’em up.”

As I pull out my wallet, I figure, “shouldn’t be a total loss.” So I
pull out some money, turn to my friend and say, “Hey, Fred, here’s that
fifty bucks I owe you.”

The robber was so offended he took out a thousand dollars of his own
money, forced Fred to lend it to me at gunpoint, and then took it back
again.

In the final analysis, the man with the gun doesn’t have to do anything
he doesn’t want to do. But in order to be able to run even a regime
based on violence effectively, one needs to establish some kind of set
of rules. The rules can be completely arbitrary. In a way it doesn’t
even matter what they are. Or, at least, it doesn’t matter at first. The
problem is, the moment one starts framing things in terms of debt,
people will inevitably start asking who really owes what to whom.

Arguments about debt have been going on for at least five thousand
years. For most of human history—at least, the history of states and
empires—most human beings have been told that they are debtors.⁴
Historians, and particularly historians of ideas, have been oddly
reluctant to consider the human consequences; especially since this
situation—more than any other—has caused continual outrage and
resentment. Tell people they are inferior, they are unlikely to be
pleased, but this surprisingly rarely leads to armed revolt. Tell people
that they are potential equals who have failed, and that therefore, even
what they do have they do not deserve, that it isn’t rightly theirs, and
you are much more likely to inspire rage. Certainly this is what history
would seem to teach us. For thousands of years, the struggle between
rich and poor has largely taken the form of conflicts between creditors
and debtors—of arguments about the rights and wrongs of interest
payments, debt peonage, amnesty, repossession, restitution, the
sequestering of sheep, the seizing of vineyards, and the selling of
debtors’ children into slavery. By the same token, for the last five
thousand years, with remarkable regularity, popular insurrections have
begun the same way: with the ritual destruction of the debt
records—tablets, papyri, ledgers, whatever form they might have taken in
any particular time and place. (After that, rebels usually go after the
records of landholding and tax assessments.) As the great classicist
Moses Finley often liked to say, in the ancient world, all revolutionary
movements had a single program: “Cancel the debts and redistribute the
land.”⁵

Our tendency to overlook this is all the more peculiar when you consider
how much of our contemporary moral and religious language originally
emerged directly from these very conflicts. Terms like “reckoning” or
“redemption” are only the most obvious, since they’re taken directly
from the language of ancient finance. In a larger sense, the same can be
said of “guilt,” “freedom,” “forgiveness,” and even “sin.” Arguments
about who really owes what to whom have played a central role in shaping
our basic vocabulary of right and wrong.

The fact that so much of this language did take shape in arguments about
debt has left the concept strangely incoherent. After all, to argue with
the king, one has to use the king’s language, whether or not the initial
premises make sense.

If one looks at the history of debt, then, what one discovers first of
all is profound moral confusion. Its most obvious manifestation is that
most everywhere, one finds that the majority of human beings hold
simultaneously that (1) paying back money one has borrowed is a simple
matter of morality, and (2) anyone in the habit of lending money is
evil.

It’s true that opinions on this latter point do shift back and forth.
One extreme possibility might be the situation the French anthropologist
Jean-Claude Galey encountered in a region of the eastern Himalayas,
where as recently as the 1970s, the low-ranking castes—they were
referred to as “the vanquished ones,” since they were thought to be
descended from a population once conquered by the current landlord
caste, many centuries before—lived in a situation of permanent debt
dependency. Landless and penniless, they were obliged to solicit loans
from the landlords simply to find a way to eat—not for the money, since
the sums were paltry, but because poor debtors were expected to pay back
the interest in the form of work, which meant they were at least
provided with food and shelter while they cleaned out their creditors’
outhouses and reroofed their sheds. For the “vanquished”—as for most
people in the world, actually—the most significant life expenses were
weddings and funerals. These required a good deal of money, which always
had to be borrowed. In such cases it was common practice, Galey
explains, for high-caste moneylenders to demand one of the borrower’s
daughters as security. Often, when a poor man had to borrow money for
his daughter’s marriage, the security would be the bride herself. She
would be expected to report to the lender’s household after her wedding
night, spend a few months there as his concubine, and then, once he grew
bored, be sent off to some nearby timber camp, where she would have to
spend the next year or two as a prostitute working off her father’s
debt. Once it was paid off, she’d return to her husband and begin her
married life.⁶

This seems shocking, outrageous even, but Galey does not report any
widespread feeling of injustice. Everyone seemed to feel that this was
just the way things worked. Neither was there much concern voiced among
the local Brahmins, who were the ultimate arbiters in matters of
morality—though this is hardly surprising, since the most prominent
moneylenders were often Brahmins themselves.

Even here, of course, it’s hard to know what people were saying behind
closed doors. If a group of Maoist rebels were to suddenly seize control
of the area (some do operate in this part of rural India) and round up
the local usurers for trial, we might hear all sorts of views expressed.

Still, what Galey describes represents, as I say, one extreme of
possibility: one in which the usurers themselves are the ultimate moral
authorities. Compare this with, say, medieval France, where the moral
status of moneylenders was seriously in question. The Catholic Church
had always forbidden the practice of lending money at interest, but the
rules often fell into desuetude, causing the Church hierarchy to
authorize preaching campaigns, sending mendicant friars to travel from
town to town warning usurers that unless they repented and made full
restitution of all interest extracted from their victims, they would
surely go to Hell.

These sermons, many of which have survived, are full of horror stories
of God’s judgment on unrepentant lenders: stories of rich men struck
down by madness or terrible diseases, haunted by deathbed nightmares of
the snakes or demons who would soon rend or eat their flesh. In the
twelfth century, when such campaigns reached their heights, more direct
sanctions began to be employed. The papacy issued instructions to local
parishes that all known usurers were to be excommunicated; they were not
to be allowed to receive the sacraments, and under no conditions could
their bodies be buried on hallowed ground. One French cardinal, Jacques
de Vitry, writing around 1210, recorded the story of a particularly
influential moneylender whose friends tried to pressure their parish
priest to overlook the rules and allow him to be buried in the local
churchyard:

Since the dead usurer’s friends were very insistent, the priest yielded
to their pressure and said, “Let us put his body on a donkey and see
God’s will, and what He will do with the body. Wherever the donkey takes
it, be it a church, a cemetery, or elsewhere, there will I bury it.” The
body was placed upon the donkey which without deviating either to right
or left, took it straight out of town to the place where thieves are
hanged from the gibbet, and with a hearty buck, sent the cadaver flying
into the dung beneath the gallows.⁷

Looking over world literature, it is almost impossible to find a single
sympathetic representation of a moneylender—or anyway, a professional
moneylender, which means by definition one who charges interest. I’m not
sure there is another profession (executioners?) with such a
consistently bad image. It’s especially remarkable when one considers
that unlike executioners, usurers often rank among the richest and most
powerful people in their communities. Yet the very name, “usurer,”
evokes images of loan sharks, blood money, pounds of flesh, the selling
of souls, and behind them all, the Devil, often represented as himself a
kind of usurer, an evil accountant with his books and ledgers, or
alternately, as the figure looming just behind the usurer, biding his
time until he can repossess the soul of a villain who, by his very
occupation, has clearly made a compact with Hell.

Historically, there have been only two effective ways for a lender to
try to wriggle out of the opprobrium: either shunt off responsibility
onto some third party, or insist that the borrower is even worse. In
medieval Europe, for instance, lords often took the first approach,
employing Jews as surrogates. Many would even speak of “our” Jews—that
is, Jews under their personal protection—though in practice this usually
meant that they would first deny Jews in their territories any means of
making a living except by usury (guaranteeing that they would be widely
detested), then periodically turn on them, claiming they were detestable
creatures, and take the money for themselves. The second approach is of
course more common. But it usually leads to the conclusion that both
parties to a loan are equally guilty; the whole affair is a shabby
business; and most likely, both are damned.

Other religious traditions have different perspectives. In medieval
Hindu law codes, not only were interest-bearing loans permissible (the
main stipulation was that interest should never exceed principal), but
it was often emphasized that a debtor who did not pay would be reborn as
a slave in the household of his creditor—or in later codes, reborn as
his horse or ox. The same tolerant attitude toward lenders, and warnings
of karmic revenge against borrowers, reappear in many strands of
Buddhism. Even so, the moment that usurers were thought to go too far,
exactly the same sort of stories as found in Europe would start
appearing. A Medieval Japanese author recounts one—he insists it’s a
true story—about the terrifying fate of Hiromushime, the wife of a
wealthy district governor around 776 ad. An exceptionally greedy woman,

she would add water to the rice wine she sold and make a huge profit on
such diluted saké. On the day she loaned something to someone she would
use a small measuring cup, but on the day of collection she used a large
one. When lending rice her scale registered small portions, but when she
received payment it was in large amounts. The interest that she forcibly
collected was tremendous—often as much as ten or even one hundred times
the amount of the original loan. She was rigid about collecting debts,
showing no mercy whatsoever. Because of this, many people were thrown
into a state of anxiety; they abandoned their households to get away
from her and took to wandering in other provinces.⁸

After she died, for seven days, monks prayed over her sealed coffin. On
the seventh, her body mysteriously sprang to life:

Those who came to look at her encountered an indescribable stench. From
the waist up she had already become an ox with four-inch horns
protruding from her forehead. Her two hands had become the hooves of an
ox, her nails were now cracked so that they resembled an ox hoof’s
instep. From the waist down, however, her body was that of a human. She
disliked rice and preferred to eat grass. Her manner of eating was
rumination. Naked, she would lie in her own excrement.⁹

Gawkers descended. Guilty and ashamed, the family made desperate
attempts to buy forgiveness, canceling all debts owed to them by
anybody, donating much of their wealth to religious establishments.
Finally, mercifully, the monster died.

The author, himself a monk, felt that the story represented a clear case
of premature reincarnation—the woman was being punished by the law of
karma for her violations of “what is both reasonable and right.” His
problem was that Buddhist scriptures, insofar as they explicitly weighed
in on the matter, didn’t provide a precedent. Normally, it was debtors
who were supposed to be reborn as oxen, not creditors. As a result, when
it came time to explain the moral of the story, his exposition grew
decidedly confusing:

It is as one sutra says: “When we do not repay the things that we have
borrowed, our payment becomes that of being reborn as a horse or ox.”
“The debtor is like a slave, the creditor is like a master.” Or again:
“a debtor is a pheasant and his creditor a hawk.” If you are in a
situation of having granted a loan, do not put unreasonable pressure on
your debtor for repayment. If you do, you will be reborn as a horse or
an ox and be put to work for him who was in debt to you, and then you
will repay many times over.¹⁰

So which will it be? They can’t both end up as animals in each other’s
barns.

All the great religious traditions seem to bang up against this quandary
in one form or another. On the one hand, insofar as all human relations
involve debt, they are all morally compromised. Both parties are
probably already guilty of something just by entering into the
relationship; at the very least they run a significant danger of
becoming guilty if repayment is delayed. On the other hand, when we say
someone acts like they “don’t owe anything to anybody,” we’re hardly
describing the person as a paragon of virtue. In the secular world,
morality consists largely of fulfilling our obligations to others, and
we have a stubborn tendency to imagine those obligations as debts.
Monks, perhaps, can avoid the dilemma by detaching themselves from the
secular world entirely, but the rest of us appear condemned to live in a
universe that doesn’t make a lot of sense.

[]

The story of Hiromushime is a perfect illustration of the impulse to
throw the accusation back at the accuser—just as in the story about the
dead usurer and the donkey, the emphasis on excrement, animals, and
humiliation is clearly meant as poetic justice, the creditor forced to
experience the same feelings of disgrace and degradation that debtors
are always made to feel. It’s all a more vivid, more visceral way of
asking that same question: “Who really owes what to whom?”

It’s also a perfect illustration of how the moment one asks the question
“Who really owes what to whom?,” one has begun to adopt the creditor’s
language. Just as if we don’t pay our debts, “our payment becomes that
of being reborn as a horse or an ox”; so if you are an unreasonable
creditor, you too will “repay.” Even karmic justice can thus be reduced
to the language of a business deal.

Here we come to the central question of this book: What, precisely, does
it mean to say that our sense of morality and justice is reduced to the
language of a business deal? What does it mean when we reduce moral
obligations to debts? What changes when the one turns into the other?
And how do we speak about them when our language has been so shaped by
the market? On one level the difference between an obligation and a debt
is simple and obvious. A debt is the obligation to pay a certain sum of
money. As a result, a debt, unlike any other form of obligation, can be
precisely quantified. This allows debts to become simple, cold, and
impersonal—which, in turn, allows them to be transferable. If one owes a
favor, or one’s life, to another human being—it is owed to that person
specifically. But if one owes forty thousand dollars at 12-percent
interest, it doesn’t really matter who the creditor is; neither does
either of the two parties have to think much about what the other party
needs, wants, is capable of doing—as they certainly would if what was
owed was a favor, or respect, or gratitude. One does not need to
calculate the human effects; one need only calculate principal,
balances, penalties, and rates of interest. If you end up having to
abandon your home and wander in other provinces, if your daughter ends
up in a mining camp working as a prostitute, well, that’s unfortunate,
but incidental to the creditor. Money is money, and a deal’s a deal.

From this perspective, the crucial factor, and a topic that will be
explored at length in these pages, is money’s capacity to turn morality
into a matter of impersonal arithmetic—and by doing so, to justify
things that would otherwise seem outrageous or obscene. The factor of
violence, which I have been emphasizing up until now, may appear
secondary. The difference between a “debt” and a mere moral obligation
is not the presence or absence of men with weapons who can enforce that
obligation by seizing the debtor’s possessions or threatening to break
his legs. It is simply that a creditor has the means to specify,
numerically, exactly how much the debtor owes.

However, when one looks a little closer, one discovers that these two
elements—the violence and the quantification—are intimately linked. In
fact it’s almost impossible to find one without the other. French
usurers had powerful friends and enforcers, capable of bullying even
Church authorities. How else would they have collected debts that were
technically illegal? Hiromushime was utterly uncompromising with her
debtors—“showing no mercy whatsoever”—but then, her husband was the
governor. She didn’t have to show mercy. Those of us who do not have
armed men behind us cannot afford to be so exacting.

The way violence, or the threat of violence, turns human relations into
mathematics will crop up again and again over the course of this book.
It is the ultimate source of the moral confusion that seems to float
around everything surrounding the topic of debt. The resulting dilemmas
appear to be as old as civilization itself. We can observe the process
in the very earliest records from ancient Mesopotamia; it finds its
first philosophical expression in the Vedas, reappears in endless forms
throughout recorded history, and still lies underneath the essential
fabric of our institutions today—state and market, our most basic
conceptions of the nature of freedom, morality, sociality—all of which
have been shaped by a history of war, conquest, and slavery in ways
we’re no longer capable of even perceiving because we can no longer
imagine things any other way.

[]

There are obvious reasons why this is a particularly important moment to
reexamine the history of debt. September 2008 saw the beginning of a
financial crisis that almost brought the entire world economy screeching
to a halt. In many ways the world economy did: ships stopped moving
across the oceans, and thousands were placed in dry dock. Building
cranes were dismantled, as no more buildings were being put up. Banks
largely ceased making loans. In the wake of this, there was not only
public rage and bewilderment, but the beginning of an actual public
conversation about the nature of debt, of money, of the financial
institutions that have come to hold the fate of nations in their grip.

But that was just a moment. The conversation never ended up taking
place.

The reason that people were ready for such a conversation was that the
story everyone had been told for the last decade or so had just been
revealed to be a colossal lie. There’s really no nicer way to say it.
For years, everyone had been hearing of a whole host of new,
ultra-sophisticated financial innovations: credit and commodity
derivatives, collateralized mortgage obligation derivatives, hybrid
securities, debt swaps, and so on. These new derivative markets were so
incredibly sophisticated, that—according to one persistent story—a
prominent investment house had to employ astrophysicists to run trading
programs so complex that even the financiers couldn’t begin to
understand them. The message was transparent: leave these things to the
professionals. You couldn’t possibly get your minds around this. Even if
you don’t like financial capitalists very much (and few seemed inclined
to argue that there was much to like about them), they were nothing if
not capable, in fact so preternaturally capable, that democratic
oversight of financial markets was simply inconceivable. (Even a lot of
academics fell for it. I well remember going to conferences in 2006 and
2007 where trendy social theorists presented papers arguing that these
new forms of securitization, linked to new information technologies,
heralded a looming transformation in the very nature of time,
possibility—reality itself. I remember thinking: “Suckers!” And so they
were.)

Then, when the rubble had stopped bouncing, it turned out that many if
not most of them had been nothing more than very elaborate scams. They
consisted of operations like selling poor families mortgages crafted in
such a way as to make eventual default inevitable; taking bets on how
long it would take the holders to default; packaging mortgage and bet
together and selling them to institutional investors (representing,
perhaps, the mortgage-holders’ retirement accounts) claiming that it
would make money no matter what happened, and allow said investors to
pass such packages around as if they were money; turning over
responsibility for paying off the bet to a giant insurance conglomerate
that, were it to sink beneath the weight of its resultant debt (which
certainly would happen), would then have to be bailed out by taxpayers
(as such conglomerates were indeed bailed out).¹¹ In other words, it
looks very much like an unusually elaborate version of what banks were
doing when they lent money to dictators in Bolivia and Gabon in the late
’70s: make utterly irresponsible loans with the full knowledge that,
once it became known they had done so, politicians and bureaucrats would
scramble to ensure that they’d still be reimbursed anyway, no matter how
many human lives had to be devastated and destroyed in order to do it.

The difference, though, was that this time, the bankers were doing it on
an inconceivable scale: the total amount of debt they had run up was
larger than the combined Gross Domestic Products of every country in the
world—and it threw the world into a tailspin and almost destroyed the
system itself.

Armies and police geared up to combat the expected riots and unrest, but
none materialized. But neither have any significant changes in how the
system is run. At the time, everyone assumed that, with the very
defining institutions of capitalism (Lehman Brothers, Citibank, General
Motors) crumbling, and all claims to superior wisdom revealed to be
false, we would at least restart a broader conversation about the nature
of debt and credit institutions. And not just a convwersation.

It seemed that most Americans were open to radical solutions. Surveys
showed that an overwhelming majority of Americans felt that the banks
should not be rescued, _whatever the economic consequences_, but that
ordinary citizens stuck with bad mortgages should be bailed out. In the
United States this is quite extraordinary. Since colonial days,
Americans have been the population least sympathetic to debtors. In a
way this is odd, since America was settled largely by absconding
debtors, but it’s a country where the idea that morality is a matter of
paying one’s debts runs deeper than almost any other. In colonial days,
an insolvent debtor’s ear was often nailed to a post. The United States
was one of the last countries in the world to adopt a law of bankruptcy:
despite the fact that in 1787, the Constitution specifically charged the
new government with creating one, all attempts were rejected on “moral
grounds” until 1898.¹² The change was epochal. For this very reason,
perhaps, those in charge of moderating debate in the media and
legislatures decided that this was not the time. The United States
government effectively put a three-trillion-dollar Band-Aid over the
problem and changed nothing. The bankers were rescued; small-scale
debtors—with a paltry few exceptions—were not.¹³ To the contrary, in the
middle of the greatest economic recession since the ’30s, we are already
beginning to see a backlash against them—driven by financial
corporations who have now turned to the same government that bailed them
out to apply the full force of the law against ordinary citizens in
financial trouble. “It’s not a crime to owe money,” reports the
Minneapolis-St. Paul _StarTribune_, “But people are routinely being
thrown in jail for failing to pay debts.” In Minnesota, “the use of
arrest warrants against debtors has jumped 60 percent over the past four
years, with 845 cases in 2009 … In Illinois and southwest Indiana, some
judges jail debtors for missing court-ordered debt payments. In extreme
cases, people stay in jail until they raise a minimum payment. In
January [2010], a judge sentenced a Kenney, Ill., man ‘to indefinite
incarceration’ until he came up with $300 toward a lumber yard debt.”¹⁴

In other words, we are moving toward a restoration of something much
like debtors’ prisons. Meanwhile, the conversation stopped dead, popular
rage against bailouts sputtered into incoherence, and we seem to be
tumbling inexorably toward the next great financial catastrophe—the only
real question being just how long it will take.

We have reached the point at which the IMF itself, now trying to
reposition itself as the conscience of global capitalism, has begun to
issue warnings that if we continue on the present course, no bailout is
likely to be forthcoming the next time. The public simply will not stand
for it, and as a result, everything really will come apart. “IMF Warns
Second Bailout Would ‘Threaten Democracy’ ” reads one recent headline.¹⁵
(Of course by “democracy” they mean “capitalism.”) Surely it means
something that even those who feel they are responsible for keeping the
current global economic system running, who just a few years ago acted
as if they could simply assume the current system would be around
forever, are now seeing apocalypse everywhere.

[]

In this case, the IMF has a point. We have every reason to believe that
we do indeed stand on the brink of epochal changes.

Admittedly, the usual impulse is to imagine everything around us as
absolutely new. Nowhere is this so true as with money. How many times
have we been told that the advent of virtual money, the
dematerialization of cash into plastic and dollars into blips of
electronic information, has brought us to an unprecedented new financial
world? The assumption that we were in such uncharted territory, of
course, was one of the things that made it so easy for the likes of
Goldman Sachs and AIG to convince people that no one could possibly
understand their dazzling new financial instruments. The moment one
casts matters on a broad historical scale, though, the first thing one
learns is that there’s nothing new about virtual money. Actually, this
was the original form of money. Credit system, tabs, even expense
accounts, all existed long before cash. These things are as old as
civilization itself. True, we also find that history tends to move back
and forth between periods dominated by bullion—where it’s assumed that
gold and silver _are_ money—and periods where money is assumed to be an
abstraction, a virtual unit of account. But historically, credit money
comes first, and what we are witnessing today is a return of assumptions
that would have been considered obvious common sense in, say, the Middle
Ages—or even ancient Mesopotamia.

But history does provide fascinating hints of what we might expect. For
instance: in the past, ages of virtual credit money almost invariably
involve the creation of institutions designed to prevent everything
going haywire—to stop the lenders from teaming up with bureaucrats and
politicians to squeeze everybody dry, as they seem to be doing now. They
are accompanied by the creation of institutions designed to protect
debtors. The new age of credit money we are in seems to have started
precisely backwards. It began with the creation of global institutions
like the IMF designed to protect not debtors, but creditors. At the same
time, on the kind of historical scale we’re talking about here, a decade
or two is nothing. We have very little idea what to expect.

[]

This book is a history of debt, then, but it also uses that history as a
way to ask fundamental questions about what human beings and human
society are or could be like—what we actually do owe each other, what it
even means to ask that question. As a result, the book begins by
attempting to puncture a series of myths—not only the Myth of Barter,
which is taken up in the first chapter, but also rival myths about
primordial debts to the gods, or to the state—that in one way or another
form the basis of our common-sense assumptions about the nature of
economy and society. In that common-sense view, the State and the Market
tower above all else as diametrically opposed principles. Historical
reality reveals, however, that they were born together and have always
been intertwined. The one thing that all these misconceptions have in
common, we will find, is that they tend to reduce all human relations to
exchange, as if our ties to society, even to the cosmos itself, can be
imagined in the same terms as a business deal. This leads to another
question: If not exchange, then what? In chapter five, I will begin to
answer the question by drawing on the fruits of anthropology to describe
a view of the moral basis of economic life; then return to the question
of the origins of money to demonstrate how the very principle of
exchange emerged largely as an effect of violence—that the real origins
of money are to be found in crime and recompense, war and slavery,
honor, debt, and redemption. That, in turn, opens the way to starting,
with chapter eight, an actual history of the last five thousand years of
debt and credit, with its great alternations between ages of virtual and
physical money. Many of the discoveries here are profoundly unexpected:
from the origins of modern conceptions of rights and freedoms in ancient
slave law, to the origins of investment capital in medieval Chinese
Buddhism, to the fact that many of Adam Smith’s most famous arguments
appear to have been cribbed from the works of free-market theorists from
medieval Persia (a story which, incidentally, has interesting
implications for understanding the current appeal of political Islam).
All of this sets the stage for a fresh approach to the last five hundred
years, dominated by capitalist empires, and allows us to at least begin
asking what might really be at stake in the present day.

For a very long time, the intellectual consensus has been that we can no
longer ask Great Questions. Increasingly, it’s looking like we have no
other choice.



CHAPTER TWO  THE MYTH OF BARTER


_For every subtle and complicated question, there is a perfectly simple
and straightforward answer, which is wrong_.

—H.L. Mencken

WHAT IS THE DIFFERENCE between a mere obligation, a sense that one ought
to behave in a certain way, or even that one owes something to someone,
and a _debt_, properly speaking? The answer is simple: money. The
difference between a debt and an obligation is that a debt can be
precisely quantified. This requires money.

Not only is it money that makes debt possible: money and debt appear on
the scene at exactly the same time. Some of the very first written
documents that have come down to us are Mesopotamian tablets recording
credits and debits, rations issued by temples, money owed for rent of
temple lands, the value of each precisely specified in grain and silver.
Some of the earliest works of moral philosophy, in turn, are reflections
on what it means to imagine morality as debt—that is, in terms of money.

A history of debt, then, is thus necessarily a history of money—and the
easiest way to understand the role that debt has played in human society
is simply to follow the forms that money has taken, and the way money
has been used, across the centuries—and the arguments that inevitably
ensued about what all this means. Still, this is necessarily a very
different history of money than we are used to. When economists speak of
the origins of money, for example, debt is always something of an
afterthought. First comes barter, then money; credit only develops
later. Even if one consults books on the history of money in, say,
France, India, or China, what one generally gets is a history of
coinage, with barely any discussion of credit arrangements at all. For
almost a century, anthropologists like me have been pointing out that
there is something very wrong with this picture. The standard
economic-history version has little to do with anything we observe when
we examine how economic life is actually conducted, in real communities
and marketplaces, almost anywhere—where one is much more likely to
discover everyone in debt to everyone else in a dozen different ways,
and that most transactions take place without the use of currency.

Why the discrepancy?

Some of it is just the nature of the evidence: coins are preserved in
the archeological record; credit arrangements usually are not. Still,
the problem runs deeper. The existence of credit and debt has always
been something of a scandal for economists, since it’s almost impossible
to pretend that those lending and borrowing money are acting on purely
“economic” motivations (for instance, that a loan to a stranger is the
same as a loan to one’s cousin); it seems important, therefore, to begin
the story of money in an imaginary world from which credit and debt have
been entirely erased. Before we can apply the tools of anthropology to
reconstruct the real history of money, we need to understand what’s
wrong with the conventional account.

Economists generally speak of three functions of money: medium of
exchange, unit of account, and store of value. All economic textbooks
treat the first as primary. Here’s a fairly typical extract from
_Economics_, by Case, Fair, Gärtner, and Heather (1996):

Money is vital to the working of a market economy. Imagine what life
would be like without it. The alternative to a monetary economy is
barter, people exchanging goods and services for other goods and
services directly instead of exchanging via the medium of money.

How does a barter system work? Suppose you want croissants, eggs and
orange juice for breakfast. Instead of going to the grocer’s and buying
these things with money, you would have to find someone who has these
items and is willing to trade them. You would also have to have
something the baker, the orange juice purveyor and the egg vendor want.
Having pencils to trade will do you no good if the baker and the orange
juice and egg sellers do not want pencils.

A barter system requires a double coincidence of wants for trade to take
place. That is, to effect a trade, I need not only have to find someone
who has what I want, but that person must also want what I have. Where
the range of traded goods is small, as it is in relatively
unsophisticated economies, it is not difficult to find someone to trade
with, and barter is often used.¹

This latter point is questionable, but it’s phrased in so vague a way
that it would be hard to disprove.

In a complex society with many goods, barter exchanges involve an
intolerable amount of effort. Imagine trying to find people who offer
for sale all the things you buy in a typical trip to the grocer’s, and
who are willing to accept goods that you have to offer in exchange for
their goods.

Some agreed-upon medium of exchange (or means of payment) neatly
eliminates the double coincidence of wants problem.²

It’s important to emphasize that this is not presented as something that
actually happened, but as a purely imaginary exercise. “To see that
society benefits from a medium of exchange” write Begg, Fischer and
Dornbuch (_Economics_, 2005), “imagine a barter economy.” “Imagine the
difficulty you would have today,” write Maunder, Myers, Wall, and Miller
(_Economics Explained_, 1991), “if you had to exchange your labor
directly for the fruits of someone else’s labor.” “Imagine,” write
Parkin and King (_Economics_, 1995), “you have roosters, but you want
roses.”³ One could multiply examples endlessly. Just about every
economics textbook employed today sets out the problem the same way.
Historically, they note, we know that there was a time when there was no
money. What must it have been like? Well, let us imagine an economy
something like today’s, except with no money. That would have been
decidedly inconvenient! Surely, people must have invented money for the
sake of efficiency.

The story of money for economists always begins with a fantasy world of
barter. The problem is where to locate this fantasy in time and space:
Are we talking about cave men, Pacific Islanders, the American frontier?
One textbook, by economists Joseph Stiglitz and John Driffill, takes us
to what appears to be an imaginary New England or Midwestern town:

One can imagine an old-style farmer bartering with the blacksmith, the
tailor, the grocer, and the doctor in his small town. For simple barter
to work, however, there must be a double coincidence of wants … Henry
has potatoes and wants shoes, Joshua has an extra pair of shoes and
wants potatoes. Bartering can make them both happier. But if Henry has
firewood and Joshua does not need any of that, then bartering for
Joshua’s shoes requires one or both of them to go searching for more
people in the hope of making a multilateral exchange. Money provides a
way to make multilateral exchange much simpler. Henry sells his firewood
to someone else for money and uses the money to buy Joshua’s shoes.⁴

Again this is just a make-believe land much like the present, except
with money somehow plucked away. As a result it makes no sense: Who in
their right mind would set up a grocery in such a place? And how would
they get supplies? But let’s leave that aside. There is a simple reason
why everyone who writes an economics textbook feels they have to tell us
the same story. For economists, it is in a very real sense the most
important story ever told. It was by telling it, in the significant year
of 1776, that Adam Smith, professor of moral philosophy at the
University of Glasgow, effectively brought the discipline of economics
into being.

He did not make up the story entirely out of whole cloth. Already in 330
bc, Aristotle was speculating along vaguely similar lines in his
treatise on politics. At first, he suggested, families must have
produced everything they needed for themselves. Gradually, some would
presumably have specialized, some growing corn, others making wine,
swapping one for the other.⁵ Money, Aristotle assumed, must have emerged
from such a process. But, like the medieval schoolmen who occasionally
repeated the story, Aristotle was never clear as to how.⁶

In the years after Columbus, as Spanish and Portuguese adventurers were
scouring the world for new sources of gold and silver, these vague
stories disappear. Certainly no one reported discovering a land of
barter. Most sixteenth- and seventeenth-century travelers in the West
Indies or Africa assumed that all societies would necessarily have their
own forms of money, since all societies had governments and all
governments issued money.⁷

Adam Smith, on the other hand, was determined to overturn the
conventional wisdom of his day. Above all, he objected to the notion
that money was a creation of government. In this, Smith was the
intellectual heir of the Liberal tradition of philosophers like John
Locke, who had argued that government begins in the need to protect
private property and operated best when it tried to limit itself to that
function. Smith expanded on the argument, insisting that property, money
and markets not only existed before political institutions but were the
very foundation of human society. It followed that insofar as government
should play any role in monetary affairs, it should limit itself to
guaranteeing the soundness of the currency. It was only by making such
an argument that he could insist that economics is itself a field of
human inquiry with its own principles and laws—that is, as distinct
from, say ethics or politics.

Smith’s argument is worth laying out in detail because it is, as I say,
the great founding myth of the discipline of economics.

What, he begins, is the basis of economic life, properly speaking? It is
“a certain propensity in human nature … the propensity to truck, barter,
and exchange one thing for another.” Animals don’t do this. “Nobody,”
Smith observes, “ever saw a dog make a fair and deliberate exchange of
one bone for another with another dog.”⁸ But humans, if left to their
own devices, will inevitably begin swapping and comparing things. This
is just what humans do. Even logic and conversation are really just
forms of trading, and as in all things, humans will always try to seek
their own best advantage, to seek the greatest profit they can from the
exchange.⁹

It is this drive to exchange, in turn, which creates that division of
labor responsible for all human achievement and civilization. Here the
scene shifts to another one of those economists’ faraway fantasylands—it
seems to be an amalgam of North American Indians and Central Asian
pastoral nomads:¹⁰

In a tribe of hunters or shepherds a particular person makes bows and
arrows, for example, with more readiness and dexterity than any other.
He frequently exchanges them for cattle or for venison with his
companions; and he finds at last that he can in this manner get more
cattle and venison, than if he himself went to the field to catch them.
From a regard to his own interest, therefore, the making of bows and
arrows grows to be his chief business, and he becomes a sort of
armourer. Another excels in making the frames and covers of their little
huts or moveable houses. He is accustomed to be of use in this way to
his neighbours, who reward him in the same manner with cattle and with
venison, till at last he finds it his interest to dedicate himself
entirely to this employment, and to become a sort of house-carpenter. In
the same manner a third becomes a smith or a brazier; a fourth a tanner
or dresser of hides or skins, the principal part of the clothing of
savages …

It’s only once we have expert arrow-makers, wigwam-makers, and so on
that people start realizing there’s a problem. Notice how, as in so many
examples, we have a tendency to slip from imaginary savages to
small-town shopkeepers.

But when the division of labor first began to take place, this power of
exchanging must frequently have been very much clogged and embarrassed
in its operations. One man, we shall suppose, has more of a certain
commodity than he himself has occasion for, while another has less. The
former consequently would be glad to dispose of, and the latter to
purchase, a part of this superfluity. But if this latter should chance
to have nothing that the former stands in need of, no exchange can be
made between them. The butcher has more meat in his shop than he himself
can consume, and the brewer and the baker would each of them be willing
to purchase a part of it. But they have nothing to offer in exchange …

[]

In order to avoid the inconveniency of such situations, every prudent
man in every period of society, after the first establishment of the
division of labor, must naturally have endeavored to manage his affairs
in such a manner, as to have at all times by him, besides the peculiar
produce of his own industry, a certain quantity of some one commodity or
other, such as he imagined that few people would be likely to refuse in
exchange for the produce of their industry.¹¹

So everyone will inevitably start stockpiling something they figure that
everyone else is likely to want. This has a paradoxical effect, because
at a certain point, rather than making that commodity less valuable
(since everyone already has some) it becomes more valuable (because it
becomes, effectively, currency):

Salt is said to be the common instrument of commerce and exchanges in
Abyssinia; a species of shells in some parts of the coast of India;
dried cod at Newfoundland; tobacco in Virginia; sugar in some of our
West India colonies; hides or dressed leather in some other countries;
and there is at this day a village in Scotland where it is not uncommon,
I am told, for a workman to carry nails instead of money to the baker’s
shop or the ale-house.¹²

Eventually, of course, at least for long-distance trade, it all boils
down to precious metals, since these are ideally suited to serve as
currency, being durable, portable, and able to be endlessly subdivided
into identical portions.

Different metals have been made use of by different nations for this
purpose. Iron was the common instrument of commerce among the ancient
Spartans; copper among the ancient Romans; and gold and silver among all
rich and commercial nations.

[]

Those metals seem originally to have been made use of for this purpose
in rude bars, without any stamp or coinage …

[]

The use of metals in this rude state was attended with two very
considerable inconveniencies; first with the trouble of weighing; and,
secondly, with that of assaying them. In the precious metals, where a
small difference in the quantity makes a great difference in the value,
even the business of weighing, with proper exactness, requires at least
very accurate weights and scales. The weighing of gold in particular is
an operation of some nicety …¹³

It’s easy to see where this is going. Using irregular metal ingots is
easier than barter, but wouldn’t standardizing the units—say, stamping
pieces of metal with uniform designations guaranteeing weight and
fineness, in different denominations—make things easier still? Clearly
it would, and so was coinage born. True, issuing coinage meant
governments had to get involved, since they generally ran the mints; but
in the standard version of the story, governments have only this one
limited role—to guarantee the money supply—and tend to do it badly,
since throughout history, unscrupulous kings have often cheated by
debasing the coinage and causing inflation and other sorts of political
havoc in what was originally a matter of simple economic common sense.

Tellingly, this story played a crucial role not only in founding the
discipline of economics, but in the very idea that there was something
called “the economy,” which operated by its own rules, separate from
moral or political life, that economists could take as their field of
study. “The economy” is where we indulge in our natural propensity to
truck and barter. We are still trucking and bartering. We always will
be. Money is simply the most efficient means.

Economists like Karl Menger and Stanley Jevons later improved on the
details of the story, most of all by adding various mathematical
equations to demonstrate that a random assortment of people with random
desires could, in theory, produce not only a single commodity to use as
money but a uniform price system. In the process, they also substituted
all sorts of impressive technical vocabulary (i.e., “inconveniences”
became “transaction costs”). The crucial thing, though, is that by now,
this story has become simple common sense for most people. We teach it
to children in schoolbooks and museums. Everybody knows it. “Once upon a
time, there was barter. It was difficult. So people invented money. Then
came the development of banking and credit.” It all forms a perfectly
simple, straightforward progression, a process of increasing
sophistication and abstraction that has carried humanity, logically and
inexorably, from the Stone Age exchange of mastodon tusks to stock
markets, hedge funds, and securitized derivatives.¹⁴

It really has become ubiquitous. Wherever we find money, we also find
the story. At one point, in the town of Arivonimamo, in Madagascar, I
had the privilege of interviewing a Kalanoro, a tiny ghostly creature
that a local spirit medium claimed to keep hidden away in a chest in his
home. The spirit belonged to the brother of a notorious local loan
shark, a horrible woman named Nordine, and to be honest I was a bit
reluctant to have anything to do with the family, but some of my friends
insisted—since after all, this was a creature from ancient times. The
creature spoke from behind a screen in an eerie, otherworldly quaver.
But all it was really interested in talking about was money. Finally,
slightly exasperated by the whole charade, I asked, “So, what did you
use for money back in ancient times, when you were still alive?”

The mysterious voice immediately replied, “No. We didn’t use money. In
ancient times we used to barter commodities directly, one for the
other …”

[]

The story, then, is everywhere. It is the founding myth of our system of
economic relations. It is so deeply established in common sense, even in
places like Madagascar, that most people on earth couldn’t imagine any
other way that money possibly could have come about.

The problem is there’s no evidence that it ever happened, and an
enormous amount of evidence suggesting that it did not.

For centuries now, explorers have been trying to find this fabled land
of barter—none with success. Adam Smith set his story in aboriginal
North America (others preferred Africa or the Pacific). In Smith’s time,
at least it could be said that reliable information on Native American
economic systems was unavailable in Scottish libraries. But by
mid-century, Lewis Henry Morgan’s descriptions of the Six Nations of the
Iroquois, among others, were widely published—and they made clear that
the main economic institution among the Iroquois nations were longhouses
where most goods were stockpiled and then allocated by women’s councils,
and no one ever traded arrowheads for slabs of meat. Economists simply
ignored this information.¹⁵ Stanley Jevons, for example, who in 1871
wrote what has come to be considered the classic book on the origins of
money, took his examples straight from Smith, with Indians swapping
venison for elk and beaver hides, and made no use of actual descriptions
of Indian life that made it clear that Smith had simply made this up.
Around that same time, missionaries, adventurers, and colonial
administrators were fanning out across the world, many bringing copies
of Smith’s book with them, expecting to find the land of barter. None
ever did. They discovered an almost endless variety of economic systems.
But to this day, no one has been able to locate a part of the world
where the ordinary mode of economic transaction between neighbors takes
the form of “I’ll give you twenty chickens for that cow.”

The definitive anthropological work on barter, by Caroline Humphrey, of
Cambridge, could not be more definitive in its conclusions: “No example
of a barter economy, pure and simple, has ever been described, let alone
the emergence from it of money; all available ethnography suggests that
there never has been such a thing.”¹⁶

Now, all this hardly means that barter does not exist—or even that it’s
never practiced by the sort of people that Smith would refer to as
“savages.” It just means that it’s almost never employed, as Smith
imagined, between fellow villagers. Ordinarily, it takes place between
strangers, even enemies. Let us begin with the Nambikwara of Brazil.
They would seem to fit all the criteria: they are a simple society
without much in the way of division of labor, organized into small bands
that traditionally numbered at best a hundred people each. Occasionally
if one band spots the cooking fires of another in their vicinity, they
will send emissaries to negotiate a meeting for purposes of trade. If
the offer is accepted, they will first hide their women and children in
the forest, then invite the men of other band to visit camp. Each band
has a chief; once everyone has been assembled, each chief gives a formal
speech praising the other party and belittling his own; everyone puts
aside their weapons to sing and dance together—though the dance is one
that mimics military confrontation. Then, individuals from each side
approach each other to trade:

If an individual wants an object he extols it by saying how fine it is.
If a man values an object and wants much in exchange for it, instead of
saying that it is very valuable he says that it is no good, thus showing
his desire to keep it. “This axe is no good, it is very old, it is very
dull,” he will say, referring to his axe which the other wants.

This argument is carried on in an angry tone of voice until a settlement
is reached. When agreement has been reached each snatches the object out
of the other’s hand. If a man has bartered a necklace, instead of taking
it off and handing it over, the other person must take it off with a
show of force. Disputes, often leading to fights, occur when one party
is a little premature and snatches the object before the other has
finished arguing.¹⁷

The whole business concludes with a great feast at which the women
reappear, but this too can lead to problems, since amidst the music and
good cheer, there is ample opportunity for seductions.¹⁸ This sometimes
led to jealous quarrels. Occasionally, people would get killed.

Barter, then, for all the festive elements, was carried out between
people who might otherwise be enemies and hovered about an inch away
from outright warfare—and, if the ethnographer is to be believed—if one
side later decided they had been taken advantage of, it could very
easily lead to actual wars.

To shift our spotlight halfway around the world to Western Arnhem Land
in Australia, where the Gunwinggu people are famous for entertaining
neighbors in rituals of ceremonial barter called the _dzamalag_. Here
the threat of actual violence seems much more distant. Partly, this is
because things are made easier by the existence of a moiety system that
embraces the whole region: no one is allowed to marry, or even have sex
with, people of their own moiety, no matter where they come from, but
anyone from the other is technically a potential match. Therefore, for a
man, even in distant communities, half the women are strictly forbidden,
half of them fair game. The region is also united by local
specialization: each people has its own trade product to be bartered
with the others.

What follows is from a description of a _dzamalag_ held in the 1940s, as
observed by an anthropologist named Ronald Berndt.

Once again, it begins as strangers, after some initial negotiations, are
invited into the hosts’ main camp. The visitors in this particular
example were famous for their “much-prized serrated spears”—their hosts
had access to good European cloth. The trading begins when the visiting
party, which consisted of both men and women, enters the camp’s dancing
ground of “ring place,” and three of them began to entertain their hosts
with music. Two men start singing, a third accompanies them on the
_didjeridu_. Before long, women from the hosts’ side come and attack the
musicians:

Men and women rise and begin to dance. The _dzamalag_ opens when two
Gunwinggu women of the opposite moiety to the singing men “give
_dzamalag”_ to the latter. They present each man with a piece of cloth,
and hit or touch him, pulling him down on the ground, calling him a
_dzamalag_ husband, and joking with him in an erotic vein. Then another
woman of the opposite moiety to the pipe player gives him cloth, hits
and jokes with him.

This sets in motion the _dzamalag_ exchange. Men from the visiting group
sit quietly while women of the opposite moiety come over and give them
cloth, hit them, and invite them to copulate; they take any liberty they
choose with the men, amid amusement and applause, while the singing and
dancing continue. Women try to undo the men’s loin coverings or touch
their penises, and to drag them from the “ring place” for coitus. The
men go with their _dzamalag_ partners, with a show of reluctance, to
copulate in the bushes away from the fires which light up the dancers.
They may give the women tobacco or beads. When the women return, they
give part of this tobacco to their own husbands, who have encouraged
them to go _dzamalag_. The husbands, in turn, use the tobacco to pay
their own female _dzamalag_ partners …¹⁹

New singers and musicians appear, are again assaulted and dragged off to
the bushes; men encourage their wives “not to be shy,” so as to maintain
the Gunwinggu reputation for hospitality; eventually those men also take
the initiative with the visitors’ wives, offering cloth, hitting them,
and leading them off into the bushes. Beads and tobacco circulate.
Finally, once participants have all paired off at least once, and the
guests are satisfied with the cloth they have acquired, the women stop
dancing and stand in two rows and the visitors line up to repay them.

Then visiting men of one moiety dance towards the women of the opposite
moiety, in order to “give them _dzamalag.”_ They hold shovel-nosed
spears poised, pretending to spear the women, but instead hit them with
the flat of the blade. “We will not spear you, for we have already
speared you with our penises.” They present the spears to the women.
Then visiting men of the other moiety go through the same actions with
the women of their opposite moiety, giving them spears with serrated
points. This terminates the ceremony, which is followed by a large
distribution of food.²⁰

This is a particularly dramatic case, but dramatic cases are revealing.
What the Gunwinggu hosts appear to have been able to do here, owing to
the relatively amicable relations between neighboring peoples in Western
Arnhem Land, is to take all the elements in Nambikwara barter (the music
and dancing, the potential hostility, the sexual intrigue), and turn it
all into a kind of festive game—one not, perhaps, without its dangers,
but (as the ethnographer emphasizes) considered enormous fun by everyone
concerned.

What all such cases of trade through barter have in common is that they
are meetings with strangers who will, likely as not, never meet again,
and with whom one certainly will not enter into any ongoing relations.
This is why a direct one-on-one exchange is appropriate: each side makes
their trade and walks away. It’s all made possible by laying down an
initial mantle of sociability, in the form of shared pleasures, music
and dance—the usual base of conviviality on which trade must always be
built. Then comes the actual trading, where both sides make a great
display of the latent hostility that necessarily exists in any exchange
of material goods between strangers—where neither party has no
particular reason _not_ to take advantage of the other—by playful mock
aggression, though in the Nambikwara case, where the mantle of
sociability is extremely thin, mock aggression is in constant danger of
slipping over into the real thing. The Gunwinggu, with their more
relaxed attitude toward sexuality, have quite ingeniously managed to
make the shared pleasures and aggression into exactly the same thing.

Recall here the language of the economics textbooks: “Imagine a society
without money.” “Imagine a barter economy.” One thing these examples
make abundantly clear is just how limited the imaginative powers of most
economists turn out to be.²¹

Why? The simplest answer would be: for there to even be a discipline
called “economics,” a discipline that concerns itself first and foremost
with how individuals seek the most advantageous arrangement for the
exchange of shoes for potatoes, or cloth for spears, it must assume that
the exchange of such goods need have nothing to do with war, passion,
adventure, mystery, sex, or death. Economics assumes a division between
different spheres of human behavior that, among people like the
Gunwinngu and the Nambikwara, simply does not exist. These divisions in
turn are made possible by very specific institutional arrangements: the
existence of lawyers, prisons, and police, to ensure that even people
who don’t like each other very much, who have no interest in developing
any kind of ongoing relationship, but are simply interested in getting
their hands on as much of the others’ possessions as possible, will
nonetheless refrain from the most obvious expedient (theft). This in
turn allows us to assume that life is neatly divided between the
marketplace, where we do our shopping, and the “sphere of consumption,”
where we concern ourselves with music, feasts, and seduction. In other
words, the vision of the world that forms the basis of the economics
textbooks, which Adam Smith played so large a part in promulgating, has
by now become so much a part of our common sense that we find it hard to
imagine any other possible arrangement.

From these examples, it begins to be clear why there are no societies
based on barter. Such a society could only be one in which everybody was
an inch away from everybody else’s throat; but nonetheless hovering
there, poised to strike but never actually striking, forever. True,
barter does sometimes occur between people who do not consider each
other strangers, but they’re usually people who might as well be
strangers—that is, who feel no sense of mutual responsibility or trust,
or the desire to develop ongoing relations. The Pukhtun of Northern
Pakistan, for instance, are famous for their open-handed hospitality.
Barter is what you do with those to whom you are _not_ bound by ties of
hospitality (or kinship, or much of anything else):

A favorite mode of exchange among men is barter, or _adal-badal_ (give
and take). Men are always on the alert for the possibility of bartering
one of their possessions for something better. Often the exchange is
like for like: a radio for a radio, sunglasses for sunglasses, a watch
for a watch. However, unlike objects can also be exchanged, such as, in
one instance, a bicycle for two donkeys. _Adal-badal_ is always
practiced with non-relatives and affords men a great deal of pleasure as
they attempt to get the advantage over their exchange partner. A good
exchange, in which a man feels he has gotten the better of the deal, is
cause for bragging and pride. If the exchange is bad, the recipient
tries to renege on the deal or, failing that, to palm off the faulty
object on someone unsuspecting. The best partner in _adal-badal_ is
someone who is distant spatially and will therefore have little
opportunity to complain.²²

Neither are such unscrupulous motives limited to Central Asia. They seem
inherent to the very nature of barter—which would explain the fact that
in the century or two before Smith’s time, the English words “truck and
barter,” like their equivalents in French, Spanish, German, Dutch, and
Portuguese, literally meant “to trick, bamboozle, or rip off.”²³
Swapping one thing directly for another while trying to get the best
deal one can out of the transaction is, ordinarily, how one deals with
people one doesn’t care about and doesn’t expect to see again. What
reason is there _not_ to try to take advantage of such a person? If, on
the other hand, one cares enough about someone—a neighbor, a friend—to
wish to deal with her fairly and honestly, one will inevitably also care
about her enough to take her individual needs, desires, and situation
into account. Even if you do swap one thing for another, you are likely
to frame the matter as a gift.

[]

To illustrate what I mean by this, let’s return to the economics
textbooks and the problem of the “double coincidence of wants.” When we
left Henry, he needed a pair of shoes, but all he had lying around were
some potatoes. Joshua had an extra pair of shoes, but he didn’t really
need potatoes. Since money has not yet been invented, they have a
problem. What are they to do?

The first thing that should be clear by now is that we’d really have to
know a bit more about Joshua and Henry. Who are they? Are they related?
If so, how? They appear to live in a small community. Any two people who
have been living their lives in the same small community will have some
sort of complicated history with each other. Are they friends, rivals,
allies, lovers, enemies, or several of these things at once?

The authors of the original example seem to assume two neighbors of
roughly equal status, not closely related, but on friendly terms—that
is, as close to neutral equality as one can get. Even so, this doesn’t
say much. For example, if Henry was living in a Seneca longhouse, and
needed shoes, Joshua would not even enter into it; he’d simply mention
it to his wife, who’d bring up the matter with the other matrons, fetch
materials from the longhouse’s collective storehouse, and sew him some.
Alternately, to find a scenario fit for an imaginary economics textbook,
we might place Joshua and Henry together in a small, intimate community
like a Nambikwara or Gunwinggu band.

SCENARIO 1

Henry walks up to Joshua and says “Nice shoes!”

Joshua says, “Oh, they’re not much, but since you seem to like them, by
all means take them.”

Henry takes the shoes.

Henry’s potatoes are not at issue since both parties are perfectly well
aware that if Joshua were ever short of potatoes, Henry would give him
some.

And that’s about it. Of course it’s not clear, in this case, how long
Henry will actually get to keep the shoes. It probably depends on how
nice they are. If they were just ordinary shoes, this might be the end
of the matter. If they are in any way unique or beautiful, they might
end up being passed around. There’s a famous story that John and Lorna
Marshall, who carried out a study of Kalahari Bushmen in the ’60s, once
gave a knife to one of their favorite informants. They left and came
back a year later, only to discover that pretty much everyone in the
band had been in possession of the knife at some point in between. On
the other hand, several Arab friends confirm to me that in less strictly
egalitarian contexts, there is an expedient. If a friend praises a
bracelet or bag, you are normally expected to immediately say “take
it”—but if you are really determined to hold on to it, you can always
say, “yes, isn’t it beautiful? It was a gift.”

But clearly, the authors of the textbook have a slightly more impersonal
transaction in mind. The authors seem to imagine the two men as the
heads of patriarchal households, on good terms with each other, but who
keep their own supplies. Perhaps they live in one of those Scottish
villages with the butcher and the baker in Adam Smith’s examples, or a
colonial settlement in New England. Except for some reason they’ve never
heard of money. It’s a peculiar fantasy, but let’s see what we can do:

SCENARIO 2

Henry walks up to Joshua and says, “Nice shoes!”

Or, perhaps—let’s make this a bit more realistic—Henry’s wife is
chatting with Joshua’s and strategically lets slip that the state of
Henry’s shoes is getting so bad he’s complaining about corns.

The message is conveyed, and Joshua comes by the next day to offer his
extra pair to Henry as a present, insisting that this is just a
neighborly gesture. He would certainly never want anything in return.

It doesn’t matter whether Joshua is sincere in saying this. By doing so,
Joshua thereby registers a credit. Henry owes him one.

How might Henry pay Joshua back? There are endless possibilities.
Perhaps Joshua really does want potatoes. Henry waits a discrete
interval and drops them off, insisting that this too is just a gift. Or
Joshua doesn’t need potatoes now but Henry waits until he does. Or maybe
a year later, Joshua is planning a banquet, so he comes strolling by
Henry’s barnyard and says “Nice pig …”

In any of these scenarios, the problem of “double coincidence of wants,”
so endlessly invoked in the economics textbooks, simply disappears.
Henry might not have something Joshua wants right now. But if the two
are neighbors, it’s obviously only a matter of time before he will.²⁴

This in turn means that the need to stockpile commonly acceptable items
in the way that Smith suggested disappears as well. With it goes the
need to develop currency. As with so many actual small communities,
everyone simply keeps track of who owes what to whom.

There is just one major conceptual problem here—one the attentive reader
might have noticed. Henry “owes Joshua one.” One what? How do you
quantify a favor? On what basis do you say that this many potatoes, or
this big a pig, seems more or less equivalent to a pair of shoes?
Because even if these things remain rough-and-ready approximations,
there must be _some_ way to establish that X is roughly equivalent to Y,
or slightly worse or slightly better. Doesn’t this imply that something
like money, at least in the sense of a unit of accounts by which one can
compare the value of different objects, already has to exist?

In most gift economies, there actually is a rough-and-ready way to solve
the problem. One establishes a series of ranked categories of _types_ of
thing. Pigs and shoes may be considered objects of roughly equivalent
status, one can give one in return for the other; coral necklaces are
quite another matter, one would have to give back another necklace, or
at least another piece of jewelry—anthropologists are used to referring
to these as creating different “spheres of exchange.”²⁵ This does
simplify things somewhat. When cross-cultural barter becomes a regular
and unexceptional thing, it tends to operate according to similar
principles: there are only certain things traded for certain others
(cloth for spears, for example), which makes it easy to work out
traditional equivalences. However, this doesn’t help us at all with the
problem of the origin of money. Actually, it makes it infinitely worse.
Why stockpile salt or gold or fish if they can only be exchanged for
some things and not others?

In fact, there is good reason to believe that barter is not a
particularly ancient phenomenon at all, but has only really become
widespread in modern times. Certainly in most of the cases we know
about, it takes place between people who are familiar with the use of
money, but for one reason or another, don’t have a lot of it around.
Elaborate barter systems often crop up in the wake of the collapse of
national economies: most recently in Russia in the ’90s, and in
Argentina around 2002, when rubles in the first case, and dollars in the
second, effectively disappeared.²⁶ Occasionally one can even find some
kind of currency beginning to develop: for instance, in POW camps and
many prisons, inmates have indeed been known to use cigarettes as a kind
of currency, much to the delight and excitement of professional
economists.²⁷ But here too we are talking about people who grew up using
money and now have to make do without it—exactly the situation
“imagined” by the economics textbooks with which I began.

The more frequent solution is to adopt some sort of credit system. When
much of Europe “reverted to barter” after the collapse of the Roman
Empire, and then again after the Carolingian Empire likewise fell apart,
this seems to be what happened. People continued keeping accounts in the
old imperial currency, even if they were no longer using coins.²⁸
Similarly, the Pukhtun men who like to swap bicycles for donkeys are
hardly unfamiliar with the use of money. Money has existed in that part
of the world for thousands of years. They just prefer direct exchange
between equals—in this case, because they consider it more manly.²⁹

The most remarkable thing is that even in Adam Smith’s examples of fish
and nails and tobacco being used as money, the same sort of thing was
happening. In the years following the appearance of _The Wealth of
Nations_, scholars checked into most of those examples and discovered
that in just about every case, the people involved were quite familiar
with the use of money, and in fact, _were_ using money—as a unit of
account.³⁰ Take the example of dried cod, supposedly used as money in
Newfoundland. As the British diplomat A. Mitchell-Innes pointed out
almost a century ago, what Smith describes was really an illusion,
created by a simple credit arrangement:

In the early days of the Newfoundland fishing industry, there was no
permanent European population; the fishers went there for the fishing
season only, and those who were not fishers were traders who bought the
dried fish and sold to the fishers their daily supplies. The latter sold
their catch to the traders at the market price in pounds, shillings and
pence, and obtained in return a credit on their books, with which they
paid for their supplies. Balances due by the traders were paid for by
drafts on England or France.³¹

It was quite the same in the Scottish village. It’s not as if anyone
actually walked into the local pub, plunked down a roofing nail, and
asked for a pint of beer. Employers in Smith’s day often lacked coin to
pay their workers; wages could be delayed by a year or more; in the
meantime, it was considered acceptable for employees to carry off either
some of their own products or leftover work materials, lumber, fabric,
cord, and so on. The nails were de facto interest on what their
employers owed them. So they went to the pub, ran up a tab, and when
occasion permitted, brought in a bag of nails to charge off against the
debt. The law making tobacco legal tender in Virginia seems to have been
an attempt by planters to oblige local merchants to accept their
products as a credit around harvest time. In effect, the law forced all
merchants in Virginia to become middlemen in the tobacco business,
whether they liked it or not; just as all West Indian merchants were
obliged to become sugar dealers, since that’s what all their wealthier
customers brought in to write off against their debt.

The primary examples, then, were ones in which people were improvising
credit systems, because actual money—gold and silver coinage—was in
short supply. But the most shocking blow to the conventional version of
economic history came with the translation, first of Egyptian
hieroglyphics, and then of Mesopotamian cuneiform, which pushed back
scholars’ knowledge of written history almost three millennia, from the
time of Homer (circa 800 bc), where it had hovered in Smith’s time, to
roughly 3500 bc. What these texts revealed was that credit systems of
exactly this sort actually _preceded_ the invention of coinage by
thousands of years.

The Mesopotamian system is the best-documented, more so than that of
Pharaonic Egypt (which appears similar), Shang China (about which we
know little), or the Indus Valley civilization (about which we know
nothing at all). As it happens, we know a great deal about Mesopotamia,
since the vast majority of cuneiform documents were financial in nature.

The Sumerian economy was dominated by vast temple and palace complexes.
These were often staffed by thousands: priests and officials,
craftspeople who worked in their industrial workshops, farmers and
shepherds who worked their considerable estates. Even though ancient
Sumer was usually divided into a large number of independent
city-states, by the time the curtain goes up on Mesopotamian
civilization around 3500, temple administrators already appear to have
developed a single, uniform system of accountancy—one that is in some
ways still with us, actually, because it’s to the Sumerians that we owe
such things as the dozen or the 24-hour day.³² The basic monetary unit
was the silver shekel. One shekel’s weight in silver was established as
the equivalent of one gur, or bushel of barley. A shekel was subdivided
into 60 minas, corresponding to one portion of barley—on the principle
that there were 30 days in a month, and Temple workers received two
rations of barley every day. It’s easy to see that “money” in this sense
is in no way the product of commercial transactions. It was actually
created by bureaucrats in order to keep track of resources and move
things back and forth between departments.

Temple bureaucrats used the system to calculate debts (rents, fees,
loans …) in silver. Silver was, effectively, money. And it did indeed
circulate in the form of unworked chunks, “rude bars” as Smith had put
it.³³ In this he was right. But it was almost the only part of his
account that was right. One reason was that silver did not circulate
very much. Most of it just sat around in Temple and Palace treasuries,
some of which remained, carefully guarded, in the same place for
literally thousands of years. It would have been easy enough to
standardize the ingots, stamp them, create some authoritative system to
guarantee their purity. The technology existed. Yet no one saw any
particular need to do so. One reason was that while debts were
calculated in silver, they did not have to be _paid_ in silver—in fact,
they could be paid in more or less anything one had around. Peasants who
owed money to the Temple or Palace, or to some Temple or Palace
official, seem to have settled their debts mostly in barley, which is
why fixing the ratio of silver to barley was so important. But it was
perfectly acceptable to show up with goats, or furniture, or lapis
lazuli. Temples and Palaces were huge industrial operations—they could
find a use for almost anything.³⁴

In the marketplaces that cropped up in Mesopotamian cities, prices were
also calculated in silver, and the prices of commodities that weren’t
entirely controlled by the Temples and Palaces would tend to fluctuate
according to supply and demand. But even here, such evidence as we have
suggests that most transactions were based on credit. Merchants (who
sometimes worked for the Temples, sometimes operated independently) were
among the few people who did, often, actually use silver in
transactions; but even they mostly did much of their dealings on credit,
and ordinary people buying beer from “ale women,” or local innkeepers,
once again, did so by running up a tab, to be settled at harvest time in
barley or anything they might have had at hand.³⁵

At this point, just about every aspect of the conventional story of the
origins of money lay in rubble. Rarely has an historical theory been so
absolutely and systematically refuted. By the early decades of the
twentieth century, all the pieces were in place to completely rewrite
the history of money. The groundwork was laid by Mitchell-Innes—the same
one I’ve already cited on the matter of the cod—in two essays that
appeared in New York’s _Banking Law Journal_ in 1913 and 1914. In these,
Mitchell-Innes matter-of-factly laid out the false assumptions on which
existing economic history was based and suggested that what was really
needed was a history of debt:

One of the popular fallacies in connection with commerce is that in
modern days a money-saving device has been introduced called _credit_
and that, before this device was known, all, purchases were paid for in
cash, in other words in coins. A careful investigation shows that the
precise reverse is true. In olden days coins played a far smaller part
in commerce than they do to-day. Indeed so small was the quantity of
coins, that they did not even suffice for the needs of the [Medieval
English] Royal household and estates which regularly used tokens of
various kinds for the purpose of making small payments. So unimportant
indeed was the coinage that sometimes Kings did not hesitate to call it
all in for re-minting and re-issue and still commerce went on just the
same.³⁶

In fact, our standard account of monetary history is precisely
backwards. We did not begin with barter, discover money, and then
eventually develop credit systems. It happened precisely the other way
around. What we now call virtual money came first. Coins came much
later, and their use spread only unevenly, never completely replacing
credit systems. Barter, in turn, appears to be largely a kind of
accidental byproduct of the use of coinage or paper money: historically,
it has mainly been what people who are used to cash transactions do when
for one reason or another they have no access to currency.

The curious thing is that it never happened. This new history was never
written. It’s not that any economist has ever refuted Mitchell-Innes.
They just ignored him. Textbooks did not change their story—even if all
the evidence made clear that the story was simply wrong. People still
write histories of money that are actually histories of coinage, on the
assumption that in the past, these were necessarily the same thing;
periods when coinage largely vanished are still described as times when
the economy “reverted to barter,” as if the meaning of this phrase is
self-evident, even though no one actually knows what it means. As a
result we have next-to-no idea how, say, the inhabitant of a Dutch town
in 950 ad actually went about acquiring cheese or spoons or hiring
musicians to play at his daughter’s wedding—let alone how any of this
was likely to be arranged in Pemba or Samarkand.³⁷



CHAPTER THREE  PRIMORDIAL DEBTS


_In being born every being is born as debt owed to the gods, the saints,
the Fathers and to men. If one makes a sacrifice, it is because of a
debt owing to the gods from birth … If one recites a sacred text, it is
because of a debt owing to the saints … If one wishes for offspring, it
is because of a debt due to the fathers from birth … And if one gives
hospitality, it is because it is a debt owing to men_.

_—Satapatha Brahmana_ 1.7.12, 1–6

_Let us drive away the evil effects of bad dreams, just as we pay off
debts_.

_—Rig Veda_ 8.47.17

THE REASON THAT economics textbooks now begin with imaginary villages is
because it has been impossible to talk about real ones. Even some
economists have been forced to admit that Smith’s Land of Barter doesn’t
really exist.¹

The question is why the myth has been perpetuated, anyway. Economists
have long since jettisoned other elements of _The Wealth of Nations_—for
instance, Smith’s labor theory of value and disapproval of joint-stock
corporations. Why not simply write off the myth of barter as a quaint
Enlightenment parable, and instead attempt to understand primordial
credit arrangements—or anyway, something more in keeping with the
historical evidence?

The answer seems to be that the Myth of Barter cannot go away, because
it is central to the entire discourse of economics.

Recall here what Smith was trying to do when he wrote _The Wealth of
Nations_. Above all, the book was an attempt to establish the newfound
discipline of economics as a science. This meant that not only did
economics have its own peculiar domain of study—what we now call “the
economy,” though the idea that there even was something called an
“economy” was very new in Smith’s day—but that this economy operated
according to laws of much the same sort as Sir Isaac Newton had so
recently identified as governing the physical world. Newton had
represented God as a cosmic watchmaker who had created the physical
machinery of the universe in such a way that it would operate for the
ultimate benefit of humans, and then let it run on its own. Smith was
trying to make a similar, Newtonian argument.² God—or Divine Providence,
as he put it—had arranged matters in such a way that our pursuit of
self-interest would nonetheless, given an unfettered market, be guided
“as if by an invisible hand” to promote the general welfare. Smith’s
famous invisible hand was, as he says in his _Theory of Moral
Sentiments_, the agent of Divine Providence. It was literally the hand
of God.³

Once economics had been established as a discipline, the theological
arguments no longer seemed necessary or important. People continue to
argue about whether an unfettered free market really will produce the
results that Smith said it would; but no one questions whether “the
market” naturally exists. The underlying assumptions that derive from
this came to be seen as common sense—so much so that, as I’ve noted, we
simply assume that when valuable objects do change hands, it will
normally be because two individuals have both decided they would gain a
material advantage by swapping them. One interesting corollary is that,
as a result, economists have come to see the very question of the
presence or absence of money as not especially important, since money is
just a commodity, chosen to facilitate exchange, and which we use to
measure the value of other commodities. Otherwise, it has no special
qualities. Still, in 1958, Paul Samuelson, one of the leading lights of
the neoclassical school that still predominates in modern economic
thought, could express disdain for what he called “the social
contrivance of money.” “Even in the most advanced industrial economies,”
he insisted, “if we strip exchange down to its barest essentials and
peel off the obscuring layer of money, we find that trade between
individuals and nations largely boils down to barter.”⁴ Others spoke of
a “veil of money” obscuring the nature of the “real economy” in which
people produced real goods and services and swapped them back and
forth.⁵

Call this the final apotheosis of economics as common sense. Money is
unimportant. Economies—“real economies”—are really vast barter systems.
The problem is that history shows that without money, such vast barter
systems do not occur. Even when economies “revert to barter,” as Europe
was said to do in the Middle Ages, they don’t actually abandon the use
of money. They just abandon the use of cash. In the Middle Ages, for
instance, everyone continued to assess the value of tools and livestock
in the old Roman currency, even if the coins themselves had ceased to
circulate.⁶

It’s money that had made it possible for us to imagine ourselves in the
way economists encourage us to do: as a collection of individuals and
nations whose main business is swapping things. It’s also clear that the
mere existence of money, in itself, is not enough to allow us see the
world this way. If it were, the discipline of economics would have been
created in ancient Sumer, or anyway, far earlier than 1776, when Adam
Smith’s _The Wealth of Nations_ appeared.

The missing element is in fact exactly the thing Smith was attempting to
downplay: the role of government policy. In England, in Smith’s day, it
became possible to see the market, the world of butchers, ironmongers,
and haberdashers, as its own entirely independent sphere of human
activity because the British government was actively engaged in
fostering it. This required laws and police, but also, specific monetary
policies, which liberals like Smith were (successfully) advocating.⁷ It
required pegging the value of the currency to silver, but at the same
time greatly increasing the money supply, and particularly the amount of
small change in circulation. This not only required huge amounts of tin
and copper, but also the careful regulation of the banks that were, at
that time, the only source of paper money. The century before _The
Wealth of Nations_ had seen at least two attempts to create
state-supported central banks, in France and Sweden, that had proven to
be spectacular failures. In each case, the would-be central bank issued
notes based largely on speculation that collapsed the moment investors
lost faith. Smith supported the use of paper money, but like Locke
before him, he also believed that the relative success of the Bank of
England and Bank of Scotland had been due to their policy of pegging
paper money firmly to precious metals. This became the mainstream
economic view, so much so that alternative theories of money as
credit—the one that Mitchell-Innes advocated—were quickly relegated to
the margins, their proponents written off as cranks, and the very sort
of thinking that led to bad banks and speculative bubbles in the first
place.

It might be helpful, then, to consider what these alternative theories
actually were.


State and Credit Theories of Money

Mitchell-Innes was an exponent of what came to be known as the Credit
Theory of money, a position that over the course of the nineteenth
century had its most avid proponents not in Mitchell-Innes’s native
Britain but in the two up-and-coming rival powers of the day, the United
States and Germany. Credit Theorists insisted that money is not a
commodity but an accounting tool. In other words, it is not a “thing” at
all. You can no more touch a dollar or a deutschmark than you can touch
an hour or a cubic centimeter. Units of currency are merely abstract
units of measurement, and as the credit theorists correctly noted,
historically, such abstract systems of accounting emerged long before
the use of any particular token of exchange.⁸

The obvious next question is: If money is a just a yardstick, what then
does it measure? The answer was simple: debt. A coin is, effectively, an
IOU. Whereas conventional wisdom holds that a banknote is, or should be,
a promise to pay a certain amount of “real money” (gold, silver,
whatever that might be taken to mean), Credit Theorists argued that a
banknote is simply the promise to pay _something_ of the same value as
an ounce of gold. But that’s all that money ever is. There’s no
fundamental difference in this respect between a silver dollar, a Susan
B. Anthony dollar coin made of a copper-nickel alloy designed to look
vaguely like gold, a green piece of paper with a picture of George
Washington on it, or a digital blip on some bank’s computer.
Conceptually, the idea that a piece of gold is really just an IOU is
always rather difficult to wrap one’s head around, but something like
this must be true, because even when gold and silver coins were in use,
they almost never circulated at their bullion value.

How could credit money come about? Let us return to the economics
professors’ imaginary town. Say, for example, that Joshua were to give
his shoes to Henry, and, rather than Henry owing him a favor, Henry
promises him something of equivalent value.⁹ Henry gives Joshua an IOU.
Joshua could wait for Henry to have something useful, and then redeem
it. In that case Henry would rip up the IOU and the story would be over.
But say Joshua were to pass the IOU on to a third party—Sheila—to whom
he owes something else. He could tick it off against his debt to a
fourth party, Lola—now Henry will owe that amount to her. Hence is money
born. Because there’s no logical end to it. Say Sheila now wishes to
acquire a pair of shoes from Edith; she can just hand Edith the IOU, and
assure her that Henry is good for it. In principle, there’s no reason
that the IOU could not continue circulating around town for
years—provided people continue to have faith in Henry. In fact, if it
goes on long enough, people might forget about the issuer entirely.
Things like this do happen. The anthropologist Keith Hart once told me a
story about his brother, who in the ‘50s was a British soldier stationed
in Hong Kong. Soldiers used to pay their bar tabs by writing checks on
accounts back in England. Local merchants would often simply endorse
them over to each other and pass them around as currency: once, he saw
one of his own checks, written six months before, on the counter of a
local vendor covered with about forty different tiny inscriptions in
Chinese.

What credit theorists like Mitchell-Innes were arguing is that even if
Henry gave Joshua a gold coin instead of a piece of paper, the situation
would be essentially the same. A gold coin is a promise to pay something
else of equivalent value to a gold coin. After all, a gold coin is not
actually useful in itself. One only accepts it because one assumes other
people will.

In this sense, the value of a unit of currency is not the measure of the
value of an object, but the measure of one’s trust in other human
beings.

This element of trust of course makes everything more complicated. Early
banknotes circulated via a process almost exactly like what I’ve just
described, except that, like the Chinese merchants, each recipient added
his or her signature to guarantee the debt’s legitimacy. But generally,
the difficulty in the Chartalist position—this is what it came to be
called, from the Latin _charta_, or token—is to establish why people
would continue to trust a piece of paper. After all, why couldn’t anyone
just sign Henry’s name on an IOU? True, this sort of debt-token system
might work within a small village where everyone knew one another, or
even among a more dispersed community like sixteenth-century Italian or
twentieth-century Chinese merchants, where everyone at least had ways of
keeping track of everybody else. But systems like these cannot create a
full-blown currency system, and there’s no evidence that they ever have.
Providing a sufficient number of IOUs to allow everyone even in a
medium-sized city to be able to carry out a significant portion of their
daily transactions in such currency would require millions of tokens.¹⁰
To be able to guarantee all of them, Henry would have to be almost
unimaginably rich.

All this would be much less of a problem, however, if Henry were, say,
Henry II, King of England, Duke of Normandy, Lord of Ireland, and Count
of Anjou.

The real impetus for the Chartalist position, in fact, came out of what
came to be known as the “German Historical School,” whose most famous
exponent was the historian G.F. Knapp, whose _State Theory of Money_
first appeared in 1905.¹¹ If money is simply a unit of measure, it makes
sense that emperors and kings should concern themselves with such
matters. Emperors and kings are almost always concerned to established
uniform systems of weights and measures throughout their kingdoms. It is
also true, as Knapp observed, that once established, such systems tend
to remain remarkably stable over time. During the reign of the actual
Henry II (1154–1189), just about everyone in Western Europe was still
keeping their accounts using the monetary system established by
Charlemagne some 350 years earlier—that is, using pounds, shillings, and
pence—despite the fact that some of these coins had never existed
(Charlemagne never actually struck a silver pound), none of
Charlemagne’s actual shillings and pence remained in circulation, and
those coins that did circulate tended to vary enormously in size,
weight, purity, and value.¹² According to the Chartalists, this doesn’t
really matter. What matters is that there is a uniform system for
measuring credits and debts, and that this system remains stable over
time. The case of Charlemagne’s currency is particularly dramatic
because his actual empire dissolved quite quickly, but the monetary
system he created continued to be used, for keeping accounts, within his
former territories for more than 800 years. It was referred to, in the
sixteenth century, quite explicitly as “imaginary money,” and derniers
and livres were only completely abandoned, as units of account, around
the time of the French Revolution.¹³

According to Knapp, whether or not the actual, physical money stuff in
circulation corresponds to this “imaginary money” is not particularly
important. It makes no real difference whether it’s pure silver, debased
silver, leather tokens, or dried cod—provided the state is willing to
accept it in payment of taxes. Because whatever the state was willing to
accept, for that reason, became currency. One of the most important
forms of currency in England in Henry’s time were notched “tally sticks”
used to record debts. Tally sticks were quite explicitly IOUs: both
parties to a transaction would take a hazelwood twig, notch it to
indicate the amount owed, and then split it in half. The creditor would
keep one half, called “the stock” (hence the origin of the term “stock
holder”) and the debtor kept the other, called “the stub” (hence the
origin of the term “ticket stub.”) Tax assessors used such twigs to
calculate amounts owed by local sheriffs. Often, though, rather than
wait for the taxes to come due, Henry’s exchequer would often sell the
tallies at a discount, and they would circulate, as tokens of debt owed
to the government, to anyone willing to trade for them.¹⁴

Modern banknotes actually work on a similar principle, except in
reverse.¹⁵ Recall here the little parable about Henry’s IOU. The reader
might have noticed one puzzling aspect of the equation: the IOU can
operate as money only as long as Henry never pays his debt. In fact this
is precisely the logic on which the Bank of England—the first successful
modern central bank—was originally founded. In 1694, a consortium of
English bankers made a loan of £1,200,000 to the king. In return they
received a royal monopoly on the issuance of banknotes. What this meant
in practice was they had the right to advance IOUs for a portion of the
money the king now owed them to any inhabitant of the kingdom willing to
borrow from them, or willing to deposit their own money in the bank—in
effect, to circulate or “monetize” the newly created royal debt. This
was a great deal for the bankers (they got to charge the king 8 percent
annual interest for the original loan and simultaneously charge interest
on the same money to the clients who borrowed it), but it only worked as
long as the original loan remained outstanding. To this day, this loan
has never been paid back. It cannot be. If it ever were, the entire
monetary system of Great Britain would cease to exist.¹⁶

If nothing else, this approach helps solve one of the obvious mysteries
of the fiscal policy of so many early kingdoms: Why did they make
subjects pay taxes at all? This is not a question we’re used to asking.
The answer seems self-evident. Governments demand taxes because they
wish to get their hands on people’s money. But if Smith was right, and
gold and silver became money through the natural workings of the market
completely independently of governments, then wouldn’t the obvious thing
be to just grab control of the gold and silver mines? Then the king
would have all the money he could possibly need. In fact, this is what
ancient kings would normally do. If there were gold and silver mines in
their territory, they would usually take control of them. So what
exactly was the point of extracting the gold, stamping one’s picture on
it, causing it to circulate among one’s subjects—and then demanding that
those same subjects give it back again?

This does seem a bit of a puzzle. But if money and markets do not emerge
spontaneously, it actually makes perfect sense. Because this is the
simplest and most efficient way to bring markets into being. Let us take
a hypothetical example. Say a king wishes to support a standing army of
fifty thousand men. Under ancient or medieval conditions, feeding such a
force was an enormous problem—unless they were on the march, one would
need to employ almost as many men and animals just to locate, acquire,
and transport the necessary provisions.¹⁷ On the other hand, if one
simply hands out coins to the soldiers and then demands that every
family in the kingdom was obliged to pay one of those coins back to you,
one would, in one blow, turn one’s entire national economy into a vast
machine for the provisioning of soldiers, since now every family, in
order to get their hands on the coins, must find some way to contribute
to the general effort to provide soldiers with things they want. Markets
are brought into existence as a side effect.

This is a bit of a cartoon version, but it is very clear that markets
did spring up around ancient armies; one need only take a glance at
Kautilya’s _Arthasasatra_, the Sassanian “circle of sovereignty,” or the
Chinese “Discourses on Salt and Iron” to discover that most ancient
rulers spent a great deal of their time thinking about the relation
between mines, soldiers, taxes, and food. Most concluded that the
creation of markets of this sort was not just convenient for feeding
soldiers, but useful in all sorts of ways, since it meant officials no
longer had to requisition everything they needed directly from the
populace, or figure out a way to produce it on royal estates or royal
workshops. In other words, despite the dogged liberal assumption—again,
coming from Smith’s legacy—that the existence of states and markets are
somehow opposed, the historical record implies that exactly the opposite
is the case. Stateless societies tend also to be without markets.

As one might imagine, state theories of money have always been anathema
to mainstream economists working in the tradition of Adam Smith. In
fact, Chartalism has tended to be seen as a populist underside of
economic theory, favored mainly by cranks.¹⁸ The curious thing is that
the mainstream economists often ended up actually working for
governments and advising such governments to pursue policies much like
those the Chartalists described—that is, tax policies designed to create
markets where they had not existed before—despite the fact that they
were in theory committed to Smith’s argument that markets develop
spontaneously of their own accord.

This was particularly true in the colonial world. To return to
Madagascar for a moment: I have already mentioned that one of the first
things that the French general Gallieni, conqueror of Madagascar, did
when the conquest of the island was complete in 1901 was to impose a
head tax. Not only was this tax quite high, it was also only payable in
newly issued Malagasy francs. In other words, Gallieni did indeed print
money and then demand that everyone in the country give some of that
money back to him.

Most striking of all, though, was language he used to describe this tax.
It was referred to as the _“impôt moralisateur,”_ the “educational” or
“moralizing tax.” In other words, it was designed—to adopt the language
of the day—to teach the natives the value of work. Since the
“educational tax” came due shortly after harvest time, the easiest way
for farmers to pay it was to sell a portion of their rice crop to the
Chinese or Indian merchants who soon installed themselves in small towns
across the country. However, harvest was when the market price of rice
was, for obvious reasons, at its lowest; if one sold too much of one’s
crop, that meant one would not have enough left to feed one’s family for
the entire year, and thus be forced to buy one’s own rice back, on
credit, from those same merchants later in the year when prices were
much higher. As a result, farmers quickly fell hopelessly into debt (the
merchants doubling as loan sharks). The easiest ways to pay back the
debt was either to find some kind of cash crop to sell—to start growing
coffee, or pineapples—or else to send one’s children off to work for
wages in the city, or on one of the plantations that French colonists
were establishing across the island. The whole project might seem no
more than a cynical scheme to squeeze cheap labor out of the peasantry,
and it was that, but it was also something more. The colonial government
was were also quite explicit (at least in their own internal policy
documents), about the need to make sure that peasants had at least some
money of their own left over, and to ensure that they became accustomed
to the minor luxuries—parasols, lipstick, cookies—available at the
Chinese shops. It was crucial that they develop new tastes, habits, and
expectations; that they lay the foundations of a consumer demand that
would endure long after the conquerors had left, and keep Madagascar
forever tied to France.

Most people are not stupid, and most Malagasy understood exactly what
their conquerors were trying to do to them. Some were determined to
resist. More than sixty years after the invasion, a French
anthropologist, Gerard Althabe, was able to observe villages on the east
coast of the island whose inhabitants would dutifully show up at the
coffee plantations to earn the money for their poll tax, and then,
having paid it, studiously ignore the wares for sale at the local shops
and instead turn over any remaining money to lineage elders, who would
then use it to buy cattle for sacrifice to their ancestors.¹⁹ Many were
quite open in saying that they saw themselves as resisting a trap.

Still, such defiance rarely lasts forever. Markets did gradually take
shape, even in those parts of the island where none had previously
existed. With them came the inevitable network of little shops. And by
the time I got there, in 1990, a generation after the poll tax had
finally been abolished by a revolutionary government, the logic of the
market had become so intuitively accepted that even spirit mediums were
reciting passages that might as well have come from Adam Smith.

Such examples could be multiplied endlessly. Something like this
occurred in just about every part of the world conquered by European
arms where markets were not already in place. Rather than discovering
barter, they ended up using the very techniques that mainstream
economics rejected to bring something like the market into being.


In Search of a Myth

Anthropologists have been complaining about the Myth of Barter for
almost a century. Occasionally, economists point out with slight
exasperation that there’s a fairly simple reason why they’re still
telling the same story despite all the evidence against it:
anthropologists have never come up with a better one.²⁰ This is an
understandable objection, but there’s a simple answer to it. The reasons
why anthropologists haven’t been able to come up with a simple,
compelling story for the origins of money is because there’s no reason
to believe there could be one. Money was no more ever “invented” than
music or mathematics or jewelry. What we call “money” isn’t a “thing” at
all, it’s a way of comparing things mathematically, as proportions: of
saying one of X is equivalent to six of Y. As such it is probably as old
as human thought. The moment we try to get any more specific, we
discover that there are any number of different habits and practices
that have converged in the stuff we now call “money,” and this is
precisely the reason why economists, historians, and the rest have found
it so difficult to come up with a single definition.

Credit Theorists have long been hobbled by the lack of an equally
compelling narrative. This is not to say that all sides in the currency
debates that ranged between 1850 and 1950 were not in the habit of
deploying mythological weaponry. This was true particularly, perhaps, in
the United States. In 1894, the Greenbackers, who pushed for detaching
the dollar from gold entirely to allow the government to spend freely on
job-creation campaigns, invented the idea of the March on Washington—an
idea that was to have endless resonance in U.S. history. L. Frank Baum’s
book _The Wonderful Wizard of Oz_, which appeared in 1900, is widely
recognized to be a parable for the Populist campaign of William Jennings
Bryan, who twice ran for president on the Free Silver platform—vowing to
replace the gold standard with a bimetallic system that would allow the
free creation of silver money alongside gold.²¹ As with the
Greenbackers, one of the main constituencies for the movement was
debtors: particularly, Midwestern farm families such as Dorothy’s, who
had been facing a massive wave of foreclosures during the severe
recession of the 1890s. According to the Populist reading, the Wicked
Witches of the East and West represent the East and West Coast bankers
(promoters of and benefactors from the tight money supply), the
Scarecrow represented the farmers (who didn’t have the brains to avoid
the debt trap), the Tin Woodsman was the industrial proletariat (who
didn’t have the heart to act in solidarity with the farmers), the
Cowardly Lion represented the political class (who didn’t have the
courage to intervene). The yellow brick road, silver slippers, emerald
city, and hapless Wizard presumably speak for themselves.²² “Oz” is of
course the standard abbreviation for “ounce.”²³ As an attempt to create
a new myth, Baum’s story was remarkably effective. As political
propaganda, less so. William Jennings Bryan failed in three attempts to
win the presidency, the silver standard was never adopted, and few
nowadays even remember what _The Wonderful Wizard of Oz_ was originally
supposed to be about.²⁴

For state-money theorists in particular, this has been a problem.
Stories about rulers using taxes to create markets in conquered
territories, or to pay for soldiers or other state functions, are not
particularly inspiring. German ideas of money as the embodiment of
national will did not travel very well.

Every time there was a major economic meltdown, however, conventional
laissez-faire economics took another hit. The Bryan campaigns were born
as a reaction to the Panic of 1893. By the time of the Great Depression
of the 1930s, the very notion that the market could regulate itself, so
long as the government ensured that money was safely pegged to precious
metals, was completely discredited. From roughly 1933 to 1979, every
major capitalist government reversed course and adopted some version of
Keynesianism. Keynesian orthodoxy started from the assumption that
capitalist markets would not really work unless capitalist governments
were willing effectively to play nanny: most famously, by engaging in
massive deficit “pump-priming” during downturns. While in the ’80s,
Margaret Thatcher in Britain and Ronald Reagan in the United States made
a great show of rejecting all of this, it’s unclear how much they really
did.²⁵ And in any case, they were operating in the wake of an even
greater blow to previous monetary orthodoxy: Richard Nixon’s decision in
1971 to unpeg the dollar from precious metals entirely, eliminate the
international gold standard, and introduce the system of floating
currency regimes that has dominated the world economy ever since. This
meant in effect that all national currencies were henceforth, as
neoclassical economists like to put it, “fiat money” backed only by the
public trust.

Now, John Maynard Keynes himself was much more open to what he liked to
call the “alternative tradition” of credit and state theories than any
economist of that stature (and Keynes is still arguably the single most
important economic thinker of the twentieth century) before or since. At
certain points he immersed himself in it: he spent several years in the
1920s studying Mesopotamian cuneiform banking records to try to
ascertain the origins of money—his “Babylonian madness,” as he would
later call it.²⁶ His conclusion, which he set forth at the very
beginning of his _Treatise on Money_, his most famous work, was more or
less the only conclusion one could come to if one started not from first
principles, but from a careful examination of the historical record:
that the lunatic fringe was, essentially, right. Whatever its earliest
origins, for the last four thousand years, money has been effectively a
creature of the state. Individuals, he observed, make contracts with one
another. They take out debts, and they promise payment.

The State, therefore, comes in first of all as the authority of law
which enforces the payment of the thing which corresponds to the name or
description in the contract. But it comes doubly when, in addition, it
claims the right to determine and declare _what thing_ corresponds to
the name, and to vary its declaration from time to time—when, that is to
say it claims the right to re-edit the dictionary. This right is claimed
by all modern States and has been so claimed for some four thousand
years at least. It is when this stage in the evolution of Money has been
reached that Knapp’s Chartalism—the doctrine that money is peculiarly a
creation of the State—is fully realized … To-day all civilized money is,
beyond the possibility of dispute, chartalist.²⁷

This does not mean that the state necessarily _creates_ money. Money is
credit, it can be brought into being by private contractual agreements
(loans, for instance). The state merely enforces the agreement and
dictates the legal terms. Hence Keynes’ next dramatic assertion: that
banks create money, and that there is no intrinsic limit to their
ability to do so: since however much they lend, the borrower will have
no choice but to put the money back into some bank again, and thus, from
the perspective of the banking system as a whole, the total number of
debits and credits will always cancel out.²⁸ The implications were
radical, but Keynes himself was not. In the end, he was always careful
to frame the problem in a way that could be reintegrated into the
mainstream economics of his day.

Neither was Keynes much of a mythmaker. Insofar as the alternative
tradition has come up with an answer to the Myth of Barter, it was not
from Keynes’ own efforts (Keynes ultimately decided that the origins of
money were not particularly important) but in the work of some
contemporary neo-Keynesians, who were not afraid to follow some of his
more radical suggestions as far as they would go.

The real weak link in state-credit theories of money was always the
element of taxes. It is one thing to explain why early states demanded
taxes (in order to create markets.) It’s another to ask “by what right?”
Assuming that early rulers were not simply thugs, and that taxes were
not simply extortion—and no Credit Theorist, to my knowledge, took such
a cynical view even of early government—one must ask how they justified
this sort of thing.

Nowadays, we all think we know the answer to this question. We pay our
taxes so that the government can provide us with services. This starts
with security services—military protection being, often, about the only
service some early states were really able to provide. By now, of
course, the government provides all sorts of things. All of this is said
to go back to some sort of original “social contract” that everyone
somehow agreed on, though no one really knows exactly when or by whom,
or why we should be bound by the decisions of distant ancestors on this
one matter when we don’t feel particularly bound by the decisions of our
distant ancestors on anything else.²⁹ All of this makes sense if you
assume that markets come before governments, but the whole argument
totters quickly once you realize that they don’t.

There is an alternative explanation, one created to be in keeping with
the state-credit theory approach. It’s referred to as “primordial debt
theory” and it has been developed largely in France, by a team of
researchers—not only economists but anthropologists, historians, and
classicists—originally assembled around the figures of Michel Aglietta
and Andre Orléans,³⁰ and more recently, Bruno Théret, and it has since
been taken up by neo-Keynesians in the United States and the United
Kingdom as well.³¹

It’s a position that has emerged quite recently, and at first, largely
amidst debates about the nature of the euro. The creation of a common
European currency sparked not only all sorts of intellectual debates
(does a common currency necessarily imply the creation of a common
European state? Or of a common European economy or society? Are these
ultimately the same thing?) but dramatic political ones as well. The
creation of the euro zone was spearheaded above all by Germany, whose
central banks still see their main goal as combating inflation. What’s
more, tight money policies and the need to balance budgets having been
used as the main weapon to chip away welfare-state policies in Europe,
it has necessarily become the stake of political struggles between
bankers and pensioners, creditors and debtors, just as heated as those
of 1890s America.

The core argument is that any attempt to separate monetary policy from
social policy is ultimately wrong. Primordial-debt theorists insist that
these have always been the same thing. Governments use taxes to create
money, and they are able to do so because they have become the guardians
of the debt that all citizens have to one another. This debt is the
essence of society itself. It exists long before money and markets, and
money and markets themselves are simply ways of chopping pieces of it
up.

At first, the argument goes, this sense of debt was expressed not
through the state, but through religion. To make the argument, Aglietta
and Orléans fixed on certain works of early Sanskrit religious
literature: the hymns, prayers, and poetry collected in the Vedas and
the Brahmanas, priestly commentaries composed over the centuries that
followed, texts that are now considered the foundations of Hindu
thought. It’s not as odd a choice as it might seem. These texts
constitute the earliest known historical reflections on the nature of
debt.

Actually, even the very earliest Vedic poems, composed sometime between
1500 and 1200 bc, evince a constant concern with debt—which is treated
as synonymous with guilt and sin.³² There are numerous prayers pleading
with the gods to liberate the worshipper from the shackles or bonds of
debt. Sometimes these seem to refer to debt in the literal sense—Rig
Veda 10.34, for instance, has a long description of the sad plight of
gamblers who “wander homeless, in constant fear, in debt, and seeking
money.” Elsewhere it’s clearly metaphorical.

In these hymns, Yama, the god of death, figures prominently. To be in
debt was to have a weight placed on you by Death. To be under any sort
of unfulfilled obligation, any unkept promise, to gods or to men, was to
live in the shadow of Death. Often, even in the very early texts, debt
seems to stand in for a broader sense of inner suffering, from which one
begs the gods—particularly Agni, who represents the sacrificial fire—for
release. It was only with the Brahmanas that commentators started trying
to weave all this together into a more comprehensive philosophy. The
conclusion: that human existence is itself a form of debt.

A man, being born, is a debt; by his own self he is born to Death, and
only when he sacrifices does he redeem himself from Death.³³

Sacrifice (and these early commentators were themselves sacrificial
priests) is thus called “tribute paid to Death.” Or such was the manner
of speaking. In reality, as the priests knew better than anyone,
sacrifice was directed to all the gods, not just Death—Death was just
the intermediary. Framing things this way, though, did immediately raise
the one problem that always comes up, whenever anyone conceives human
life through such an idiom. If our lives are on loan, who would actually
wish to repay such a debt? To live in debt is to be guilty, incomplete.
But completion can only mean annihilation. In this way, the “tribute” of
sacrifice could be seen as a kind of interest payment, with the life of
the animal substituting temporarily for what’s really owed, which is
ourselves—a mere postponement of the inevitable.³⁴

Different commentators proposed different ways out of the dilemma. Some
ambitious Brahmins began telling their clients that sacrificial ritual,
if done correctly, promised a way to break out of the human condition
entirely and achieve eternity (since, in the face of eternity, all debts
become meaningless.)³⁵ Another way was to broaden the notion of debt, so
that all social responsibilities become debts of one sort or another.
Thus two famous passages in the Brahmanas insist that we are born as a
debt not just to the gods, to be repaid in sacrifice, but also to the
Sages who created the Vedic learning to begin with, which we must repay
through study; to our ancestors (“the Fathers”), who we must repay by
having children; and finally, “to men”—apparently meaning humanity as a
whole, to be repaid by offering hospitality to strangers.³⁶ Anyone,
then, who lives a proper life is constantly paying back existential
debts of one sort or another; but at the same time, as the notion of
debt slides back into a simple sense of social obligation, it becomes
something far less terrifying than the sense that one’s very existence
is a loan taken against Death.³⁷ Not least because social obligations
always cut both ways. Especially since, once one has oneself fathered
children, one is just as much a debtor as a creditor.

What primordial-debt theorists have done is to propose that the ideas
encoded in these Vedic texts are not peculiar to a certain intellectual
tradition of early Iron Age ritual specialists in the Ganges valley, but
that they are essential to the very nature and history of human thought.
Consider for example this statement, from an essay by French economist
Bruno Théret with the uninspiring title “The Socio-Cultural Dimensions
of the Currency: Implications for the Transition to the Euro,” published
in the _Journal of Consumer Policy_ in 1999:

At the origin of money we have a “relation of representation” of death
as an invisible world, before and beyond life—a representation that is
the product of the symbolic function proper to the human species and
which envisages birth as an original debt incurred by all men, a debt
owing to the cosmic powers from which humanity emerged.

Payment of this debt, which can however never be settled on
earth—because its full reimbursement is out of reach—takes the form of
sacrifices which, by replenishing the credit of the living, make it
possible to prolong life and even in certain cases to achieve eternity
by joining the Gods. But this initial belief-claim is also associated
with the emergence of sovereign powers whose legitimacy resides in their
ability to represent the entire original cosmos. And it is these powers
that invented money as a means of settling debts—a means whose
abstraction makes it possible to resolve the sacrificial paradox by
which putting to death becomes the permanent means of protecting life.
Through this institution, belief is in turn transferred to a currency
stamped with the effigy of the sovereign—a money put in circulation but
whose return is organized by this other institution which is the
tax/settlement of the life debt. So money also takes on the function of
a means of payment.³⁸

If nothing else, this provides a neat illustration of how different are
standards of debate in Europe from those current in the Anglo-American
world. One can’t imagine an American economist of any stripe writing
something like this. Still, the author is actually making a rather
clever synthesis here. Human nature does not drive us to “truck and
barter.” Rather, it ensures that we are always creating symbols—such as
money itself. This is how we come to see ourselves in a cosmos
surrounded by invisible forces; as in debt to the universe.

The ingenious move of course is to fold this back into the state theory
of money—since by “sovereign powers” Théret actually means “the state.”
The first kings were sacred kings who were either gods in their own
right or stood as privileged mediators between human beings and the
ultimate forces that governed the cosmos. This sets us on a road to the
gradual realization that our debt to the gods was always, really, a debt
to the society that made us what we are.

The “primordial debt,” writes British sociologist Geoffrey Ingham, “is
that owed by the living to the continuity and durability of the society
that secures their individual existence.”³⁹ In this sense it is not just
criminals who owe a “debt to society”—we are all, in a certain sense,
guilty, even criminals.

For instance, Ingham notes that, while there is no actual proof that
money emerged in this way, “there is considerable indirect etymological
evidence”:

In all Indo-European languages, words for “debt” are synonymous with
those for “sin” or “guilt”, illustrating the links between religion,
payment and the mediation of the sacred and profane realms by “money.”
For example, there is a connection between money (German _Geld_),
indemnity or sacrifice (Old English _Geild_), tax (Gothic _Gild_) and,
of course, guilt.⁴⁰

Or, to take another curious connection: Why were cattle so often used as
money? The German historian Bernard Laum long ago pointed out that in
Homer, when people measure the value of a ship or suit of armor, they
always measure it in oxen—even though when they actually exchange
things, they never pay for anything in oxen. It is hard to escape the
conclusion that this was because an ox was what one offered the gods in
sacrifice. Hence they represented absolute value. From Sumer to
Classical Greece, silver and gold were dedicated as offerings in
temples. Everywhere, money seems to have emerged from the thing most
appropriate for giving to the gods.⁴¹

If the king has simply taken over guardianship of that primordial debt
we all owe to society for having created us, this provides a very neat
explanation for why the government feels it has the right to make us pay
taxes. Taxes are just a measure of our debt to the society that made us.
But this doesn’t really explain how this kind of absolute life-debt can
be converted into _money_, which is by definition a means of measuring
and comparing the value of _different_ things. This is just as much a
problem for credit theorists as for neoclassical economists, even if the
problem for them is somewhat differently framed. If you start from the
barter theory of money, you have to resolve the problem of how and why
you would come to select one commodity to measure just how much you want
each of the other ones. If you start from a credit theory, you are left
with the problem I described in the first chapter: how to turn a moral
obligation into a specific sum of money, how the mere sense of owing
someone else a favor can eventually turn into a system of accounting in
which one is able to calculate exactly how many sheep or fish or chunks
of silver it would take to repay the debt. Or in this case, how do we go
from that absolute debt we owe to God to the very specific debts we owe
our cousins, or the bartender?

The answer provided by primordial-debt theorists is, again, ingenious.
If taxes represent our absolute debt to the society that created us,
then the first step toward creating real money comes when we start
calculating much more specific debts to society, systems of fines, fees,
and penalties, or even debts we owe to specific individuals who we have
wronged in some way, and thus to whom we stand in a relation of “sin” or
“guilt.”

This is actually much less implausible than it might sound. One of the
puzzling things about all the theories about the origins of money that
we’ve been looking at so far is that they almost completely ignore the
evidence of anthropology. Anthropologists do have a great deal of
knowledge of how economies within stateless societies actually
worked—how they still work in places where states and markets have been
unable to completely break up existing ways of doing things. There are
innumerable studies of, say, the use of cattle as money in eastern or
southern Africa, of shell money in the Americas (wampum being the most
famous example) or Papua New Guinea, bead money, feather money, the use
of iron rings, cowries, spondylus shells, brass rods, or woodpecker
scalps.⁴² The reason that this literature tends to be ignored by
economists is simple: “primitive currencies” of this sort is only rarely
used to buy and sell things, and even when they are, never primarily to
buy and sell everyday items such as chickens or eggs or shoes or
potatoes. Rather than being employed to acquire things, they are mainly
used to rearrange relations between people. Above all, to arrange
marriages and to settle disputes, particularly those arising from
murders or personal injury.

There is every reason to believe that our own money started the same
way—even the English word “to pay” is originally derived from a word for
“to pacify, appease”—as in, to give someone something precious, for
instance, to express just how badly you feel about having just killed
his brother in a drunken brawl, and how much you would really like to
avoid this becoming the basis for an ongoing blood-feud.⁴³

Debt theorists are especially concerned with this latter possibility.
This is partly because they tend to skip past the anthropological
literature and look at early law codes—taking inspiration here, from the
groundbreaking work of one of the twentieth century’s greatest
numismatists, Philip Grierson, who in the ’70s, first suggested that
money might first have emerged from early legal practice. Grierson was
an expert in the European Dark Ages, and he became fascinated by what
have come to be known as the “Barbarian Law Codes,” established by many
Germanic peoples after the destruction of the Roman Empire in the 600s
and 700s—Goths, Frisians, Franks, and so on—soon followed by similar
codes published everywhere from Russia to Ireland. Certainly they are
fascinating documents. On the one hand, they make it abundantly clear
just how wrong are conventional accounts of Europe around this time
“reverting to barter.” Almost all of the Germanic law codes use Roman
money to make assessments; penalties for theft, for instance, are almost
always followed by demands that the thief not only return the stolen
property but pay any outstanding rent (or in the event of stolen money,
interest) owing for the amount of time it has been in his possession. On
the other hand, these were soon followed by law codes by people living
in territories that had never been under Roman rule—in Ireland, Wales,
Nordic countries, Russia—and these are if anything even more revealing.
They could be remarkably creative, both in what could be used as a means
of payment and on the precise breakdown of injuries and insults that
required compensation:

Compensation in the Welsh laws is reckoned primarily in cattle and in
the Irish ones in cattle or bondmaids _(cumal)_, with considerable use
of precious metals in both. In the Germanic codes it is mainly in
precious metal … In the Russian codes it was silver and furs, graduated
from marten down to squirrel. Their detail is remarkable, not only in
the personal injuries envisioned—specific compensations for the loss of
an arm, a hand, a forefinger, a nail, for a blow on the head so that the
brain is visible or bone projects—but in the coverage some of them gave
to the possessions of the individual household. Title II of the Salic
Law deals with the theft of pigs, Title III with cattle, Title IV with
sheep, Title V with goats, Title VI with dogs, each time with an
elaborate breakdown differentiating between animals of different age and
sex.⁴⁴

This does make a great deal of psychological sense. I’ve already
remarked how difficult it is to imagine how a system of precise
equivalences—one young healthy milk cow is equivalent to exactly
thirty-six chickens—could arise from most forms of gift exchange. If
Henry gives Joshua a pig and feels he has received an inadequate
counter-gift, he might mock Joshua as a cheapskate, but he would have
little occasion to come up with a mathematical formula for precisely how
cheap he feels Joshua has been. On the other hand, if Joshua’s pig just
destroyed Henry’s garden, and especially, if that led to a fight in
which Henry lost a toe, and Henry’s family is now hauling Joshua up in
front of the village assembly—this is precisely the context where people
are most likely to become petty and legalistic and express outrage if
they feel they have received one groat less than was their rightful due.
That means exact mathematical specificity: for instance, the capacity to
measure the exact value of a two-year-old pregnant sow. What’s more, the
levying of penalties must have constantly required the calculation of
equivalences. Say the fine is in marten pelts but the culprit’s clan
doesn’t have any martens. How many squirrel skins will do? Or pieces of
silver jewelry? Such problems must have come up all the time and led to
at least a rough-and-ready set of rules of thumb over what sorts of
valuable were equivalent to others. This would help explain why, for
instance, medieval Welsh law codes can contain detailed breakdowns not
only of the value of different ages and conditions of milk cow, but of
the monetary value of every object likely to be found in an ordinary
homestead, down to the cost of each piece of timber—despite the fact
that there seems no reason to believe that most such items could even be
purchased on the open market at the time.⁴⁵

[]

There is something very compelling in all this. For one thing, the
premise makes a great deal of intuitive sense. After all, we do owe
everything we are to others. This is simply true. The language we speak
and even think in, our habits and opinions, the kind of food we like to
eat, the knowledge that makes our lights switch on and toilets flush,
even the style in which we carry out our gestures of defiance and
rebellion against social conventions—all of this, we learned from other
people, most of them long dead. If we were to imagine what we owe them
as a debt, it could only be infinite. The question is: Does it really
make sense to think of this as a debt? After all, a debt is by
definition something that we could at least imagine paying back. It is
strange enough to wish to be square with one’s parents—it rather implies
that one does not wish to think of them as parents any more. Would we
really want to be square with all humanity? What would that even mean?
And is this desire really a fundamental feature of all human thought?

Another way to put this would be: Are primordial-debt theorists
_describing_ a myth, have they discovered a profound truth of the human
condition that has always existed in all societies, and is it simply
spelled out particularly clearly in certain ancient texts from India—or
are they _inventing_ a myth of their own?

Clearly it must be the latter. They are inventing a myth.

The choice of the Vedic material is significant. The fact is, we know
almost nothing about the people who composed these texts and little
about the society that created them.⁴⁶ We don’t even know if
interest-bearing loans existed in Vedic India—which obviously has a
bearing on whether priests really saw sacrifice as the payment of
interest on a loan we owe to Death.⁴⁷ As a result, the material can
serve as a kind of empty canvas, or a canvas covered with hieroglyphics
in an unknown language, on which we can project almost anything we want
to. If we look at other ancient civilizations in which we do know
something about the larger context, we find that no such notion of
sacrifice as payment is in evidence.⁴⁸ If we look through the work of
ancient theologians, we find that most were familiar with the idea that
sacrifice was a way by which human beings could enter into commercial
relations with the gods, but that they felt it was patently ridiculous:
If the gods already have everything they want, what exactly do humans
have to bargain with?⁴⁹ We’ve seen in the last chapter how difficult it
is to give gifts to kings. With gods (let alone God) the problem is
magnified infinitely. Exchange implies equality. In dealing with cosmic
forces, this was simply assumed to be impossible from the start.

The notion that debts to gods were appropriated by the state, and thus
became the bases for taxation systems, can’t really stand up either. The
problem here is that in the ancient world, free citizens didn’t usually
pay taxes. Generally speaking, tribute was levied only on conquered
populations. This was already true in ancient Mesopotamia, where the
inhabitants of independent cities did not usually have to pay direct
taxes at all. Similarly, as Moses Finley put it, “Classical Greeks
looked upon direct taxes as tyrannical and avoided them whenever
possible.⁵⁰ Athenian citizens did not pay direct taxes of any sort;
though the city did sometimes distribute money to its citizens, a kind
of reverse taxation—sometimes directly, as with the proceeds of the
Laurium silver mines, and sometimes indirectly, as through generous fees
for jury duty or attending the assembly. Subject cities, however, did
have to pay tribute. Even within the Persian Empire, Persians did not
have to pay tribute to the Great King, but the inhabitants of conquered
provinces did.⁵¹ The same was true in Rome, where for a very long time,
Roman citizens not only paid no taxes but had a right to a share of the
tribute levied on others, in the form of the dole—the “bread” part of
the famous “bread and circuses.”⁵²

In other words, Benjamin Franklin was wrong when he said that in this
world nothing is certain except death and taxes. This obviously makes
the idea that the debt to one is just a variation on the other much
harder to maintain.

None of this, however, deals a mortal blow to the state theory of money.
Even those states that did not demand taxes did levy fees, penalties,
tariffs, and fines of one sort or another. But it _is_ very hard to
reconcile with any theory that claims states were first conceived as
guardians of some sort of cosmic, primordial debt.

It’s curious that primordial-debt theorists never have much to say about
Sumer or Babylonia, despite the fact that Mesopotamia is where the
practice of loaning money at interest was first invented, probably two
thousand years before the Vedas were composed—and that it was also the
home of the world’s first states. But if we look into Mesopotamian
history, it becomes a little less surprising. Again, what we find there
is in many ways the exact opposite of what such theorists would have
predicted.

The reader will recall here that Mesopotamian city-states were dominated
by vast Temples: gigantic, complex industrial institutions often staffed
by thousands—including everyone from shepherds and barge-pullers to
spinners and weavers to dancing girls and clerical administrators. By at
least 2700 bc, ambitious rulers had begun to imitate them by creating
palace complexes organized on similar terms—with the exception that
where the Temples centered on the sacred chambers of a god or goddess,
represented by a sacred image who was fed and clothed and entertained by
priestly servants as if he or she were a living person. Palaces centered
on the chambers of an actual live king. Sumerian rulers rarely went so
far as to declare themselves gods, but they often came very close.
However, when they did interfere in the lives of their subjects in their
capacity as cosmic rulers, they did not do it by imposing public debts,
but rather by canceling private ones.⁵³

We don’t know precisely when and how interest-bearing loans originated,
since they appear to predate writing. Most likely, Temple administrators
invented the idea as a way of financing the caravan trade. This trade
was crucial because while the river valley of ancient Mesopotamia was
extraordinarily fertile and produced huge surpluses of grain and other
foodstuffs, and supported enormous numbers of livestock, which in turn
supported a vast wool and leather industry, it was almost completely
lacking in anything else. Stone, wood, metal, even the silver used as
money, all had to be imported. From quite early times, then, Temple
administrators developed the habit of advancing goods to local
merchants—some of them private, others themselves Temple
functionaries—who would then go off and sell it overseas. Interest was
just a way for the Temples to take their share of the resulting
profits.⁵⁴ However, once established, the principle seems to have
quickly spread. Before long, we find not only commercial loans, but also
consumer loans—usury in the classical sense of the term. By c2400 bc it
already appears to have been common practice on the part of local
officials, or wealthy merchants, to advance loans to peasants who were
in financial trouble on collateral and begin to appropriate their
possessions if they were unable to pay. It usually started with grain,
sheep, goats, and furniture, then moved on to fields and houses, or,
alternately or ultimately, family members. Servants, if any, went
quickly, followed by children, wives, and in some extreme occasions,
even the borrower himself. These would be reduced to debt-peons: not
quite slaves, but very close to that, forced into perpetual service in
the lender’s household—or, sometimes, in the Temples or Palaces
themselves. In theory, of course, any of them could be redeemed whenever
the borrower repaid the money, but for obvious reasons, the more a
peasant’s resources were stripped away from him, the harder that became.

The effects were such that they often threatened to rip society apart.
If for any reason there was a bad harvest, large proportions of the
peasantry would fall into debt peonage; families would be broken up.
Before long, lands lay abandoned as indebted farmers fled their homes
for fear of repossession and joined semi-nomadic bands on the desert
fringes of urban civilization. Faced with the potential for complete
social breakdown, Sumerian and later Babylonian kings periodically
announced general amnesties: “clean slates,” as economic historian
Michael Hudson refers to them. Such decrees would typically declare all
outstanding consumer debt null and void (commercial debts were not
affected), return all land to its original owners, and allow all
debt-peons to return to their families. Before long, it became more or
less a regular habit for kings to make such a declaration on first
assuming power, and many were forced to repeat it periodically over the
course of their reigns.

In Sumeria, these were called “declarations of freedom”—and it is
significant that the Sumerian word _amargi_, the first recorded word for
“freedom” in any known human language, literally means “return to
mother”—since this is what freed debt-peons were finally allowed to
do.⁵⁵

Michael Hudson argues that Mesopotamian kings were only in a position to
do this because of their cosmic pretensions: in taking power, they saw
themselves as literally recreating human society, and so were in a
position to wipe the slate clean of all previous moral obligations.
Still, this is about as far from what primordial-debt theorists had in
mind as one could possibly imagine.⁵⁶

[]

Probably the biggest problem in this whole body of literature is the
initial assumption: that we begin with an infinite debt to something
called “society.” It’s this debt to society that we project onto the
gods. It’s this same debt that then gets taken up by kings and national
governments.

What makes the concept of society so deceptive is that we assume the
world is organized into a series of compact, modular units called
“societies,” and that all people know which one they’re in.
Historically, this is very rarely the case. Imagine I am a Christian
Armenian merchant living under the reign of Genghis Khan. What is
“society” for me? Is it the city where I grew up, the society of
international merchants (with its own elaborate codes of conduct) within
which I conduct my daily affairs, other speakers of Armenian,
Christendom (or maybe just Orthodox Christendom), or the inhabitants of
the Mongol empire itself, which stretched from the Mediterranean to
Korea? Historically, kingdoms and empires have rarely been the most
important reference points in peoples’ lives. Kingdoms rise and fall;
they also strengthen and weaken; governments may make their presence
known in people’s lives quite sporadically, and many people in history
were never entirely clear whose government they were actually in. Even
until quite recently, many of the world’s inhabitants were never even
quite sure what country they were supposed to be in, or why it should
matter. My mother, who was born a Jew in Poland, once told me a joke
from her childhood:

There was a small town located along the frontier between Russia and
Poland; no one was ever quite sure to which it belonged. One day an
official treaty was signed and not long after, surveyors arrived to draw
a border. Some villagers approached them where they had set up their
equipment on a nearby hill.

“So where are we, Russia or Poland?”

“According to our calculations, your village now begins exactly
thirty-seven meters into Poland.”

The villagers immediately began dancing for joy.

“Why?” the surveyors asked. “What difference does it make?”

“Don’t you know what this means?” they replied. “It means we’ll never
have to endure another one of those terrible Russian winters!”

However, if we are born with an infinite debt to all those people who
made our existence possible, but there is no natural unit called
“society”—then who or what exactly do we really owe it to? Everyone?
Everything? Some people or things more than others? And how do we pay a
debt to something so diffuse? Or, perhaps more to the point, who exactly
can claim the authority to tell us how we can repay it, and on what
grounds?

If we frame the problem that way, the authors of the Brahmanas are
offering a quite sophisticated reflection on a moral question that no
one has really ever been able to answer any better before or since. As I
say, we can’t know much about the conditions under which those texts
were composed, but such evidence as we do have suggests that the crucial
documents date from sometime between 500 and 400 bc—that is, roughly the
time of Socrates—which in India appears to have been just around the
time that a commercial economy, and institutions like coined money and
interest-bearing loans were beginning to become features of everyday
life. The intellectual classes of the time were, much as they were in
Greece and China, grappling with the implications. In their case, this
meant asking: What does it mean to imagine our responsibilities as
debts? To whom do we owe our existence?

It’s significant that their answer did not make any mention either of
“society” or states (though certainly kings and governments certainly
existed in early India). Instead, they fixed on debts to gods, to sages,
to fathers, and to “men.” It wouldn’t be at all difficult to translate
their formulation into more contemporary language. We could put it this
way. We owe our existence above all:

• To the universe, cosmic forces, as we would put it now, to Nature. The
ground of our existence. To be repaid through ritual: ritual being an
act of respect and recognition to all that beside which we are small.⁵⁷

• To those who have created the knowledge and cultural accomplishments
that we value most; that give our existence its form, its meaning, but
also its shape. Here we would include not only the philosophers and
scientists who created our intellectual tradition but everyone from
William Shakespeare to that long-since-forgotten woman, somewhere in the
Middle East, who created leavened bread. We repay them by becoming
learned ourselves and contributing to human knowledge and human culture.

• To our parents, and their parents—our ancestors. We repay them by
becoming ancestors.

• To humanity as a whole. We repay them by generosity to strangers, by
maintaining that basic communistic ground of sociality that makes human
relations, and hence life, possible.

Set out this way, though, the argument begins to undermine its very
premise. These are nothing like commercial debts. After all, one might
repay one’s parents by having children, but one is not generally thought
to have repaid one’s creditors if one lends the cash to someone else.⁵⁸

Myself, I wonder: Couldn’t that really be the point? Perhaps what the
authors of the Brahmanas were really demonstrating was that, in the
final analysis, our relation with the cosmos is ultimately nothing like
a commercial transaction, nor could it be. That is because commercial
transactions imply both equality and separation. These examples are all
about overcoming separation: you are free from your debt to your
ancestors when you become an ancestor; you are free from your debt to
the sages when you become a sage, you are free from your debt to
humanity when you act with humanity. All the more so if one is speaking
of the universe. If you cannot bargain with the gods because they
already have everything, then you certainly cannot bargain with the
universe, because the universe _is_ everything—and that everything
necessarily includes yourself. One could in fact interpret this list as
a subtle way of saying that the only way of “freeing oneself” from the
debt was not literally repaying debts, but rather showing that these
debts do not exist because one is not in fact separate to begin with,
and hence that the very notion of canceling the debt, and achieving a
separate, autonomous existence, was ridiculous from the start. Or even
that the very presumption of positing oneself as separate from humanity
or the cosmos, so much so that one can enter into one-to-one dealings
with it, is itself the crime that can be answered only by death. Our
guilt is not due to the fact that we cannot repay our debt to the
universe. Our guilt is our presumption in thinking of ourselves as being
in any sense an equivalent to Everything Else that Exists or Has Ever
Existed, so as to be able to conceive of such a debt in the first
place.⁵⁹

Or let us look at the other side of the equation. Even if it is possible
to imagine ourselves as standing in a position of absolute debt to the
cosmos, or to humanity, the next question becomes: Who exactly has a
right to speak for the cosmos, or humanity, to tell us how that debt
must be repaid? If there’s anything more preposterous than claiming to
stand apart from the entire universe so as to enter into negotiations
with it, it is claiming to speak for the other side.

If one were looking for the ethos for an individualistic society such as
our own, one way to do it might well be to say: we all owe an infinite
debt to humanity, society, nature, or the cosmos (however one prefers to
frame it), but no one else could possibly tell us how we are to pay it.
This at least would be intellectually consistent. If so, it would
actually be possible to see almost all systems of established
authority—religion, morality, politics, economics, and the
criminal-justice system—as so many different fraudulent ways to presume
to calculate what cannot be calculated, to claim the authority to tell
us how some aspect of that unlimited debt ought to be repaid. Human
freedom would then be our ability to decide for ourselves how we want to
do so.

No one, to my knowledge, has ever taken this approach. Instead, theories
of existential debt always end up becoming ways of justifying—or laying
claim to—structures of authority. The case of the Hindu intellectual
tradition is telling here. The debt to humanity appears only in a few
early texts, and is quickly forgotten. Almost all later Hindu
commentators ignore it and instead put their emphasis on a man’s debt to
his father.⁶⁰

[]

Primordial-debt theorists have other fish to fry. They are not really
interested in the cosmos, but actually, in “society.”

Let me return again to that word, “society.” The reason that it seems
like such a simple, self-evident concept is because we mostly use it as
a synonym for “nation.” After all, when Americans speak of paying their
debt to society, they are not thinking of their responsibilities to
people who live in Sweden. It’s only the modern state, with its
elaborate border controls and social policies, that enables us to
imagine “society” in this way, as a single bounded entity. This is why
projecting that notion backwards into Vedic or Medieval times will
always be deceptive, even though we don’t really have another word.

It seems to me that this is exactly what the primordial-debt theorists
are doing: projecting such a notion backwards.

Really, the whole complex of ideas they are talking about—the notion
that there is this thing called society, that we have a debt to it, that
governments can speak for it, that it can be imagined as a sort of
secular god—all of these ideas emerged together around the time of the
French Revolution, or in its immediate wake. In other words, it was born
alongside the idea of the modern nation-state.

We can already see them coming together clearly in the work of Auguste
Comte, in early nineteenth-century France. Comte, a philosopher and
political pamphleteer now most famous for having first coined the term
“sociology,” went so far, by the end of his life, as actually proposing
a Religion of Society, which he called Positivism, broadly modeled on
Medieval Catholicism, replete with vestments where all the buttons were
on the back (so they couldn’t be put on without the help of others). In
his last work, which he called a “Positivist Catechism,” he also laid
down the first explicit theory of social debt. At one point someone asks
an imaginary Priest of Positivism what he thinks of the notion of human
rights. The priest scoffs at the very idea. This is nonsense, he says,
an error born of individualism. Positivism understands only duties.
After all:

We are born under a load of obligations of every kind, to our
predecessors, to our successors, to our contemporaries. After our birth
these obligations increase or accumulate before the point where we are
capable of rendering anyone any service. On what human foundation, then,
could one seat the idea of “rights”?⁶¹

While Comte doesn’t use the word “debt,” the sense is clear enough. We
have already accumulated endless debts before we get to the age at which
we can even think of paying them. By that time, there’s no way to
calculate to whom we even owe them. The only way to redeem ourselves is
to dedicate ourselves to the service of Humanity as a whole.

In his lifetime, Comte was considered something of a crackpot, but his
ideas proved influential. His notion of unlimited obligations to society
ultimately crystallized in the notion of the “social debt,” a notion
taken up among social reformers and, eventually, socialist politicians
in many parts of Europe and abroad.⁶² “We are all born as debtors to
society”: in France the notion of a social debt soon became something of
a catchphrase, a slogan, and eventually a cliché.⁶³ The state, according
to this view, was merely the administrator of an existential debt that
all of us have to the society that created us, embodied not least in the
fact that we all continue to be completely dependent on one another for
our existence, even if we are not completely aware of how.

These are also the intellectual and political circles that shaped the
thought of Emile Durkheim, the founder of the discipline of sociology
that we know today, who in a way did Comte one better by arguing that
all gods in all religions are always already projections of society—so
an explicit religion of society would not even be necessary. All
religions, for Durkheim, are simply ways of recognizing our mutual
dependence on one another, a dependence that affects us in a million
ways that we are never entirely aware of. “God” and “society” are
ultimately the same.

The problem is that for several hundred years now, it has simply been
assumed that the guardian of that debt we owe for all of this, the
legitimate representatives of that amorphous social totality that has
allowed us to become individuals, must necessarily be the state. Almost
all socialist or socialistic regimes end up appealing to some version of
this argument. To take one notorious example, this was how the Soviet
Union used to justify forbidding their citizens from emigrating to other
countries. The argument was always: The USSR created these people, the
USSR raised and educated them, made them who they are. What right do
they have to take the product of our investment and transfer it to
another country, as if they didn’t owe us anything? Neither is this
rhetoric restricted to socialist regimes. Nationalists appeal to exactly
the same kind of arguments—especially in times of war. And all modern
governments are nationalist to some degree.

One might even say that what we really have, in the idea of primordial
debt, is the ultimate nationalist myth. Once we owed our lives to the
gods that created us, paid interest in the form of animal sacrifice, and
ultimately paid back the principal with our lives. Now we owe it to the
Nation that formed us, pay interest in the form of taxes, and when it
comes time to defend the nation against its enemies, to offer to pay it
with our lives.

This is a great trap of the twentieth century: on one side is the logic
of the market, where we like to imagine we all start out as individuals
who don’t owe each other anything. On the other is the logic of the
state, where we all begin with a debt we can never truly pay. We are
constantly told that they are opposites, and that between them they
contain the only real human possibilities. But it’s a false dichotomy.
States created markets. Markets require states. Neither could continue
without the other, at least, in anything like the forms we would
recognize today.



CHAPTER FOUR  CRUELTY AND REDEMPTION


_We will buy the poor for silver, the needy for a pair of sandals_.

_—Amos_ 2:6

THE READER MAY have noticed that there is an unresolved debate between
those who see money as a commodity and those who see it as an IOU. Which
one is it? By now, the answer should be obvious: it’s both. Keith Hart,
probably the best-known current anthropological authority on the
subject, pointed this out many years ago. There are, he famously
observed, two sides to any coin:

Look at a coin from your pocket. On one side is “heads”—the symbol of
the political authority which minted the coin; on the other side is
“tails”—the precise specification of the amount the coin is worth as
payment in exchange. One side reminds us that states underwrite
currencies and the money is originally a relation between persons in
society, a token perhaps. The other reveals the coin as a thing, capable
of entering into definite relations with other things.¹

Clearly, money was not invented to overcome the inconveniences of barter
between neighbors—since neighbors would have no reason to engage in
barter in the first place. Still, a system of pure credit money would
have serious inconveniences as well. Credit money is based on trust, and
in competitive markets, trust itself becomes a scarce commodity. This is
particularly true of dealings between strangers. Within the Roman
empire, a silver coin stamped with the image of Tiberius might have
circulated at a value considerably higher than the value of the silver
it contained. Ancient coins invariably circulated at a value higher than
their metal content.² This was largely because Tiberius’s government was
willing to accept them at face value. However, the Persian government
probably wasn’t, and the Mauryan and Chinese governments certainly
weren’t. Very large numbers of Roman gold and silver coins did end up in
India and even China; this is presumably the main reason that they were
made of gold and silver to begin with.

What’s true for a vast empire like Rome or China is obviously all the
more true for a Sumerian or Greek city-state, let alone anyone operating
within the kind of broken checkerboard of kingdoms, towns, and tiny
principalities that prevailed in most of Medieval Europe or India. As
I’ve pointed out, often what was inside and what was outside were not
especially clear. Within a community—a town, a city, a guild or
religious society—pretty much anything could function as money, provided
everyone knew there was _someone_ willing to accept it to cancel out a
debt. To offer one particularly striking example, in certain cities in
nineteenth-century Siam, small change consisted entirely of porcelain
Chinese gaming counters—basically, the equivalent of poker chips—issued
by local casinos. If one of these casinos went out of business or lost
its license, its owners would have to send a crier through the streets
banging a gong and announcing that anyone holding such chits had three
days to redeem them.³ For major transactions, of course, currency that
was also acceptable outside the community (usually silver or gold again)
was ordinarily employed.

In a similar way, English shops, for many centuries, would issue their
own wood or lead or leather token money. The practice was often
technically illegal, but it continued until relatively recent times.
Here is an example from the seventeenth century, by a certain Henry, who
had a store at Stony Stratford, Buckinghamshire:

[]

This is clearly a case of the same principle: Henry would provide small
change in the form of IOUs redeemable at his own store. As such, they
might circulate broadly, at least among anyone who did regular business
at that shop. But they were unlikely to travel very far from Stony
Stratford—most tokens, in fact, never circulated more than a few blocks
in any direction. For larger transactions, everyone, including Henry,
expected money in a form that would be acceptable anywhere, including in
Italy or France.⁴

Throughout most of history, even where we do find elaborate markets, we
also find a complex jumble of different sorts of currency. Some of these
may have originally emerged from barter between foreigners: the cacao
money of Mesoamerica or salt money of Ethiopia are frequently cited
examples.⁵ Others arose from credit systems, or from arguments over what
sort of goods should be acceptable to pay taxes or other debts. Such
questions were often matters of endless contestation. One could often
learn a lot about the balance of political forces in a given time and
place by what sorts of things were acceptable as currency. For instance:
in much the same way that colonial Virginia planters managed to pass a
law obliging shopkeepers to accept their tobacco as currency, medieval
Pomeranian peasants appear to have at certain points convinced their
rulers to make taxes, fees, and customs duties, which were registered in
Roman currency, actually payable in wine, cheese, peppers, chickens,
eggs, and even herring—much to the annoyance of traveling merchants, who
therefore had to either carry such things around in order to pay the
tolls or buy them locally at prices that would have been more
advantageous to their suppliers for that very reason.⁶ This was in an
area with a free peasantry, rather than serfs. They were in a relatively
strong political position. In other times and places, the interests of
lords and merchants prevailed instead.

Thus money is almost always something hovering between a commodity and a
debt-token. This is probably why coins—pieces of silver or gold that are
already valuable commodities in themselves, but that, being stamped with
the emblem of a local political authority, became even more
valuable—still sit in our heads as the quintessential form of money.
They most perfectly straddle the divide that defines what money is in
the first place. What’s more, the relation between the two was a matter
of constant political contestation.

In other words, the battle between state and market, between governments
and merchants is not inherent to the human condition.

[]

Our two origin stories—the myth of barter and the myth of primordial
debt—may appear to be about as far apart as they could be, but in their
own way, they are also two sides of the same coin. One assumes the
other. It’s only once we can imagine human life as a series of
commercial transactions that we’re capable of seeing our relation to the
universe in terms of debt.

To illustrate, let me call a perhaps surprising witness, Friedrich
Nietzsche, a man able to see with uncommon clarity what happens when you
try to imagine the world in commercial terms.

Nietzsche’s _On the Genealogy of Morals_ appeared in 1887. In it, he
begins with an argument that might well have been taken directly from
Adam Smith—but he takes it a step further than Smith ever dared to,
insisting that not just barter, but buying and selling itself, precede
any other form of human relationship. The feeling of personal
obligation, he observes,

has its origin in the oldest and most primitive personal relationship
there is, in the relationship between seller and buyer, creditor and
debtor. Here for the first time one person moved up against another
person, here an individual _measured himself_ against another
individual. We have found no civilization still at such a low level that
something of this relationship is not already perceptible. To set
prices, to measure values, to think up equivalencies, to exchange
things—that preoccupied man’s very first thinking to such a degree that
in a certain sense it’s what thinking _itself_ is. Here the oldest form
of astuteness was bred; here, too, we can assume are the first
beginnings of man’s pride, his feeling of pre-eminence in relation to
other animals. Perhaps our word “man” (_manas_) continues to express
directly something of _this_ feeling of the self: the human being
describes himself as a being which assesses values, which values and
measures, as the “inherently calculating animal.” Selling and buying,
together with their psychological attributes, are even older than the
beginnings of any form of social organizations and groupings; out of the
most rudimentary form of personal legal rights the budding feeling of
exchange, contract, guilt, law, duty, and compensation was instead first
_transferred_ to the crudest and earliest social structures (in their
relationships with similar social structures), along with the habit of
comparing power with power, of measuring, of calculating.⁷

Smith, too, we will remember, saw the origins of language—and hence of
human thought—as lying in our propensity to “exchange one thing for
another,” in which he also saw the origins of the market.⁸ The urge to
trade, to compare values, is the very thing that makes us intelligent
beings, and different from other animals. Society comes later—which
means our ideas about responsibilities to other people first take shape
in strictly commercial terms.

Unlike with Smith, however, it never occurred to Nietzsche that you
could have a world where all such transactions immediately cancel out.
Any system of commercial accounting, he assumed, will produce creditors
and debtors. In fact, he believed that it was from this very fact that
human morality emerged. Note, he says, how the German word _schuld_
means both “debt” and “guilt.” At first, to be in debt was simply to be
guilty, and creditors delighted in punishing debtors unable to repay
their loans by inflicting “all sorts of humiliation and torture on the
body of the debtor, for instance, cutting as much flesh off as seemed
appropriate for the debt.”⁹ In fact, Nietzsche went so far as to insist
that those original barbarian law codes that tabulated so much for a
ruined eye, so much for a severed finger, were not originally meant to
fix rates of monetary compensation for the loss of eyes and fingers, but
to establish how much of the debtor’s body creditors were allowed to
take! Needless to say, he doesn’t provide a scintilla of evidence for
this (none exists).¹⁰ But to ask for evidence would be to miss the
point. We are dealing here not with a real historical argument but with
a purely imaginative exercise.

When humans did begin to form communities, Nietzsche continues, they
necessarily began to imagine their relationship to the community in
these terms. The tribe provides them with peace and security. They are
therefore in its debt. Obeying its laws is a way of paying it back
(“paying your debt to society” again). But this debt, he says, is also
paid—here too—in sacrifice:

Within the original tribal cooperatives—we’re talking about primeval
times—the living generation always acknowledged a legal obligation to
the previous generations, and especially to the earliest one which had
founded the tribe […] Here the reigning conviction is that the tribe
only _exists_ at all only because of the sacrifices and achievements of
its ancestors—and that people have to _pay them back_ with sacrifices
and achievements. In this people recognize a _debt_ which keeps steadily
growing because these ancestors in their continuing existence as
powerful spirits do not stop giving the tribe new advantages and lending
them their power. Do they do this for free? But there is no “for free”
for those raw and “spiritually destitute” ages. What can people give
back to them? Sacrifices (at first as nourishment understood very
crudely), festivals, chapels, signs of honor, above all, obedience—for
all customs, as work of one’s ancestors, are also their statutes and
commands. Do people ever give them enough? This suspicion remains and
grows.¹¹

In other words, for Nietzsche, starting from Adam Smith’s assumptions
about human nature means we must necessarily end up with something very
much along the lines of primordial-debt theory. On the one hand, it is
because of our feeling of debt to the ancestors that we obey the
ancestral laws: this is why we feel that the community has the right to
react “like an angry creditor” and punish us for our transgressions if
we break them. In a larger sense, we develop a creeping feeling that we
could never really pay back the ancestors, that no sacrifice (not even
the sacrifice of our first-born) will ever truly redeem us. We are
terrified of the ancestors, and the stronger and more powerful a
community becomes, the more powerful they seem to be, until finally,
“the ancestor is necessarily transfigured into a god.” As communities
grow into kingdoms and kingdoms into universal empires, the gods
themselves come to seem more universal, they take on grander, more
cosmic pretentions, ruling the heavens, casting thunderbolts—culminating
in the Christian god, who, as the maximal deity, necessarily “brought
about the maximum feeling of indebtedness on earth.” Even our ancestor
Adam is no longer figured as a creditor, but as a transgressor, and
therefore a debtor, who passes on to us his burden of Original Sin:

Finally, with the impossibility of discharging the debt, people also
come up with the notion that it is impossible to remove the penance, the
idea that it cannot be paid off (“_eternal_ punishment”) … until all of
a sudden we confront the paradoxical and horrifying expedient with which
a martyred humanity found temporary relief, that stroke of genius of
_Christianity:_ God sacrificing himself for the guilt of human beings,
God paying himself back with himself, God as the only one who can redeem
man from what for human beings has become impossible to redeem—the
creditor sacrificing himself for the debtor, out of _love_ (can people
believe that?), out of love for his debtor!¹²

It all makes perfect sense if you start from Nietzsche’s initial
premise. The problem is that the premise is insane.

There is also every reason to believe that Nietzsche knew the premise
was insane; in fact, that this was the entire point. What Nietzsche is
doing here is starting out from the standard, common-sense assumptions
about the nature of human beings prevalent in his day (and to a large
extent, still prevalent)—that we are rational calculating machines, that
commercial self-interest comes before society, that “society” itself is
just a way of putting a kind of temporary lid on the resulting conflict.
That is, he is starting out from ordinary bourgeois assumptions and
driving them to a place where they can only shock a bourgeois audience.

It’s a worthy game and no one has ever played it better; but it’s a game
played entirely within the boundaries of bourgeois thought. It has
nothing to say to anything that lies beyond that. The best response to
anyone who wants to take seriously Nietzsche’s fantasies about savage
hunters chopping pieces off each other’s bodies for failure to remit are
the words of an actual hunter-gatherer—an Inuit from Greenland made
famous in the Danish writer Peter Freuchen’s _Book of the Eskimo_.
Freuchen tells how one day, after coming home hungry from an
unsuccessful walrus-hunting expedition, he found one of the successful
hunters dropping off several hundred pounds of meat. He thanked him
profusely. The man objected indignantly:

“Up in our country we are human!” said the hunter. “And since we are
human we help each other. We don’t like to hear anybody say thanks for
that. What I get today you may get tomorrow. Up here we say that by
gifts one makes slaves and by whips one makes dogs.”¹³

The last line is something of an anthropological classic, and similar
statements about the refusal to calculate credits and debits can be
found through the anthropological literature on egalitarian hunting
societies. Rather than seeing himself as human because he could make
economic calculations, the hunter insisted that being truly human meant
_refusing_ to make such calculations, refusing to measure or remember
who had given what to whom, for the precise reason that doing so would
inevitably create a world where we began “comparing power with power,
measuring, calculating” and reducing each other to slaves or dogs
through debt.

It’s not that he, like untold millions of similar egalitarian spirits
throughout history, was unaware that humans have a propensity to
calculate. If he wasn’t aware of it, he could not have said what he did.
Of course we have a propensity to calculate. We have all sorts of
propensities. In any real-life situation, we have propensities that
drive us in several different contradictory directions simultaneously.
No one is more real than any other. The real question is which we take
as the foundation of our humanity, and therefore, make the basis of our
civilization. If Nietzsche’s analysis of debt is helpful to us, then, it
is because it reveals that when we start from the assumption that human
thought is essentially a matter of commercial calculation, that buying
and selling are the basis of human society—then, yes, once we begin to
think about our relationship with the cosmos, we will necessarily
conceive of it in terms of debt.

[]

I do think Nietzsche helps us in another way as well: to understand the
concept of redemption. Niezsche’s account of “primeval times” might be
absurd, but his description of Christianity—of how a sense of debt is
transformed into an abiding sense of guilt, and guilt to self-loathing,
and self-loathing to self-torture—all of this does ring very true.

Why, for instance, do we refer to Christ as the “redeemer”? The primary
meaning of “redemption” is to buy something back, or to recover
something that had been given up in security for a loan; to acquire
something by paying off a debt. It is rather striking to think that the
very core of the Christian message, salvation itself, the sacrifice of
God’s own son to rescue humanity from eternal damnation, should be
framed in the language of a financial transaction.

Nietzsche might have been starting from the same assumptions as Adam
Smith, but clearly the early Christians weren’t. The roots of this
thinking lie deeper than Smith’s with his nation of shopkeepers. The
authors of the Brahmanas were not alone in borrowing the language of the
marketplace as a way of thinking about the human condition. Indeed, to
one degree or another, all the major world religions do this.

The reason is that all of them—from Zoroastrianism to Islam—arose amidst
intense arguments about the role of money and the market in human life,
and particularly about what these institutions meant for fundamental
questions of what human beings owed to one another. The question of
debt, and arguments about debt, ran through every aspect of the
political life of the time. These arguments were set amidst revolts,
petitions, reformist movements. Some such movements gained allies in the
temples and palaces. Others were brutally suppressed. Most of the terms,
slogans, and specific issues being debated, though, have been lost to
history. We just don’t know what a political debate in a Syrian tavern
in 750 bc was likely to be about. As a result, we have spent thousands
of years contemplating sacred texts full of political allusions that
would have been instantly recognizable to any reader at the time when
they were written, but whose meaning we now can only guess at.¹⁴

One of the unusual things about the Bible is that it preserves some bits
of this larger context. To return to the notion of redemption: the
Hebrew words _padah_ and _goal_, both translated as “redemption,” could
be used for buying back anything one had sold to someone else,
particularly the recovery of ancestral land, or to recovering some
object held by creditors in way of a pledge.¹⁵ The example foremost in
the minds of prophets and theologians seems to have been the last: the
redemption of pledges, and especially, of family members held as
debt-pawns. It would seem that the economy of the Hebrew kingdoms, by
the time of the prophets, was already beginning to develop the same kind
of debt crises that had long been common in Mesopotamia: especially in
years of bad harvests, the poor became indebted to rich neighbors or to
wealthy moneylenders in the towns, they would begin to lose title to
their fields and to become tenants on what had been their own land, and
their sons and daughters would be removed to serve as servants in their
creditors’ households, or even sold abroad as slaves.¹⁶ The earlier
prophets contain allusions to such crises, but the book of Nehemiah,
written in Persian times, is the most explicit:¹⁷

Some also there were that said, “We have mortgaged our lands, vineyards,
and houses, that we might buy corn, because of the dearth.”

There were also those that said, “We have borrowed money for the king’s
tribute, and that upon our lands and vineyards.

“Yet now our flesh is as the flesh of our brethren, our children as
their children: and, lo, we bring into bondage our sons and our
daughters to be servants, and some of our daughters are brought unto
bondage already: neither is it in our power to redeem them; for other
men have our lands and vineyards.”

And I was very angry when I heard their cry and these words.

Then I consulted with myself, and I rebuked the nobles, and the rulers,
and said unto them, “Ye exact usury, every one of his brother.” And I
set a great assembly against them.¹⁸

Nehemiah was a Jew born in Babylon, a former cup-bearer to the Persian
emperor. In 444 bc, he managed to talk the Great King into appointing
him governor of his native Judaea. He also received permission to
rebuild the Temple in Jerusalem that had been destroyed by
Nebuchadnezzar more than two centuries earlier. In the course of
rebuilding, sacred texts were recovered and restored; in a sense, this
was the moment of the creation of what we now consider Judaism.

The problem was that Nehemiah quickly found himself confronted with a
social crisis. All around him, impoverished peasants were unable to pay
their taxes; creditors were carrying off the children of the poor. His
first response was to issue a classic Babylonian-style “clean slate”
edict—having himself been born in Babylon, he was clearly familiar with
the general principle. All non-commercial debts were to be forgiven.
Maximum interest rates were set. At the same time, though, Nehemiah
managed to locate, revise, and reissue much older Jewish laws, now
preserved in Exodus, Deuteronomy, and Leviticus, which in certain ways
went even further, by institutionalizing the principle.¹⁹ The most
famous of these is the Law of Jubilee: a law that stipulated that all
debts would be automatically cancelled “in the Sabbath year” (that is,
after seven years had passed), and that all who languished in bondage
owing to such debts would be released.²⁰

“Freedom,” in the Bible, as in Mesopotamia, came to refer above all to
release from the effects of debt. Over time, the history of the Jewish
people itself came to be interpreted in this light: the liberation from
bondage in Egypt was God’s first, paradigmatic act of redemption; the
historical tribulations of the Jews (defeat, conquest, exile) were seen
as misfortunes that would eventually lead to a final redemption with the
coming of the Messiah—though this could only be accomplished, prophets
such as Jeremiah warned them, after the Jewish people truly repented of
their sins (carrying each other off into bondage, whoring after false
gods, the violation of commandments).²¹ In this light, the adoption of
the term by Christians is hardly surprising. Redemption was a release
from one’s burden of sin and guilt, and the end of history would be that
moment when all slates are wiped clean and all debts finally lifted when
a great blast from angelic trumpets will announce the final Jubilee.

If so, “redemption” is no longer about buying something back. It’s
really more a matter of destroying the entire system of accounting. In
many Middle Eastern cities, this was literally true: one of the common
acts during debt cancelation was the ceremonial destruction of the
tablets on which financial records had been kept, an act to be repeated,
much less officially, in just about every major peasant revolt in
history.²²

This leads to another problem: What is possible in the meantime, before
that final redemption comes? In one of his more disturbing parables, the
Parable of the Unforgiving Servant, Jesus seemed to be explicitly
playing with the problem:

Therefore, the kingdom of heaven is like a king who wanted to settle
accounts with his servants. As he began the settlement, a man who owed
him ten thousand talents was brought to him. Since he was not able to
pay, the master ordered that he and his wife and his children and all
that he had be sold to repay the debt.

The servant fell on his knees before him. “Be patient with me,” he
begged, “and I will pay back everything.” The servant’s master took pity
on him, canceled the debt, and let him go.

But when that servant went out, he found one of his fellow servants who
owed him a hundred denarii. He grabbed him and began to choke him. “Pay
back what you owe me!” he demanded.

His fellow servant fell to his knees and begged him, “Be patient with
me, and I will pay you back.”

But he refused. Instead, he went off and had the man thrown into prison
until he could pay the debt. When the other servants saw what had
happened, they were greatly distressed and went and told their master
everything that had happened.

Then the master called the servant in. “You wicked servant,” he said, “I
canceled all that debt of yours because you begged me to. Shouldn’t you
have had mercy on your fellow servant just as I had on you?” In anger
his master turned him over to the jailers to be tortured, until he
should pay back all he owed.²³

This is quite an extraordinary text. On one level it’s a joke; in
others, it could hardly be more serious.

We begin with the king wishing to “settle accounts” with his servants.
The premise is absurd. Kings, like gods, can’t really enter into
relations of exchange with their subjects, since no parity is possible.
And this is a king who clearly _is_ God. Certainly there can be no final
settling of accounts.

So at best we are dealing with an act of whimsy on the king’s part. The
absurdity of the premise is hammered home by the sum the first man
brought before him is said to owe. In ancient Judaea, to say someone
owes a creditor “ten thousand talents” would be like now saying someone
owes “a hundred billion dollars.” The number is a joke, too; it simply
stands in for “a sum no human being could ever, conceivably, repay.”²⁴

Faced with infinite, existential debt, the servant can only tell obvious
lies: “a hundred billion? Sure, I’m good for it! Just give me a little
more time.” Then, suddenly, apparently just as arbitrarily, the Lord
forgives him.

Yet, it turns out, the amnesty has a condition he is not aware of. It is
incumbent on his being willing to act in an analogous way to other
humans—in this particular case, another servant who owes him (to
translate again into contemporary terms), maybe a thousand bucks.
Failing the test, the human is cast into hell for all eternity, or
“until he should pay back all he owed,” which in this case comes down to
the same thing.

The parable has long been a challenge to theologians. It’s normally
interpreted as a comment on the endless bounty of God’s grace and how
little He demands of us in comparison—and thus, by implication, as a way
of suggesting that torturing us in hell for all eternity is not as
unreasonable as it might seem. Certainly, the unforgiving servant is a
genuinely odious character. Still, what is even more striking to me is
the tacit suggestion that forgiveness, in this world, is ultimately
impossible. Christians practically say as much every time they recite
the Lord’s Prayer, and ask God to “forgive us our debts, as we also
forgive our debtors.”²⁵ It repeats the story of the parable almost
exactly, and the implications are similarly dire. After all, most
Christians reciting the prayer are aware that they do not generally
forgive their debtors. Why then should God forgive them their sins?²⁶

What’s more, there is the lingering suggestion that we really couldn’t
live up to those standards, even if we tried. One of the things that
makes the Jesus of the New Testament such a tantalizing character is
that it’s never clear what he’s telling us. Everything can be read two
ways. When he calls on his followers to forgive all debts, refuse to
cast the first stone, turn the other cheek, love their enemies, to hand
over their possessions to the poor—is he really expecting them to do
this? Or are such demands just a way of throwing in their faces that,
since we are clearly not prepared to act this way, we are all sinners
whose salvation can only come in another world—a position that can be
(and has been) used to justify almost anything? This is a vision of
human life as inherently corrupt, but it also frames even spiritual
affairs in commercial terms: with calculations of sin, penance, and
absolution, the Devil and St. Peter with their rival ledger books,
usually accompanied by the creeping feeling that it’s all a charade
because the very fact that we are reduced to playing such a game of
tabulating sins reveals us to be fundamentally unworthy of forgiveness.

World religions, as we shall see, are full of this kind of ambivalence.
On the one hand they are outcries against the market; on the other, they
tend to frame their objections in commercial terms—as if to argue that
turning human life into a series of transactions is not a very good
deal. What I think even these few examples reveal, though, is how much
is being papered over in the conventional accounts of the origins and
history of money. There is something almost touchingly naïve in the
stories about neighbors swapping potatoes for an extra pair of shoes.
When the ancients thought about money, friendly swaps were hardly the
first thing that came to mind.

True, some might have thought about their tab at the local ale-house,
or, if they were a merchant or administrator, of storehouses, account
books, exotic imported delights. For most, though, what was likely to
come to mind was the selling of slaves and ransoming of prisoners,
corrupt tax-farmers and the depredations of conquering armies, mortgages
and interest, theft and extortion, revenge and punishment, and, above
all, the tension between the need for money to create families, to
acquire a bride so as to have children, and use of that same money to
destroy families—to create debts that lead to the same wife and children
being taken away. “Some of our daughters are brought unto bondage
already: neither is it in our power to redeem them.” One can only
imagine what those words meant, emotionally, to a father in a
patriarchal society in which a man’s ability to protect the honor of his
family was everything. Yet this is what money meant to the majority of
people for most of human history: the terrifying prospect of one’s sons
and daughters being carried off to the homes of repulsive strangers to
clean their pots and provide the occasional sexual services, to be
subject to every conceivable form of violence and abuse, possibly for
years, conceivably forever, as their parents waited, helpless, avoiding
eye contact with their neighbors, who knew exactly what was happening to
those they were supposed to have been able to protect.²⁷ Clearly this
was the worst thing that could happen to anyone—which is why, in the
parable, it could be treated as interchangeable with being “turned over
to the jailors to be tortured” for life. And that’s just from the
perspective of the father. One can only imagine how it might have felt
to be the daughter. Yet, over the course of human history, untold
millions of daughters have known (and in fact many still know) exactly
what it’s like.

One might object that this was just assumed to be in the nature of
things: like the imposition of tribute on conquered populations, it
might have been resented, but it wasn’t considered a moral issue, a
matter of right and wrong. Some things just happen. This has been the
most common attitude of peasants to such phenomena throughout human
history. What’s striking about the historical record is that in the case
of debt crises, this was _not_ how many reacted. Many actually did
become indignant. So many, in fact, that most of our contemporary
language of social justice, our way of speaking of human bondage and
emancipation, continues to echo ancient arguments about debt.

It’s particularly striking because so many other things do seem to have
been accepted as simply in the nature of things. One does not see a
similar outcry against caste systems, for example, or for that matter,
the institution of slavery.²⁸ Surely slaves and untouchables often
experienced at least equal horrors. No doubt many protested their
condition. Why was it that the debtors’ protests seemed to carry such
greater moral weight? Why were debtors so much more effective in winning
the ear of priests, prophets, officials, and social reformers? Why was
it that officials like Nehemiah were willing to give such sympathetic
consideration to their complaints, to inveigh, to summon great
assemblies?

Some have suggested practical reasons: debt crises destroyed the free
peasantry, and it was free peasants who were drafted into ancient armies
to fight in wars.²⁹ No doubt this was a factor; clearly it wasn’t the
only one. There is no reason to believe that Nehemiah, for instance, in
his anger at the usurers, was primarily concerned with his ability to
levy troops for the Persian king. It is something more fundamental.

What makes debt different is that it is premised on an assumption of
equality.

To be a slave, or lower-caste, is to be intrinsically inferior. We are
dealing with relations of unadulterated hierarchy. In the case of debt,
we are dealing with two individuals who begin as equal parties to a
contract. Legally, at least as far as the contract is concerned, they
are the same.

We can add that, in the ancient world, when people who actually were
more or less social equals loaned money to one another, the terms appear
to have normally been quite generous. Often no interest was charged, or
if it was, it was very low. “And don’t charge me interest,” wrote one
wealthy Canaanite to another, in a tablet dated around 1200 bc, “after
all, we are both gentlemen.”³⁰ Between close kin, many “loans” were
probably, then as now, just gifts that no one seriously expected to
recover. Loans between rich and poor were something else again.

The problem was that, unlike status distinctions like caste or slavery,
the line between rich and poor was never precisely drawn. One can
imagine the reaction of a farmer who went up to the house of a wealthy
cousin, on the assumption that “humans help each other,” and ended up, a
year or two later, watching his vineyard seized and his sons and
daughters led away. Such behavior could be justified, in legal terms, by
insisting that the loan was not a form of mutual aid but a commercial
relationship—a contract is a contract. (It also required a certain
reliable access to superior force.) But it could only have felt like a
terrible betrayal. What’s more, framing it as a breach of contract meant
stating that this was, in fact, a moral issue: these two parties _ought_
to be equals, but one had failed to honor the bargain. Psychologically,
this can only have made the indignity of the debtor’s condition all the
more painful, since it made it possible to say that it was his own
turpitude that sealed his daughter’s fate. But that just made the motive
all the more compelling to throw back the moral aspersions: “Our flesh
is as the flesh of our brethren, our children as their children.” We are
all the same people. We have a responsibility to take account of one
another’s needs and interests. How then could my brother do this to me?

In the Old Testament case, debtors were able to marshal a particularly
powerful moral argument—as the authors of Deuteronomy constantly
reminded their readers, were not the Jews all slaves in Egypt, and had
they not all been redeemed by God? Was it right, when they had all been
given this promised land to share, for some to take that land away from
others? Was it right for a population of liberated slaves to go about
enslaving one aother’s children?³¹ But analogous arguments were being
made in similar situations almost everywhere in the ancient world: in
Athens, in Rome, and for that matter, in China—where legend had it that
coinage itself was first invented by an ancient emperor to redeem the
children of families who had been forced to sell them after a series of
devastating floods.

Through most of history, when overt political conflict between classes
did appear, it took the form of pleas for debt cancellation—the freeing
of those in bondage, and usually, a more just reallocation of the land.
What we see, in the Bible and other religious traditions, are traces of
the moral arguments by which such claims were justified, usually subject
to all sorts of imaginative twists and turns, but inevitably, to some
degree, incorporating the language of the marketplace itself.



CHAPTER FIVE  A BRIEF TREATISE ON THE MORAL GROUNDS OF ECONOMIC RELATIONS


TO TELL THE HISTORY of debt, then, is also necessarily to reconstruct
how the language of the marketplace has come to pervade every aspect of
human life—even to provide the terminology for the moral and religious
voices ostensibly raised against it. We have already seen how both Vedic
and Christian teachings thus end up making the same curious move: first
describing all morality as debt, but then, in their very manner of doing
so, demonstrating that morality cannot really be reduced to debt, that
it must be grounded in something else.¹

But what? Religious traditions prefer vast, cosmological answers: the
alternative to the morality of debt lies in recognition of continuity
with the universe, or life in the expectation of the imminent
annihilation of the universe, or absolute subordination to the deity, or
withdrawal into another world. My own aims are more modest, so I will
take the opposite approach. If we really want to understand the moral
grounds of economic life, and by extension, human life, it seems to me
that we must start instead with the very small things: the everyday
details of social existence, the way we treat our friends, enemies, and
children—often with gestures so tiny (passing the salt, bumming a
cigarette) that we ordinarily never stop to think about them at all.
Anthropology has shown us just how different and numerous are the ways
in which humans have been known to organize themselves. But it also
reveals some remarkable commonalities—fundamental moral principles that
appear to exist everywhere, and that will always tend to be invoked,
wherever people transfer objects back and forth or argue about what
other people owe them.

One of the reasons that human life is so complicated, in turn, is
because many of these principles contradict one another. As we will see,
they are constantly pulling us in radically different directions. The
moral logic of exchange, and hence of debt, is only one; in any given
situation, there are likely to be completely different principles that
could be brought to bear. In this sense, the moral confusion discussed
in the first chapter is hardly new; in a sense, moral thought is founded
on this very tension.

[]

To really understand what debt is, then, it will be necessary to
understand how it’s different from other sorts of obligation that human
beings might have to one another—which, in turn, means mapping out what
those other sorts of obligation actually are. Doing so, however, poses
peculiar challenges. Contemporary social theory—economic anthropology
included—offers surprisingly little help in this regard. There’s an
enormous anthropological literature on gifts, for instance, starting
with the French anthropologist Marcel Mauss’s essay of 1925, even on
“gift economies” that operate on completely different principles than
market economies—but in the end, almost all this literature concentrates
on the exchange of gifts, assuming that whenever one gives a gift, this
act incurs a debt, and the recipient must eventually reciprocate in
kind. Much as in the case of the great religions, the logic of the
marketplace has insinuated itself even into the thinking of those who
are most explicitly opposed to it. As a result, I am going to have to
start over here, to create a new theory, pretty much from scratch.

Part of the problem is the extraordinary place that economics currently
holds in the social sciences. In many ways it is treated as a kind of
master discipline. Just about anyone who runs anything important in
America is expected to have some training in economic theory, or at
least to be familiar with its basic tenets. As a result, those tenets
have come to be treated as received wisdom, as basically beyond question
(one knows one is in the presence of received wisdom when, if one
challenges it, the first reaction is to treat one as simply
ignorant—“You obviously have never heard of the Laffer Curve”; “Clearly
you need a course in Economics 101”—the theory is seen as so obviously
true that no one who understands it could possibly disagree.) What’s
more, those branches of social theory that make the greatest claims to
“scientific status”—“rational choice theory,” for instance—start from
the same assumptions about human psychology that economists do: that
human beings are best viewed as self-interested actors calculating how
to get the best terms possible out of any situation, the most profit or
pleasure or happiness for the least sacrifice or investment—curious,
considering experimental psychologists have demonstrated over and over
again that these assumptions simply aren’t true.²

From early on, there were those who wished to create a theory of social
interaction grounded in a more generous view of human nature—insisting
that moral life comes down to something more than mutual advantage, that
it is motivated above all by a sense of justice. The key term here
became “reciprocity,” the sense of equity, balance, fairness, and
symmetry, embodied in our image of justice as a set of scales. Economic
transactions were just one variant of the principle of balanced
exchange—and one that had a notorious tendency to go awry. But if one
examines matters closely, one finds that all human relations are based
on some variation on reciprocity.

In the 1950s, ’60s and ’70s, there was something of a craze for this
sort of thing, in the guise of what was then called “exchange theory,”
developed in infinite variations, from George Homans’ “Social Exchange
Theory” in the United States to Claude Levi-Strauss’s Structuralism in
France. Levi-Strauss, who became a kind of intellectual god in
anthropology, made the extraordinary argument that human life could be
imagined as consisting of three spheres: language (which consisted of
the exchange of words), kinship (which consisted of the exchange of
women), and economics (which consisted of the exchange of things). All
three, he insisted, were governed by the same fundamental law of
reciprocity.³

Levi-Strauss’s star is fallen now, and such extreme statements seem, in
retrospect, a little bit ridiculous. Still, it’s not as if anyone has
proposed a bold new theory to replace all this. Instead, the assumptions
have simply retreated into the background. Almost everyone continues to
assume that in its fundamental nature, social life is based on the
principle of reciprocity, and therefore that all human interaction can
best be understood as a kind of exchange. If so, then debt really is at
the root of all morality, because debt is what happens when some balance
has not yet been restored.

But can all justice really be reduced to reciprocity? It’s easy enough
to come up with forms of reciprocity that don’t seem particularly just.
“Do unto others as you would wish others to do unto you” might seem like
an excellent foundation for a system of ethics, but for most of us, “an
eye for an eye” does not evoke justice so much as vindictive brutality.⁴
“One good turn deserves another” is a pleasant sentiment, but “I’ll
scratch your back, you scratch mine” is shorthand for political
corruption. Conversely, there are relationships that seem clearly moral
but appear to have nothing to do with reciprocity. The relation between
mother and child is an oft-cited example. Most of us learn our sense of
justice and morality first from our parents. Yet it is extremely
difficult to see the relation between parent and child as particularly
reciprocal.

Would we really be willing to conclude that therefore it is not a moral
relationship? That it has nothing to do with justice?

The Canadian novelist Margaret Atwood begins a recent book on debt with
a similar paradox:

Nature Writer Ernest Thompson Seton had an odd bill presented to him on
his twenty-first birthday. It was a record kept by his father of all the
expenses connected with young Ernest’s childhood and youth, including
the fee charged by the doctor for delivering him. Even more oddly,
Ernest is said to have paid it. I used to think that Mr. Seton Senior
was a jerk, but now I’m wondering.⁵

Most of us wouldn’t wonder much. Such behavior seems monstrous, inhuman.
Certainly Seton did: he paid the bill, but never spoke to his father
again afterward.⁶ And in a way, this is precisely why the presentation
of such a bill seems so outrageous. Squaring accounts means that the two
parties have the ability to walk away from each other. By presenting it,
his father suggested he’d just as soon have nothing further to do with
him.

In other words, while most of us can imagine what we owe to our parents
as a kind of debt, few of us can imagine being able to actually pay
it—or even that such a debt ever _should_ be paid. Yet if it can’t be
paid, in what sense is it a “debt” at all? And if it is not a debt, what
is it?

[]

One obvious place to look for alternatives is in cases of human
interaction in which expectations of reciprocity seem to slam into a
wall. Nineteenth-century travelers’ accounts, for instance, are full of
this sort of thing. Missionaries working in certain parts of Africa
would often be astounded by the reactions they would receive when they
administered medicines. Here’s a typical example, from a British
missionary in Congo:

A day or two after we reached Vana we found one of the natives very ill
with pneumonia. Comber treated him and kept him alive on strong
fowl-soup; a great deal of careful nursing and attention was visited on
him, for his house was beside the camp. When we were ready to go on our
way again, the man was well. To our astonishment he came and asked us
for a present, and was as astonished and disgusted as he had made us to
be, when we declined giving it. We suggested that it was his place to
bring us a present and to show some gratitude. He said to us, “Well
indeed! You white men have no shame!”⁷

In the early decades of the twentieth century, the French philosopher
Lucien Levy-Bruhl, in an attempt to prove that “natives” operated with
an entirely different form of logic, compiled a list of similar stories:
for instance, of a man saved from drowning who proceeded to ask his
rescuer to give him some nice clothes to wear, or another who, on being
nursed back to health after having been savaged by a tiger, demanded a
knife. One French missionary working in Central Africa insisted that
such things happened to him on a regular basis:

You save a person’s life, and you must expect to receive a visit from
him before long; you are now under an obligation to him, and you will
not get rid of him except by giving him presents.⁸

Now, certainly, there is almost always felt to be something
extraordinary about saving a life. Anything surrounding birth and death
almost cannot help but partake of the infinite, and, therefore, throw
all everyday means of moral calculation askew. This is probably why
stories like this had become something of a cliché in America when I was
growing up. I remember as a child several times being told that among
the Inuit (or sometimes it was among Buddhists, or Chinese, but
curiously, never Africans)—that if one saves someone else’s life, one is
considered responsible for taking care of that person forever. It defies
our sense of reciprocity. But somehow, it also makes a weird kind of
sense.

We have no way of knowing what was really going on in the minds of the
patients in these stories, since we don’t know who they were or what
sort of expectations they had (how they normally interacted with their
doctors, for example). But we can guess. Let’s try a thought experiment.
Imagine that we are dealing with a place where, if one man saved
another’s life, the two became like brothers. Each was now expected to
share everything, and to provide for the other when he was in need. If
so, the patient would surely notice that his new brother appeared to be
extraordinarily wealthy, not in much need of anything, but that he, the
patient, was lacking in many things the missionary could provide.

Alternately (and more likely), imagine that we are dealing not with a
relationship of radical equality but the very opposite. In many parts of
Africa, accomplished curers were also important political figures with
extensive clienteles of former patients. A would-be follower thus
arrives to declare his political allegiance. What complicates the matter
in this case is that followers of great men, in this part of Africa,
were in a relatively strong bargaining position. Good henchmen were hard
to come by; important people were expected to be generous with followers
to keep them from joining some rival’s entourage instead. If so, asking
for a shirt or knife would be a way of asking for confirmation that the
missionary does wish to have the man as a follower. Paying him back, in
contrast, would be, like Seton’s gesture to his father, an insult: a way
of saying that despite the missionary having saved his life, he would
just as soon have nothing further to do with him.

[]

This is a thought experiment—because we don’t really know what the
African patients were thinking. The point is that such forms of radical
equality and radical inequality do exist in the world, that each carries
within it its own kind of morality, its own way of thinking and arguing
about the rights and wrongs of any given situation, and these moralities
are entirely different than that of tit-for-tat exchange. In the rest of
the chapter, I will provide a rough-and-ready way to map out the main
possibilities, by proposing that there are three main moral principles
on which economic relations can be founded, all of which occur in any
human society, and which I will call communism, hierarchy, and exchange.


Communism

I will define communism here as any human relationship that operates on
the principles of “from each according to their abilities, to each
according to their needs.”

I admit that the usage here is a bit provocative. “Communism” is a word
that can evoke strong emotional reactions—mainly, of course, because we
tend to identify it with “communist” regimes. This is ironic, since the
Communist parties that ruled over the USSR and its satellites, and that
still rule China and Cuba, never described their own systems as
“communist.” They described them as “socialist.” “Communism” was always
a distant, somewhat fuzzy utopian ideal, usually to be accompanied by
the withering away of the state—to be achieved at some point in the
distant future.

Our thinking about communism has been dominated by a myth. Once upon a
time, humans held all things in common—in the Garden of Eden, during the
Golden Age of Saturn, in Paleolithic hunter-gatherer bands. Then came
the Fall, as a result of which we are now cursed with divisions of power
and private property. The dream was that someday, with the advance of
technology and general prosperity, with social revolution or the
guidance of the Party, we would finally be in a position to put things
back, to restore common ownership and common management of collective
resources. Throughout the last two centuries, Communists and
anti-Communists argued over how plausible this picture was and whether
it would be a blessing or a nightmare. But they all agreed on the basic
framework: communism was about collective property, “primitive
communism” did once exist in the distant past, and someday it might
return.

We might call this “mythic communism”—or even, “epic communism”—a story
we like to tell ourselves. Since the days of the French Revolution, it
has inspired millions; but it has also done enormous damage to humanity.
It’s high time, I think, to brush the entire argument aside. In fact,
“communism” is not some magical utopia, and neither does it have
anything to do with ownership of the means of production. It is
something that exists right now—that exists, to some degree, in any
human society, although there has never been one in which _everything_
has been organized in that way, and it would be difficult to imagine how
there could be. All of us act like communists a good deal of the time.
None of us acts like a communist consistently. “Communist society”—in
the sense of a society organized exclusively on that single
principle—could never exist. But all social systems, even economic
systems like capitalism, have always been built on top of a bedrock of
actually-existing communism.

Starting, as I say, from the principle of “from each according to their
abilities, to each according to their needs” allows us to look past the
question of individual or private ownership (which is often little more
than formal legality anyway) and at much more immediate and practical
questions of who has access to what sorts of things and under what
conditions.⁹ Whenever it is the operative principle, even if it’s just
two people who are interacting, we can say we are in the presence of a
sort of communism.

Almost everyone follows this principle if they are collaborating on some
common project.¹⁰ If someone fixing a broken water pipe says, “Hand me
the wrench,” his co-worker will not, generally speaking, say, “And what
do I get for it?”—even if they are working for Exxon-Mobil, Burger King,
or Goldman Sachs. The reason is simple efficiency (ironically enough,
considering the conventional wisdom that “communism just doesn’t work”):
if you really care about getting something done, the most efficient way
to go about it is obviously to allocate tasks by ability and give people
whatever they need to do them.¹¹ One might even say that it’s one of the
scandals of capitalism that most capitalist firms, internally, operate
communistically. True, they don’t tend to operate very democratically.
Most often they are organized around military-style top-down chains of
command. But there is often an interesting tension here, because
top-down chains of command are not particularly efficient: they tend to
promote stupidity among those on top, resentful foot-dragging among
those on the bottom. The greater the need to improvise, the more
democratic the cooperation tends to become. Inventors have always
understood this, start-up capitalists frequently figure it out, and
computer engineers have recently rediscovered the principle: not only
with things like freeware, which everyone talks about, but even in the
organization of their businesses. Apple Computers is a famous example:
it was founded by (mostly Republican) computer engineers who broke from
IBM in Silicon Valley in the 1980s, forming little democratic circles of
twenty to forty people with their laptops in each other’s garages.

This is presumably also why in the immediate wake of great disasters—a
flood, a blackout, or an economic collapse—people tend to behave the
same way, reverting to a rough-and-ready communism. However briefly,
hierarchies and markets and the like become luxuries that no one can
afford. Anyone who has lived through such a moment can speak to their
peculiar qualities, the way that strangers become sisters and brothers
and human society itself seems to be reborn. This is important, because
it shows that we are not simply talking about cooperation. In fact,
_communism is the foundation of all human sociability_. It is what makes
society possible. There is always an assumption that anyone who is not
actually an enemy can be expected on the principle of “from each
according to their abilities,” at least to an extent: for example, if
one needs to figure out how to get somewhere, and the other knows the
way.

We so take this for granted, in fact, that the exceptions are themselves
revealing. E.E. Evans-Pritchard, an anthropologist who in the 1920s
carried out research among the Nuer, Nilotic pastoralists in southern
Sudan, reports his discomfiture when he realized that someone had
intentionally given him wrong directions:

On one occasion I asked the way to a certain place and was deliberately
deceived. I returned in chagrin to camp and asked the people why they
had told me the wrong way. One of them replied, “You are a foreigner,
why should we tell you the right way? Even if a Nuer who was a stranger
asked us the way we would say to him, ‘You continue straight along that
path,’ but we would not tell him that the path forked. Why should we
tell him? But you are now a member of our camp and you are kind to our
children, so we will tell you the right way in future.”¹²

The Nuer are constantly engaged in feuds; any stranger might well turn
out to be an enemy there to scout out a good place for an ambush, and it
would be unwise to give such a person useful information. What’s more,
Evans-Pritchard’s own situation was obviously relevant, since he was an
agent of the British government—the same government that had recently
sent in the RAF to strafe and bomb the inhabitants of this very
settlement before forcibly resettling them there. Under the
circumstances, the inhabitants’ treatment of Evans-Pritchard seems quite
generous. The main point, though, is that it requires something on this
scale—an immediate threat to life and limb, terror-bombing of civilian
populations—before people will ordinarily consider not giving a stranger
accurate directions.¹³

It’s not just directions. Conversation is a domain particularly disposed
to communism. Lies, insults, put-downs, and other sorts of verbal
aggression are important—but they derive most of their power from the
shared assumption that people do not ordinarily act this way: an insult
does not sting unless one assumes that others will normally be
considerate of one’s feelings, and it’s impossible to lie to someone who
does not assume you would ordinarily tell the truth. When we genuinely
wish to break off amicable relations with someone, we stop speaking to
them entirely.

The same goes for small courtesies like asking for a light, or even for
a cigarette. It seems more legitimate to ask a stranger for a cigarette
than for an equivalent amount of cash, or even food; in fact, if one has
been identified as a fellow smoker, it’s rather difficult to refuse such
a request. In such cases—a match, a piece of information, holding the
elevator—one might say the “from each” element is so minimal that most
of us comply without even thinking about it. Conversely, the same is
true if another person’s need—even a stranger’s—is particularly
spectacular or extreme: if he is drowning, for example. If a child has
fallen onto the subway tracks, we assume that anyone who is capable of
helping her up will do so.

I will call this “baseline communism”: the understanding that, unless
people consider themselves enemies, if the need is considered great
enough, or the cost considered reasonable enough, the principle of “from
each according to their abilities, to each according to their needs”
will be assumed to apply. Of course, different communities apply very
different standards. In large, impersonal urban communities, such a
standard may go no further than asking for a light or directions. This
might not seem like much, but it founds the possibility of larger social
relations. In smaller, less impersonal communities—especially those not
divided into social classes—the same logic will likely extend much
further: for example, it is often effectively impossible to refuse a
request not just for tobacco, but for food—sometimes even from a
stranger; certainly from anyone considered to belong to the community.
Exactly one page after describing his difficulties in asking for
directions, Evans-Pritchard notes that these same Nuer find it almost
impossible, when dealing with someone they have accepted as a member of
their camp, to refuse a request for almost any item of common
consumption, so that a man or woman known to have anything extra in the
way of grain, tobacco, tools, or agricultural implements can be expected
to see their stockpiles disappear almost immediately.¹⁴ However, this
baseline of openhanded sharing and generosity never extends to
everything. Often, in fact, things freely shared are treated as trivial
and unimportant for that very reason. Among the Nuer, true wealth takes
the form of cattle. No one would freely share their cattle; in fact,
young Nuer men learn that they are expected to defend their cattle with
their lives; for this reason, cattle are neither bought nor sold.

The obligation to share food, and whatever else is considered a basic
necessity, tends to become the basis of everyday morality in a society
whose members see themselves as equals. Another anthropologist, Audrey
Richards, once described how Bemba mothers, “such lax disciplinarians in
everything else,” will scold their children harshly if they give one an
orange or some other treat and the child does not immediately offer to
share it with her friends.¹⁵ But sharing is also, in such societies—in
any, if we really think about it—a major focus of life’s pleasures. As a
result, the need to share is particularly acute in both the best of
times and the worst of times: during famines, for example, but also
during moments of extreme plenty. Early missionary accounts of native
North Americans almost invariably include awestruck remarks on
generosity in times of famine, often to total strangers.¹⁶ At the same
time,

On returning from their fishing, their hunting, and their trading, they
exchange many gifts; if they have thus obtained something unusually
good, even if they have bought it, or if it has been given to them, they
make a feast to the whole village with it. Their hospitality towards all
sorts of strangers is remarkable.¹⁷

The more elaborate the feast, the more likely one is to see some
combination of free sharing of some things (for instance, food and
drink) and careful distribution of others: say, prize meat, whether from
game or sacrifice, which is often parceled out according to very
elaborate protocols or equally elaborate gift exchange. The giving and
taking of gifts often takes on a distinctly gamelike quality, continuous
often with the actual games, contests, pageants, and performances that
also often mark popular festivals. As with society at large, the shared
conviviality could be seen as a kind of communistic base on top of which
everything else is constructed. It also helps to emphasize that sharing
is not simply about morality, but also about pleasure. Solitary
pleasures will always exist, but for most human beings, the most
pleasurable activities almost always involve sharing something: music,
food, liquor, drugs, gossip, drama, beds. There is a certain communism
of the senses at the root of most things we consider fun.

The surest way to know that one is in the presence of communistic
relations is that not only are no accounts taken, but it would be
considered offensive, or simply bizarre, to even consider doing so. Each
village, clan, or nation within the League of the Hodenosaunee, or
Iroquois, for example, was divided into two halves.¹⁸ This is a common
pattern: in other parts of the world (Amazonia, Melanesia) too, there
are arrangements in which members of one side can only marry someone
from the other side, or only eat food grown on the other side; such
rules are explicitly designed to make each side dependent on the other
for some basic necessity of life. Among the Six Iroquois, each side was
expected to bury the other’s dead. Nothing would be more absurd than for
one side to complain that, “last year, we buried five of your dead, but
you only buried two of ours.”

Baseline communism might be considered the raw material of sociality, a
recognition of our ultimate interdependence that is the ultimate
substance of social peace. Still, in most circumstances, that minimal
baseline is not enough. One always behaves in a spirit of solidarity
more with some people than others, and certain institutions are
specifically based on principles of solidarity and mutual aid. First
among these are those we love, with mothers being the paradigm of
selfless love. Others include close relatives, wives and husbands,
lovers, one’s closest friends. These are the people with whom we share
everything, or at least to whom we know we can turn in need, which is
the definition of a true friend everywhere. Such friendships may be
formalized by a ritual as “bond-friends” or “blood brothers” who cannot
refuse each other anything. As a result, any community could be seen as
criss-crossed with relations of “individualistic communism,” one-to-one
relations that operate, to varying intensities and degrees, on the basis
of “from each according to their ability, to each according to their
needs.”¹⁹

This same logic can be, and is, extended within groups: not only
cooperative work groups, but almost any in-group will define itself by
creating its own sort of baseline communism. There will be certain
things shared or made freely available within the group, others that
anyone will be expected to provide for other members on request, that
one would never share with or provide to outsiders: help in repairing
one’s nets in an association of fisherman, stationery supplies in an
office, certain sorts of information among commodity traders, and so
forth. Also, certain categories of people we can always call on in
certain situations, such as harvesting or moving house.²⁰ One could go
on from here to various forms of sharing, pooling, who gets to call on
whom for help with certain tasks: moving, or harvesting, or even, if one
is in trouble, providing an interest-free loan. Finally, there are the
different sorts of “commons,” the collective administration of common
resources.

The sociology of everyday communism is a potentially enormous field, but
one which, owing to our peculiar ideological blinkers, we have been
unable to write about because we have been largely unable to see it.
Rather than try to further outline it, I will limit myself to three
final points.

First, we are not really dealing with reciprocity here—or at best, only
with reciprocity in the broadest sense.²¹ What is equal on both sides is
the knowledge that the other person _would_ do the same for you, not
that they necessarily _will_. The Iroquois example brings home clearly
what makes this possible: that such relations are based on a presumption
of eternity. Society will always exist. Therefore, there will always be
a north and a south side of the village. This is why no accounts need be
taken. In a similar way, people tend to treat their mothers and best
friends as if they will always exist, however well they know it isn’t
true.

The second point has to do with the famous “law of hospitality.” There
is a peculiar tension between a common stereotype of what are called
“primitive societies” (people lacking both states and markets) as
societies in which anyone not a member of the community is assumed to be
an enemy, and the frequent accounts of early European travelers
awestruck by the extraordinary generosity shown them by actual
“savages.” Granted, there is a certain truth to both sides. Wherever a
stranger is a dangerous potential enemy, the normal way to overcome the
danger is by some dramatic gesture of generosity whose very magnificence
catapults them into that mutual sociality that is the ground for all
peaceful social relations. True, when one is dealing with completely
unknown quantities, there is often a process of testing. Both
Christopher Columbus, in Hispaniola, and Captain Cook, in Polynesia,
reported similar stories of islanders who either flee, attack, or offer
everything—but who often later enter the boats and help themselves to
anything they take a fancy to, provoking threats of violence from the
crew, who then did their utmost to establish the principle that
relations between strange peoples should be mediated instead by “normal”
commercial exchange.

It’s understandable that dealings with potentially hostile strangers
should encourage an all-or-nothing logic, a tension preserved even in
English in the etymology of the words “host,” “hostile,” “hostage,” and
indeed “hospitality,” all of which are derived from the same Latin
root.²² What I want to emphasize here is that all such gestures are
simply exaggerated displays of that very “baseline communism” that I
have already argued is the ground of all human social life. This is why,
for instance, the difference between friends and enemies is so often
articulated through food—and often the most commonplace, humble,
domestic sorts of food: as in the familiar principle, common in both
Europe and the Middle East, that those who have shared bread and salt
must never harm one another. In fact, those things that exist above all
to be shared often become those things one _cannot_ share with enemies.
Among the Nuer, so free with food and everyday possessions, if one man
murders another, a blood feud follows. Everyone in the vicinity will
often have to line up on one side or another, and those on opposite
sides are strictly forbidden to eat with anyone on the other, or even to
drink from a cup or bowl one of their newfound enemies has previously
used, lest terrible results ensue.²³ The extraordinary inconvenience
this creates is a major incentive to try to negotiate some sort of
settlement. By the same token, it is often said that people who have
shared food, or the right, archetypal kind of food, are forbidden to
harm one another, however much they might be otherwise inclined to do
so. At times, this can take on an almost comical formality, as in the
Arab story of the burglar who, while ransacking someone’s house, stuck
his finger in a jar to see if it was full of sugar, only to discover it
was full of salt instead. Realizing that he had now eaten salt at the
owner’s table, he dutifully put back everything he’d stolen.

Finally, once we start thinking of communism as a principle of morality
rather than just a question of property ownership, it becomes clear that
this sort of morality is almost always at play to some degree in any
transaction—even commerce. If one is on sociable terms with someone,
it’s hard to completely ignore their situation. Merchants often reduce
prices for the needy. This is one of the main reasons why shopkeepers in
poor neighborhoods are almost never of the same ethnic group as their
customers; it would be almost impossible for a merchant who grew up in
the neighborhood to make money, as they would be under constant pressure
to give financial breaks, or at least easy credit terms, to their
impoverished relatives and school chums. The opposite is true as well.
An anthropologist who lived for some time in rural Java once told me
that she measured her linguistic abilities by how well she could bargain
at the local bazaar. It frustrated her that she could never get it down
to a price as low as local people seemed pay. “Well,” a Javanese friend
finally had to explain, “they charge rich Javanese people more, too.”

Once again, we are back to the principle that if the needs (for
instance, dire poverty), or the abilities (for instance, wealth beyond
imagination), are sufficiently dramatic, then unless there is a complete
absence of sociality, some degree of communistic morality will almost
inevitably enter into the way people take accounts.²⁴ A Turkish folktale
about the Medieval Sufi mystic Nasruddin Hodja illustrates the
complexities thus introduced into the very concept of supply and demand:

One day when Nasruddin was left in charge of the local teahouse, the
king and some retainers, who had been hunting nearby, stopped in for
breakfast.

“Do you have quail eggs?” asked the king.

“I’m sure I can find some,” answered Nasruddin.

The king ordered an omelet of a dozen quail eggs, and Nasruddin hurried
out to look for them. After the king and his party had eaten, he charged
them a hundred gold pieces.

The king was puzzled. “Are quail eggs really that rare in this part of
the country?”

“It’s not so much quail eggs that are rare around here,” Nasruddin
replied. “It’s more visits from kings.”


Exchange

Communism, then, is based neither in exchange nor in reciprocity—except,
as I have observed, in the sense that it does involve mutual
expectations and responsibilities. Even here, it seems better to use
another word (“mutuality”?) so as to emphasize that exchange operates on
entirely different principles; that it’s a fundamentally different kind
of moral logic.

Exchange is all about equivalence. It’s a back-and-forth process
involving two sides in which each side gives as good as it gets. This is
why one can speak of people exchanging words (if there’s an argument),
blows, or even gunfire.²⁵ In these examples, it’s not that there is ever
an exact equivalence—even if there were some way to measure an exact
equivalence—but more a constant process of interaction tending toward
equivalence. Actually, there’s something of a paradox here: each side in
each case is trying to outdo the other, but, unless one side is utterly
put to rout, it’s easiest to break the whole thing off when both
consider the outcome to be more or less even. When we move to the
exchange of material goods, we find a similar tension. Often there is an
element of competition; if nothing else, there’s always that
possibility. But at the same time, there’s a sense that both sides are
keeping accounts, and that, unlike what happens in communism, which
always partakes of a certain notion of eternity, the entire relationship
can be canceled out, and either party can call an end to it at any time.

This element of competition can work in completely different ways. In
cases of barter or commercial exchange, when both parties to the
transaction are only interested in the value of goods being transacted,
they may well—as economists insist they should—try to seek the maximum
material advantage. On the other hand, as anthropologists have long
pointed out, when the exchange is of gifts, that is, the objects passing
back and forth are mainly considered interesting in how they reflect on
and rearrange relations between the people carrying out the transaction,
then insofar as competition enters in, it is likely to work precisely
the other way around—to become a matter of contests of generosity, of
people showing off who can give more away.

Let me take these one at a time.

What marks commercial exchange is that it’s “impersonal”: who it is that
is selling something to us, or buying something from us, should in
principle be entirely irrelevant. We are simply comparing the value of
two objects. True, as with any principle, in practice, this is rarely
completely true. There has to be some minimal element of trust for a
transaction to be carried out at all, and, unless one is dealing with a
vending machine, that usually requires some outward display of
sociality. Even in the most impersonal shopping mall or supermarket,
clerks are expected to at least simulate personal warmth, patience, and
other reassuring qualities; in a Middle-Eastern bazaar, one might have
to go through an elaborate process of establishing a simulated
friendship, sharing tea, food, or tobacco, before engaging in similarly
elaborate haggling—an interesting ritual that begins by establishing
sociality through baseline communism—and continues with an often
prolonged mock battle over prices. It’s all done on the basis of the
assumption that buyer and seller are, at least at that moment, friends
(and thus each entitled to feel outraged and indignant at the other’s
unreasonable demands), but it’s all a little piece of theater. Once the
object changes hands, there is no expectation that the two will ever
have anything to do with each other again.²⁶

Most often this sort of haggling—in Madagascar the term for it literally
means “to battle out a sale” _(miady varotra)_—can be a source of
pleasure in itself.

The first time I visited Analakely, the great cloth market in
Madagascar’s capital, I came with a Malagasy friend intent on buying a
sweater. The whole process took about four hours. It went something like
this: my friend would spot a likely sweater hanging in some booth, ask
the price, and then she would begin a prolonged battle of wits with the
vendor, invariably involving dramatic displays of insult and
indignation, and simulated walkings off in disgust. Often it seemed
ninety percent of the argument was spent on a final, tiny difference of
a few ariary—literally, pennies—that seemed to become a profound matter
of principle on either side, since a merchant’s failure to concede it
could sink the entire deal.

The second time I visited Analakely I went with another friend, also a
young woman, who had a list of measures of cloth to buy supplied by her
sister. At each booth she adopted the same procedure: she simply walked
up and asked for the price.

The man would quote her one.

“All right,” she then asked, “and what’s your real final price?”

He’d tell her, and she’d hand over the money.

“Wait a minute!” I asked. “You can _do_ that?

“Sure,” she said. “Why not?”

I explained what had happened with my last friend.

“Oh, yeah,” she said. “Some people enjoy that sort of thing.”

Exchange allows us to cancel out our debts. It gives us a way to call it
even: hence, to end the relationship. With vendors, one is usually only
pretending to have a relationship at all. With neighbors, one might for
this very reason prefer _not_ to pay one’s debts. Laura Bohannan writes
about arriving in a Tiv community in rural Nigeria; neighbors
immediately began arriving bearing little gifts: “two ears corn, one
vegetable marrow, one chicken, five tomatoes, one handful peanuts.”²⁷
Having no idea what was expected of her, she thanked them and wrote down
in a notebook their names and what they had brought. Eventually, two
women adopted her and explained that all such gifts did have to be
returned. It would be entirely inappropriate to simply accept three eggs
from a neighbor and never bring anything back. One did not have to bring
back eggs, but one should bring something back of approximately the same
value. One could even bring money—there was nothing inappropriate in
that—provided one did so at a discreet interval, and above all, that one
did not bring the exact cost of the eggs. It had to be either a bit more
or a bit less. To bring back nothing at all would be to cast oneself as
an exploiter or a parasite. To bring back an exact equivalent would be
to suggest that one no longer wishes to have anything to do with the
neighbor. Tiv women, she learned, might spend a good part of the day
walking for miles to distant homesteads to return a handful of okra or a
tiny bit of change, “in an endless circle of gifts to which no one ever
handed over the precise value of the object last received”—and in doing
so, they were continually creating their society. There was certainly a
trace of communism here—neighbors on good terms could also be trusted to
help each other out in emergencies—but unlike communistic relations,
which are assumed to be permanent, this sort of neighborliness had to be
constantly created and maintained, because any link can be broken off at
any time.

There are endless variations on this sort of tit-for-tat, or almost
tit-for-tat, gift exchange. The most familiar is the exchange of
presents: I buy someone a beer; they buy me the next one. Perfect
equivalence implies equality. But consider a slightly more complicated
example: I take a friend out to a fancy restaurant for dinner; after a
discreet interval, they do the same. As anthropologists have long been
in the habit of pointing out, the very existence of such
customs—especially, the feeling that one really _ought_ to return the
favor—can’t be explained by standard economic theory, which assumes that
any human interaction is ultimately a business deal and that we are all
self-interested individuals trying to get the most for ourselves for the
least cost or least amount of effort.²⁸ But this feeling is quite real,
and it can cause genuine strain for those of limited means trying to
keep up appearances. So: Why, if I took a free-market economic theorist
out to an expensive dinner, would that economist feel somewhat
diminished—uncomfortably in my debt—until he had been able to return the
favor? Why, if he were feeling competitive with me, would he be inclined
to take me to someplace even more expensive?

Recall the feasts and festivals alluded to above: here, too, there is a
base of conviviality and playful (sometimes not so playful) competition.
On the one hand, everyone’s pleasure is enhanced—after all, how many
people would really want to eat a superb meal at a French restaurant all
alone? On the other, things can easily slip into games of
one-upmanship—and hence obsession, humiliation, rage … or, as we’ll soon
see, even worse. In some societies, these games are formalized, but it’s
important to stress that such games only really develop between people
or groups who perceive themselves to be more or less equivalent in
status.²⁹ To return to our imaginary economist: it’s not clear that he
would feel diminished if he received a present, or was taken out to
dinner, by just anyone. He would be most likely to feel this way if the
benefactor were someone he felt was of roughly equivalent status or
dignity: a colleague, for example. If Bill Gates or George Soros took
him out to dinner, he would likely conclude that he had indeed received
something for nothing and leave it at that. If some ingratiating junior
colleague or eager graduate student did the same, he’d be likely to
conclude that he was doing the man a favor just by accepting the
invitation—if indeed he did accept, which he probably wouldn’t.

This, too, appears to be the case wherever we find society divided into
fine gradations of status and dignity. Pierre Bourdieu has described the
“dialectic of challenge and riposte” that governs all games of honor
among Kabyle Berber men in Algeria, in which the exchange of insults,
attacks (in feud or battles), thefts, or threats was seen to follow
exactly the same logic as the exchange of gifts.³⁰ To give a gift is
both an honor and a provocation. To respond to one requires infinite
artistry. Timing is all-important. So is making the counter-gift just
different enough, but also just slightly grander. Above all is the tacit
moral principle that one must always pick on someone one’s own size. To
challenge someone obviously older, richer, and more honorable is to risk
being snubbed, and hence humiliated; to overwhelm a poor but respectable
man with a gift he couldn’t possibly pay back is simply cruel, and will
do equal damage to your reputation. There’s an Indonesian story about
that too: about a rich man who sacrificed a magnificent ox to shame a
penurious rival; the poor man utterly humiliated him, and won the
contest, by calmly proceeding to sacrifice a chicken.³¹

Games like this become especially elaborate when status is to some
degree up for grabs. When matters are _too_ clear-cut, that introduces
its own sorts of problems. Giving gifts to kings is often a particularly
tricky and complicated business. The problem here is that one cannot
really give a gift fit for a king (unless, perhaps, one is another
king), since kings by definition already have everything. On the one
hand, one is expected to make a reasonable effort:

Nasruddin was once called up to visit the king. A neighbor saw him
hurrying along the road carrying a bag of turnips.

“What are those for?” he asked.

“I’ve been called to see the king. I thought it would be best to bring
some kind of present.”

“You’re bringing him turnips? But turnips are peasant food! He’s a king!
You should bring him something more appropriate, like grapes.”

Nasruddin agreed, and came to the king carrying a bunch of grapes. The
king was not amused. “You’re giving me grapes? But I’m a king! This is
ridiculous. Take this idiot out and teach him some manners! Throw each
and every one of the grapes at him and then kick him out of the palace.”

The emperor’s guards dragged Nasruddin into a side room and began
pelting him with grapes. As they did so, he fell on his knees and began
crying, “Thank you, thank you God, for your infinite mercy!”

“Why are you thanking God?” they asked. “You’re being totally
humiliated!”

Nasruddin replied, “Oh, I was just thinking, ‘Thank God I didn’t bring
the turnips!’ ”

On the other hand, to give something that a king does not already have
can get you in even greater trouble. One story circulating in the early
Roman Empire concerned an inventor who, with great fanfare, presented a
glass bowl as a gift to the emperor Tiberius. The emperor was puzzled:
What was so impressive about a piece of glass? The man dropped it on the
ground. Rather than shattering, it merely dented. He picked it up and
simply pushed it back into its former shape.

“Did you tell anyone else how you made this thing?” asked a startled
Tiberius.

The inventor assured him that he had not. The emperor therefore ordered
him killed, since, if word of how to make unbreakable glass got out, his
treasury of gold and silver would soon be worthless.³²

The best bet when dealing with kings was to make a reasonable effort to
play the game, but one that is still bound to fail. The
fourteenth-century Arab traveler Ibn Battuta tells of the customs of the
King of Sind, a terrifying monarch who took a particular delight in
displays of arbitrary power.³³ It was customary for foreign worthies
visiting the king to present him with magnificent presents; whatever the
gift was, he would invariably respond by presenting the bearer with
something many times its value. As a result, a substantial business
developed where local bankers would lend money to such visitors to
finance particularly spectacular gifts, knowing they could be well
repaid from the proceeds of royal one-upmanship. The king must have
known about this. He didn’t object—since the whole point was to show
that his wealth exceeded all possible equivalence—and if he really
needed to, he could always expropriate the bankers. They knew that the
really important game was not economic, but one of status, and his was
absolute.

In exchange, the objects being traded are seen as equivalent. Therefore,
by implication, so are the people: at least, at the moment when gift is
met with counter-gift, or money changes hands; when there is no further
debt or obligation and each of the two parties is equally free to walk
away. This in turn implies autonomy. Both principles sit uncomfortably
with monarchs, which is the reason that kings generally dislike any sort
of exchange.³⁴ But within that overhanging prospect of potential
cancellation, of ultimate equivalence, we find endless variations,
endless games one can play. One can demand something from another
person, knowing that by doing so, one is giving the other the right to
demand something of equivalent value in return. In some contexts, even
praising another’s possession might be interpreted as a demand of this
sort. In eighteenth-century New Zealand, English settlers soon learned
that it was not a good idea to admire, say, a particularly beautiful
jade pendant worn around the neck of a Maori warrior; the latter would
inevitably insist on giving it, not take no for an answer, and then,
after a discreet interval, return to praise the settler’s coat or gun.
The only way to head this off was to quickly give him a gift before he
could ask for one. Sometimes gifts are offered in order for the giver to
be able to make such a demand: if one accepts the present, one is
tacitly agreeing to allow the giver to claim whatever he deems
equivalent.³⁵

All this, in turn, can shade into something very much like barter,
directly swapping one thing for another—which as we’ve seen does occur
even in what Marcel Mauss liked to refer to as “gift economies,” even if
largely between strangers.³⁶ Within communities, there is almost always
a reluctance, as the Tiv example so nicely illustrates, to allow things
to cancel out—one reason that if there is money in common usage, people
will often either refuse to use it with friends or relatives (which in a
village society includes pretty much everyone), or alternately, like the
Malagasy villagers in chapter 3, use it in radically different ways.


Hierarchy

Exchange, then, implies formal equality—or at least, the potential for
it. This is precisely why kings have such trouble with it.

In contrast, relations of explicit hierarchy—that is, relations between
at least two parties in which one is considered superior to the other—do
not tend to operate by reciprocity at all. It’s hard to see because the
relation is often justified in reciprocal terms (“the peasants provide
food, the lords provide protection”), but the principle by which they
operate is exactly the opposite. In practice, hierarchy tends to work by
a logic of precedent.

To illustrate what I mean by this, let us imagine a kind of continuum of
one-sided social relations, ranging from the most exploitative to the
most benevolent. At one extreme is theft, or plunder; on the other
selfless charity.³⁷ Only at these two extremes is it is possible to have
material interactions between people who otherwise have no social
relation of any kind. Only a lunatic would mug his next-door neighbor. A
band of marauding soldiers or nomadic horsemen falling on a peasant
hamlet to rape and pillage also obviously have no intention of forming
any ongoing relations with the survivors. But in a similar way,
religious traditions often insist that the only true charity is
anonymous—in other words, not meant to place the recipient in one’s
debt. One extreme form of this, documented in various parts of the
world, is the gift by stealth, in a kind of reverse burglary: to
literally sneak into the recipient’s house at night and plant one’s
present so no one can know for sure who has left it. The figure of Santa
Claus, or Saint Nicholas (who, it must be remembered, was not just the
patron saint of children, but also the patron saint of thieves) would
appear to be the mythological version of the same principle: a
benevolent burglar with whom no social relations are possible and
therefore to whom no one could possibly owe anything, in his case, above
all, because he does not actually exist.

Observe, however, what happens when one moves just a little bit less far
out on the continuum in either direction. I have been told (I suspect it
isn’t true) that in parts of Belarus, gangs prey so systematically on
travelers on trains and busses that they have developed the habit of
giving each victim a little token, to confirm that the bearer has
already been robbed. Obviously one step toward the creation of a state.
Actually, one popular theory of the origins of the state, that goes back
at least to the fourteenth-century North African historian Ibn Khaldun,
runs precisely along these lines: nomadic raiders eventually systematize
their relations with sedentary villagers; pillage turns into tribute,
rape turns into the “right of the first night” or the carrying off of
likely candidates as recruits for the royal harem. Conquest, untrammeled
force, becomes systematized, and thus framed not as a predatory relation
but as a moral one, with the lords providing protection, and the
villagers, their sustenance. But even if all parties assume they are
operating by a shared moral code, that even kings cannot do whatever
they want but must operate within limits, allowing peasants to argue
about the rights and wrongs of just how much of their harvest a king’s
retainers are entitled to carry off, they are very unlikely to frame
their calculation in terms of the quality or quantity of protection
provided, but rather in terms of custom and precedent: How much did we
pay last year? How much did our ancestors have to pay? The same is true
on the other side. If charitable donations become the basis for any sort
of social relation, it will not be one based on reciprocity. If you give
some coins to a panhandler, and that panhandler recognizes you later, it
is unlikely that he will give you any money—but he might well consider
you more likely to give him money again. Certainly this is true if one
donates money to a charitable organization. (I gave money to the United
Farm Workers once and I still haven’t heard the end of it.) Such an act
of one-sided generosity is treated as a precedent for what will be
expected afterward.³⁸ It’s quite the same if one gives candy to a child.

This is what I mean when I say that hierarchy operates by a principle
that is the very opposite of reciprocity. Whenever the lines of
superiority and inferiority are clearly drawn and accepted by all
parties as the framework of a relationship, and relations are
sufficiently ongoing that we are no longer simply dealing with arbitrary
force, then relations will be seen as being regulated by a web of habit
or custom. Sometimes the situation is assumed to have originated in some
founding act of conquest. Or it might have been seen as ancestral custom
for which there is no need of explanation. But this introduces another
complication to the problem of giving gifts to kings—or to any superior:
there is always the danger that it will be treated as a precedent, added
to the web of custom, and therefore considered obligatory thereafter.
Xenophon claims that in the early days of the Persian Empire, each
province vied to send the Great King gifts of its most unique and
valuable products. This became the basis of the tribute system: each
province was eventually expected to provide the same “gifts” every
year.³⁹ Similarly, according to the great Medieval historian Marc Bloch:

[I]n the ninth century, when one day there was a shortage of wine in the
royal cellars at Ver, the monks of Saint-Denis were asked to supply the
two hundred hogs-heads required. This contribution was thenceforth
claimed from them as of right every year, and it required an imperial
charter to abolish it. At Ardres, we are told, there was once a bear,
the property of the local lord. The inhabitants, who loved to watch it
fight with dogs, undertook to feed it. The beast eventually died, but
the lord continued to exact the loaves of bread.”⁴⁰

In other words, any gift to a feudal superior, “especially if repeated
three of four times,” was likely to be treated as a precedent and added
to the web of custom. As a result, those giving gifts to superiors often
insisted on receiving a “letter of non-prejudice” legally stipulating
that such a gift would not be required in the future. While it is
unusual for matters to become quite so formalized, any social relation
that is assumed from the start to be unequal will inevitably begin to
operate on an analogous logic—if only because, once relations are seen
as based on “custom,” the only way to demonstrate that one has a duty or
obligation to do something is to show that one has done it before.

Often, such arrangements can turn into a logic of caste: certain clans
are responsible for weaving the ceremonial garments, or bringing the
fish for royal feasts, or cutting the king’s hair. They thus come to be
known as weavers or fishermen or barbers.⁴¹ This last point can’t be
overemphasized because it brings home another truth regularly
overlooked: that the logic of identity is, always and everywhere,
entangled in the logic of hierarchy. It is only when certain people are
placed above others, or where everyone is being ranked in relation to
the king, or the high priest, or Founding Fathers, that one begins to
speak of people bound by their essential nature: about fundamentally
different kinds of human being. Ideologies of caste or race are just
extreme examples. It happens whenever one group is seen as raising
themselves above others, or placing themselves below others, in such a
way that ordinary standards of fair dealing no longer apply.

In fact, something like this happens in a small way even in our most
intimate social relations. The moment we recognize someone as a
different _sort_ of person, either above or below us, then ordinary
rules of reciprocity become modified or are set aside. If a friend is
unusually generous once, we will likely wish to reciprocate. If she acts
this way repeatedly, we conclude she is a generous person, and are hence
less likely to reciprocate.⁴²

We can describe a simple formula here: a certain action, repeated,
becomes customary; as a result, it comes to define the actor’s essential
nature. Alternately, a person’s nature may be defined by how others have
acted toward him in the past. To be an aristocrat is largely to insist
that in the past, others have _treated_ you as an aristocrat (since
aristocrats don’t really do anything in particular, most spend their
time simply existing in some sort of putatively superior state), and
therefore should continue to do so. Much of the art of being such a
person is that of treating oneself in such a manner that it conveys how
you expect others to treat you: in the case of actual kings, covering
oneself with gold so as to suggest that others do likewise. On the other
end of the scale, this is also how abuse becomes self-legitimating. As a
former student of mine, Sarah Stillman, pointed out: in the United
States, if a middle-class thirteen-year-old girl is kidnapped, raped,
and killed, it is considered an agonizing national crisis that everyone
with a television is expected to follow for several weeks. If a
thirteen-year-old girl is turned out as a child prostitute, raped
systematically for years, and ultimately killed, all this is considered
unremarkable—really just the sort of thing one can expect to end up
happening to someone like that.⁴³

When objects of material wealth pass back and forth between superiors
and inferiors as gifts or payments, the key principle seems to be that
the sorts of things given on each side should be considered
fundamentally different in quality, their relative value impossible to
quantify—the result being that there is no way to even conceive of a
squaring of accounts. Even if Medieval writers insisted on imagining
society as a hierarchy in which priests pray for everyone, nobles fight
for everyone, and peasants feed everyone, it never even occurred to
anyone to establish how many prayers or how much military protection was
equivalent to a ton of wheat. Nor did anyone ever consider making such a
calculation. Neither is it that “lowly” sorts of people are necessarily
given lowly sorts of things and vice versa. Sometimes it is quite the
opposite. Until recently, just about any notable philosopher, artist,
poet, or musician was required to find a wealthy patron for support.
Famous works of poetry or philosophy are often prefaced—oddly, to the
modern eye—with gushing, sycophantic praise for the wisdom and virtue of
some long-forgotten earl or count who provided a meager stipend. The
fact that the noble patron merely provided room and board, or money, and
that the client showed his gratitude by painting the _Mona Lisa_, or
composing the _Toccata and Fugue in D Minor_, was in no way seen to
compromise the assumption of the noble’s intrinsic superiority.

There is one great exception to this principle, and that is the
phenomenon of hierarchical redistribution. Here, though, rather than
giving back and forth the same sorts of things, they give back and forth
_exactly_ the same thing: as, for instance, when fans of certain
Nigerian pop stars throw money onto the stage during concerts, and the
pop stars in question make occasional tours of their fans’ neighborhoods
tossing (the same) money from the windows of their limos. When this is
all that’s going on, we may speak of an absolutely minimal sort of
hierarchy. In much of Papua New Guinea, social life centers on “big
men,” charismatic individuals who spend much of their time coaxing,
cajoling, and manipulating in order to acquire masses of wealth to give
away again at some great feast. One could, in practice, pass from here
to, say, an Amazonian or indigenous North American chief. Unlike big
men, their role is more formalized; but actually such chiefs have no
power to compel anyone to do anything they don’t want to (hence North
American Indian chiefs’ famous skill at oratory and powers of
persuasion). As a result, they tended to give away far more than they
received. Observers often remarked that in terms of personal
possessions, a village chief was often the poorest man in the village,
such was the pressure on him for constant supply of largesse.

Indeed, one could judge how egalitarian a society really was by exactly
this: whether those ostensibly in positions of authority are merely
conduits for redistribution, or able to use their positions to
accumulate riches. The latter seems most likely in aristocratic
societies that add another element: war and plunder. After all, just
about anyone who comes into a very large amount of wealth will
ultimately give at least part of it away—often in grandiose and
spectacular ways to large numbers of people. The more of one’s wealth is
obtained by plunder or extortion, the more spectacular and
self-aggrandizing will be the forms in which it’s given away.⁴⁴ And what
is true of warrior aristocracies is all the more true of ancient states,
where rulers almost invariably represented themselves as the protectors
of the helpless, supporters of widows and orphans, and champions of the
poor. The genealogy of the modern redistributive state—with its
notorious tendency to foster identity politics—can be traced back not to
any sort of “primitive communism” but ultimately to violence and war.


Shifting between Modalities

I should underline again that we are not talking about different types
of society here (as we’ve seen, the very idea that we’ve ever been
organized into discrete “societies” is dubious) but moral principles
that always coexist everywhere. We are all communists with our closest
friends, and feudal lords when dealing with small children. It is very
hard to imagine a society where people wouldn’t be both.

The obvious question is: If we are all ordinarily moving back and forth
between completely different systems of moral accounting, why hasn’t
anybody noticed this? Why, instead, do we continually feel the need to
reframe everything in terms of reciprocity?

Here we must return to the fact that reciprocity is our main way of
imagining justice. In particular, it is what we fall back on when we’re
thinking in the abstract, and especially when we’re trying to create an
idealized picture of society. I’ve already given examples of this sort
of thing. Iroquois communities were based on an ethos that required
everyone to be attentive to the needs of several different sorts of
people: their friends, their families, members of their matrilineal
clans, even friendly strangers in situations of hardship. It was when
they had to think about society in the abstract that they started to
emphasize the two sides of the village, each of which had to bury the
other’s dead. It was a way of imagining communism through reciprocity.
Similarly, feudalism was a notoriously messy and complicated business,
but whenever Medieval thinkers generalized about it, they reduced all
its ranks and orders into one simple formula in which each order
contributed its share: “Some pray, some fight, still others work.”⁴⁵
Even hierarchy was seen as ultimately reciprocal, despite this formula
having nothing to do with the real relations between priests, knights,
and peasants really operated on the ground. Anthropologists are familiar
with the phenomenon: it’s only when people who have never had occasion
to really think about their society or culture as a whole, who probably
weren’t even aware they were living inside something other people
considered a “society” or a “culture,” are asked to explain how
everything works that they say things like “this is how we repay our
mothers for the pain of having raised us,” or puzzle over conceptual
diagrams in which clan A gives their women in marriage to clan B who
gives theirs to clan C, who gives theirs back to A again, but which
never seem to quite correspond to what real people actually do.⁴⁶ When
trying to imagine a just society, it’s hard not to evoke images of
balance and symmetry, of elegant geometries where everything balances
out.

The idea that there is something called “the market” is not so very
different. Economists will often admit this, if you ask them in the
right way. Markets aren’t real. They are mathematical models, created by
imagining a self-contained world where everyone has exactly the same
motivation and the same knowledge and is engaging in the same
self-interested calculating exchange. Economists are aware that reality
is always more complicated; but they are also aware that to come up with
a mathematical model, one always has to make the world into a bit of a
cartoon. There’s nothing wrong with this. The problem comes when it
enables some (often these same economists) to declare that anyone who
ignores the dictates of the market shall surely be punished—or that
since we live in a market system, everything (except government
interference) is based on principles of justice: that our economic
system is one vast network of reciprocal relations in which, in the end,
the accounts balance and all debts are paid.

These principles get tangled up in each other and it’s thus often
difficult to tell which predominates in a given situation—one reason
that it’s ridiculous to pretend we could ever reduce human behavior,
economic or otherwise, to a mathematical formula of any sort. Still,
this means that some degree of reciprocity can be detected as
potentially present in any situation; so a determined observer can
always find some excuse to say it’s there. What’s more, certain
principles appear to have an inherent tendency to slip into others. For
instance, a lot of extremely hierarchical relationships can operate (at
least some of the time) on communistic principles. If you have a rich
patron, you come to him in times of need, and he is expected to help
you. But only to a certain degree. No one expects the patron to provide
so much help that it threatens to undermine the underlying inequality.⁴⁷

Likewise, communistic relations can easily start slipping into relations
of hierarchical inequality—often without anyone noticing it. It’s not
hard to see why this happens. Sometimes different people’s “abilities”
and “needs” are grossly disproportionate. Genuinely egalitarian
societies are keenly aware of this and tend to develop elaborate
safeguards around the dangers of anyone—say, especially good hunters, in
a hunting society—rising too far above themselves; just as they tend to
be suspicious of anything that might make one member of the society feel
in genuine debt to another. A member who draws attention to his own
accomplishments will find himself the object of mockery. Often, the only
polite thing to do if one has accomplished something significant is to
instead make fun of oneself. The Danish writer Peter Freuchen, in his
_Book of the Eskimo_, described how in Greenland, one could tell what a
fine delicacy someone had to offer his guests by how much he belittled
it beforehand:

The old man laughed. “Some people don’t know much. I am such a poor
hunter and my wife a terrible cook who ruins everything. I don’t have
much, but I think there is a piece of meat outside. It might still be
there as the dogs have refused it several times.”

This was such a recommendation in the Eskimo way of backwards bragging
that everyone’s mouths began to water …

The reader will recall the walrus hunter of the last chapter, who took
offense when the author tried to thank him for giving him a share of
meat—after all, humans help one another, and once we treat something as
a gift, we turn into something less than human: “Up here we say that by
gifts one makes slaves and by whips one makes dogs.”⁴⁸

“Gift” here does _not_ mean something given freely, not mutual aid that
we can ordinarily expect human beings to provide to one another. To
thank someone suggests that he or she might _not_ have acted that way,
and that therefore the choice to act this way creates an obligation, a
sense of debt—and hence, inferiority. Communes or egalitarian
collectives in the United States often face similar dilemmas, and they
have to come up with their own safeguards against creeping hierarchy.
It’s not that the tendency for communism to slip into hierarchy is
inevitable—societies like the Inuit have managed to fend it off for
thousands of years—but rather, that one must always guard against it.

In contrast, it’s notoriously difficult—often downright impossible—to
shift relations based on an assumption of communistic sharing to
relations of equal exchange. We observe this all the time with friends:
if someone is seen as taking advantage of your generosity, it’s often
much easier to break off relations entirely than to demand that they
somehow pay you back. One extreme example is the Maori story about a
notorious glutton who used to irritate fishermen up and down the coast
near where he lived by constantly asking for the best portions of their
catch. Since to refuse a direct request for food was effectively
impossible, they would dutifully turn it over; until one day, people
decided enough was enough and killed him.⁴⁹

We’ve already seen how creating a ground of sociability among strangers
can often require an elaborate process of testing the others’ limits by
helping oneself to their possessions. The same sort of thing can happen
in peacemaking, or even in the creation of business partnerships.⁵⁰ In
Madagascar, people told me that two men who are thinking of going into
business together will often become blood brothers. Blood brotherhood,
_fatidra_, consists of an unlimited promise of mutual aid. Both parties
solemnly swear that they will never refuse any request from the other.
In reality, partners to such an agreement are usually fairly circumspect
in what they actually request. But, my friends insisted, when people
first make such an agreement, they sometimes like to test it out. One
may demand the other’s house, the shirt off his back, or (everyone’s
favorite example) the right to spend the night with his wife. The only
limit is the knowledge that anything one can demand, the other one can
too.⁵¹ Here, again, we are talking about an initial establishment of
trust. Once the genuineness of the mutual commitment has been confirmed,
the ground is prepared, as it were, and the two men can begin to buy and
sell on consignment, advance funds, share profits, and otherwise trust
that each will look after the other’s commercial interests from then on.
The most famous and dramatic moments, however, are those when relations
of exchange threaten to break down into hierarchy: that is, when two
parties are acting like equals, trading gifts, or blows, or commodities,
or anything else, but one of them does something that completely flips
the scale.

I’ve already mentioned the tendency of gift exchange to turn into games
of one-upmanship, and how in some societies this potential is formalized
in great public contests. This is typical, above all, of what are often
called “heroic societies”: those in which governments are weak or
nonexistent and society is organized instead around warrior noblemen,
each with his entourage of loyal retainers and tied to the others by
ever-shifting alliances and rivalries. Most epic poetry—from the _Iliad_
to the _Mahabharata_ to _Beowulf_—harkens back to this sort of world,
and anthropologists have discovered similar arrangements among the Maori
of New Zealand and the Kwakiutl, Tlingit, and Haida of the American
Northwest coast. In heroic societies, the throwing of feasts and
resulting contests of generosity are often spoken of as mere extensions
of war: “fighting with property” or “fighting with food.” Those who
throw such feasts often indulge in colorful speeches about how their
enemies are thus crushed and destroyed by glorious feats of generosity
aimed in their direction (Kwakiutl chiefs liked to speak of themselves
as great mountains from which gifts rolled like giant boulders), and of
how conquered rivals are thus reduced—much as in the Inuit metaphor—to
slaves.

Such statements are not to be taken literally—another feature of such
societies is a highly developed art of boasting.⁵² Heroic chiefs and
warriors tended to talk themselves up just as consistently as those in
egalitarian societies talked themselves down. It’s not as if someone who
loses out in a contest of gift exchange is ever actually reduced to
slavery, but he might end up feeling as if he were. And the consequences
could be catastrophic. One ancient Greek source describes Celtic
festivals where rival nobles would alternate between jousts and contests
of generosity, presenting their enemies with magnificent gold and silver
treasures. Occasionally this could lead to a kind of checkmate; someone
would be faced with a present so magnificent that he could not possibly
match it. In this case, the only honorable response was for him to cut
his own throat, thus allowing his wealth to be distributed to his
followers.⁵³ Six hundred years later, we find a case from an Icelandic
saga of an aging Viking named Egil, who befriended a younger man named
Einar, who was still actively raiding. They liked to sit together
composing poetry. One day Einar came by a magnificent shield “inscribed
with old tales; and between the writing were overlaid spangles of gold
with precious stones.” No one had ever seen anything like it. He took it
with him on a visit to Egil. Egil was not at home, so Einar waited three
days, as was the custom, then hung the shield as a present in the
mead-hall and rode off.

Egil returned home, saw the shield, and asked who owned such a treasure.
He was told that Einar had visited and given it to him. Then Egil said,
“To hell with him! Does he think I’m going to stay up all night and
compose a poem about his shield? Get my horse, I’m going to ride after
him and kill him.” As Einar’s luck would have it he had left early
enough to put sufficient distance between himself and Egil. So Egil
resigned himself to composing a poem about Einar’s gift.⁵⁴

[]

Competitive gift exchange, then, does not literally render anyone
slaves; it is simply an affair of honor. These are people, however, for
whom honor is everything.

The main reason that being unable to pay a debt, especially a debt of
honor, was such a crisis was because this _was_ how noblemen assembled
their entourages. The law of hospitality in the ancient world, for
instance, insisted that any traveler must be fed, given shelter, and
treated as an honored guest—but only for a certain length of time. If a
guest did not go away, he would eventually become a mere subordinate.
The role of such hangers-on has been largely neglected by students of
human history. In many periods—from imperial Rome to medieval
China—probably the most important relationships, at least in towns and
cities, were those of patronage. Anyone rich and important would find
himself surrounded by flunkies, sycophants, perpetual dinner guests, and
other sorts of willing dependents. Drama and poetry of the time are full
of such characters.⁵⁵ Similarly, for much of human history, being
respectable and middle-class meant spending one’s mornings going from
door to door, paying one’s respects to important local patrons. To this
day, informal patronage systems still crop up, whenever relatively rich
and powerful people feel the need to assemble networks of supporters—a
practice well documented in many parts of the Mediterranean, the Middle
East, and Latin America. Such relationships seem to consist of a
slapdash mix of all three principles that I’ve been mapping out over the
course of this chapter; nevertheless, those observing them insist on
trying to cast them in the language of exchange and debt.

A final example: in a collection called _Gifts and Spoils_, published in
1971, we find a brief essay by the anthropologist Lorraine Blaxter about
a rural department in the French Pyrenees, most of whose inhabitants are
farmers. Everyone places a great emphasis on the importance of mutual
aid—the local phrase means “giving service” _(rendre service)_. People
living in the same community should look out for one another and pitch
in when their neighbors are having trouble. This is the essence of
communal morality, in fact, it’s how one knows that any sort of
community exists. So far so good. However, she notes, when someone does
a particularly great favor, mutual aid can turn into something else:

If a man in a factory went to the boss and asked for a job, and the boss
found him one, this would be an example of someone giving service. The
man who got the job could never repay the boss, but he could show him
respect, or perhaps give him symbolic gifts of garden produce. If a gift
demands a return, and no tangible return is possible, the repayment will
be through support or esteem.⁵⁶

Thus does mutual aid slip into inequality. Thus do patron-client
relations come into being. We have already observed this. I chose this
particular passage because the author’s phrasing is so weird. It
completely contradicts itself. The boss does the man a favor. The man
cannot repay the favor. Therefore, the man repays the favor by showing
up at the boss’s house with the occasional basket of tomatoes and
showing him respect. So which one is it? Can he repay the favor, or not?

Peter Freuchen’s walrus hunter would, no doubt, think he knew exactly
what was going on here. Bringing the basket of tomatoes was simply the
equivalent of saying “Thank you.” It was a way of acknowledging that one
owes a debt of gratitude, that gifts had in fact made slaves just as
whips make dogs. The boss and the employee are now fundamentally
different sorts of people. The problem is that in all other respects,
they are not fundamentally different sorts of people. Most likely they
are both middle-aged Frenchmen, fathers of families, citizens of the
Republic with similar tastes in music, sports, and food. They _ought_ to
be equals. As a result, even the tomatoes, which are really a token of
recognition of the existence of a debt that can never be repaid, has to
be represented as if it was itself a kind of repayment—an interest
payment on a loan that could, everyone agrees to pretend, someday be
paid back, thus returning the two members to their proper equal status
once again.⁵⁷

(It’s telling that the favor is finding the client a job in a factory,
because what happens is not very different from what happens when you
get a job in a factory to begin with. A wage-labor contract is,
ostensibly, a free contract between equals—but an agreement between
equals in which both agree that once one of them punches the time clock,
they won’t be equals any more.⁵⁸ The law does recognize a bit of a
problem here; that’s why it insists that you cannot sell off your
equality permanently [you are not free to sell yourself into slavery].
Such arrangements are only acceptable if the boss’s power is not
absolute, if it is limited to work time, and if you have the legal right
to break off the contract and thereby to restore yourself to full
equality, at any time.)

It seems to me that this agreement between equals to no longer be equal
(at least for a time) is critically important. It is the very essence of
what we call “debt.”

[]

What, then, is debt?

Debt is a very specific thing, and it arises from very specific
situations. It first requires a relationship between two people who do
not consider each other fundamentally different sorts of being, who are
at least potential equals, who _are_ equals in those ways that are
really important, and who are not currently in a state of equality—but
for whom there is some way to set matters straight.

In the case of gift-giving, as we’ve seen, this requires a certain
equality of status. That’s why our economics professor didn’t feel any
sense of obligation—any debt of honor—if taken out to dinner by someone
who ranked either much higher or much lower than himself. With money
loans, all that is required is that the two parties be of equal legal
standing. (You can’t lend money to a child, or to a lunatic. Well, you
can, but the courts won’t help you get it back.) Legal—rather than
moral—debts have other unique qualities. For instance, they can be
forgiven, which isn’t always possible with a moral debt.

This means that there is no such thing as a genuinely unpayable debt. If
there was no conceivable way to salvage the situation, we wouldn’t be
calling it a “debt.” Even the French villager could, conceivably, save
his patron’s life, or win the lottery and buy the factory. Even when we
speak of a criminal “paying his debt to society,” we are saying that he
has done something so terrible that he has now been banished from that
equal status under the law that belongs by natural right to any citizen
of his country; however, we call it a “debt” because it _can_ be paid,
equality _can_ be restored, even if the cost may be death by lethal
injection.

During the time that the debt remains unpaid, the logic of hierarchy
takes hold. There is no reciprocity. As anyone who has ever been in jail
knows, the first thing the jailors communicate is that nothing that
happens in jail has anything to do with justice. Similarly, debtor and
creditor confront each other like a peasant before a feudal lord. The
law of precedent takes hold. If you bring your creditor tomatoes from
the garden, it never occurs to you that he would give something back. He
might expect you to do it again, though. But always there is the
assumption that the situation is somewhat unnatural, because the debt
really ought to be paid.

This is what makes situations of effectively unpayable debt so difficult
and so painful. Since creditor and debtor are ultimately equals, if the
debtor cannot do what it takes to restore herself to equality, there is
obviously something wrong with her; it must be her fault.

This connection becomes clear if we look at the etymology of common
words for “debt” in European languages. Many are synonyms for “fault,”
“sin,” or “guilt;” just as a criminal owes a debt to society, a debtor
is always a sort of criminal.⁵⁹ In ancient Crete, according to Plutarch,
it was the custom for those taking loans to pretend to snatch the money
from the lender’s purse. Why, he wondered? Probably “so that, if they
default, they could be charged with violence and punished all the
more.”⁶⁰ This is why in so many periods of history insolvent debtors
could be jailed, or even—as in early Republican Rome—executed.

A debt, then, is just an exchange that has not been brought to
completion.

It follows that debt is strictly a creature of reciprocity and has
little to do with other sorts of morality (communism, with its needs and
abilities; hierarchy, with its customs and qualities). True, if we were
really determined, we could argue (as some do) that communism is a
condition of permanent mutual indebtedness, or that hierarchy is
constructed out of unpayable debts. But isn’t this just the same old
story, starting from the assumption that all human interactions must be,
by definition, forms of exchange, and then performing whatever mental
somersaults are required to prove it?

No. All human interactions are not forms of exchange. Only some are.
Exchange encourages a particular way of conceiving human relations. This
is because exchange implies equality, but it also implies separation.
It’s precisely when the money changes hands, when the debt is cancelled,
that equality is restored _and_ both parties can walk away and have
nothing further to do with each other.

Debt is what happens in between: when the two parties cannot yet walk
away from each other, because they are not yet equal. But it is carried
out in the shadow of eventual equality. Because achieving that equality,
however, destroys the very reason for having a relationship, just about
everything interesting happens in between.⁶¹ In fact, just about
everything human happens in between—even if this means that all such
human relations bear with them at least a tiny element of criminality,
guilt, or shame.

For the Tiv women whom I mentioned earlier in the chapter, this wasn’t
much of a problem. By ensuring that everyone was always slightly in debt
to one another, they actually created human society, if a very fragile
sort of society—a delicate web made up of obligations to return three
eggs or a bag of okra, ties renewed and recreated, as any one of them
could be cancelled out at any time.

Our own habits of civility are not so very different. Consider the
custom, in American society, of constantly saying “please” and “thank
you.” To do so is often treated as basic morality: we are constantly
chiding children for forgetting to do it, just as the moral guardians of
our society—teachers and ministers, for instance—do to everybody else.
We often assume that the habit is universal, but as the Inuit hunter
made clear, it is not.⁶² Like so many of our everyday courtesies, it is
a kind of democratization of what was once a habit of feudal deference:
the insistence on treating absolutely everyone the way that one used
only to have to treat a lord or similar hierarchical superior.

Perhaps this is not so in every case. Imagine we are on a crowded bus,
looking for a seat. A fellow passenger moves her bag aside to clear one;
we smile, or nod, or make some other little gesture of acknowledgment.
Or perhaps we actually say “Thank you.” Such a gesture is simply a
recognition of common humanity: we are acknowledging that the woman who
had been blocking the seat is not a mere physical obstacle but a human
being, and that we feel genuine gratitude toward someone we will likely
never see again. None of this is generally true when one asks someone
across the table to “please pass the salt,” or when the postman thanks
you for signing for a delivery. We think of these simultaneously as
meaningless formalities and as the very moral basis of society. Their
apparent unimportance can be measured by the fact that almost no one
would refuse, on principle, to say “please” or “thank you” in just about
any situation—even those who might find it almost impossible to say “I’m
sorry” or “I apologize.”

In fact, the English “please” is short for “if you please,” “if it
pleases you to do this”—it is the same in most European languages
(French _si il vous plait_, Spanish _por favor_). Its literal meaning is
“you are under no obligation to do this.” “Hand me the salt. Not that I
am saying that you have to!” This is not true; there is a social
obligation, and it would be almost impossible not to comply. But
etiquette largely consists of the exchange of polite fictions (to use
less polite language, lies). When you ask someone to pass the salt, you
are also giving them an order; by attaching the word “please,” you are
saying that it is not an order. But, in fact, it is.

In English, “thank you” derives from “think,” it originally meant, “I
will remember what you did for me”—which is usually not true either—but
in other languages (the Portuguese _obrigado_ is a good example) the
standard term follows the form of the English “much obliged”—it actually
does means “I am in your debt.” The French _merci_ is even more graphic:
it derives from “mercy,” as in begging for mercy; by saying it you are
symbolically placing yourself in your benefactor’s power—since a debtor
is, after all, a criminal.⁶³ Saying “you’re welcome,” or “it’s nothing”
(French _de rien_, Spanish _de nada_)—the latter has at least the
advantage of often being literally true—is a way of reassuring the one
to whom one has passed the salt that you are not actually inscribing a
debit in your imaginary moral account book. So is saying “my
pleasure”—you are saying, “No, actually, it’s a credit, not a debit—you
did _me_ a favor because in asking me to pass the salt, you gave me the
opportunity to do something I found rewarding in itself!”⁶⁴

Decoding the tacit calculus of debt (“I owe you one,” “No, you don’t owe
me anything,” “Actually, if anything, it’s me who owes you,” as if
inscribing and then scratching off so many infinitesimal entries in an
endless ledger) makes it easy to understand why this sort of thing is
often viewed not as the quintessence of morality, but as the
quintessence of _middle-class_ morality. True, by now middle-class
sensibilities dominate society. But there are still those who find the
practice odd. Those at the very top of society often still feel that
deference is owed primarily to hierarchical superiors and find it
slightly idiotic to watch postmen and pastry cooks taking turns
pretending to treat each other like little feudal lords. At the other
extreme, those who grew up in what in Europe are called “popular”
environments—small towns, poor neighborhoods, anyplace where there is
still an assumption that people who are not enemies will, ordinarily,
take care of one another—will often find it insulting to be constantly
told, in effect, that there is some chance they might _not_ do their job
as a waiter or taxi driver correctly, or provide houseguests with tea.
In other words, middle-class etiquette insists that we are all equals,
but it does so in a very particular way. On the one hand, it pretends
that nobody is giving anybody orders (think here of the burly security
guard at the mall who appears before someone walking into a restricted
area and says, “Can I help you?”); on the other, it treats every gesture
of what I’ve been calling “baseline communism” as if it were really a
form of exchange. As a result, like Tiv neighborhoods, middle-class
society has to be endlessly recreated, as a kind of constant flickering
game of shadows, the criss-crossing of an infinity of momentary debt
relations, each one almost instantly cancelled out.

All of this is a relatively recent innovation. The habit of always
saying “please” and “thank you” first began to take hold during the
commercial revolution of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries—among
those very middle classes who were largely responsible for it. It is the
language of bureaus, shops, and offices, and over the course of the last
five hundred years it has spread across the world along with them. It is
also merely one token of a much larger philosophy, a set of assumptions
of what humans are and what they owe one another, that have by now
become so deeply ingrained that we cannot see them.

[]

Sometimes, at the brink of a new historical era, some prescient soul can
see the full implications of what is beginning to happen—sometimes in a
way that later generations can’t. Let me end with a text by such a
person. In Paris, sometime in 1540s, François Rabelais—lapsed monk,
doctor, legal scholar—composed what was to become a famous mock eulogy,
which he inserted in the third book of his great _Gargantua and
Pantagruel_, and which came to be known as “In Praise of Debt.”

Rabelais places the encomium in the mouth of one Panurge, a wandering
scholar and man of extreme classical erudition who, he observes, “knew
sixty-three ways of making money—the most honorable and most routine of
which was stealing.”⁶⁵ The good-natured giant Pantagruel adopts Panurge
and even provides him with a respectable income, but it bothers him that
Panurge continues to spend money like water and remains up to his ears
in debt. Wouldn’t it be better, Pantagruel suggests, to be able to pay
his creditors?

Panurge responds with horror: “God forbid that I should ever be out of
debt!” Debt is, in fact, the very basis of his philosophy:

Always owe somebody something, then he will be forever praying God to
grant you a good, long and blessed life. Fearing to lose what you owe
him, he will always be saying good things about you in every sort of
company; he will be constantly acquiring new lenders for you, so that
you can borrow to pay him back, filling his ditch with other men’s
spoil.⁶⁶

Above all else, they will always be praying that you come into money.
It’s like those ancient slaves destined to be sacrificed at their
masters’ funerals. When they wished their master long life and good
health, they genuinely meant it! What’s more, debt can make you into a
kind of god, who can make something (money, well-wishing creditors) out
of absolutely nothing.

Worse still: I give myself to bonnie Saint Bobelin if all my life I have
not reckoned debts to be, as it were, a connection and colligation
between Heaven and Earth (uniquely preserving the lineage of Man without
which, I say, all human beings would soon perish) and perhaps to be that
great World Soul which, according to the Academics, gives life to all
things.

That it really is so, evoke tranquilly in your mind the Idea and Form of
a world—take if you like the thirtieth of the worlds imagined by
Metrodorus—in which there were no debtors or lenders at all. A universe
sans debts! Amongst the heavenly bodies there would be no regular course
whatsoever: all would be in disarray. Jupiter, reckoning that he owed no
debt to Saturn, would dispossess him of his sphere, and with his Homeric
chain hold in suspension all the Intelligences, gods, heavens, daemons,
geniuses, heroes, devils, earth, sea and all the elements … The Moon
would remain dark and bloody; why should the Sun share his light with
her? He is under no obligation. The Sun would never shine on their
Earth; the heavenly bodies would pour no good influences down upon it.

Between the elements there will be no mutual sharing of qualities, no
alternation, no transmutation whatsoever, one will not think itself
obliged to the other; it has lent it nothing. From earth no longer will
water be made, nor water transmuted into air; from air fire will not be
made, and fire will not warm the earth. Earth will bring forth nothing
but monsters, Titans, giants. The rain will not rain, the light will
shed no light, the wind will not blow, and there will be no summer, no
autumn, Lucifer will tear off his bonds and, sallying forth from deepest
Hell with the Furies, the Vengeances and the horned devils, will seek to
turf the gods of both the greater and lesser nations out from their
nests in the heavens.

And what’s more, if human beings owed nothing to one another, life would
“be no better than a dog-fight”—a mere unruly brawl.

Amongst human beings none will save another; it will be no good a man
shouting Help! Fire! I’m drowning! Murder! Nobody will come and help
him. Why? Because he has lent nothing: and no one owes him anything. No
one has anything to lose by his fire, his shipwreck, his fall, or his
death. He has lent nothing. And: he would lend nothing either hereafter.

In short, Faith, Hope and Charity would be banished from this world.

Panurge—a man without a family, alone, whose entire calling in life was
getting large amounts of money and then spending it—serves as a fitting
prophet for the world that was just beginning to emerge. His perspective
of course is that of a _wealthy_ debtor—not one liable to be trundled
off to some pestiferous dungeon for failure to pay. Still, what he is
describing is the logical conclusion, the _reductio ad absurdum_, which
Rabelais as always lays out with cheerful perversity, of the assumptions
about the world as exchange slumbering behind all our pleasant bourgeois
formalities (which Rabelais himself, incidentally, detested—the book is
basically a mixture of classical erudition and dirty jokes).

And what he says is true. If we insist on defining all human
interactions as matters of people giving one thing for another, then any
ongoing human relations can only take the form of debts. Without them,
no one would owe anything to anybody. A world without debt would revert
to primordial chaos, a war of all against all; no one would feel the
slightest responsibility for one another; the simple fact of being human
would have no significance; we would all become isolated planets who
couldn’t even be counted on to maintain our proper orbits.

Pantagruel will have none of it. His own feelings on the matter, he
says, can be summed up with one line from the Apostle Paul: “Owe no man
anything, save mutual love and affection.”⁶⁷ Then, in an appropriately
biblical gesture, he declares, “From your past debts I shall free you.”

“What can I do but thank you?” Panurge replies.



CHAPTER SIX  GAMES WITH SEX AND DEATH


WHEN WE RETURN to an examination of conventional economic history, one
thing that jumps out is how much has been made to disappear. Reducing
all human life to exchange means not only shunting aside all other forms
of economic experience (hierarchy, communism), but also ensuring that
the vast majority of the human race who are not adult males, and
therefore whose day-to-day existence is relatively difficult to reduce
to a matter of swapping things in such a way as to seek mutual
advantage, melt away into the background.

As a result, we end up with a sanitized view of the way actual business
is conducted. The tidy world of shops and malls is the quintessential
middle-class environment, but at either the top or the bottom of the
system, the world of financiers or of gangsters, deals are often made in
ways not so completely different from ways that the Gunwinggu or
Nambikwara make them—at least in that sex, drugs, music, extravagant
displays of food, and the potential for violence do often play parts.

Consider the case of Neil Bush (George W.’s brother) who, during divorce
proceedings with his wife, admitted to multiple infidelities with women
who, he claimed, would mysteriously appear at his hotel-room door after
important business meetings in Thailand and Hong Kong.

“You have to admit it’s pretty remarkable,” remarked one of his wife’s
attorneys, “for a man to go to a hotel-room door and open it and have a
woman standing there and have sex with her.”

“It was very unusual,” Bush replied, admitting however that this had
happened to him on numerous occasions.

“Were they prostitutes?”

“I don’t know.”¹

In fact, such things seem almost par for the course when really big
money comes into play.

In this light, the economists’ insistence that economic life begins with
barter, the innocent exchange of arrows for teepee frames, with no one
in a position to rape, humiliate, or torture anyone else, and that it
continues in this way, is touchingly utopian.

As a result, though, the histories we tell are full of blank spaces, and
the women in them seem to appear out of nowhere, without explanation,
much like the Thai women who appeared at Bush’s door. Recall the passage
cited in Chapter Three, from numismatist Philip Grierson, about money in
the barbarian law codes:

Compensation in the Welsh laws is reckoned primarily in cattle and in
the Irish ones in cattle or bondmaids _(cumal)_, with considerable use
of precious metals in both. In the Germanic codes it is mainly in
precious metal …²

How is it possible to read this passage without immediately stopping at
the end of the first line? “Bondmaids”? Doesn’t that mean “slaves?” (It
does.) In ancient Ireland, female slaves were so plentiful and important
that they came to function as currency. How did that happen? And if we
are trying to understand the origins of money, here, isn’t the fact that
people are using _one another_ as currency at all interesting or
significant?³ Yet none of the sources on money remark much on it. It
would seem that by the time of the law codes, slave girls were not
actually traded, but just used as units of account. Still, they must
have been traded at some point. Who were they? How were they enslaved?
Were they captured in war, sold by their parents, or reduced to slavery
through debt? Were they a major trade item? The answer to all these
questions would seem to be yes, but it’s hard to say more because the
history remains largely unwritten.⁴

Or let’s return to the parable of the ungrateful servant. “Since he was
not able to pay, the master ordered that he and his wife and his
children and all that he had be sold to repay the debt.” How did that
happen? Note that we’re not even speaking of debt service here (he is
already his creditor’s servant), but outright slavery. How did a man’s
wife and children come to be considered no different than his sheep and
crockery—as property to be liquidated on the occasion of default? Was it
normal for a man in first-century Palestine to be able to sell his wife?
(It wasn’t.)⁵ If he didn’t own her, why was someone else allowed to sell
her if he couldn’t pay his debts?

The same could be asked of the story in Nehemiah. It’s hard not to
empathize with the distress of a father watching his daughter taken off
by strangers. On the other hand, one might also ask: Why weren’t they
taking _him?_ The daughter hadn’t borrowed any money.

It’s not as if it is ordinary for fathers in traditional societies to be
able to sell their children. This is a practice with a very specific
history: it appears in the great agrarian civilizations, from Sumer to
Rome to China, right around the time when we also start to see evidence
of money, markets, and interest-bearing loans; later, more gradually, it
also appears in those surrounding hinterlands that supplied those
civilizations with slaves.⁶ What’s more, if we examine the historical
evidence, there seems good reason to believe that the very obsession
with patriarchal honor that so defines “tradition” in the Middle East
and Mediterranean world _itself_ arose alongside the father’s power to
alienate his children—as a reaction to what were seen as the moral
perils of the market. All of this is treated as somehow outside the
bounds of economic history.

Excluding all this is deceptive not only because it excludes the main
purposes to which money was actually put in the past, but because it
doesn’t give us a clear vision of the present. After all, who were those
Thai women who so mysteriously appeared at Neil Bush’s hotel door?
Almost certainly, they were children of indebted parents. Likely as not,
they were contractual debt peons themselves.⁷

Focusing on the sex industry would be deceptive, though. Then as now,
most women in debt bondage spend the vast majority of their time sewing,
preparing soups, and scouring latrines. Even in the Bible, the
admonition in the Ten Commandments not to “covet thy neighbor’s wife”
clearly referred not to lust in one’s heart (adultery had already been
covered in commandment number seven), but to the prospect of taking her
as a debt-peon—in other words, as a servant to sweep one’s yard and hang
out the laundry.⁸ In most such matters, sexual exploitation was at best
incidental (usually illegal, sometimes practiced anyway, symbolically
important.) Again, once we remove some of our usual blinders, we can see
that matters have changed far less, over the course of the last five
thousand years or so, than we really like to think.

[]

These blinders are all the more ironic when one looks at the
anthropological literature on what used to be called “primitive
money”—that is, the sort one encounters in places where there are no
states or markets—whether Iroquois wampum, African cloth money, or
Solomon Island feather money, and discovers that such money is used
almost exclusively for the kinds of transactions that economists don’t
like to have to talk about.

In fact, the term “primitive money” is deceptive for this very reason,
since it suggests that we are dealing with a crude version of the kind
of currencies we use today. But this is precisely what we don’t find.
Often, such currencies are never used to buy and sell anything at all.⁹
Instead, they are used to create, maintain, and otherwise reorganize
relations between people: to arrange marriages, establish the paternity
of children, head off feuds, console mourners at funerals, seek
forgiveness in the case of crimes, negotiate treaties, acquire
followers—almost anything but trade in yams, shovels, pigs, or jewelry.

Often, these currencies were extremely important, so much so that social
life itself might be said to revolve around getting and disposing of the
stuff. Clearly, though, they mark a totally different conception of what
money, or indeed an economy, is actually about. I’ve decided therefore
to refer to them as “social currencies,” and the economies that employ
them as “human economies.” By this I mean not that these societies are
necessarily in any way more humane (some are quite humane; others
extraordinarily brutal), but only that they are economic systems
primarily concerned not with the accumulation of wealth, but with the
creation, destruction, and rearranging of human beings.

Historically, commercial economies—market economies, as we now like to
call them—are a relative newcomer. For most of human history, human
economies predominated. To even begin to write a genuine history of
debt, then, we have to start by asking: What sort of debts, what sort of
credits and debits, do people accumulate in human economies? And what
happens when human economies begin to give away to or are taken over by
commercial ones? This is another way of asking the question, “How do
mere obligations turn into debts?”—but it means not just asking the
question in the abstract, but examining the historical record to try to
reconstruct what actually did happen.

This is what I will do over the course of the next two chapters. First I
will look at the role of money in human economies, then describe what
can happen when human economies are suddenly incorporated into the
economic orbits of larger, commercial ones. The African slave trade will
serve as a particularly catastrophic case in point. Then, in the next
chapter, I will return to the first emergence of commercial economies in
early civilizations of Europe and the Middle East.


Money as Inadequate Substitute

The most interesting theory of the origin of money is the one recently
put forward by a French economist-turned-anthropologist named Philippe
Rospabé. While his work is largely unknown in the English-speaking
world, it’s quite ingenious, and it bears directly on our problem.
Rospabé’s argument is that “primitive money” was not originally a way to
pay debts of any sort. It’s a way of recognizing the existence of debts
that cannot possibly be paid. His argument is worth considering in
detail.

In most human economies, money is used first and foremost to arrange
marriages. The simplest and probably most common way of doing this was
by being presented as what used to be called “bride-price”: a suitor’s
family would deliver a certain number of dog teeth, or cowries, or brass
rings, or whatever is the local social currency, to a woman’s family,
and they would present their daughter as his bride. It’s easy to see why
this might be interpreted as buying a women, and many colonial officials
in Africa and Oceania in the early part of the twentieth century did
indeed come to that conclusion. The practice caused something of a
scandal, and by 1926, the League of Nations was debating banning the
practice as a form of slavery. Anthropologists objected. Really, they
explained, this was nothing like the purchase of, say, an ox—let alone a
pair of sandals. After all, if you buy an ox, you don’t have any
responsibilities _to_ the ox. What you are really buying is the right to
dispose of the ox in any way that pleases you. Marriage is entirely
different, since a husband will normally have just as many
responsibilities toward his wife as his wife will have toward him. It’s
a way of rearranging relations between people. Second of all, if you
were really buying a wife, you’d be able to sell her. Finally, the real
significance of the payment concerns the status of the woman’s children:
if he’s buying anything, it’s the right to call her offspring his own.¹⁰

The anthropologists ended up winning the argument, and “bride-price” was
dutifully redubbed “bridewealth.” But they never really answered the
question: What is actually happening here? When a Fijian suitor’s family
presents a whale tooth to ask for a woman’s hand in marriage, is this an
advance payment for the services the woman will provide in cultivating
her future husband’s gardens? Or is he purchasing the future fertility
of her womb? Or is this a pure formality, the equivalent of the dollar
that has to change hands in order to seal a contract? According to
Rospabé, it’s none of these. The whale tooth, however valuable, is not a
form of payment. It is really an acknowledgment that one is asking for
something so uniquely valuable that payment of any sort would be
impossible. The only appropriate payment for the gift of a woman is the
gift of another woman; in the meantime, all one can do is to acknowledge
the outstanding debt.

[]

There are places where suitors say this quite explicitly. Consider the
Tiv of Central Nigeria, who we have already met briefly in the last
chapter. Most of our information on the Tiv comes from mid-century, when
they were still under British colonial rule.¹¹ Everyone at that time
insisted that a proper marriage should take the form of an exchange of
sisters. One man gives his sister in marriage to another, that man
marries the sister of his newfound brother-in-law. This is the perfect
marriage because the only thing one can really give in exchange for a
woman is another woman.

Obviously, even if every family had exactly equal numbers of brothers
and sisters, things couldn’t always work this neatly. Say I marry your
sister but you don’t want to marry mine (because, say, you don’t like
her, or because she’s only five years old). In that case, you become her
“guardian,” which means you can claim the right to dispose of her in
marriage to someone else—for instance, someone whose sister you actually
do wish to marry. This system quickly grew into a complex system in
which most important men became guardians of numerous “wards,” often
scattered over wide areas; they would swap and trade them and in the
process accumulate numerous wives for themselves, while less-fortunate
men were only able to marry late in life, or not at all.¹²

There was one other expedient. The Tiv at that time used bundles of
brass rods as their most prestigious form of currency. Brass rods were
only held by men, and never used to buy things in markets (markets were
dominated by women); instead, they were exchanged only for things that
men considered of higher importance: cattle, horses, ivory, ritual
titles, medical treatment, magical charms. It was possible, as one Tiv
ethnographer, Akiga Sai, explains, to acquire a wife with brass rods,
but it required quite a lot of them. You would need to give two or three
bundles of them to her parents to establish yourself as a suitor; then,
when you did finally make off with her (such marriages were always first
framed as elopements), another few bundles to assuage her mother when
she showed up angrily demanding to know what was going on. This would
normally be followed by five more to get her guardian to at least
temporarily accept the situation, and more still to her parents when she
gave birth, if you were to have any chance of their accepting your
claims to be the father of her children. That might get her parents off
your back, but you’d have to pay off the guardian forever, because you
could never really use money to acquire the rights to a woman. Everyone
knew that the only thing you can legitimately give in exchange for a
woman is another woman. In this case, everyone has to abide by the
pretext that a woman will someday be forthcoming. In the meantime, as
one ethnographer succinctly puts it, “the debt can never be fully
paid.”¹³

According to Rospabé, the Tiv are just making explicit the underlying
logic of bridewealth everywhere. The suitor presenting bridewealth is
never paying for a woman, or even for the rights to claim her children.
That would imply that brass rods, or whale’s teeth, cowrie shells, or
even cattle are somehow the equivalent of a human being, which by the
logic of a human economy is obviously absurd. Only a human could ever be
considered equivalent to another human. All the more so since, in the
case of marriage, we are speaking of something even more valuable than
one human life: we are speaking of a human life that also has the
capacity to generate new lives.

Certainly, many of those who pay bridewealth are, like the Tiv, quite
explicit about all this. Bridewealth money is presented not to settle a
debt, but as a kind of acknowledgment that there exists a debt that
_cannot_ be settled by means of money. Often the two sides will maintain
at least the polite fiction that there will, someday, be a recompense in
kind: that the suitor’s clan will eventually provide one of its own
women, perhaps even that very woman’s daughter or granddaughter, to
marry a man of the wife’s natal clan. Or maybe there will be some
arrangement about the disposition of her children; perhaps her clan will
get to keep one for itself. The possibilities are endless.

[]

Money, then, begins, as Rospabé himself puts it, “as a substitute for
life.”¹⁴ One might call it the recognition of a life-debt. This, in
turn, explains why it’s invariably the exact same kind of money that’s
used to arrange marriages that is also used to pay wergeld (or
“bloodwealth” as it’s sometimes also called): money presented to the
family of a murder victim so as to prevent or resolve a blood-feud. Here
the sources are even more explicit. On the one hand, one presents whale
teeth or brass rods because the murderer’s kin recognize they owe a life
to the victim’s family. On the other, whale teeth or brass rods are in
no sense, and can never be, compensation for the loss of a murdered
relative. Certainly no one presenting such compensation would ever be
foolish enough to suggest that any amount of money could possibly be the
“equivalent” to the value of someone’s father, sister, or child.

So here again, money is first and foremost an acknowledgment that one
owes something much more valuable than money.

In the case of a blood-feud, both parties will also be aware that even a
revenge killing, while at least it conforms to the principle of a life
for a life, won’t really compensate for the victim’s grief and pain
either. This knowledge allows for some possibility of settling the
matter without violence. But even here, there is often a feeling that,
as in the case of marriage, the _real_ solution to the problem is simply
being temporarily postponed.

An illustration might be helpful. Among the Nuer, there is a special
class of priestly figures who specialize in mediating feuds, referred to
in the literature as “leopard-skin chiefs.” If one man murders another,
he will immediately seek out one of their homesteads, since such a
homestead is treated as an inviolate sanctuary: even the dead man’s
family, who will be honor-bound to avenge the murder, will know that
they cannot enter it, lest terrible consequences ensue. According to
Evans-Pritchard’s classic account, the chief will immediately start
trying to negotiate a settlement between the murderer and victim’s
families, a delicate business, because the victim’s family will always
first refuse:

The chief first finds out what cattle the slayer’s people possess and
what they are prepared to pay in compensation.… He then visits the dead
man’s people and asks them to accept cattle for the life. They usually
refuse, for it is a point of honor to be obstinate, but their refusal
does not mean that they are unwilling to accept compensation. The chief
knows this and insists on their acceptance, even threatening to curse
them if they do not give way …¹⁵

More-distant kin weigh in, reminding everyone of their responsibility to
the larger community, of all the trouble that an outstanding feud will
cause to innocent relatives, and after a great show of holding out,
insisting that it is insulting to suggest that any number of cattle
could possibly substitute for the life of a son or brother, they will
usually grudgingly accept.¹⁶ In fact, even once the matter has
technically been settled, it really hasn’t—it usually takes years to
assemble the cattle, and even once they have been paid, the two sides
will avoid each other, “especially at dances, for in the excitement they
engender, merely bumping into a man whose kinsman has been slain may
cause a fight to break out, because the offense is never forgiven and
the score must finally be paid with a life.”¹⁷

So it’s much the same as with bridewealth. Money does not wipe out the
debt. One life can only be paid for with another. At best those paying
bloodwealth, by admitting the existence of the debt and insisting that
they wish they could pay it, even though they know this is impossible,
can allow the matter to be placed permanently on hold.

Halfway around the world, one finds Lewis Henry Morgan describing the
elaborate mechanisms set up by the Six Nations of the Iroquois to avoid
precisely this state of affairs. In the event one man killed another,

Immediately on the commission of a murder, the affair was taken up by
the tribes to which the parties belonged, and strenuous efforts were
made to effect a reconciliation, lest private retaliation should lead to
disastrous consequences.

The first council ascertained whether the offender was willing to
confess his crime, and to make atonement. If he was, the council
immediately sent a belt of white wampum, in his name, to the other
council, which contained a message to that effect. The latter then
endeavored to pacify the family of the deceased, to quiet their
excitement, and to induce them to accept the wampum as condonation.¹⁸

Much as in the case of the Nuer, there were complicated schedules of
exactly how many fathoms of wampum were paid over, depending on the
status of the victim and the nature of the crime. As with the Nuer, too,
everyone insisted that this was _not_ payment. The value of the wampum
in no sense represented the value of the dead man’s life:

The present of white wampum was not in the nature of a compensation for
the life of the deceased, but of a regretful confession of the crime,
with a petition for forgiveness. It was a peace-offering, the acceptance
of which was pressed by mutual friends …¹⁹

Actually, in many cases there was also some way to manipulate the system
to turn payments meant to assuage one’s rage and grief into ways of
creating a new life that would in some sense substitute for the one that
was lost. Among the Nuer, forty cattle were set as the standard fee for
bloodwealth. But it was also the standard rate of bridewealth. The logic
was this: if a man had been murdered before he was able to marry and
produce offspring, it’s only natural that his spirit would be angry. He
had been, effectively, robbed of his eternity. The best solution would
be to use the cattle paid in settlement to acquire what was called a
“ghost-wife”: a woman who would then be formally married to the dead
man. In practice, she was usually paired off with one of the victim’s
brothers, but this was not particularly important; it didn’t really
matter too much who impregnated her, since he would be in no sense the
father of her children. Her children would be considered the children of
the victim’s ghost—and as a result, any boys among them were seen as
having been born with a particular commitment to someday avenge his
death.²⁰

This latter is unusual. But Nuer appear to have been unusually stubborn
about feuds. Rospabé provides examples from other parts of the world
that are even more telling. Among North African Bedouins, for instance,
it sometimes happened that the only way to settle a feud was for the
killer’s family to turn over a daughter, who would then marry the
victim’s next of kin—his brother, say. If she bore him a male child, the
boy was given the same name as his dead uncle and considered to be, at
least in the broadest sense, a substitute for him.²¹ The Iroquois, who
traced descent in the female line, did not trade women in this fashion.
However, they had another, more direct approach. If a man died—even of
natural causes—his wife’s relatives might “put his name upon the mat,”
sending off belts of wampum to commission a war party, which would then
raid an enemy village to secure a captive. The captive could either be
killed, or, if the clan matrons were in a benevolent mood (one could
never tell; the grief of mourning is tricky), adopted: this was
signified by throwing a belt of wampum around his shoulders, whereon he
would be given the name of the deceased and be considered, from that
moment on, married to the victim’s wife, the owner of his personal
possessions, and in every way, effectively, the exact same person as the
dead man used to be.²²

All of this merely serves to underline Rospabé’s basic point, which is
that money can be seen, in human economies, as first and foremost the
acknowledgment of the existence of a debt that _cannot_ be paid.

In a way, it’s all very reminiscent of primordial-debt theory: money
emerges from the recognition of an absolute debt to that which has given
you life. The difference is that instead of imagining such debts as
between an individual and society, or perhaps the cosmos, here they are
imagined as a kind of network of dyadic relations: almost everyone in
such societies was in a relation of absolute debt to someone else. It’s
not that we owe “society.” If there is any notion of “society” here—and
it’s not clear that there is—society _is_ our debts.


Blood Debts (Lele)

Obviously, this leads us to the same familiar problem: How does a token
of recognition that one cannot pay a debt turn into a form of payment by
which a debt can be extinguished? If anything, the problem seems even
worse than it was before.

In fact, it isn’t. The African evidence clearly shows how such things
can happen—though the answer is a bit unsettling. To demonstrate this,
it will be necessary to look at one or two African societies with a
closer focus.

I’ll start with the Lele, an African people who had, at the time that
Mary Douglas studied them in the 1950s, managed to turn the principle of
blood debts into the organizing principle of their entire society.

The Lele were, at that time, a group of perhaps ten thousand souls,
living on a stretch of rolling country near the Kasai River in the
Belgian Congo, and considered a rude backcountry folk by their richer
and more cosmopolitan neighbors, the Kuba and Bushong. Lele women grew
maize and manioc; the men thought of themselves as intrepid hunters but
spent most of their time weaving and sewing raffia-palm cloth. This
cloth was what the area was really known for. It was not only used for
every sort of clothing, but also exported: the Lele considered
themselves the clothiers of the region, and it was traded with
surrounding people to acquire luxuries. Internally, it functioned as a
sort of currency. Still, it was not used in markets (there were no
markets), and, as Mary Douglas discovered to her great inconvenience,
within a village, one couldn’t use it to acquire food, tools, tableware,
or really much of anything.²³ It was the quintessential social currency.

Informal gifts of raffia cloth smooth all social relations: husband to
wife, son to mother, son to father. They resolve occasions of tension,
as peace-offerings; they make parting gifts, or convey congratulations.
There are also formal gifts of raffia which are neglected only at risk
of rupture of the social ties involved. A man, on reaching adulthood,
should give 20 cloths to his father. Otherwise he would be ashamed to
ask his father’s help for raising his marriage dues. A man should give
20 cloths to his wife on each delivery of a child …²⁴

Cloth was also used for various fines and fees, and to pay curers. So
for instance, if a man’s wife reported a would-be seducer, it was
customary to reward her with 20 cloths for her fidelity (it was not
required, but not doing so was considered decidedly unwise); if an
adulterer was caught, he was expected to pay 50 or 100 cloths to the
woman’s husband; if the husband and lover disturbed the peace of the
village by fighting before the matter was settled, each would have to
pay two in compensation, and so forth.

Gifts tended to flow upward. Young people were always giving little
presents of cloth as marks of respect to fathers, mothers, uncles, and
the like. These gifts were hierarchical in nature: that is, it never
occurred to those receiving them that they should have to reciprocate in
any way. As a result, elders, and especially elder men, usually had a
few extra pieces lying around, and young men, who could never weave
quite enough to meet their needs, would have to turn to them whenever
time for some major payment rolled around: for instance, if they had to
pay a major fine, or wished to hire a doctor to assist their wife in
child-birth, or wanted to join a cult society. They were thus always
slightly in debt, or at least slightly beholden, to their elders. But
everyone also had a whole range of friends and relatives who they had
helped out, and so could turn to for assistance.²⁵

Marriage was particularly expensive, since the arrangements usually
required getting one’s hands on several bars of camwood. If raffia cloth
was the small change of social life, camwood—a rare imported wood used
for the manufacture of cosmetics—was the high-denomination currency. A
hundred raffia cloths were equivalent to three to five bars. Few
individuals owned much in the way of camwood, usually just little bits
to grind up for their own use. Most was kept in each village’s
collective treasury.

This is not to say that camwood was used for anything like
bridewealth—rather, it was used in marriage negotiations, in which all
sorts of gifts were passed back and forth. In fact, there was no
bridewealth. Men could not use money to acquire women; nor could they
use it to claim any rights over children. The Lele were matrilineal.
Children belonged not to their father’s clan, but to their mother’s.

There was another way that men gained control over women, however.²⁶
This was the system of blood debts.

It is a common understanding among many traditional African peoples that
human beings do not simply die without a reason. If someone dies,
someone must have killed them. If a Lele woman died in childbirth, for
example, this was assumed to be because she had committed adultery. The
adulterer was thus responsible for the death. Sometimes she would
confess on her deathbed, otherwise the facts of the matter would have to
be established through divination. It was the same if a baby died. If
someone became sick, or slipped and fell while climbing a tree, one
would check to see if they had been involved in any quarrel that could
be said to have caused the misfortune. If all else failed, one could
employ magical means to identify the sorcerer. Once the village was
satisfied that a culprit had been identified, that person owed a
blood-debt: that is, he owed the victim’s next of kin a human life. The
culprit would thus have to transfer over a young woman from his family,
his sister or her daughter, to be the victim’s ward, or “pawn.”

As with the Tiv, the system quickly became immensely complicated.
Pawnship was inherited. If a woman was someone’s pawn, so would her
children be, and so would her daughters’ children. This meant that most
males were also considered someone else’s man. Still, no one would
accept a male pawn in payment of blood-debts: the whole point was to get
hold of a young woman, who would then go on to produce additional pawn
children. Douglas’s Lele informants emphasized that any man would
naturally want to have many of these as possible:

Ask “Why do you want to have more pawns?” and they invariably say, “The
advantage of owning pawns is that if you incur a blood-debt, you can
settle it by paying one of your pawns, and your own sisters remain
free.” Ask, “Why do you wish your own sisters to remain free?” and they
reply, “Ah! then if I incur a blood-debt, I can settle it by giving one
of them as a pawn …”

Every man is always aware that at any time he is liable for a
blood-debt. If any woman he has seduced confesses his name in the throes
of child-birth, and subsequently dies, or if her child dies, or if
anyone he has quarreled with dies of illness or accident, he may be held
responsible … Even if a woman runs away from her husband, and fighting
breaks out on her account, the deaths will be laid at her door, and her
brother or mother’s brother will have to pay up. Since only women are
accepted as blood-compensation, and since compensation is demanded for
all deaths, of men as well as of women, it is obvious that there can
never be enough to go around. Men fall into arrears in their pawnship
obligations, and girls used to be pledged before their birth, even
before their mothers were of marriageable age.²⁷

In other words, the whole thing turned into an endlessly complicated
chess game—one reason, Douglas remarks, why the term “pawn” seems
singularly apropos. Just about every adult Lele male was both someone
else’s pawn, and engaged in a constant game of securing, swapping, or
redeeming pawns. Every major drama or tragedy of village life would
ordinarily lead to a transfer of rights in women. Almost all of those
women would eventually get swapped again.

Several points need to be emphasized here. First of all, what were being
traded were, quite specifically, human lives. Douglas calls them
“blood-debts,” but “life-debts” would be more appropriate. Say, for
instance, a man is drowning, and another man rescues him. Or say he’s
deathly ill but a doctor cures him. In either case, we would likely say
one man “owes his life” to the other. So would the Lele, but they meant
it literally. Save someone’s life, they owe you a life, and a life owed
had to be paid back. The usual recourse was for a man whose life was
saved to turn over his sister as a pawn—or if not that, a different
woman; a pawn he had acquired from someone else.

The second point is that nothing could substitute for a human life.
“Compensation was based on the principle of equivalence, a life for a
life, a person for a person.” Since the value of a human life was
absolute, no amount of raffia cloth, or camwood bars, or goats, or
transistor radios, or anything else could possibly take its place.

The third and most important point is that in practice, “human life”
actually meant “woman’s life”—or even more specifically, “young woman’s
life.” Ostensibly this was to maximize one’s holdings: above all, one
wished for a human being who could become pregnant and produce children,
since those children would also be pawns. Still, even Mary Douglas, who
was in no sense a feminist, was forced to admit that the whole
arrangement did seem to operate as if it were one gigantic apparatus for
asserting male control over women. This was true above all because women
themselves could not own pawns.²⁸ They could only be pawns. In other
words: when it came to life-debts, only men could be either creditors
_or_ debtors. Young women were thus the credits and the debits—the
pieces being moved around the chessboard—while the hands that moved them
were invariably male.²⁹

Of course, since almost everyone was a pawn, or had been at some point
in their lives, being one could not in itself be much of a tragedy. For
male pawns it was in some ways quite advantageous, since one’s “owner”
had to pay most of one’s fines and fees and even blood-debts. This is
why, as Douglas’s informants uniformly insisted, pawnship had nothing in
common with slavery. The Lele did keep slaves, but never very many.
Slaves were war captives, usually foreigners. As such they had no
family, no one to protect them. To be a pawn, on the other hand, meant
to have not one, but two different families to look after you: you still
had your own mother and her brothers, but now you also had your “lord.”

For a woman, the very fact that she was the stakes in a game that all
men were playing afforded all sorts of opportunities to game the system.
In principle, a girl might be born a pawn, assigned to some man for
eventual marriage. In practice, however,

a little Lele girl would grow up a coquette. From infancy she was the
centre of affectionate, teasing, flirting attention. Her affianced
husband never gained more than a very limited control over her … Since
men competed with one another for women there was scope for women to
manoeuvre and intrigue. Hopeful seducers were never lacking and no woman
doubted that she could get another husband if it suited her.³⁰

In addition, a young Lele woman had one unique and powerful card to
play. Everyone was well aware that, if she completely refused to
countenance her situation, she always had the option of becoming a
“village-wife.”³¹

The institution of village-wife was a peculiarly Lele one. Probably the
best way to describe it is to imagine a hypothetical case. Let us say
that an old, important man acquires a young woman as pawn through a
blood-debt, and he decides to marry her himself. Technically, he has the
right to do so, but it’s no fun for a young woman to be an old man’s
third or fourth wife. Or, say he decides to offer her in marriage to one
of his male pawns in a village far away from her mother and natal home.
She protests. He ignores her protestations. She waits for an opportune
moment and slips off at night to an enemy village, where she asks for
sanctuary. This is always possible: all villages have their traditional
enemies. Neither would an enemy village refuse a woman who came to them
in such a situation. They would immediately declare her “wife of the
village,” who all men living there would then be obliged to protect.

It helps to understand that here, as in many parts of Africa, most older
men had several wives. This meant that the pool of women available for
younger men was considerably reduced. As our ethnographer explains, the
imbalance was a source of considerable sexual tension:

Everyone recognized that the young unmarried men coveted the wives of
their seniors. Indeed, one of their pastimes was to plan seductions and
the man who boasted of none was derided. Since the old men wished to
remain polygynists, with two or three wives, and since adulteries were
thought to disrupt the peace of the village, Lele had to make some
arrangement to appease their unmarried men.

Therefore, when a sufficient number of them reached the age of eighteen
or so, they were allowed to buy the right to a common wife.³²

After paying an appropriate fee in raffia cloth to the village treasury,
they were permitted to build a collective house, and then they were
either allotted a wife to put in it, or allowed to form a party that
would try to steal one from a rival village. (Or, alternately, if one
showed up as a refugee, they would ask the rest of the village for the
right to accept her: this was invariably granted.) This common wife is
what’s referred to as a “village wife.” The position of village wife was
more than respectable. In fact, a newly married village wife was treated
very much like a princess. She was not expected to plant or weed in the
gardens, fetch wood or water, or even to cook; all household chores were
done by her eager young husbands, who provided the best of everything,
spending much of their time hunting in the forest vying to bring her the
choicest delicacies, or plying her with palm wine. She could help
herself to others’ possessions and was expected to make all sorts of
mischief to the bemused indulgence of all concerned. She was also
expected to make herself sexually available to all members of the
age-set—perhaps ten or twelve different men—at first, pretty much
whenever they wanted her.³³

Over time, a village wife would usually settle down with just three or
four of her husbands, and finally, just one. The domestic arrangements
were flexible. Nonetheless, in principle, she was married to the village
as a whole. If she had children, the village was considered to be their
father, and as such expected to bring them up, provide them with
resources, and eventually, get them properly married off—which is why
villages had to maintain collective treasuries full of raffia and
camwood bars in the first place. Since at any time a village was likely
to have several village wives, it would also have its own children and
grandchildren, and therefore be in a position to both demand and pay
blood-debts, and thus, to accumulate pawns.

As a result, villages became corporate bodies, collective groups that,
like modern corporations, had to be treated as if they were individuals
for purposes of law. However there was one key difference. Unlike
ordinary individuals, villages could back up their claims with force.

As Douglas emphasizes, this was crucial, because ordinary Lele men were
simply not able to do this to one another.³⁴ In everyday affairs, there
was an almost complete lack of any systematic means of coercion. This
was the main reason, she notes, that pawnship was so innocuous. There
were all sorts of rules, but with no government, no courts, no judges to
make authoritative decisions, no group of armed men willing or able to
employ the threat of force to back those decisions up, rules were there
to be adjusted and interpreted. In the end, everyone’s feelings had to
be taken into account. In everyday affairs, Lele put great stock on
gentle and agreeable behavior. Men might have been regularly seized with
the urge to throw themselves at each other in fits of jealous rage
(often they had good reason to), but they very rarely did. And if a
fight did break out, everyone would immediately jump in to break it up
and submit the affair to public mediation.³⁵

Villages, in contrast, were fortified, and age-sets could be mobilized
to act as military units. Here, and only here, did organized violence
enter the picture. True, when villages fought, it was also always over
women (everyone Douglas talked to expressed incredulity at the very idea
that grown men, anywhere, could ever come to blows over anything else).
But in the case of villages, it could come to an actual war. If another
village’s elders ignored one’s claims to a pawn, one’s young men might
organize a raiding party and kidnap her, or carry off some other likely
young women to be their collective wife. This might lead to deaths, and
to further claims for compensation. “Since it had the backing of force,”
Douglas observes drily, “the village could afford to be less
conciliatory towards the wishes of its pawns.”³⁶

It’s at exactly this point, too, where the potential for violence
enters, that the great wall constructed between the value of lives and
money can suddenly come tumbling down.

Sometimes when two clans were disputing a claim to blood compensation,
the claimant might see no hope of getting satisfaction from his
opponents. The political system offered no direct means for one man (or
clan) to use physical coercion or to resort to superior authority to
enforce claims against another. In such a case, rather than abandon his
claim to a pawn-woman, he would be ready to take the equivalent in
wealth, if he could get it. The usual procedure was to sell his case
against the defendants to the only group capable of extorting a pawn by
force, that is, to a village.

The man who meant to sell his case to a village asked them for 100
raffia cloths or five bars of camwood. The village raised the amount,
either from its treasury, or by a loan from one of its members, and
thereby adopted as its own his claim to a pawn.³⁷

Once he held the money, his claim was over, and the village, which had
now bought it, would proceed to organize a raid to seize the woman in
dispute.

In other words, it was _only_ when violence was brought into the
equation that there was any question of buying and selling people. The
ability to deploy force, to cut through the endless maze of preferences,
obligations, expectations, and responsibilities that mark real human
relationships, also made it possible to overcome what is otherwise the
first rule of all Lele economic relationships: that human lives can only
be exchanged for other human lives, and never for physical objects.
Significantly, the amount paid—a hundred cloths, or an equivalent amount
of camwood—was also the price of a slave.³⁸ Slaves were, as I mentioned,
war captives. There seem never to have been very many of them; Douglas
only managed to locate two descendants of slaves in the 1950s, some
twenty-five years after the practice had been abolished.³⁹ Still, the
numbers were not important. The mere fact of their existence set a
precedent. The value of a human life could, sometimes, be quantified;
but if one was able to move from A = A (one life equals another) to A =
B (one life = one hundred cloths), it was only because the equation was
established at the point of a spear.


Flesh-Debt (Tiv)

I have dwelt on the Lele in such detail in part because I wanted to
convey some sense of why I was using the term “human economy,” what life
is like inside one, what sort of dramas fill people’s days, and how
money typically operates in the midst of all this. Lele currencies are,
as I say, quintessential social currencies. They are used to mark every
visit, every promise, every important moment in a man’s or woman’s life.
It is surely significant, too, what the objects used as currency here
actually were. Raffia cloth was used for clothing. In Douglas’s day, it
was the main thing used to clothe the human body; camwood bars were the
source of a red paste that was used as a cosmetic—it was the main
substance used as makeup, by both men and women, to beautify themselves
each day. These, then, were the materials used to shape people’s
physical appearance, to make them appear mature, decent, attractive, and
dignified to their fellows. They were what turned a mere naked body into
a proper social being.

This is no coincidence. In fact, it’s extraordinarily common in what
I’ve been calling human economies. Money almost always arises first from
objects that are used primarily as adornment of the person. Beads,
shells, feathers, dog or whale teeth, gold, and silver are all
well-known cases in point. All are useless for any purpose other than
making people look more interesting, and hence, more beautiful. The
brass rods used by the Tiv might seem an exception, but actually they’re
not: they were used mainly as raw material for the manufacture of
jewelry, or simply twisted into hoops and worn at dances. There are
exceptions (cattle, for instance), but as a general rule, it’s only when
governments, and then markets, enter the picture that we begin to see
currencies like barley, cheese, tobacco, or salt.⁴⁰

It also illustrates the peculiar progression of ideas that so often mark
human economies. On the one hand, human life is the absolute value.
There is no possible equivalent. Whether a life is given or taken, the
debt is absolute. In places, this principle is indeed sacrosanct. More
often, it is compromised by the elaborate games played by the Tiv, who
treat the giving of lives, and the Lele, who treat the taking of lives,
as creating debts that can only be paid by delivering another human
being. In each case, too, the practice ends up engendering an
extraordinarily complex game in which important men end up exchanging
women, or at least, rights over their fertility.

But this is already a kind of opening. Once the game exists, once the
principle of substitution comes in, there was always the possibility of
extending it. When that begins to happen, systems of debt that were
premised on creating people can—even here—suddenly become the means of
destroying them.

As an example, let us once again return to the Tiv. The reader will
recall that if a man did not have a sister or a ward to give in exchange
for one’s wife, it was possible to assuage her parents and guardians by
gifts of money. However, such a wife would never be considered truly
his. Here too, there was one dramatic exception. A man could buy a
slave, a woman kidnapped in a raid from a distant country.⁴¹ Slaves,
after all, had no parents, or could be treated as if they didn’t; they
had been forcibly removed from all those networks of mutual obligation
and debt in which ordinary people acquired their outward identities.
This was why they could be bought and sold.

Once married, though, a purchased wife would quickly develop new ties.
She was no longer a slave, and her children were perfectly
legitimate—more so, in fact, than those of a wife who was merely
acquired through the continual payment of brass rods.

We have perhaps a general principle: to make something saleable, in a
human economy, one needs to first rip it from its context. That’s what
slaves are: people stolen from the community that made them what they
are. As strangers to their new communities, slaves no longer had
mothers, fathers, kin of any sort. This is why they could be bought and
sold or even killed: because the _only_ relation they had was to their
owners. A Lele village’s ability to organize raids and kidnap a woman
from an alien community seems to have been the key to its ability to
start trading women for money—even if in their case, they could do so
only to a very limited extent. After all, her relatives were not very
far away, and they would surely come around demanding an explanation. In
the end, someone would have to come up with an arrangement that everyone
could live with.⁴²

Still, I would also insist that there is something more than this. One
gets the distinct sense, in much of the literature, that many African
societies were haunted by the awareness that these elaborate networks of
debt could, if things went just slightly wrong, be transformed into
something absolutely terrible. The Tiv are a dramatic case in point.

[]

Among students of anthropology, the Tiv are mainly famous for the fact
that their economic life was divided into what their best-known
ethnographers, Paul and Laura Bohannan, referred to as three separate
“spheres of exchange.” Ordinary, everyday economic activity was mostly
the affair of women. They were the ones who filled the markets, and who
trod the paths giving and returning minor gifts of okra, nuts, or fish.
Men concerned themselves with what they considered higher things: the
kind of transactions that could be conducted using the Tiv currency,
which, as with the Lele, consisted of two denominations, a kind of
locally made cloth called _tugudu_, widely exported, and, for major
transactions, bundles of imported brass rods.⁴³ These could be used to
acquire certain flashy and luxurious things (cows, purchased foreign
wives), but they were mainly for the give and take of political affairs,
hiring curers, acquiring magic, gaining initiation into cult societies.
In political matters, Tiv were even more resolutely egalitarian than the
Lele: successful old men with their numerous wives might have lorded it
over their sons and other dependants within their own house compounds,
but beyond that, there was no formal political organization of any sort.
Finally, there was the system of wards, which consisted entirely of
men’s rights in women. Hence, the notion of “spheres.” In principle,
these three levels—ordinary consumption goods, masculine prestige goods,
and rights in women—were completely separate. No amount of okra could
get you a brass rod, just as, in principle, no number of brass rods
could give you full rights to a woman.

In practice, there were ways to game the system. Say a neighbor was
sponsoring a feast but was short on supplies; one might come to his aid,
then later, discreetly, ask for a bundle or two in repayment. To be able
to wheel and deal, to “turn chickens into cows,” as the saying went, and
ultimately, broker one’s wealth and prestige into a way of acquiring
wives, required a “strong heart”—that is, an enterprising and
charismatic personality.⁴⁴ But “strong heart” had another meaning too.
There was believed to be a certain actual biological substance called
_tsav_ that grew on the human heart. This was what gave certain people
their charm, their energy, and their powers of persuasion. _Tsav_
therefore was both a physical substance and that invisible power that
allows certain people to bend others to their will.⁴⁵

The problem was—and most Tiv of that time appear to have believed that
this was _the_ problem with their society—that it was also possible to
augment one’s _tsav_ through artificial means, and this could only be
accomplished by consuming human flesh.

Now, I should emphasize right away that there is no reason to believe
that any Tiv actually did practice cannibalism. The idea of eating human
flesh appears to have disgusted and horrified them as much as it would
most Americans. Yet for centuries, most appear to have been veritably
obsessed by the suspicion that some of their neighbors—and particularly
prominent men who became de facto political leaders—were, in fact,
secret cannibals. Men who built up their _tsav_ by such means, the
stories went, attained extraordinary powers: the ability to fly, to
become impervious to weapons, to be able to send out their souls at
night to kill their victims in such a way that their victims did not
even know that they were dead, but would wander about, confused and
feckless, to be harvested for their cannibal feasts. They became, in
short, terrifying witches.⁴⁶

The _mbatsav_, or society of witches, was always looking for new
members, and the way to accomplish this was to trick people into eating
human flesh. A witch would take a piece of the body of one of his own
close relatives, who he had murdered, and place it in the victim’s food.
If the man was foolish enough to eat it, he would contract a
“flesh-debt,” and the society of witches ensured that flesh-debts are
always paid.

Perhaps your friend, or some older man, has noticed that you have a
large number of children, or brothers and sisters, and so tricks you
into contracting the debt with him. He invites you to eat food in his
house alone with him, and when you begin the meal he sets before you two
dishes of sauce, one of which contains cooked human flesh …

If you eat from the wrong dish, but you do not have a “strong heart”—the
potential to become a witch—you will become sick and flee from the house
in terror. But if you have that hidden potential, the flesh will begin
to work in you. That evening, you will find your house surrounded by
screeching cats and owls. Strange noises will fill the air. Your new
creditor will appear before you, backed by his confederates in evil. He
will tell of how he killed his own brother so you two could dine
together, and pretend to be tortured by the thought of having lost his
own kin as you sit there, surrounded by your plump and healthy
relatives. The other witches will concur, acting as if all this is your
own fault. “You have sought for trouble, and trouble has come upon you.
Come and lie down on the ground, that we may cut your throat.”⁴⁷

There’s only one way out, and that’s to pledge a member of your own
family as substitute. This is possible, because you will find you have
terrible new powers, but they must be used as the other witches demand.
One by one, you must kill off your brothers, sisters, children; their
bodies will be stolen from their graves by the college of witches,
brought back to life just long enough to be properly fattened, tortured,
killed again, then carved and roasted for yet another feast.

The flesh debt goes on and on. The creditor keeps on coming. Unless the
debtor has men behind him who are very strong in _tsav_, he cannot free
himself from the flesh debt until he has given up all his people, and
his family is finished. Then he goes himself and lies down on the ground
to be slaughtered, and so the debt is finally discharged.⁴⁸


The Slave Trade

In one sense, it’s obvious what’s going on here. Men with “strong
hearts” have power and charisma; using it, they can manipulate debt to
turn extra food into treasures, and treasures into wives, wards, and
daughters, and thus become the heads of ever-growing families. But that
very power and charisma that allows them to do this also makes them run
the constant danger of sending the whole process jolting back into a
kind of horrific implosion, of creating flesh-debts whereby one’s family
is converted back into food.

Now, if one is simply trying to imagine the worst thing that could
possibly happen to someone, surely, being forced to dine on the
mutilated corpses of one’s own children would, anywhere, be pretty high
on the list. Still, anthropologists have come to understand, over the
years, that every society is haunted by slightly different nightmares,
and these differences are significant. Horror stories, whether about
vampires, ghouls, or flesh-eating zombies, always seem to reflect some
aspect of the tellers’ own social lives, some terrifying potential, in
the way they are accustomed to interact with each other, that they do
not wish to acknowledge or confront, but also cannot help but talk
about.⁴⁹

In the Tiv case, what would that be? Clearly, Tiv did have a major
problem with authority. They lived in a landscape dotted with compounds,
each organized around a single older man with his numerous wives,
children, and assorted hangers-on. Within each compound, that man had
near-absolute authority. Outside there was no formal political
structure, and Tiv were fiercely egalitarian. In other words: all men
aspired to become the masters of large families, but they were extremely
suspicious of any form of mastery. Hardly surprising, then, that Tiv men
were so ambivalent about the nature of power that they became convinced
that the very qualities that allow a man to rise to legitimate
prominence could, if taken just a little bit further, turn him into a
monster.⁵⁰ In fact, most Tiv seemed to assume that most male elders
_were_ witches, and that if a young person died, they were probably
being paid off for a flesh-debt.

But this still doesn’t answer the one obvious question: Why is all this
framed in terms of debt?

[]

Here a little history is in order. It would appear that the ancestors of
the Tiv arrived in the Benue river valley and adjacent lands sometime
around 1750—a time when all of what’s now Nigeria was being torn apart
by the Atlantic slave trade. Early stories relate how the Tiv, during
their migrations, used to paint their wives and children with what
looked like smallpox scars, so that potential raiders would be afraid to
carry them off.⁵¹ They established themselves in a notoriously
inaccessible stretch of country and offered up ferocious defense against
periodic raids from neighboring kingdoms to their north and west—with
which they eventually came to a political rapprochement.⁵²

The Tiv, then, were well aware of what was happening all around them.
Consider, for example, the case of the copper bars whose use they were
so careful to restrict, so as to avoid their becoming an allpurpose form
of currency.

Now, copper bars had been used for money in this part of Africa for
centuries, and at least in some places, for ordinary commercial
transactions, as well. It was easy enough to do: one simply snapped them
apart into smaller pieces, or pulled some of them into thin wires,
twisted those around to little loops, and one had perfectly serviceable
small change for everyday market transactions.⁵³ Most of the ones
current in Tivland since the late eighteenth century, on the other hand,
were mass-produced in factories in Birmingham and imported through the
port of Old Calabar at the mouth of the Cross River, by slave-traders
based in Liverpool and Bristol.⁵⁴ In all the country adjoining the Cross
River—that is, in the region directly to the south of the Tiv
territory—copper bars were used as everyday currency. This was
presumably how they entered Tivland; they were either carried in by
pedlars from the Cross River or acquired by Tiv traders on expeditions
abroad. All this, however, makes the fact that the Tiv refused to use
copper bars as such a currency doubly significant.

During the 1760s alone, perhaps a hundred thousand Africans were shipped
down the Cross River to Calabar and nearby ports, where they were put in
chains, placed on British, French, or other European ships, and shipped
across the Atlantic—part of perhaps a million and a half exported from
the Bight of Biafra during the whole period of the Atlantic slave
trade.⁵⁵ Some of them had been captured in wars or raids, or simply
kidnapped. The majority, though, were carried off because of debts.

Here, though, I must explain something about the organization of the
slave trade.

The Atlantic Slave Trade as a whole was a gigantic network of credit
arrangements. Ship-owners based in Liverpool or Bristol would acquire
goods on easy credit terms from local wholesalers, expecting to make
good by selling slaves (also on credit) to planters in the Antilles and
America, with commission agents in the city of London ultimately
financing the affair through the profits of the sugar and tobacco
trade.⁵⁶ Ship-owners would then transport their wares to African ports
like Old Calabar. Calabar itself was the quintessential mercantile
city-state, dominated by rich African merchants who dressed in European
clothes, lived in European-style houses, and in some cases even sent
their children to England to be educated.

On arrival, European traders would negotiate the value of their cargoes
in the copper bars that served as the currency of the port. In 1698, a
merchant aboard a ship called the _Dragon_ noted the following prices he
managed to establish for his wares:

  ---------------------- -----------------
       one bar iron      4 copper bars
    one bunch of beads   4 copper bars
      five rangoes⁵⁷     4 copper bars
     one basin No. 1     4 copper bars
       one tankard       3 copper bars
      one yard linen     1 copper bar
        six knives       1 copper bar
   one brass bell No. 1  3 copper bars⁵⁸
  ---------------------- -----------------

By the height of the trade fifty years later, British ships were
bringing in large quantities of cloth (both products of the newly
created Manchester mills and calicoes from India), and iron and copper
ware, along with incidental goods like beads, and also, for obvious
reasons, substantial numbers of firearms.⁵⁹ The goods were then advanced
to African merchants, again on credit, who assigned them to their own
agents to move upstream.

The obvious problem was how to secure the debt. The trade was an
extraordinarily duplicitous and brutal business, and slave raiders were
unlikely to be dependable credit risks—especially when dealing with
foreign merchants who they might never see again.⁶⁰ As a result, a
system quickly developed in which European captains would demand
security in the form of pawns.

The sort of “pawns” we are talking about here are clearly quite
different from the kind we encountered among the Lele. In many of the
kingdoms and trading towns of West Africa, the nature of pawnship
appears to have already undergone profound changes by the time Europeans
showed up on the scene around 1500—it had become, effectively, a kind of
debt peonage. Debtors would pledge family members as surety for loans;
the pawns would then become dependents in the creditors’ households,
working their fields and tending to their household chores—their persons
acting as security while their labor, effectively, substituted for
interest.⁶¹ Pawns were not slaves; they were not, like slaves, cut off
from their families; but neither were they precisely free.⁶² In Calabar
and other ports, masters of slaving ships, on advancing goods to their
African counterparts, soon developed the custom of demanding pawns as
security—for instance, two of the merchants’ own dependents for every
three slaves to be delivered, preferably including at least one member
of the merchants’ families.⁶³ This was in practice not much different
than demanding the surrender of hostages, and at times it created major
political crises when captains, tired of waiting for delayed shipments,
decided to take off with a cargo of pawns instead.

Upriver, debt pawns also played a major part in the trade. In one way,
the area was a bit unusual. In most of West Africa, the trade ran
through major kingdoms such as Dahomey or Asante to make wars and impose
draconian punishments—one very common expedient for rulers was to
manipulate the justice system, so that almost any crime came to be
punishable by enslavement, or by death with the enslavement of one’s
wife and children, or by outrageously high fines which, if one could not
pay them, would cause the defaulter and his family to be sold as slaves.
In another way, it is unusually revealing, since the lack of any larger
government structures made it easier to see what was really happening.
The pervasive climate of violence led to the systematic perversion of
all the institutions of existing human economies, which were transformed
into a gigantic apparatus of dehumanization and destruction.

In the Cross River region, the trade seems to have seen two phases. The
first was a period of absolute terror and utter chaos, in which raids
were frequent, and anyone traveling alone risked being kidnapped by
roving gangs of thugs and sold to Calabar. Before long, villages lay
abandoned; many people fled into the forest; men would have to form
armed parties to work the fields.⁶⁴ This period was relatively brief.
The second began when representatives of local merchant societies began
to establish themselves in communities up and down the region, offering
to restore order. The most famous of these was the Aro Confederacy, who
called themselves, “Children of God.”⁶⁵ Backed by heavily armed
mercenaries and the prestige of their famous Oracle at Arochukwu, they
established a new and notoriously harsh justice system.⁶⁶ Kidnappers
were hunted down and themselves sold as slaves. Safety was restored to
roads and farmsteads. At the same time, Aro collaborated with local
elders to create a code of ritual laws and penalties so comprehensive
and severe that everyone was at constant risk of falling afoul of
them.⁶⁷ Anyone who violated one would be turned over to the Aro for
transport to the coast, with their accuser receiving their price in
copper bars.⁶⁸ According to some contemporary accounts, a man who simply
disliked his wife and was in need of brass rods could always come up
with some reason to sell her, and the village elders—who received a
share of the profits—would almost invariably concur.⁶⁹ The most
ingenious trick of the merchant societies, though, was to assist in the
dissemination of a secret society, called Ekpe. Ekpe was most famous for
sponsoring magnificent masquerades and for initiating its members into
arcane mysteries, but it also acted as a secret mechanism for the
enforcement of debts.⁷⁰ In Calabar itself, for example, the Ekpe society
had access to a whole range of sanctions, starting with boycotts (all
members were forbidden to conduct trade with a defaulting debtor),
fines, seizure of property, arrest, and finally, execution—with the most
hapless victims left tied to trees, their lower jaws removed, as a
warning to others.⁷¹ It was ingenious, particularly, because such
societies always allowed anyone to buy in, rising though the nine
initiatory grades if they could pay the fee—these also exacted, of
course, in the brass rods the merchants themselves supplied. In Calabar,
the fee schedule for each grade looked like this:⁷²

[]

In other words, it was quite expensive. But membership quickly became
the chief mark of honor and distinction everywhere. Entry fees were no
doubt less exorbitant in small, distant communities, but the effect was
still the same: thousands ended up in debt to the merchants, whether for
the fees required for joining, or for the trade goods they supplied
(mostly cloth and metal put to use creating the gear and costumes for
the Ekpe performances—debts that they thus themselves became responsible
for enforcing on themselves. These debts, too, were regularly paid in
people, ostensibly yielded up as pawns.)

How did it work in practice? It appears to have varied a great deal from
place to place. In the Afikpo district, on a remote part of the upper
Cross River, for instance, we read that everyday affairs—the acquisition
of food, for example—was conducted, as among the Tiv, “without trade or
the use of money.” Brass rods, supplied by the merchant societies, were
used to buy and sell slaves, but otherwise mostly as a social currency,
“used for gifts and for payments in funerals, titles, and other
ceremonies.”⁷³ Most of those payments, titles, and ceremonies were tied
to the secret societies that the merchants had also brought to the area.
All this does sound a bit like the Tiv arrangement, but the presence of
the merchants ensured that the effects were very different:

In the old days, if anybody got into trouble or debt in the upper parts
of the Cross River, and wanted ready money, he used generally to
“pledge” one or more of his children, or some other members of his
family or household, to one of the Akunakuna traders who paid periodical
visits to his village. Or he would make a raid on some neighboring
village, seize a child, and sell him or her to the same willing
purchaser.⁷⁴

The passage only makes sense if one recognizes that debtors were also,
owing to their membership in the secret societies, collectors. The
seizing of a child is a reference to the local practice of “panyarring,”
current throughout West Africa, by which creditors despairing of
repayment would simply sweep into the debtor’s community with a group of
armed men and seize anything—people, goods, domestic animals—that could
be easily carried off, then hold it hostage as security.⁷⁵ It didn’t
matter if the people or goods had belonged to the debtor, or even the
debtor’s relatives. A neighbor’s goats or children would do just as
well, since the whole point was to bring social pressure on whoever owed
the money. As William Bosman put it, “If the Debtor be an honest man and
the Debt just, he immediately endeavours by the satisfaction of his
Creditors to free his Countrymen.”⁷⁶ It was actually a quite sensible
expedient in an environment with no central authority, where people
tended to feel an enormous sense of responsibility toward other members
of their community and very little responsibility toward anyone else. In
the case of the secret society cited above, the debtor would,
presumably, be calling in his own debts—real or imagined—to those
outside the organization, in order not to have to send off members of
his own family.⁷⁷

Such expedients were not always effective. Often debtors would be forced
to pawn more and more of their own children or dependents, until finally
there was no recourse but to pawn themselves.⁷⁸ And of course, at the
height of the slave trade, “pawning” had become little more than a
euphemism. The distinction between pawns and slaves had largely
disappeared. Debtors, like their families before them, ended up turned
over to the Aro, then to the British, and finally, shackled and chained,
crowded into tiny slaving vessels and sent off to be sold on plantations
across the sea.⁷⁹

[]

If the Tiv, then, were haunted by the vision of an insidious secret
organization that lured unsuspecting victims into debt traps, whereby
they themselves became the enforcers of debts to be paid with the bodies
of their children, and ultimately, themselves—one reason was because
this was, literally happening to people who lived a few hundred miles
away. Nor is the use of the phrase “flesh-debt” in any way
inappropriate. Slave-traders might not have been reducing their victims
to meat, but they were certainly reducing them to nothing more than
bodies. To be a slave was to be plucked from one’s family, kin, friends,
and community, stripped of one’s name, identity, and dignity; of
everything that made one a person rather than a mere human machine
capable of understanding orders. Neither were most slaves offered much
opportunity to develop enduring human relations. Most that ended up in
Caribbean or American plantations, though, were simply worked to death.

What is remarkable is that all this was done, the bodies extracted,
through the very mechanisms of the human economy, premised on the
principle that human lives are the ultimate value, to which nothing
could possibly compare. Instead, all the same institutions—fees for
initiations, means of calculating guilt and compensation, social
currencies, debt pawnship—were turned into their opposite; the machinery
was, as it were, thrown into reverse; and, as the Tiv also perceived,
the gears and mechanisms designed for the creation of human beings
collapsed on themselves and became the means for their destruction.

[]

I do not want to leave the reader with the impression that what I am
describing here is in any way peculiar to Africa. One could find the
exact same things happening wherever human economies came into contact
with commercial ones (and particularly, commercial economies with
advanced military technology and an insatiable demand for human labor).

Remarkably similar things can be observed throughout Southeast Asia,
particularly amongst hill and island people living on the fringes of
major kingdoms. As the premier historian of the region, Anthony Reid,
has pointed out, labor throughout Southeast Asia has long been organized
above all through relations of debt bondage.

Even in relatively simple societies little penetrated by money, there
were ritual needs for substantial expenditures—the payment of
bride-price for marriage and the slaughter of a buffalo at the death of
a family member. It is widely reported that such ritual needs are the
most common reason why the poor become indebted to the rich …⁸⁰

For instance, one practice, noted from Thailand to Sulawesi, is for a
group of poor brothers to turn to a rich sponsor to pay for the expenses
of one brother’s marriage. He’s then referred to as their “master.” This
is more like a patron-client relation than anything else: the brothers
might be obliged to do the occasional odd job, or appear as his
entourage on occasions when he has to make a good impression—not much
more. Still, technically, he owns their children, and “can also
repossess the wife he provided if his bondsmen fail to carry out his
obligations.”⁸¹

Elsewhere, we hear similar stories to those in Africa—of peasants
pawning themselves or members of their families, or even gambling
themselves into bondage; of principalities where penalties invariably
took the form of heavy fines. “Frequently, of course, these fines could
not be paid, and the condemned man, often accompanied by his dependants,
became the bondsman of the ruler, of the injured party, or of whoever
was able to pay his fine for him.”⁸² Reid insists that most of this was
relatively innocuous—in fact, poor men might take out loans for the
express purpose of becoming debtors to some wealthy patron, who could
provide them with food during hard times, a roof, a wife. Clearly this
was not “slavery” in the ordinary sense. That is, unless the patron
decided to ship some of his dependents off to creditors of his own in
some distant city like Majapahit or Ternate, whereupon they might find
themselves toiling in some grandee’s kitchen or pepper plantation like
any other slave.

It’s important to point this out because one of the effects of the slave
trade is that people who don’t actually live in Africa are often left
with an image of that continent as an irredeemably violent, savage
place—an image that has had disastrous effects on those who do live
there. It might be fitting, then, to consider the history of one place
that is usually represented as the polar opposite: Bali, the famous
“land of ten thousand temples”—an island often pictured in
anthropological texts and tourist brochures as if it were inhabited
exclusively by placid, dreamy artists who spend their days arranging
flowers and practicing synchronized dance routines.

In the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, Bali had not yet obtained
this reputation. At the time, it was still divided among a dozen tiny,
squabbling kingdoms in an almost perpetual state of war. In fact, its
reputation among the Dutch merchants and officials ensconced in nearby
Java was almost exactly the opposite of what it is today. Balinese were
considered a rude and violent people ruled by decadent, opium-addicted
nobles whose wealth was based almost exclusively on their willingness to
sell their subjects to foreigners as slaves. By the time the Dutch were
fully in control in Java, Bali had been turned largely into a reservoir
for the export of human beings—young Balinese women in particular being
in great demand in cities through the region as both prostitutes and
concubines.⁸³ As the island was drawn into the slave trade, almost the
entire social and political system of the island was transformed into an
apparatus for the forcible extraction of women. Even within villages,
ordinary marriages took the form of “marriage by capture”—sometimes
staged elopements, sometimes real forcible kidnappings, after which the
kidnappers would pay a woman’s family to let the matter drop.⁸⁴ If a
woman was captured by someone genuinely important, though, no
compensation would be offered. Even in the 1960s, elders recalled how
attractive young women used to be hidden away by their parents,

forbidden to bear towering offerings to temple festivals, lest they be
espied by a royal scout and hustled into the closely protected female
quarters of the palace, where the eyes of male visitors were restricted
to foot level. For there was slim chance a girl would become a
legitimate low-caste wife _(penawing)_ of the raja … More likely after
affording a few years’ licentious satisfaction, she would degenerate
into a slave-like servant.⁸⁵

Or, if she did rise to such a position that the high-caste wives began
to see her as a rival, she might be either poisoned or shipped off
overseas to end up servicing soldiers at some Chinese-run bordello in
Jogjakarta, or changing bedpans in the house of a French
plantation-owner in the Indian Ocean island of Reunion.⁸⁶ Meanwhile,
royal law codes were rewritten in all the usual ways, with the exception
that here, the force of law was directed above all and explicitly
against women. Not only were criminals and debtors to be enslaved and
deported, but any married man was granted the power to renounce his
wife, and by doing so render her, automatically, property of the local
ruler, to be disposed of as he wished. Even a woman whose husband died
before she had produced male offspring would to be handed over to the
palace to be sold abroad.⁸⁷

As Adrian Vickers explains, even Bali’s famous cockfights—so familiar to
any first-year anthropology student—were originally promoted by royal
courts as a way of recruiting human merchandise:

Kings even helped put people into debt by staging large cockfights in
their capitals. The passion and extravagance encouraged by this exciting
sport led many peasants to bet more than they could afford. As with any
gambling, the hope of great wealth and the drama of a contest fuelled
ambitions which few could afford and at the end of the day, when the
last spur had sunk into the chest of the last rooster, many peasants had
no home and family to return to. They, and their wives and children,
would be sold to Java.⁸⁸


Reflections on Violence

I began this book by asking a question: How is it that moral obligations
between people come to be thought of as debts, and as a result, end up
justifying behavior that would otherwise seem utterly immoral?

I began this chapter by beginning to propose an answer: by making a
distinction between commercial economies and what I call “human
economies”—that is, those where money acts primarily as a social
currency, to create, maintain, or sever relations between people rather
than to purchase things. As Rospabé so cogently demonstrated, it is the
peculiar quality of such social currencies that they are never quite
equivalent to people. If anything, they are a constant reminder that
human beings can never be equivalent to anything—even, ultimately, to
one another. This is the profound truth of the blood-feud. No one can
ever really forgive the man who killed his brother because every brother
is unique. Nothing could substitute—not even some other man given the
same name and status as your brother, or a concubine who will bear a son
who will be named after your brother, or a ghost-wife who will bear a
child pledged to someday avenge his death.

In a human economy, each person is unique, and of incomparable value,
because each is a unique nexus of relations with others. A woman may be
a daughter, sister, lover, rival, companion, mother, age-mate, and
mentor to many different people in different ways. Each relation is
unique, even in a society in which they are sustained through the
constant giving back and forth of generic objects such as raffia cloth
or bundles of copper wire. In one sense, those objects make one who one
is—a fact illustrated by the way the objects used as social currencies
are so often things otherwise used to clothe or decorate the human body,
that help make one who one is in the eyes of others. Still, just as our
clothes don’t really make us who we are, a relationship kept alive by
the giving and taking of raffia is always something more than that.⁸⁹
This means that the raffia, in turn, is always something less. This is
why I think Rospabé was right to emphasize the fact that in such
economies, money can never substitute for a person: money is a way of
acknowledging that very fact, that the debt cannot be paid. But even the
notion that a person can substitute for a person, that one sister can
somehow be equated with another, is by no means self-evident. In this
sense, the term “human economy” is double-edged. These are, after all,
_economies:_ that is, systems of exchange in which qualities are reduced
to quantities, allowing calculations of gain and loss—even if those
calculations are simply a matter (as in sister exchange) of 1 equals 1,
or (as in the feud) of 1 minus 1 equals 0.

How is this calculability effectuated? How does it become possible to
treat people as if they are identical? The Lele example gave us a hint:
to make a human being an object of exchange, one woman equivalent to
another for example, requires first of all ripping her from her context;
that is, tearing her away from that web of relations that makes her the
unique conflux of relations that she is, and thus, into a generic value
capable of being added and subtracted and used as a means to measure
debt. This requires a certain violence. To make her equivalent to a bar
of camwood takes even more violence, and it takes an enormous amount of
sustained and systematic violence to rip her so completely from her
context that she becomes a slave.

I should be clear here. I am not using the word “violence”
metaphorically. I am not speaking merely of conceptual violence, but of
the literal threat of broken bones and bruised flesh; of punches and
kicks; in much the same way that when the ancient Hebrews spoke of their
daughters in “bondage,” they were not being poetic, but talking about
literal ropes and chains.

Most of us don’t like to think much about violence. Those lucky enough
to live relatively comfortable, secure lives in modern cities tend
either to act as if it does not exist or, when reminded that it does, to
write off the larger world “out there” as a terrible, brutal place, with
not much that can be done to help it. Either instinct allows us not to
have to think about the degree to which even our own daily existence is
defined by violence or at least the threat of violence (as I’ve often
noted, think about what would happen if you were to insist on your right
to enter a university library without a properly validated ID), and to
overstate the importance—or at least the frequency—of things like war,
terrorism, and violent crime. The role of force in providing the
framework for human relations is simply more explicit in what we call
“traditional societies”—even if in many, actual physical assault by one
human on another occurs less often than in our own. Here’s a story from
the Bunyoro kingdom, in East Africa:

Once a man moved into a new village. He wanted to find out what his
neighbors were like, so in the middle of the night he pretended to beat
his wife very severely, to see if the neighbors would come and
remonstrate with him. But he did not really beat her; instead he beat a
goatskin, while his wife screamed and cried out that he was killing her.
Nobody came, and the very next day the man and his wife packed up and
left that village and went to find some other place to live.⁹⁰

The point is obvious. In a proper village, the neighbors should have
rushed in, held him back, demanded to know what the woman could possibly
have done to deserve such treatment. The dispute would become a
collective concern that ended in some sort of collective settlement.
This is how people ought to live. No reasonable man or woman would want
to live in a place where neighbors don’t look after one another.

In its own way it’s a revealing story, charming even, but one must still
ask: How would a community—even one the man in the story would have
considered a proper community—have reacted if they thought _she_ was
beating _him?⁹¹_ I think we all know the answer. The first case would
have led to concern; the second would have led to ridicule. In Europe in
the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, young villagers used to put on
satirical skits making fun of husbands beaten by their wives, even to
parade them about the town mounted backwards on an ass for everyone to
jeer at.⁹² No African society, as far as I know, went quite this far.
(Neither did any African society burn as many witches—Western Europe at
that time was a particularly savage place.) Yet as in most of the world,
the assumption that the one sort of brutality was at least potentially
legitimate, and that the other was not, was the framework within which
relations between the sexes took place.⁹³

What I want to emphasize is that there is a direct relation between that
fact and the possibility of trading lives for one another.
Anthropologists are fond of making diagrams to represent preferential
marriage patterns. Sometimes, these diagrams can be quite beautiful:⁹⁴

[]

_Ideal pattern of bilateral cross-cousin marriage_

Sometimes they merely have a certain elegant simplicity, as in this
diagram on an instance of Tiv sister exhange:⁹⁵

[]

Human beings, left to follow their own desires, rarely arrange
themselves in symmetrical patterns. Such symmetry tends to be bought at
a terrible human price. In the Tiv case, Akiga is actually willing to
describe it:

Under the old system an elder who had a ward could always marry a young
girl, however senile he might be, even if he were a leper with no hands
or feet; no girl would dare to refuse him. If another man were attracted
by his ward he would take his own and give her to the old man by force,
in order to make an exchange. The girl had to go with the old man,
sorrowfully carrying his goat-skin bag. If she ran back to her home her
owner caught her and beat her, then bound her and brought her back to
the elder. The old man was pleased, and grinned till he showed his
blackened molars. “Wherever you go,” he told her, “you will be brought
back here to me; so stop worrying, and settle down as my wife.” The girl
fretted, till she wished the earth might swallow her. Some women even
stabbed themselves to death when they were given to an old man against
their will; but in spite of all, the Tiv did not care.⁹⁶

The last line says everything. Citing it might seem unfair (the Tiv did,
evidently, care enough to elect Akiga to be their first parliamentary
representative, knowing he supported legislation to outlaw such
practices), but it serves nicely to bring home the real point: that
certain sorts of violence _were_ considered morally acceptable.⁹⁷ No
neighbors would rush in to intervene if a guardian was beating a runaway
ward. Or if they did, it would be to insist that he use more gentle
means to return her to her rightful husband. And it was because women
knew that this is how their neighbors, or even parents, would react that
“exchange marriage” was possible.

This is what I mean by people “ripped from their contexts.”

[]

The Lele were fortunate enough to have largely escaped the devastations
of the slave trade; the Tiv were sitting practically on the teeth of the
shark, and they had to make heroic efforts to keep the threat at bay.
Nonetheless, in both cases there were mechanisms for forcibly removing
young women from their homes, and it was precisely this that made them
exchangeable—though in each case too, a principle stipulated that a
woman could only be exchanged for another woman. The few exceptions,
when women could be exchanged for other things, emerged directly from
war and slavery—that is, when the level of violence was significantly
ratcheted up.

The slave trade, of course, represented violence on an entirely
different scale. We are speaking here of destruction of genocidal
proportions, in world-historic terms, comparable only to events like the
destruction of New World civilizations or the Holocaust. Neither do I
mean in any way to blame the victims: we need only imagine what would be
likely to happen in our own society if a group of space aliens suddenly
appeared, armed with undefeatable military technology, infinite wealth,
and no recognizable morality—and announced that they were willing to pay
a million dollars each for human workers, no questions asked. There will
always be at least a handful of people unscrupulous enough to take
advantage of such a situation—and a handful is all it takes.

Groups like the Aro Confederacy represent an all-too-familiar strategy,
deployed by fascists, mafias, and right-wing gangsters everywhere: first
unleash the criminal violence of an unlimited market, in which
everything is for sale and the price of life becomes extremely cheap;
then step in, offering to restore a certain measure of order—though one
which in its very harshness leaves all the most profitable aspects of
the earlier chaos intact. The violence is preserved within the structure
of the law. Such mafias, too, almost invariably end up enforcing a
strict code of honor in which morality becomes above all a matter of
paying one’s debts.

Were this a different book, I might reflect here on the curious
parallels between the Cross River societies and Bali, both of which saw
a magnificent outburst of artistic creativity (Cross River Ekpe masks
were a major influence on Picasso) that took the form, above all, of an
efflorescence of theatrical performance, replete with intricate music,
splendid costumes, and stylized dance—a kind of alternative political
order as imaginary spectacle—at the exact moment that ordinary life
became a game of constant peril in which any misstep might lead to being
sent away. What was the link between the two? It’s an interesting
question, but not one we can really answer here. For present purposes,
the crucial question has to be: How common was this? The African slave
trade was, as I mentioned, an unprecedented catastrophe, but commercial
economies had already been extracting slaves from human economies for
thousands of years. It is a practice as old as civilization. The
question I want to ask is: To what degree is it actually constitutive of
civilization itself?

I am not speaking strictly of slavery here, but of that process that
dislodges people from the webs of mutual commitment, shared history, and
collective responsibility that make them what they are, so as to make
them exchangeable—that is, to make it possible to make them subject to
the logic of debt. Slavery is just the logical end-point, the most
extreme form of such disentanglement. But for that reason it provides us
with a window on the process as a whole. What’s more, owing to its
historical role, slavery has shaped our basic assumptions and
institutions in ways that we are no longer aware of and whose influence
we would probably never wish to acknowledge if we were. If we have
become a debt society, it is because the legacy of war, conquest, and
slavery has never completely gone away. It’s still there, lodged in our
most intimate conceptions of honor, property, even freedom. It’s just
that we can no longer see that it’s there.

In the next chapter, I will begin to describe how this happened.



CHAPTER SEVEN  HONOR AND DEGRADATION



_OR, ON THE FOUNDATIONS OF CONTEMPORARY CIVILIZATION_


_ur₅ [HAR]: n., liver; spleen; heart, soul; bulk, main body; foundation;
loan; obligation; interest; surplus, profit; interest-bearing debt;
repayment; slave-woman_.

—early Sumerian dictionary¹

_It is just to give each what is owed_.

—Simonides

IN THE LAST CHAPTER, I offered a glimpse of how human economies, with
their social currencies—which are used to measure, assess, and maintain
relationships between people, and only perhaps incidentally to acquire
material goods—might be transformed into something else. What we
discovered was that we cannot begin to think about such questions
without taking into account the role of sheer physical violence. In the
case of the African slave trade, this was primarily violence imposed
from outside. Nonetheless, its very suddenness, its very brutality,
provides us with a sort of freeze-frame of a process that must have
occurred in a much slower, more haphazard fashion in other times and
places. This is because there is every reason to believe that slavery,
with its unique ability to rip human beings from their contexts, to turn
them into abstractions, played a key role in the rise of markets
everywhere.

What happens, then, when the same process happens more slowly? It would
seem that much of this history is permanently lost—since in both the
ancient Middle East and the ancient Mediterranean, most of the really
critical moments seem to have occurred just before the advent of written
records. Still, the broad outlines can be reconstructed. The best way to
do so, I believe, is to start from a single, odd, vexed concept: the
concept of honor, which can be treated as a kind of artifact, or even as
a hieroglyphic, a fragment preserved from history that seems to compress
into itself the answer to almost everything we’ve been trying to
understand. On the one hand, violence: men who live by violence, whether
soldiers or gangsters, are almost invariably obsessed with honor, and
assaults on honor are considered the most obvious justification for acts
of violence. On the other, debt. We speak both of debts of honor, and
honoring one’s debts; in fact, the transition from one to the other
provides the best clue to how debts emerge from obligations; even as the
notion of honor seemed to echo a defiant insistence that financial debts
are not really the most important ones; an echo, here, of arguments
that, like those in the Vedas and the Bible, go back to the very dawn of
the market itself. Even more disturbingly, since the notion of honor
makes no sense without the possibility of degradation, reconstructing
this history reveals how much our basic concepts of freedom and morality
took shape within institutions—notably, but not only, slavery—that we’d
sooner not have to think about at all.

[]

To underscore some of the paradoxes surrounding the concept and bring
home what’s really at stake here, let us consider the story of one man
who survived the Middle Passage: Olaudah Equiano, born sometime around
1745 in a rural community somewhere within the confines of the Kingdom
of Benin. Kidnapped from his home at the age of eleven, Equiano was
eventually sold to British slavers operating in the Bight of Biafra,
from whence he was conveyed first to Barbados, then to a plantation in
colonial Virginia.

Equiano’s further adventures—and there were many—are narrated in his
autobiography, _The Interesting Narrative of the Life of Olaudah
Equiano: or, Gustavus Vassa, the African_, published in 1789. After
spending much of the Seven Years’ War hauling gunpowder on a British
frigate, he was promised his freedom, denied his freedom, sold to
several owners—who regularly lied to him, promising his freedom, and
then broke their word—until he passed into the hands of a Quaker
merchant in Pennsylvania, who eventually allowed him to purchase his
freedom. Over the course of his later years he was to become a
successful merchant in his own right, a best-selling author, an Arctic
explorer, and eventually, one of the leading voices of English
Abolitionism. His eloquence and the power of his life story played
significant parts in the movement that led to the British abolition of
the slave trade in 1807.

Readers of Equiano’s book are often troubled by one aspect of the story:
that for most of his early life, he was not opposed to the institution
of slavery. At one point, while saving money to buy his freedom, he even
briefly took a job that involved purchasing slaves in Africa. Equiano
only came around to an abolitionist position after converting to
Methodism and falling in with religious activists against the trade.
Many have asked: Why did it take him so long? Surely if anyone had
reason to understand the evils of slavery, he did.

The answer seems, oddly, to lie in the man’s very integrity. One thing
that comes through strikingly in the book is that this was not only a
man of endless resourcefulness and determination, but above all, a man
of honor. Yet this created a terrible dilemma. To be made a slave is to
be stripped of any possible honor. Equiano wished above all else to
regain what had been taken from him. The problem is that honor is, by
definition, something that exists in the eyes of others. To be able to
recover it, then, a slave must necessarily adopt the rules and standards
of the society that surrounds him, and this means that, in practice at
least, he cannot absolutely reject the institutions that deprived him of
his honor in the first place.

It strikes me that this experience—of only being able to restore one’s
lost honor, to regain the ability to act with integrity by acting in
accord with the terms of a system that one knows, through deeply
traumatic personal experience, to be utterly unjust—is itself one of the
most profoundly violent aspects of slavery. It is another example,
perhaps, of the need to argue in the master’s language, but here taken
to insidious extremes.

All societies based on slavery tend to be marked by this agonizing
double consciousness: the awareness that the highest things one has to
strive for are also, ultimately, wrong; but at the same time, the
feeling that this is simply the nature of reality. This might help
explain why throughout most of history, when slaves did rebel against
their masters, they rarely rebelled against slavery itself. But the flip
side of this is that even slave-owners seemed to feel that the whole
arrangement was somehow fundamentally perverse or unnatural. First-year
Roman law students, for instance, were made to memorize the following
definition:

slavery

is an institution according to the law of nations whereby one person
falls under the property rights of another, contrary to nature.²

At the very least, there was always seen to be something disreputable
and ugly about slavery. Anyone too close to it was tainted.
Slave-traders particularly were scorned as inhuman brutes. Throughout
history, moral justifications for slavery are rarely taken particularly
seriously even by those who espouse them. For most of human history,
most people saw slavery much as we see war: a tawdry business, to be
sure, but one would have to be naïve indeed to imagine it could simply
be eliminated.


Honor Is Surplus Dignity

So what is slavery? I’ve already begun to suggest an answer in the last
chapter. Slavery is the ultimate form of being ripped from one’s
context, and thus from all the social relationships that make one a
human being. Another way to put this is that the slave is, in a very
real sense, dead.

This was the conclusion of the first scholar to carry out a broad
historical survey of the institution, an Egyptian sociologist named Ali
‘Abd al-Wahid Wafi, in Paris in 1931.³ Everywhere, he observes, from the
ancient world to then-present-day South America, one finds the same list
of possible ways whereby a free person might be reduced to slavery:

1) By the law of force

a. By surrender or capture in war

b. By being the victim of raiding or kidnapping

2) As legal punishment for crimes (including debt)

3) Through paternal authority (a father’s sale of his children)

4) Through the voluntary sale of one’s self⁴

Everywhere, too, capture in war is considered the only way that is
considered absolutely legitimate. All the others were surrounded by
moral problems. Kidnapping was obviously criminal, and parents would not
sell children except under desperate circumstances.⁵ We read of famines
in China so severe that thousands of poor men would castrate themselves,
in the hope that they might sell themselves as eunuchs at court—but this
was also seen as the sign of total social breakdown.⁶ Even the judicial
process could easily be corrupted, as the ancients were well
aware—especially when it came to enslavement for debt.

On one level, al-Wahid’s argument is just an extended apologia for the
role of slavery in Islam—widely criticized, since Islamic law never
eliminated slavery, even when the institution largely vanished in the
rest of the Medieval world. True, he argues, Mohammed did not forbid the
practice, but still, the early Caliphate was the first government we
know of that actually succeeded in eliminating all these practices
(judicial abuse, kidnappings, the sale of offspring) that had been
recognized as social problems for thousands of years, and to limit
slavery strictly to prisoners of war.

The book’s most enduring contribution, though, lay simply in asking:
What do all these circumstances have in common? Al-Wahid’s answer is
striking in its simplicity: one becomes a slave in situations where one
would otherwise have died. This is obvious in the case of war: in the
ancient world, the victor was assumed to have total power over the
vanquished, including their women and children; all of them could be
simply massacred. Similarly, he argued, criminals were condemned to
slavery only for capital crimes, and those who sold themselves, or their
children, normally faced starvation.⁷

This is not just to say, though, that a slave was seen as owing his
master his life since he would otherwise be dead.⁸ Perhaps this was true
at the moment of his or her enslavement. But after that, a slave could
not owe debts, because in almost every important sense, a slave _was_
dead. In Roman law, this was quite explicit. If a Roman soldier was
captured and lost his liberty, his family was expected to read his will
and dispose of his possessions. Should he later regain his freedom, he
would have to start over, even to the point of remarrying the woman who
was now considered his widow.⁹

In West Africa, according to one French anthropologist, the same
principles applied:

Once he had been finally removed from his own milieu through capture the
slave was considered as socially _dead_, just as if he had been
vanquished and killed in combat. Among the Mande, at one time, prisoners
of war brought home by the conquerors were offered _dege_ (millet and
milk porridge)—because it was held that a man should not die on an empty
stomach—and then presented with their arms so that they could kill
themselves. Anyone who refused was slapped on the face by his abductor
and kept as a captive: he had accepted the contempt which deprived him
of personality.¹⁰

Tiv horror stories about men who are dead but do not know it or who are
brought back from the grave to serve their murderers, and Haitian zombie
stories, all seem to play on this essential horror of slavery: the fact
that it’s a kind of living death.

In a book called _Slavery and Social Death_—surely the most profound
comparative study of the institution yet written—Orlando Patterson works
out exactly what it has meant to be so completely and absolutely ripped
from one’s context.¹¹ First of all, he emphasizes, slavery is unlike any
other form of human relation because it is not a moral relation.
Slave-owners might dress it up in all sorts of legalistic or
paternalistic language, but really this is just window-dressing and no
one really believes it; really, it is a relation based purely on
violence; a slave must obey because if he doesn’t, he can be beaten,
tortured, or killed, and everyone is perfectly well aware of this.
Second of all, being socially dead means that a slave has no binding
moral relations with anyone else: he is alienated from his ancestors,
community, family, clan, city; he cannot make contracts or meaningful
promises, except at the whim of his master; even if he acquires a
family, it can be broken up at any time. The relation of pure force that
attached him to his master was hence the only human relationship that
ultimately mattered. As a result—and this is the third essential
element—the slave’s situation was one of utter degradation. Hence the
Mande warrior’s slap: the captive, having refused his one final chance
to save his honor by killing himself, must recognize that he will now be
considered an entirely contemptible being.¹²

Yet at the same time, this ability to strip others of their dignity
becomes, for the master, the foundation of his honor. As Patterson
notes, there have been places—the Islamic world affords numerous
examples—where slaves are not even put to work for profit; instead, rich
men make a point of surrounding themselves with battalions of slave
retainers simply for reasons of status, as tokens of their magnificence
and nothing else.

It seems to me that this is precisely what gives honor its notoriously
fragile quality. Men of honor tend to combine a sense of total ease and
self-assurance, which comes with the habit of command, with a notorious
jumpiness, a heightened sensitivity to slights and insults, the feeling
that a man (and it is almost always a man) is somehow reduced,
humiliated, if any “debt of honor” is allowed to go unpaid. This is
because honor is not the same as dignity. One might even say: honor is
surplus dignity. It is that heightened consciousness of power, and its
dangers, that comes from having stripped away the power and dignity of
others; or at the very least, from the knowledge that one is capable of
doing so. At its simplest, honor is that excess dignity that must be
defended with the knife or sword (violent men, as we all know, are
almost invariably obsessed with honor). Hence the warrior’s ethos, where
almost anything that could possibly be seen as a sign of disrespect—in
inappropriate word, an inappropriate glance—is considered a challenge,
or can be treated as such. Yet even where overt violence has largely
been put out of the picture, wherever honor is at issue, it comes with a
sense that dignity _can_ be lost, and therefore must be constantly
defended.

The result is that to this day, “honor” has two contradictory meanings.
On the one hand, we can speak of honor as simple integrity. Decent
people honor their commitments. This is clearly what “honor” meant for
Equiano: to be an honorable man meant to be one who speaks the truth,
obeys the law, keeps his promises, is fair and conscientious in his
commercial dealings.¹³ His problem was that honor simultaneously meant
something else, which had everything to do with the kind of violence
required to reduce human beings to commodities to begin with.

The reader might be asking: But what does all this have to do with the
origins of money? The answer is, surprisingly: everything. Some of the
most genuinely archaic forms of money we know about appear to have been
used precisely as measures of honor and degradation: that is, the value
of money was, ultimately, the value of the power to turn others into
money. The curious puzzle of the _cumal_—the slave-girl money of
medieval Ireland—would appear to be a dramatic illustration.


Honor Price (Early Medieval Ireland)

For much of its early history, Ireland’s situation was not very
different than that in many of the African societies we looked at in the
end of the last chapter. It was a human economy perched uncomfortably on
the fringe of an expanding commercial one. What’s more, at certain
periods there was a very lively slave trade. As one historian put it,
“Ireland has no mineral wealth, and foreign luxury goods could be bought
by Irish kings mainly for two export goods, cattle and people.”¹⁴ Hardly
surprising, perhaps, that cattle and people were the two major
denominations of the currency. Still, by the time our earliest records
kick in, around 600AD, the slave trade appears to have died off, and
slavery itself was a waning institution, coming under severe disapproval
from the Church.¹⁵ Why, then, were cumal still being used as units of
account, to tally up debts that were actually paid out in cows, and in
cups and brooches and other objects made of silver, or, in the case of
minor transactions, sacks of wheat or oats? And there’s an even more
obvious question: Why _women?_ There were plenty of male slaves in early
Ireland, yet no one seems ever to have used them as money.

Most of what we know about the economy of early Medieval Ireland comes
from legal sources—a series of law codes, drawn up by a powerful class
of jurists, dating roughly from the seventh to ninth centuries ad.
These, however, are exceptionally rich. Ireland at that time was still
very much a human economy. It was also a very rural one: people lived in
scattered homesteads, not unlike the Tiv, growing wheat and tending
cattle. The closest there were to towns were a few concentrations around
monasteries. There appears to have been a near total absence of markets,
except for a few on the coast—presumably, mainly slave or cattle
markets—frequented by foreign ships.¹⁶

As a result, money was employed almost exclusively for social purposes:
gifts; fees to craftsmen, doctors, poets, judges, and entertainers;
various feudal payments (lords gave gifts of cattle to clients who then
had to regularly supply them with food). The authors of the law codes
didn’t even know how to put a price on most goods of ordinary
use—pitchers, pillows, chisels, slabs of bacon, and the like; no one
seems ever to have paid money for them.¹⁷ Food was shared in families or
delivered to feudal superiors, who laid it out in sumptuous feasts for
friends, rivals, and retainers. Anyone needing a tool or furniture or
clothing either went to a kinsman with the relevant craft skills or paid
someone to make it. The objects themselves were not for sale. Kings, in
turn, assigned tasks to different clans: this one was to provide them
with leather, this one poets, this one shields … precisely the sort of
unwieldy arrangement that markets were later developed to get around.¹⁸

Money could be loaned. There was a highly complex system of pledges and
sureties to guarantee that debtors delivered what they owed. Mainly,
though, it was used for paying fines. These fines are endlessly and
meticulously elaborated in the codes, but what really strikes the
contemporary observer is that they were carefully graded by rank. This
is true of almost all the “Barbarian Law Codes”—the size of the
penalties usually has at least as much do with the status of the victim
as it does with the nature of the injury—but only in Ireland were things
mapped out quite so systematically.

The key to the system was a notion of honor: literally “face.”¹⁹ One’s
honor was the esteem one had in the eyes of others, one’s honesty,
integrity, and character, but also one’s power, in the sense of the
ability to protect oneself, and one’s family and followers, from any
sort of degradation or insult. Those who had the highest degree of honor
were literally sacred beings: their persons and possessions were
sacrosanct. What was so unusual about Celtic systems—and the Irish one
went further with this than any other—was that honor could be precisely
quantified. Every free person had his or her “honor price”: the price
that one had to pay for an insult to the person’s dignity. These varied.
The honor price of a king, for instance, was seven cumal, or seven slave
girls—this was the standard honor price for any sacred being, the same
as a bishop or master poet. Since (as all sources hasten to point out)
slave girls were not normally paid as such, this would mean, in the case
of an insult to such a person’s dignity, one would have to pay
twenty-one milk cows or twenty-one ounces of silver.²⁰ The honor price
of a wealthy peasant was two and a half cows, of a minor lord, that,
plus half a cow additionally for each of his free dependents—and since a
lord, to remain a lord, had to have at least five of these, that brought
him up to at least five cows total.²¹

Honor price is not to be confused with wergeld—the actual price of a man
or woman’s life. If one killed a man, one paid goods to the value of
seven cumals, in recompense for killing him, to which one then added his
honor price, for having offended against his dignity (by killing him).
Interestingly, only in the case of a king are the blood price and his
honor price the same.

There were also payments for injury: if one wounds a man’s cheek, one
pays his honor price plus the price of the injury. (A blow to the face
was, for obvious reasons, particularly egregious.) The problem was how
to calculate the injury, since this varied according to both the
physical damage and status of the injured party. Here, Irish jurists
developed the ingenious expedient of measuring different wounds with
different varieties of grain: a cut on the king’s cheek was measured in
grains of wheat, on that of a substantial farmer in oats, on that of a
smallholder merely in peas. One cow was paid for each.²² Similarly, if
one stole, say, a man’s brooch or pig, one had to pay back three
brooches or three pigs—plus his honor price, for having violated the
sanctity of his homestead. Attacking a peasant under the protection of a
lord was the same as raping a man’s wife or daughter, a violation of the
honor not of the victim, but of the man who should have been able to
protect them.

Finally, one had to pay the honor price if one simply insulted someone
of any importance: say, by turning the person away at a feast, inventing
a particularly embarrassing nickname (at least, if it caught on), or
humiliating the person through the use of satire.²³ Mockery was a
refined art in Medieval Ireland, and poets were considered close to
magicians: it was said that a talented satirist could rhyme rats to
death, or at the very least, raise blisters on the faces of victims. Any
man publicly mocked would have no choice but to defend his honor; and,
in Medieval Ireland, the value of that honor was precisely defined.

I should note that while twenty-one cows might not seem like much when
we are dealing with kings, Ireland at the time had about 150 kings.²⁴
Most had only a couple of thousand subjects, though there were also
higher-ranking, provincial kings for whom the honor price was double.²⁵
What’s more, since the legal system was completely separate from the
political one, jurists, in theory, had the right the demote
anyone—including a king—who had committed a dishonorable act. If a
nobleman turned a worthy man away from his door or feast, sheltered a
fugitive, or ate steak from an obviously stolen cow, or even if he
allowed himself to be satirized and did not take the offending poet to
court, his price could be lowered to that of a commoner. But the same
was true of a king who ran away in battle, or abused his powers, or even
was caught working in the fields or otherwise engaging in tasks beneath
his dignity. A king who did something utterly outrageous—murdered one of
his own relatives, for example—might end up with no honor price at all,
which meant not that people could say anything they liked about the
king, without fear of recompense, but that he couldn’t stand as surety
or witness in court, as one’s oath and standing in law was also
determined by one’s honor price. This didn’t happen often, but it did
happen, and legal wisdom made sure to remind people of it: the list,
contained in one famous legal text, of the “seven kings who lost their
honor price,” was meant to ensure that everyone remembered that no
matter how sacred and powerful, anyone could fall.

What’s unusual about the Irish material is that it’s all spelled out so
clearly. This is partly because Irish law codes were the work of a class
of legal specialists who seem to have turned the whole thing almost into
a form of entertainment, devoting endless hours to coming up with every
possible abstract possibility. Some of the provisos are so whimsical
(“if stung by another man’s bee, one must calculate the extent of the
injury, but also, if one swatted it in the process, subtract the
replacement value of the bee”) that one has to assume they were simply
jokes. Still, as a result, the moral logic that lies behind any
elaborate code of honor is laid out here in startling honesty. What
about women? A free woman was honored at precisely 50 percent of the
price of her nearest male relative (her father, if alive; if not, her
husband). If she was dishonored, her price was payable to that relative.
Unless, that is, she was an independent landholder. In that case, her
honor price was the same as that of a man. And unless she was a woman of
easy virtue, in which case it was zero, since she had no honor to
outrage. What about marriage? A suitor paid the value of the wife’s
honor to her father and thus became its guardian. What about serfs? The
same principle applied: when a lord acquired a serf, he bought out that
man’s honor price, presenting him with its equivalent in cows. From that
moment on, if anyone insulted or injured the serf, it was seen an attack
on the lord’s honor, and it was up to the lord to collect the attendant
fees. Meanwhile the lord’s honor price was notched upward as a result of
gathering another dependent: in other words, he literally absorbs his
new vassal’s honor into his own.²⁶

All this, in turn, makes it possible to understand both something of the
nature of honor, and why slave girls were kept as units for reckoning
debts of honor even at a time when—owing no doubt to church
influence—they no longer actually changed hands. At first sight it might
seem strange that the honor of a nobleman or king should be measured in
slaves, since slaves were human beings whose honor was zero. But if
one’s honor is ultimately founded on one’s ability to extract the honor
of others, it makes perfect sense. The value of a slave is that of the
honor that has been extracted from them.

Sometimes, one comes on a single haphazard detail that gives the game
away. In this case it comes not from Ireland but from the Dimetian Code
in Wales, written somewhat later but operating on much the same
principles. At one point, after listing the honors due to the seven holy
sees of the Kingdom of Dyfed, whose bishops and abbots were the most
exalted and sacred creatures in the kingdom, the text specifies that

Whoever draws blood from an abbot of any one of those principal seats
before mentioned, let him pay seven pounds; and a female of his kindred
to be a washerwoman, as a disgrace to the kindred, and to serve as a
memorial to the payment of the honor price.²⁷

A washerwoman was the lowest of servants, and the one turned over in
this case was to serve for life. She was, in effect, reduced to slavery.
Her permanent disgrace was the restoration of the abbot’s honor. While
we cannot know if some similar institution once lay behind the habit of
reckoning the honor of Irish “sacred” beings in slave-women, the
principle is clearly the same. Honor is a zero-sum game. A man’s ability
to protect the women of his family is an essential part of that honor.
Therefore, forcing him to surrender a woman of his family to perform
menial and degrading chores in another’s household is the ultimate blow
to his honor. This, in turn, makes it the ultimate reaffirmation of the
honor of he who takes it away.

[]

What makes Medieval Irish laws seem so peculiar from our perspective is
that their exponents had not the slightest discomfort with putting an
exact monetary price on human dignity. For us, the notion that the
sanctity of a priest or the majesty of a king could be held equivalent
to a million fried eggs or a hundred thousand haircuts is simply
bizarre. These are precisely the things that ought to be considered
beyond all possibility of quantification. If Medieval Irish jurists felt
otherwise, it was because people at that time did not use money to buy
eggs or haircuts.²⁸ It was the fact that it was still a human economy,
in which money was used for social purposes, that it was possible to
create such an intricate system whereby it was possible not just to
measure but to add and subtract specific quantities of human dignity—and
in doing so, provide us with a unique window into the true nature of
honor itself.

The obvious question is: What happens to such an economy when people do
begin to use the same money used to measure dignity to buy eggs and
haircuts? As the history of ancient Mesopotamia and the Mediterranean
world reveals, the result was a profound—and enduring—moral crisis.


Mesopotamia (The Origins of Patriarchy)

In ancient Greek, the word for “honor” was _tīme_. In Homer’s time, the
term appears to have been used much like the Irish term “honor price”:
it referred both to the glory of the warrior and the compensation paid
as damages in case of injury or insult. Yet with the rise of markets
over the next several centuries, the meaning of the word _tīme_ began to
change. On the one hand, it became the word for “price”—as in, the price
of something one buys in the market. On the other, it referred to an
attitude of complete contempt for markets.

Actually, this is still the case today:

In Greece the word “timi” means honor, which has been typically seen as
the most important value in Greek village society. Honor is often
characterized in Greece as an open-handed generosity and blatant
disregard for monetary costs and counting. And yet the same word also
means “price” as in the price of a pound of tomatoes.²⁹

The word “crisis” literally refers to a crossroads: it is the point
where things could go either of two different ways. The odd thing about
the crisis in the concept of honor is that it never seems to have been
resolved. Is honor the willingness to pay one’s monetary debts? Or is it
the fact that one does not feel that monetary debts are really that
important? It appears to be both at the same time.

There’s also the question of what men of honor actually _do_ think is
important. When most of us think of a Mediterranean villager’s sense of
honor, we don’t think so much of a casual attitude toward money as of a
veritable obsession with premarital virginity. Masculine honor is caught
up not even so much in a man’s ability to protect his womenfolk as in
his ability to protect their sexual reputations, to respond to any
suggestion of impropriety on the part of his mother, wife, sister, or
daughter as if it were a direct physical attack on his own person. This
is a stereotype, but it’s not entirely unjustified. One historian who
went through fifty years of police reports about knife-fights in
nineteenth-century Ionia discovered that virtually every one of them
began when one party publicly suggested that the other’s wife or sister
was a whore.³⁰

So, why the sudden obsession with sexual propriety? It doesn’t seem to
be there in the Welsh or Irish material. There, the greatest humiliation
was to see your sister or daughter reduced to scrubbing someone else’s
laundry. What is it, then, about the rise of money and markets that
cause so many men to become so uneasy about sex?³¹

This is a difficult question, but at the very least, one can imagine how
the transition from a human economy to a commercial one might cause
certain moral dilemmas. What happens, for instance, when the same money
once used to arrange marriages and settle affairs of honor can also be
used to pay for the services of prostitutes?

As we’ll see, there is reason to believe that it is in such moral crises
that we can find the origin not only of our current conceptions of
honor, but of patriarchy itself. This is true, at least, if we define
“patriarchy” in its more specific Biblical sense: the rule of fathers,
with all the familiar images of stern bearded men in robes, keeping a
close eye over their sequestered wives and daughters, even as their
children kept a close eye over their flocks and herds, familiar from the
book of Genesis.³² Readers of the Bible had always assumed that there
was something primordial in all this; that this was simply the way
desert people, and thus the earliest inhabitants of the Near East, had
always behaved. This was why the translation of Sumerian, in the first
half of the twentieth century, came as something of a shock.

In the very earliest Sumerian texts, particularly those from roughly
3000 to 2500 bc, women are everywhere. Early histories not only record
the names of numerous female rulers, but make clear that women were well
represented among the ranks of doctors, merchants, scribes, and public
officials, and generally free to take part in all aspects of public
life. One cannot speak of full gender equality: men still outnumbered
women in all these areas. Still, one gets the sense of a society not so
different than that which prevails in much of the developed world today.
Over the course of the next thousand years or so, all this changes. The
place of women in civic life erodes; gradually, the more familiar
patriarchal pattern takes shape, with its emphasis on chastity and
premarital virginity, a weakening and eventually wholesale disappearance
of women’s role in government and the liberal professions, and the loss
of women’s independent legal status, which renders them wards of their
husbands. By the end of the Bronze Age, around 1200 bc, we begin to see
large numbers of women sequestered away in harems and (in some places,
at least), subjected to obligatory veiling.

In fact, this appears to reflect a much broader worldwide pattern. It
has always been something of a scandal for those who like to see the
advance of science and technology, the accumulation of learning,
economic growth—“human progress,” as we like to call it—as necessarily
leading to greater human freedom, that for women, the exact opposite
often seems to be the case. Or at least, has been the case until very
recent times. A similar gradual restriction on women’s freedoms can be
observed in India and China. The question is, obviously, Why? The
standard explanation in the Sumerian case has been the gradual
infiltration of pastoralists from the surrounding deserts who,
presumably, always had more patriarchal mores. There was, after all,
only a narrow strip of land along the Tigris and Euphrates rivers that
could support intensive irrigation works, and hence, urban life.
Civilization was thus from early times surrounded by a fringe of desert
people, who lived much like those described in Genesis and spoke the
same Semitic languages. It is undeniably true that, over the course of
time, the Sumerian language was gradually replaced—first by Akkadian,
then by Amorite, then by Aramaic languages, and finally, most recently
of all, by Arabic, which was also brought to Mesopotamia and the Levant
by desert pastoralists. While all this did, clearly, bring with it
profound cultural changes as well, it’s not a particularly satisfying
explanation.³³ Former nomads appear to have been willing to adapt to
urban life in any number of other ways. Why not that one? And it’s very
much a local explanation and does nothing, really, to explain the
broader pattern. Feminist scholarship has instead tended to emphasize
the growing scale and social importance of war, and the increasing
centralization of the state that accompanied it.³⁴ This is more
convincing. Certainly, the more militaristic the state, the harsher its
laws tended to be toward women. But I would add another, complementary
argument. As I have emphasized, historically, war, states, and markets
all tend to feed off one another. Conquest leads to taxes. Taxes tend to
be ways to create markets, which are convenient for soldiers and
administrators. In the specific case of Mesopotamia, all of this took on
a complicated relation to an explosion of debt that threatened to turn
all human relations—and by extension, women’s bodies—into potential
commodities. At the same time, it created a horrified reaction on the
part of the (male) winners of the economic game, who over time felt
forced to go to greater and greater lengths to make clear that _their_
women could in no sense be bought or sold.

A glance at the existing material on Mesopotamian marriage gives us a
clue as to how this might have happened.

It is common anthropological wisdom that bridewealth tends to be typical
of situations where population is relatively thin, land not a
particularly scarce resource, and therefore, politics are all about
controlling labor. Where population is dense and land at a premium, one
tends to instead find dowry: adding a woman to the household is adding
another mouth to feed, and rather than being paid off, a bride’s father
is expected to contribute something (land, wealth, money …) to help
support his daughter in her new home.³⁵ In Sumerian times, for instance,
the main payment at marriage was a huge gift of food paid by the groom’s
father to the bride’s, destined to provide a sumptuous feast for the
wedding.³⁶ Before long, however, this seems to have split into two
payments, one for the wedding, another to the woman’s father,
calculated—and often paid—in silver.³⁷ Wealthy women sometimes appear to
have ended up with the money: at least, many appear to have to worn
silver arm and leg rings of identical denominations.

However as time went on, this payment, called the _terhatum_, often
began to take on the qualities of a simple purchase. It was referred to
as “the price of a virgin”—not a mere metaphor, since the illegal
deflowering of a virgin was considered a property crime against her
father.³⁸ Marriage was referred to as “taking possession” of a woman,
the same word one would use for the seizure of goods.³⁹ In principle, a
wife, once possessed, owed her husbands strict obedience, and often
could not seek a divorce even in cases of physical abuse.

For women with wealthy or powerful parents, all this remained largely a
matter of principle, modified considerably in practice. Merchants’
daughters, for example, typically received substantial cash dowries,
with which they could go into business in their own right, or act as
partners to their husbands. However, for the poor—that is, most
people—marriage came more and more to resemble a simple cash
transaction.

Some of this must have been an effect of slavery: while actual slaves
were rarely numerous, the very existence of a class of people with no
kin, who were simply commodities, did make a difference. In Nuzi, for
instance, “the brideprice was paid in domestic animals and silver
amounting to a total value of 40 shekels of silver”‘—to which the author
drily adds, “there is some evidence that it was equal to the price of a
slave girl.”⁴⁰ This must have been making things uncomfortably obvious.
It’s in Nuzi, too, where we happen to have unusually detailed records,
that we find examples of rich men paying cut-rate “brideprice” to
impoverished families to acquire a daughter who they would then adopt,
but who would in fact be either kept as a concubine or nursemaid, or
married to one of their slaves.⁴¹

Still, the really critical factor here was debt. As I pointed out in the
last chapter, anthropologists have long emphasized that paying
bridewealth is not the same as buying a wife. After all—and this was one
of the clinching arguments, remember, in the original 1930s League of
Nations debate—if a man were really buying a woman, wouldn’t he also be
able to sell her? Clearly African and Melanesian husbands were not able
to sell their wives to some third party. At most, they could send them
home and demand back their bridewealth.⁴²

A Mesopotamian husband couldn’t sell his wife either. Or, normally he
couldn’t. Still, everything changed the moment he took out a loan. Since
if he did, it was perfectly legal—as we’ve seen—to use his wife and
children as surety, and if he was unable to pay, they could then be
taken away as debt pawns in exactly the same way that he could lose his
slaves, sheep, and goats. What this also meant was that honor and credit
became, effectively, the same thing: at least for a poor man, one’s
creditworthiness was precisely one’s command over one’s household, and
(the flip side, as it were) relations of domestic authority, relations
that in principle meant ones of care and protection, became property
rights that could indeed be bought and sold.

Again, for the poor, this meant that family members became commodities
that could be rented or sold. Not only could one dispose of daughters as
“brides” to work in rich men’s households, tablets in Nuzi show that one
could now hire out family members simply by taking out a loan: there are
recorded cases of men sending their sons or even wives as “pawns” for
loans that were clearly just advance payment for employment in the
lender’s farm or cloth workshop.⁴³

The most dramatic and enduring crisis centered on prostitution. It’s
actually not entirely clear, from the earliest sources, whether one can
speak here of “prostitution” at all. Sumerian temples do often appear to
have hosted a variety of sexual activities. Some priestesses, for
instance, were considered to be married to or otherwise dedicated to
gods. What this meant in practice seems to have varied considerably.
Much as in the case of the later _devadasis_, or “temple dancers” of
Hindu India, some remained celibate; others were permitted to marry but
were not to bear children; others were apparently expected to find
wealthy patrons, becoming in effect courtesans to the elite. Still
others lived in the temples and had the responsibility to make
themselves sexually available to worshippers on certain ritual
occasions.⁴⁴ One thing the early texts do make clear is that all such
women were considered extraordinarily important. In a very real sense,
they were the ultimate embodiments of civilization. After all, the
entire machinery of the Sumerian economy ostensibly existed to support
the temples, which were considered the households of the gods. As such,
they represented the ultimate possible refinement in everything from
music and dance to art, cuisine, and graciousness of living. Temple
priestesses and spouses of the gods were the highest human incarnations
of this perfect life.

It’s also important to emphasize that Sumerian men do not appear, at
least in this earliest period, to have seen anything troubling about the
idea of their sisters having sex for money. To the contrary, insofar as
prostitution did occur (and remember, it could not have been nearly so
impersonal, cold-cash a relation in a credit economy), Sumerian
religious texts identify it as among the fundamental features of human
civilization, a gift given by the gods at the dawn of time. Procreative
sex was considered natural (after all, animals did it). Non-procreative
sex, sex for pleasure, was divine.⁴⁵

The most famous expression of this identification of prostitute and
civilization can be found in the story of Enkidu in the epic of
Gilgamesh. In the beginning of the story, Enkidu is a monster—a naked
and ferocious “wild man” who grazes with the gazelles, drinks at the
watering place with wild cattle, and terrorizes the people of the city.
Unable to defeat him, the citizens finally send out a courtesan who is
also a priestess of the goddess Ishtar. She strips before him, and they
make love for six days and seven nights. Afterward, Enkidu’s former
animal companions run away from him. After she explains that he has now
learned wisdom and become like a God (she is, after all, a divine
consort), he agrees to put on clothing and come to live in the city like
a proper, civilized human being.⁴⁶

Already, in the earliest version of the Enkidu story, though, one can
detect a certain ambivalence. Much later, Enkidu is sentenced to death
by the gods, and his immediate reaction is to condemn the courtesan for
having brought him from the wilds in the first place: he curses her to
become a common streetwalker or tavern keeper, living among vomiting
drunks, abused and beaten by her clients. Then, later, he regrets his
behavior and blesses her instead. But that trace of ambivalence was
there from the beginning, and over time, it grew more powerful. From
early times, Sumerian and Babylonian temple complexes were surrounded by
far less glamorous providers of sexual services—indeed, by the time we
know much about them, they were the center of veritable red-light
districts full of taverns with dancing girls, men in drag (some of them
slaves, some runaways), and an almost infinite variety of prostitutes.
There is an endlessly elaborate terminology whose subtleties are long
since lost to us. Most seem to have doubled as entertainers:
tavern-keepers doubled as musicians; male transvestites were not only
singers and dancers, but often performed knife-throwing acts. Many were
slaves put to work by their masters, or women working off religious vows
or debts, or debt bondswomen, or, for that matter, women escaping debt
bondage with no place else to go. Over time, many of the lower-ranking
temple women were either bought as slaves or debt peons as well, and
there might have often been a blurring of roles between priestesses who
performed erotic rituals and prostitutes owned by the temple (and hence,
in principle, by the god), sometimes lodged within the temple compound
itself, whose earnings added to the temple treasuries.⁴⁷ Since most
everyday transactions in Mesopotamia were not cash transactions, once
has to assume that it was the same with prostitutes—like the
tavern-keepers, many of whom seem to have been former prostitutes, they
developed ongoing credit relations with their clients—and this must have
meant that most were less like what we think of as streetwalkers and
more like courtesans.⁴⁸ Still, the origins of commercial prostitution
appear to have been caught up in a peculiar mixture of sacred (or
once-sacred) practice, commerce, slavery, and debt.

[]

“Patriarchy” originated, first and foremost, in a rejection of the great
urban civilizations in the name of a kind of purity, a reassertion of
paternal control against great cities like Uruk, Lagash, and Babylon,
seen as places of bureaucrats, traders, and whores. The pastoral
fringes, the deserts and steppes away from the river valleys, were the
places to which displaced, indebted farmers fled. Resistance, in the
ancient Middle East, was always less a politics of rebellion than a
politics of exodus, of melting away with one’s flocks and families—often
before both were taken away.⁴⁹ There were always tribal peoples living
on the fringes. During good times, they began to take to the cities; in
hard times, their numbers swelled with refugees—farmers who effectively
became Enkidu once again. Then, periodically, they would create their
own alliances and sweep back into the cities once again as conquerors.
It’s difficult to say precisely how they imagined their situation,
because it’s only in the Old Testament, written on the other side of the
Fertile Crescent, that one has any record of the pastoral rebels’ points
of view. But nothing there mitigates against the suggestion that the
extraordinary emphasis we find there on the absolute authority of
fathers, and the jealous protection of their fickle womenfolk, were made
possible by, but at the same time a protest against, this very
commoditization of people in the cities that they fled.

The world’s Holy Books—the Old and New Testaments, the Koran, religious
literature from the Middle Ages to this day—echo this voice of
rebellion, combining contempt for the corrupt urban life, suspicion of
the merchant, and often, intense misogyny. One need only think of the
image of Babylon itself, which has become permanently lodged in the
collective imagination as not only the cradle of civilization, but also
the Place of Whores. Herodotus echoed popular Greek fantasies when he
claimed that every Babylonian maiden was obliged to prostitute herself
at the temple, so as to raise the money for her dowry.⁵⁰ In the New
Testament, Saint Peter often referred to Rome as “Babylon,” and the Book
of Revelation provides perhaps the most vivid image of what he meant by
this when it speaks of Babylon, “the great whore,” sitting “upon a
scarlet colored beast, full of names of blasphemy”:

17:4 And the woman was arrayed in purple and scarlet color, and decked
with gold and precious stones and pearls, having a golden cup in her
hand full of abominations and filthiness of her fornication:

17:5 And upon her forehead was a name written, mystery, babylon the
great, the mother of harlots and abominations of the earth.⁵¹

Such is the voice of patriarchal hatred of the city, and of the angry
millennial voices of the fathers of the ancient poor.

Patriarchy as we know it seems to have taken shape in a see-sawing
battle between the newfound elites and newly dispossessed. Much of my
own analysis here is inspired by the brilliant work of feminist
historian Gerda Lerner, who, in an essay on the origins of prostitution,
observed:

Another source for commercial prostitution was the pauperization of
farmers and their increasing dependence on loans in order to survive
periods of famine, which led to debt slavery. Children of both sexes
were given up for debt pledges or sold for “adoption.” Out of such
practices, the prostitution of female family members for the benefit of
the head of the family could readily develop. Women might end up as
prostitutes because their parents had to sell them into slavery or
because their impoverished husbands might so use them. Or they might
become self-employed as a last alternative to enslavement. With luck,
they might in this profession be upwardly mobile through becoming
concubines.

By the middle of the second millennium B.C., prostitution was well
established as a likely occupation for the daughters of the poor. As the
sexual regulation of women of the propertied class became more firmly
entrenched, the virginity of respectable daughters became a financial
asset for the family. Thus, commercial prostitution came to be seen as a
social necessity for meeting the sexual needs of men. What remained
problematic was how to distinguish clearly and permanently between
respectable and non-respectable women.

This last point is crucial. The most dramatic known attempt to solve the
problem, Lerner observes, can be found in a Middle Assyrian law code
dating from somewhere between 1400 and 1100 bc, which is also the first
known reference to veiling in the history of the Middle East—and also,
Lerner emphasizes, first to make the policing of social boundaries the
responsibility of the state.⁵² It is not surprising that this takes
place under the authority of perhaps the most notoriously militaristic
state in the entire ancient Middle East.

The code carefully distinguishes among five classes of women.
Respectable women (either married ladies or concubines), widows, and
daughters of free Assyrian men—“must veil themselves” when they go out
on the street. Prostitutes and slaves (and prostitutes are now
considered to include unmarried temple servants as well as simple
harlots) are not allowed to wear veils. The remarkable thing about the
laws is that the punishments specified in the code are not directed at
respectable women who do not wear veils, but against prostitutes and
slaves who do. The prostitute was to be publicly beaten fifty times with
staves and have pitch poured on her head; the slave girl was to have her
ears cut off. Free men proven to have knowingly abetted an impostor
would also be thrashed and put to a month’s forced labor.

Presumably in the case of respectable women, the law was assumed to be
self-enforcing: as what respectable woman would wish to go out on the
street in the guise of a prostitute?

When we refer to “respectable” women, then, we are referring to those
whose bodies could not, under any conditions, be bought or sold. Their
physical persons were hidden away and permanently relegated to some
man’s domestic sphere; when they appeared in public veiled, they were
effectively still ostentatiously walking around, even in public, inside
such a sphere.⁵³ Women who could be exchanged for money, on the other
hand, must be instantly recognizable as such.

The Assyrian law code is one isolated instance; veils certainly did not
become obligatory everywhere after 1300 bc. But it provides a window on
developments that were happening, however unevenly, even spasmodically,
across the region, propelled by the intersection of commerce, class,
defiant assertions of male honor, and the constant threat of the
defection of the poor. States seem to have played a complex dual role,
simultaneously fostering commoditization and intervening to ameliorate
its effects: enforcing the laws of debt and rights of fathers, and
offering periodic amnesties. But the dynamic also led, over the course
of millennia, to a systematic demotion of sexuality itself from a divine
gift and embodiment of civilized refinement to one of its more familiar
associations: with degradation, corruption, and guilt.

[]

Here I think we have the explanation for that general decline of women’s
freedoms that may be observed in all the great urban civilizations for
so much of their history. In all of them, similar things were happening,
even if in each case, the pieces came together in different ways.

The history of China, for instance, saw continual and largely
unsuccessful government campaigns to eradicate both brideprice and debt
slavery, and periodic scandals over the existence of “markets in
daughters,” including the outright sale of girls as daughters, wives,
concubines, or prostitutes (at the buyer’s discretion) continue to this
day.⁵⁴ In India, the caste system allowed what were otherwise
differences between rich and poor to be made formal and explicit.
Brahmins and other members of the upper castes jealously sequestered
their daughters, and married them off with lavish dowries, while the
lower castes practiced brideprice, allowing members of the higher
(“twice-born”) castes to scoff at them for selling their daughters. The
twice-born were likewise largely protected from falling into debt
bondage, while for much of the rural poor, debt dependency was
institutionalized, with the daughters of poor debtors, predictably,
often dispatched to brothels or to the kitchens or laundries of the
rich.⁵⁵ In either case, between the push of commoditization, which fell
disproportionally on daughters, and the pull of those trying to reassert
patriarchal rights to “protect” women from any suggestion that they
might be commoditized, women’s formal and practical freedoms appear to
have been gradually but increasingly restricted and effaced. As a
result, notions of honor changed too, becoming a kind of protest against
the implications of the market, even as at the same time (like the world
religions) they came to echo that market logic in endless subtle ways.

Nowhere, however, are our sources as rich and detailed as they are for
ancient Greece. This is partly because a commercial economy arrived
there so late, almost three thousand years later than in Sumer. As a
result, Classical Greek literature gives us a unique opportunity to
observe the transformation as it was actually taking place.


Ancient Greece (Honor and Debt)

The world of the Homeric epics is one dominated by heroic warriors who
are disdainful of trade. In many ways, it is strikingly reminiscent of
medieval Ireland. Money existed, but it was not used to buy anything;
important men lived their lives in pursuit of honor, which took material
form in followers and treasure. Treasures were given as gifts, awarded
as prizes, carried off as loot.⁵⁶ This is no doubt how _tīme_ first came
to mean both “honor” and “price”—in such a world, no one sensed any sort
of contradiction between the two.⁵⁷

All this was to change dramatically when commercial markets began to
develop two hundred years later. Greek coinage seem to have been first
used mainly to pay soldiers, as well as to pay fines and fees and
payments made to and by the government, but by about 600 bc, just about
every Greek city-state was producing its own coins as a mark of civic
independence. It did not take long, though, before coins were in common
use in everyday transactions. By the fifth century, in Greek cities, the
_agora_, the place of public debate and communal assembly, also doubled
as a marketplace.

One of the first effects of the arrival of a commercial economy was a
series of debt crises, of the sort long familiar from Mesopotamia and
Israel. “The poor,” as Aristotle succinctly put it in his _Constitution
of the Athenians_, “together with their wives and children, were
enslaved to the rich.”⁵⁸ Revolutionary factions emerged, demanding
amnesties, and most Greek cities were at least for a while taken over by
populist strongmen swept into power partly by the demand for radical
debt relief. The solution most cities ultimately found, however, was
quite different than it had been in the Near East. Rather than
institutionalize periodic amnesties, Greek cities tended to adopt
legislation limiting or abolishing debt peonage altogether, and then, to
forestall future crises, they would turn to a policy of expansion,
shipping off the children of the poor to found military colonies
overseas. Before long, the entire coast from Crimea to Marseille was
dotted with Greek cities, which served, in turn, as conduits for a
lively trade in slaves.⁵⁹ The sudden abundance of chattel slaves, in
turn, completely transformed the nature of Greek society. First and most
famously, it allowed even citizens of modest means to take part in the
political and cultural life of the city and have a genuine sense of
citizenship. But this, in turn, drove the old aristocratic classes to
develop more and more elaborate means of setting themselves off from
what they considered the tawdriness and moral corruption of the new
democratic state.

When the curtain truly goes up on Greece, in the fifth century, we find
everybody arguing about money. For the aristocrats, who wrote most of
the surviving texts, money was the embodiment of corruption. Aristocrats
disdained the market. Ideally, a man of honor should be able to raise
everything he needed on his own estates, and never have to handle cash
at all.⁶⁰ In practice, they knew this was impossible. Yet at every point
they tried to set themselves apart from the values of the ordinary
denizens of the marketplace: to contrast the beautiful gold and silver
beakers and tripods they gave one another at funerals and weddings with
the vulgar hawking of sausages or charcoal; the dignity of the athletic
contests for which they endlessly trained with commoners’ vulgar
gambling; the sophisticated and literate courtesans who attended to them
at their drinking clubs, and common prostitutes _(porne)_—slave-girls
housed in brothels near the agora, brothels often sponsored by the
democratic polis itself as a service to the sexual needs of its male
citizenry. In each case, they placed a world of gifts, generosity, and
honor above sordid commercial exchange.⁶¹

This resulted in a slightly different play of push and pull than we saw
in Mesopotamia. On the one hand, we see a culture of aristocratic
protest against what they saw as the lowly commercial sensibilities of
ordinary citizens. On the other hand, we see an almost schizophrenic
reaction on the part of the ordinary citizens themselves, who
simultaneously tried to limit or even ban aspects of aristocratic
culture and to imitate aristocratic sensibilities. Pederasty is an
excellent case in point here. On the one hand, man-boy love was seen as
the quintessential aristocratic practice—it was the way, in fact, that
young aristocrats would ordinarily become initiated into the privileges
of high society. As a result, the democratic polis saw it as politically
subversive and made sexual relations between male citizens illegal. At
the same time, almost everyone began to practice it.

The famous Greek obsession with male honor that still informs so much of
the texture of daily life in rural communities in Greece hearkens back
not so much to Homeric honor but to this aristocratic rebellion against
the values of the marketplace, which everyone, eventually, began to make
their own.⁶² The effects on women, though, were even more severe than
they had been in the Middle East. Already by the age of Socrates, while
a man’s honor was increasingly tied to disdain for commerce and
assertiveness in public life, a woman’s honor had come to be defined in
almost exclusively sexual terms: as a matter of virginity, modesty, and
chastity, to the extent that respectable women were expected to be shut
up inside the household and any woman who played a part in public life
was considered for that reason a prostitute, or tantamount to one.⁶³ The
Assyrian habit of veiling was not widely adopted in the Middle East, but
it _was_ adopted in Greece. As much as it flies in the face of our
stereotypes about the origins of “Western” freedoms, women in democratic
Athens, unlike those of Persia or Syria, were expected to wear veils
when they ventured out in public.⁶⁴

[]

Money, then, had passed from a measure of honor to a measure of
everything that honor was not. To suggest that a man’s honor could be
bought with money became a terrible insult—this despite the fact that,
since men were often taken in war or even by bandits or pirates and held
for ransom, they often did go through dramas of bondage and redemption
not unlike those experienced by so many Middle Eastern women. One
particularly striking way of hammering it home—actually, in this case,
almost literally—was by branding ransomed prisoners with the mark of
their own currency, much as if today some imaginary foreign kidnapper,
after having received the ransom money for an American victim, made a
point of burning a dollar sign onto the victim’s forehead before
returning him.⁶⁵

One question that isn’t clear from all this is, Why? Why had money, in
particular, become such a symbol of degradation? Was it all because of
slavery? One might be tempted to conclude that it was: perhaps the
newfound presence of thousands of utterly degraded human beings in
ancient Greek cities made any suggestion that a free man (let alone a
free woman) might in any sense be bought or sold particularly insulting.
But this is clearly not the case. Our discussion of the slave money of
Ireland showed that the possibility of the utter degradation of a human
being was in no sense a threat to heroic honor—in a way, it was its very
essence. Homeric Greeks do not appear to have been any different. It
seems hardly coincidental that the quarrel between Agamemnon and
Achilles that sets off the action of the _Iliad_, generally considered
to be the first great work of Western literature, is a dispute over
honor between two heroic warriors over the disposition of a slave
girl.⁶⁶ Agamemnon and Achilles were also well aware that it would only
take an unfortunate turn in battle, or perhaps a shipwreck, for either
of them to wind up as a slave. Odysseus barely escapes being enslaved on
several occasions in the _Odyssey_. Even in the third century ad, the
Roman emperor Valerian (253–260 ad), defeated at the Battle of Edessa,
was captured and spent the last years of his life as the footstool that
the Sassanian emperor Shapur I used to mount his horse. Such were the
perils of war. All this was essential to the nature of martial honor. A
warrior’s honor is his willingness to play a game on which he stakes
everything. His grandeur is directly proportional to how far he can
fall.

Was it, then, that the advent of commercial money threw traditional
social hierarchies into disarray? Greek aristocrats often spoke this
way, but the complaints seem rather disingenuous. Surely it was money
that allowed such a polished aristocracy to exist in the first place.⁶⁷
Rather, the thing that really seemed to bother them about money was
simply that they wanted it so much. Since money could be used to buy
just about anything, everybody wanted it. That is: it was desirable
_because_ it was non-discriminating. One could see how the metaphor of
the _porne_ might seem particularly appropriate. A woman “common to the
people”—as the poet Archilochos put it—is available to everyone. In
principle, we shouldn’t be attracted to such an undiscriminating
creature. In fact, of course, we are.⁶⁸ And nothing was both so
undiscriminating, and so desirable, as money. True, Greek aristocrats
would ordinarily insist that they were not attracted to common _porne_,
and that the courtesans, flute-girls, acrobats, and beautiful boys that
frequented their symposia were not really prostitutes at all (though at
times they also admitted that they really were), they also struggled
with the fact that their own high-minded pursuits, such as
chariot-racing, outfitting ships for the navy, and sponsoring tragic
dramas, required the exact same coins as the ones used to buy cheap
perfume and pies for a fisherman’s wife—the only real difference being
that their pursuits tended to require a lot more of them.⁶⁹

We might say, then, that money introduced a democratization of desire.
Insofar as everyone wanted money, everyone, high and low, was pursuing
the same promiscuous substance. But even more: increasingly, they did
not just want money. They needed it. This was a profound change. In the
Homeric world, as in most human economies, we hear almost no discussion
of those things considered necessary to human life (food, shelter,
clothing) because it is simply assumed that everybody has them. A man
with no possessions could, at the very least, become a retainer in some
rich man’s household. Even slaves had enough to eat.⁷⁰ Here too, the
prostitute was a potent symbol for what had changed, since while some of
the denizens of brothels were slaves, others were simply poor; the fact
that their basic needs could no longer be taken for granted were
precisely what made them submit to others’ desires. This extreme fear of
dependency on others’ whims lies at the basis of the Greek obsession
with the self-sufficient household.

All this lies behind the unusually assiduous efforts of the male
citizens of Greek city-states—like the later Romans—to insulate their
wives and daughters from both the dangers and the freedoms of the
marketplace. Unlike their equivalents in the Middle East, they do not
seem to have offered them as debt pawns. Neither, at least in Athens,
was it legal for the daughters of free citizens to be employed as
prostitutes.⁷¹ As a result, respectable women became invisible, largely
removed from the high dramas of economic and political life.⁷² If anyone
was enslaved for debt, it was normally the debtor. Even more
dramatically, it was ordinarily _male_ citizens who accused one another
of prostitution—with Athenian politicians regularly asserting that their
rivals, when they were young boys being plied with gifts from their male
suitors, were really trading sex for money, and hence deserved to lose
their civic freedoms.⁷³

[]

It might be helpful here, to return to the principles laid out in
chapter five. What we see above all is the erosion both of older forms
of hierarchy—the Homeric world of great men with their retainers—and, at
the same time, of older forms of mutual aid, with communistic relations
increasingly being confined to the interior of the household.

It’s the former—the erosion of hierarchy—that really seems to have been
at stake in the “debt crises” that struck so many Greek cities around
600 bc, right around the time that commercial markets were first taking
shape.⁷⁴ When Aristotle spoke of the Athenian poor as falling slave to
the rich, what he appears to have meant was that in harsh years, many
poor farmers fell into debt; as a result they ended up as sharecroppers
on their own property, dependents. Some were even sold abroad as slaves.
This led to unrest and agitation, and also to demands for clean slates,
for the freeing of those held in bondage, and for the redistribution of
agricultural land. In a few cases it led to outright revolution. In
Megara, we are told, a radical faction that seized power not only made
interest-bearing loans illegal, but did so retroactively, forcing
creditors to make restitution of all interest they had collected in the
past.⁷⁵ In other cities, populist tyrants seized power on promises to
abrogate agricultural debts.

On the face of it, all this doesn’t seem all that surprising: the moment
when commercial markets developed, Greek cities quickly developed all
the social problems that had been plaguing Middle Eastern cities for
millennia: debt crises, debt resistance, political unrest. In reality,
things are not so clear. For one thing, for the poor to be “enslaved to
the rich,” in the loose sense that Aristotle seems to be using, was
hardly a new development. Even in Homeric society, it was assumed as a
matter of course that rich men would live surrounded by dependents and
retainers, drawn from the ranks of the dependent poor. The critical
thing, though, about such relations of patronage is that they involved
responsibilities on both sides. A noble warrior and his humble client
were assumed to be fundamentally different sorts of people, but both
were also expected to take account of each other’s (fundamentally
different) needs. Transforming patronage into debt relations—treating,
say, an advance of seed corn as a _loan_, let alone an interest-bearing
loan—changed all this.⁷⁶ What’s more, it did so in two completely
contradictory respects. On the one hand, a loan implies no ongoing
responsibilities on the part of the creditor. On the other, as I have
continually emphasized, a loan does assume a certain formal, legal
equality between contractor and contractee. It assumes that they are, at
least in some ways on some level, fundamentally the same kind of person.
This is certainly about the most ruthless and violent form of equality
imaginable. But the fact it was conceived as equality before the market
made such arrangements even more difficult to endure.⁷⁷

The same tensions can be observed between neighbors, who in farming
communities tend to give, lend, and borrow things amongst
themselves—anything from sieves and sickles, to charcoal and cooking
oil, to seed corn or oxen for plowing. On the one hand, such giving and
lending were considered essential parts of the basic fabric of human
sociability in farm communities, on the other, overly demanding
neighbors were a notorious irritant—one that could only have grown worse
when all parties are aware of precisely how much it would have cost to
buy or rent the same items that were being given away. Again, one of the
best ways to get a sense of what were considered everyday dilemmas for
Mediterranean peasants is to look at jokes. Late stories from across the
Aegean in Turkey echo exactly the same concerns:

Nasruddin’s neighbor once came by ask if he could borrow his donkey for
an unexpected errand. Nasruddin obliged, but the next day the neighbor
was back again—he needed to take some grain to be milled. Before long he
was showing up almost every morning, barely feeling he needed a pretext.
Finally, Nasruddin got fed up, and one morning told him his brother had
already come by and taken the donkey.

Just as the neighbor was leaving he heard a loud braying sound from the
yard.

“Hey, I thought you said the donkey wasn’t here!”

“Look, who are you going to believe?” asked Nasruddin. “Me, or some
animal?”

With the appearance of money, it could also become unclear what was a
gift, and what a loan. On the one hand, even with gifts, it was always
considered best to return something slightly better than one had
received.⁷⁸ On the other hand, friends do not charge one another
interest, and any suggestion that they might was sure to rankle. So
what’s the difference between a generous return gift and an interest
payment? This is the basis of one of the most famous Nasruddin stories,
one that appears to have provided centuries of amusement for peasants
across the Mediterranean basin and adjoining regions. (It is also, I
might note, a play on the fact that in many Mediterranean languages,
Greek included, the word for “interest” literally means “offspring.”)

One day Nasruddin’s neighbor, a notorious miser, came by to announce he
was throwing a party for some friends. Could he borrow some of
Nasruddin’s pots? Nasruddin didn’t have many but said he was happy to
lend whatever he had. The next day the miser returned, carrying
Nasruddin’s three pots, and one tiny additional one.

“What’s that?” asked Nasrudddin.

“Oh, that’s the offspring of the pots. They reproduced during the time
they were with me.”

Nasruddin shrugged and accepted them, and the miser left happy that he
had established a principle of interest. A month later Nasruddin was
throwing a party, and he went over to borrow a dozen pieces of his
neighbor’s much more luxurious crockery. The miser complied. Then he
waited a day. And then another …

On the third day, the miser came by and asked what had happened to his
pots.

“Oh, them?” Nasruddin said sadly. “It was a terrible tragedy. They
died.”⁷⁹

In a heroic system, it is only debts of honor—the need to repay gifts,
to exact revenge, to rescue or redeem friends or kinsmen fallen
prisoner—that operate completely under a logic of tit-for-tat exchange.
Honor is the same as credit; it’s one’s ability to keep one’s promises,
but also, in the case of a wrong, to “get even.” As the last phrase
implies, it was a monetary logic, but money, or anyway money-like
relations, are confined to this. Gradually, subtly, without anyone
completely understanding the full implications of what was happening,
what had been the essence of moral relations turned into the means for
every sort of dishonest stratagem.

We know a little about it from trial speeches, many of which have
survived. Here is one from the fourth century, probably around 365 bc.
Apollodorus was a prosperous but low-born Athenian citizen (his father,
a banker, had begun life as a slave) who, like many such gentlemen, had
acquired a country estate. There he made a point of making friends with
his closest neighbor, Nicostratus, a man of aristocratic origins, though
currently of somewhat straitened means. They acted as neighbors normally
did, giving and borrowing small sums, lending each other animals or
slaves, minding each other’s property when one was away. Then one day
Nicostratus ran into a piece of terrible luck. While trying to track
down some runaway slaves, he was himself captured by pirates and held
for ransom at the slave market on the island of Aegina. His relatives
could only assemble part of the price, so he was forced to borrow the
rest from strangers in the market. These appear to have been
professionals who specialized in such loans, and their terms were
notoriously harsh: if not repaid in THIRTY days, the sum doubled; if not
repaid at all, the debtor became the slave of the man who had put up the
money for his redemption.

Tearfully, Nicostratus appealed to his neighbor. All his possessions
were already pledged now to one creditor or another; he knew Apollodorus
wouldn’t have that much cash lying around, but could his dear friend
possibly put up something of his own by way of security? Apollodorus was
moved. He would be happy to forgive all debts Nicostratus already owed
him, but the rest would be difficult. Still, he would do his best. In
the end, he arranged to himself take a loan from an acquaintance of his,
Arcesas, on the security of his town-house, at 16 percent annual
interest, so as to be able to satisfy Nicostratus’s creditors while
Nicostratus himself arranged a friendly, no-interest _eranos_ loan from
his own relatives. But before long, Apollodorus began to realize that he
had been set up. The impoverished aristocrat had decided to take
advantage of his nouveau-riche neighbor; he was actually working with
Arcesas and some of Apollodorus’s enemies to have him falsely declared a
“public debtor,” that is, someone who had defaulted on an obligation to
the public treasury. This would have first of all meant that he would
lose his right to take anyone to court (i.e., his deceivers, to recover
the money), and second, would give them a pretext to raid his house to
remove his furniture and other possessions. Presumably, Nicostratus had
never felt especially comfortable being in debt to a man he considered
his social inferior. Rather like Egil the Viking, who would rather kill
his friend Einar than have to compose an elegy thanking him for an
overly magnificent gift, Nicostratus appears to have concluded that it
was more honorable, or anyway more bearable, to try to extract the money
from his lowly friend through force and fraud than to spend the rest of
his life feeling beholden. Before long, things had indeed descended to
outright physical violence, and the whole matter ended up in court.⁸⁰

The story has everything. We see mutual aid: the communism of the
prosperous, the expectation that if the need is great enough, or the
cost manageable enough, friends and neighbors will help one another.⁸¹
And most did, in fact, have circles of people who would pool money if a
crisis did arise: whether a wedding, a famine, or a ransom. We also see
the omnipresent danger of predatory violence that reduces human beings
to commodities, and by doing so introduces the most cutthroat kinds of
calculation into economic life—not just on the part of the pirates, but
even more so, perhaps, on those moneylenders lurking by the market
offering stiff credit terms to anyone who came to ransom their relatives
but found themselves caught short, and who then could appeal to the
state to allow them to hire men with weapons to enforce the contract. We
see heroic pride, which sees too great an act of generosity as itself a
kind of belittling assault. We see the ambiguity among gifts, loans, and
commercial credit arrangements. Neither does the way things played out
in this case seem particularly unusual, except perhaps for Nicostratus’s
extraordinarily ingratitude. Prominent Athenians were always borrowing
money to pursue their political projects; less-prominent ones were
constantly worrying about their debts, or how to collect from their own
debtors.⁸² Finally, there is another, subtler element here. While
everyday market transactions, at shops or stalls in the agora, were here
as elsewhere typically conducted on credit, the mass production of
coinage permitted a degree of anonymity for transactions that, in a pure
credit regime, simply could not exist.⁸³ Pirates and kidnappers do
business in cash—yet the loan sharks at Aegina’s marketplace could not
have operated without them. It is on this same combination of illegal
cash business, usually involving violence, and extremely harsh credit
terms, also enforced through violence, that innumerable criminal
underworlds have been constructed ever since.

[]

In Athens, the result was extreme moral confusion. The language of
money, debt, and finance provided powerful—and ultimately
irresistible—ways to think about moral problems. Much as in Vedic India,
people started talking about life as a debt to the gods, of obligations
as debts, about literal debts of honor, of debt as sin and of vengeance
as debt collection.⁸⁴ Yet if debt was morality—and certainly at the very
least it was in the interest of creditors, who often had little legal
recourse to compel debtors to pay up, to insist that it was—what was one
to make of the fact that money, that very thing that seemed capable of
turning morality into an exact and quantifiable science, also seemed to
encourage the very worst sorts of behavior?

It is from such dilemmas that modern ethics and moral philosophy begin.
I think this is true quite literally. Consider Plato’s _Republic_,
another product of fourth-century Athens. The book begins when Socrates
visits an old friend, a wealthy arms manufacturer, at the port of
Piraeus. They get into a discussion of justice, which begins when the
old man proposes that money cannot be a bad thing, since it allows those
who have it to be just, and that justice consists in two things: telling
the truth, and always paying one’s debts.⁸⁵ The proposal is easily
demolished. What, Socrates asks, if someone lent you his sword, went
violently insane, and then asked for it back (presumably, so he could
kill someone)? Clearly it can never be right to arm a lunatic whatever
the circumstances.⁸⁶ The old man cheerfully shrugs the problem off and
heads off to attend to some ritual, leaving his son to carry on the
argument.

The son, Polemarchus, switches gears: clearly his father hadn’t meant
“debt” in the literal sense of returning what one has borrowed. He meant
it more in the sense of giving people what is owed to them; repaying
good with good and evil with evil; helping one’s friends and hurting
one’s enemies. Demolishing this one takes a little more work (are we
saying justice plays no part in determining who one’s friends and
enemies are? If so, wouldn’t someone who decided he had no friends, and
therefore tried to hurt everyone, be a just man? And even if you did
have some way to say for certain that one’s enemy really is an
intrinsically bad person and deserves harm, by harming him, do you not
thus make him worse? Can turning bad people into even worse people
really be an example of justice?) but it is eventually accomplished. At
this point a Sophist, Thrasymachos, enters and denounces all of the
debaters as milky-eyed idealists. In reality, he says, all talk of
“justice” is mere political pretext, designed to justify the interests
of the powerful. And so it should be, because insofar as justice exists,
it is simply that: the interest of the powerful. Rulers are like
shepherds. We like to think of them as benevolently tending their
flocks, but what do shepherds ultimately _do_ with sheep? They kill and
eat them, or sell the meat for money. Socrates responds by pointing out
that Thrasymachos is confusing the art of tending sheep with the art of
profiting from them. The art of medicine aims to improve health, whether
or not doctors get paid for practicing it. The art of shepherding aims
to ensure the well-being of sheep, whether or not the shepherd (or his
employer) is also a businessman who knows how to extract a profit from
them. Just so with the art of governance. If such an art exists, it must
have its own intrinsic aim apart from any profit one might also get from
it, and what can this be other than the establishment of social justice?
It’s only the existence of money, Socrates suggests, that allows us to
imagine that words like “power” and “interest” refer to universal
realities that can be pursued in their own right, let alone that all
pursuits are really ultimately the pursuit of power, advantage, or
self-interest.⁸⁷ The question, he said, is how to ensure that those who
hold political office will do so not for gain, but rather for honor.

I will leave off here. As we all know, Socrates eventually gets around
to offering some political proposals of his own, involving philosopher
kings; the abolition of marriage, the family, and private property;
selective human breeding boards. (Clearly, the book was meant to annoy
its readers, and for more than two thousand years, it has succeeded
brilliantly.) What I want to emphasize, though, is the degree to which
what we consider our core tradition of moral and political theory today
springs from this question: What does it mean to pay our debts? Plato
presents us first with the simple, literal businessman’s view. When this
proves inadequate, he allows it to be reframed in heroic terms. Perhaps
all debts are really debts of honor after all.⁸⁸ But heroic honor no
longer works in a world where (as Apollodorus sadly discovered)
commerce, class, and profit have so confused everything that peoples’
true motives are never clear. How do we even know who our enemies are?
Finally, Plato presents us with cynical realpolitik. Maybe nobody really
owes anything to anybody. Maybe those who pursue profit for its own sake
have it right after all. But even that does not hold up. We are left
with a certainty that existing standards are incoherent and
self-contradictory, and that _some_ sort of radical break would be
required in order to create a world that makes any logical sense. But
most of those who seriously consider a radical break along the lines
that Plato suggested have come to the conclusion that there might be far
worse things than moral incoherence. And there we have stood, ever
since, in the midst of an insoluble dilemma.

[]

It’s not surprising that these issues weighed on Plato’s mind. Not seven
years before, he had taken an ill-fated sea cruise and wound up being
captured and, supposedly like Nicostratus, offered for sale on the
auction block at Aegina. However, Plato had better luck. A Libyan
philosopher of the Epicurean school, one Annikeris, happened to be in
the market at the time. He recognized Plato and ransomed him. Plato felt
honor-bound to try to repay him, and his Athenian friends assembled
twenty minas in silver with which to do so, but Annikeris refused to
accept the money, insisting that it was his honor to be able to benefit
a fellow lover of wisdom.⁸⁹ As indeed it was: Annikeris has been
remembered, and celebrated, for his generosity ever since. Plato went on
to use the twenty minas to buy land for a school, the famous Academy.
And while he hardly showed the same ingratitude as Nicostratus, one does
rather get the impression that even Plato wasn’t especially happy about
the fact that his subsequent career was, in a sense, made possible by
his debt to a man who he probably considered an extremely minor
philosopher—and Annikeris wasn’t even Greek! At least this would help
explain why Plato, otherwise the inveterate name-dropper, never
mentioned Annikeris. We know of his existence only from later
biographers.⁹⁰


Ancient Rome (Property and Freedom)

If Plato’s work testifies to how profoundly the moral confusion
introduced by debt has shaped our traditions of thought, Roman law
reveals how much it has shaped even our most familiar institutions.

German legal theorist Rudolf von Jhering famously remarked that ancient
Rome had conquered the world three times: the first time through its
armies, the second through its religion, the third through its laws.⁹¹
He might have added: each time more thoroughly. The Empire, after all,
only spanned a tiny portion of the globe; the Roman Catholic Church has
spread farther; Roman law has come to provide the language and
conceptual underpinnings of legal and constitutional orders everywhere.
Law students from South Africa to Peru are expected to spend a good deal
of their time memorizing technical terms in Latin, and it is Roman law
that provides almost all our basic conceptions about contract,
obligation, torts, property, and jurisdiction—and, in a broader sense,
of citizenship, rights, and liberties on which political life, too, is
based.

This was possible, Jhering held, because, the Romans were the first to
turn jurisprudence into a genuine science. Perhaps—but for all that, it
remains true that Roman law has a few notoriously quirky features, some
so odd that they have confused and confounded jurists ever since Roman
law was revived in Italian universities in the High Middle Ages. The
most notorious of these is the unique way it defines property. In Roman
law, property, or _dominium_, is a relation between a person and a
thing, characterized by absolute power of that person over that thing.
This definition has caused endless conceptual problems. First of all,
it’s not clear what it would mean for a human to have a “relation” with
an inanimate object. Human beings can have relations with one another.
But what would it mean to have a “relation” with a thing? And if one
did, what would it mean to give that relation legal standing? A simple
illustration will suffice: imagine a man trapped on a desert island. He
might develop extremely personal relationships with, say, the palm trees
growing on that island. If he’s there too long, he might well end up
giving them all names and spending half his time having imaginary
conversations with them. Still, does he _own_ them? The question is
meaningless. There’s no need to worry about property rights if noone
else is there.

Clearly, then, property is not really a relation between a person and a
thing. It’s an understanding or arrangement between people concerning
things. The only reason that we sometimes fail to notice this is that in
many cases—particularly when we are talking about our rights over our
shoes, or cars, or power tools—we are talking of rights held, as English
law puts it, “against all the world”—that is, understandings between
ourselves and everyone else on the planet, that they will all refrain
from interfering with our possessions, and therefore allow us to treat
them more or less any way we like. A relation between one person and
everyone else on the planet is, understandably, difficult to conceive as
such. It’s easier to think of it as a relationship with a thing. But
even here, in practice this freedom to do as one likes turns out to be
fairly limited. To say that the fact that I own a chainsaw gives me an
“absolute power” to do anything I want with it is obviously absurd.
Almost anything I might think of doing with a chainsaw outside my own
home or land is likely to be illegal, and there are only a limited
number of things I can really do with it inside. The only thing
“absolute” about my rights to a chainsaw is my right to prevent anyone
_else_ from using it.⁹²

Nonetheless, Roman law does insist that the basic form of property is
private property, and that private property is the owner’s absolute
power to do anything he wants with his possessions. Twelfth-century
Medieval jurists came to refine this into three principles, _usus_ (use
of the thing), _fructus_ (fruits, i.e., enjoyment of the products of the
thing), and _abusus_ (abuse or destruction of the thing), but Roman
jurists weren’t even interested in specifying that much, since in a
certain way, they saw the details as lying entirely outside the domain
of law. In fact, scholars have spent a great deal of time debating
whether Roman authors actually considered private property to be a right
_(ius),⁹³_ for the very reason that rights were ultimately based on
agreements between people, and one’s power to dispose of one’s property
was not: it was just one’s natural ability to do whatever one pleased
when social impediments were absent.⁹⁴

If you think about it, this really is an odd place to start in
developing a theory of property law. It is probably fair to say that, in
any part of the world, in any period of history, whether in ancient
Japan or Machu Picchu, someone who had a piece of string was free to
twist it, knot it, pull it apart, or toss it in the fire more or less as
they had a mind to. Nowhere else did legal theorists appear to have
found this fact in any way interesting or important. Certainly no other
tradition makes it the very basis of property law—since, after all,
doing so made almost all actual law little more than a series of
exceptions.

How did this come about? And why? The most convincing explanation I’ve
seen is Orlando Patterson’s: the notion of absolute private property is
really derived from slavery. One can imagine property not as a relation
between people, but as a relation between a person and a thing, if one’s
starting point is a relation between two people, one of whom is also a
thing. (This is how slaves were defined in Roman law: they were people
who were also a _res_, a thing.)⁹⁵ The emphasis on absolute power begins
to make sense as well.⁹⁶

The word _dominium_, meaning absolute private property, was not
particularly ancient.⁹⁷ It only appears in Latin in the late Republic,
right around the time when hundreds of thousands of captive laborers
were pouring into Italy, and when Rome, as a consequence, was becoming a
genuine slave society.⁹⁸ By 50 bc, Roman writers had come to simply
assume that workers—whether the farmworkers harvesting peas in
countryside plantations, the muleteers delivering those peas to shops in
the city, or the clerks keeping count of them—were someone else’s
property. The existence of millions of creatures who were simultaneously
persons and things created endless legal problems, and much of the
creative genius of Roman law was spent in working out the endless
ramifications. One need only flip open a casebook of Roman law to get a
sense of these. This is from the second-century jurist Ulpian:

Again, Mela writes that if some persons were playing ball and one of
them, hitting the ball quite hard, knocked it against a barber’s hands,
and in this way the throat of a slave, whom the barber was shaving, was
cut by a razor pressed against it, then who is the person with whom the
culpability lay is liable under the Lex Aquilia [the law of civil
damages]? Proclus says that the culpability lies with the barber; and
indeed, if he was shaving at a place where games are normally played or
where traffic was heavy, there is reason to fault him. But it would not
be badly held that if someone entrusts himself to a barber who has a
chair in a dangerous place, he should have himself to blame.⁹⁹

In other words, the master cannot claim civil damages against the
ballplayers or barber for destroying his property if the real problem
was that he bought a stupid slave. Many of these debates might strike us
as profoundly exotic (could you be accused of theft for merely
convincing a slave to run away? If someone killed a slave who was also
your son, could you take your sentimental feelings toward him into
account in assessing damages, or would you have to stick to his market
value?)—but our contemporary tradition of jurisprudence is founded
directly on such debates.¹⁰⁰

As for _dominium_, the word is derived from _dominus_, meaning “master”
or “slave-owner,” but ultimately from _domus_, meaning “house”or
“household.” It’s of course related to the English term “domestic,”
which even now can be used either to mean “pertaining to private life,”
or to refer to a servant who cleans the house. _Domus_ overlaps somewhat
in meaning with _familia_, “family”—but, as proponents of “family
values” might be interested to know, _familia_ itself ultimately derives
from the word _famulus_, meaning “slave.” A family was originally all
those people under the domestic authority of a _paterfamilias_, and that
authority was, in early Roman law at least, conceived as absolute.¹⁰¹ A
man did not have total power over his wife, since she was still to some
degree under the protection of her own father, but his children, slaves,
and other dependents were his to do with as he wanted—at least in early
Roman law, he was perfectly free to whip, torture, or sell them. A
father could even execute his children, provided he found them to have
committed capital crimes.¹⁰² With his slaves, he didn’t even need that
excuse.

In creating a notion of _dominium_, then, and thus creating the modern
principle of absolute private property, what Roman jurists were doing
first of all was taking a principle of domestic authority, of absolute
power over people, defining some of those people (slaves) as things, and
then extending the logic that originally applied to slaves to geese,
chariots, barns, jewelry boxes, and so forth—that is, to every other
sort of thing that the law had anything to do with.

It was quite extraordinary, even in the ancient world, for a father to
have the right to execute his slaves—let alone his children. No one is
quite sure why the early Romans were so extreme in this regard. It’s
telling, though, that the earliest Roman debt law was equally unusual in
its harshness, since it allowed creditors to execute insolvent
debtors.¹⁰³ The early history of Rome, like the histories of early Greek
city-states, was one of continual political struggle between creditors
and debtors, until the Roman elite eventually figured out the principle
that most successful Mediterranean elites learned: that a free peasantry
means a more effective army, and that conquering armies can provide war
captives who can do anything debt bondsmen used to do, and therefore, a
social compromise—allowing limited popular representation, banning debt
slavery, channeling some of the fruits of empire into social-welfare
payments—was actually in their interest. Presumably, the absolute power
of fathers developed as part of this whole constellation in the same way
as we’ve seen elsewhere. Debt bondage reduced family relations to
relations of property; social reforms retained the new power of fathers
but protected them from debt. At the same time, the increasing influx of
slaves soon meant that any even moderately prosperous household was
likely to contain slaves. This meant that the logic of conquest extended
into the most intimate aspects of everyday life. Conquered people poured
one’s bath and combed one’s hair. Conquered tutors taught one’s children
about poetry. Since slaves were sexually available to owners and their
families, as well as to their friends and dinner guests, it is likely
that most Romans’ first sexual experience was with a boy or girl whose
legal status was conceived as that of a defeated enemy.¹⁰⁴

Over time, this became more and more of a legal fiction—actual slaves
were much more likely to have been paupers sold by parents, unfortunates
kidnapped by pirates or bandits, victims of wars or judicial process
among barbarians at the fringes of the empire, or children of other
slaves.¹⁰⁵ Still, the fiction was maintained.

What made Roman slavery so unusual, in historical terms, was a
conjuncture of two factors. One was its very arbitrariness. In dramatic
contrast with, say plantation slavery in the Americas, there was no
sense that certain people were naturally inferior and therefore destined
to be slaves. Instead, slavery was seen as a misfortune that could
happen to anyone.¹⁰⁶ As a result, there was no reason that a slave might
not be in every way superior to his or her master: smarter, with a finer
sense of morality, better taste, and a greater understanding of
philosophy. The master might even be willing to acknowledge this. There
was no reason not to, since it had no effect on the nature of the
relationship, which was simply one of power.

The second was the absolute nature of this power. There are many places
where slaves are conceived as war captives, and masters as conquerors
with absolute powers of life and death—but usually, this is something of
an abstract principle. Almost everywhere, governments quickly move to
limit such rights. At the very least, emperors and kings will insist
that they are the only ones with the power to order others put to
death.¹⁰⁷ But under the Roman Republic there was no emperor; insofar as
there was a sovereign body, it was the collective body of the
slave-owners themselves. Only under the early Empire do we see any
legislation limiting what owners could do to their (human) property: the
first being a law of the time of the emperor Tiberius (dated 16 ad)
stipulating that a master had to obtain a magistrate’s permission before
ordering a slave publicly torn apart by wild beasts.¹⁰⁸ However, the
absolute nature of the master’s power—the fact that in this context, he
effectively _was_ the state—also meant that there were also, at first,
no restrictions on manumission: a master could liberate his slave, or
even adopt him or her, whereby—since liberty meant nothing outside of
membership in a community—that slave automatically became a Roman
citizen. This led to some very peculiar arrangements. In the first
century ad, for example, it was not uncommon for educated Greeks to have
themselves sold into slavery to some wealthy Roman in need of a
secretary, entrust the money to a close friend or family member, and
then, after a certain interval, buy themselves back, thus obtaining
Roman citizenship. This despite the fact that, during such time as they
were slaves, if their owner decided to, say, cut one of his secretary’s
feet off, legally, he would have been perfectly free to do so.¹⁰⁹

The relation of _dominus_ and slave thus brought a relation of conquest,
of absolute political power into the household (in fact, made it the
essence of the household). It’s important to emphasize that this was not
a moral relation on either side. A well-known legal formula, attributed
to a Republican lawyer named Quintus Haterius, brings this home with
particular clarity. With the Romans as with the Athenians, for a male to
be the object of sexual penetration was considered unbefitting to a
citizen. In defending a freedman accused of continuing to provide sexual
favors to his former master, Haterius coined an aphorism that was later
to become something of a popular dirty joke: _impudicitia in ingenuo
crimen est, in servo necessitas, in liberto officium_ (“to be the object
of anal penetration is a crime in the freeborn, a necessity for a slave,
a duty for a freedman”).¹¹⁰ What is significant here is that sexual
subservience is considered the “duty” only of the freedman. It is not
considered the “duty” of a slave. This is because, again, slavery was
not a moral relation. The master could do what he liked, and there was
nothing the slave could do about it.

[]

The most insidious effect of Roman slavery, however, is that through
Roman law, it has come to play havoc with our idea of human freedom. The
meaning of the Roman word _libertas_ itself changed dramatically over
time. As everywhere in the ancient world, to be “free” meant, first and
foremost, not to be a slave. Since slavery means above all the
annihilation of social ties and the ability to form them, freedom meant
the capacity to make and maintain moral commitments to others. The
English word “free,” for instance, is derived from a German root meaning
“friend,” since to be free meant to be able to make friends, to keep
promises, to live within a community of equals. This is why freed slaves
in Rome became citizens: to be free, by definition, meant to be anchored
in a civic community, with all the rights and responsibilities that this
entailed.¹¹¹

By the second century ad, however, this had begun to change. The jurists
gradually redefined _libertas_ until it became almost indistinguishable
from the power of the master. It was the right to do absolutely
anything, with the exception, again, of all those things one could not
do. Actually, in the _Digest_, the definitions of freedom and slavery
appear back to back:

Freedom is the natural faculty to do whatever one wishes that is not
prevented by force or law. Slavery is an institution according to the
law of nations whereby one person becomes private property _(dominium)_
of another, contrary to nature.¹¹²

Medieval commentators immediately noticed the problem here.¹¹³ But
wouldn’t this mean that everyone is free? After all, even slaves are
free to do absolutely anything they’re actually permitted to do. To say
a slave is free (except insofar as he isn’t) is a bit like saying the
earth is square (except insofar as it is round), or that the sun is blue
(except insofar as it is yellow), or, again, that we have an absolute
right to do anything we wish with our chainsaw (except those things that
we can’t.)

In fact, the definition introduces all sorts of complications. If
freedom is natural, then surely slavery is unnatural, but if freedom and
slavery are just matters of degree, then, logically, would not _all_
restrictions on freedom be to some degree unnatural? Would not that
imply that society, social rules, in fact even property rights, are
unnatural as well? This is precisely what many Roman jurists did
conclude—that is, when they did venture to comment on such abstract
matters, which was only rarely. Originally, human beings lived in a
state of nature where all things were held in common; it was war that
first divided up the world, and the resultant “law of nations,” the
common usages of mankind that regulate such matters as conquest,
slavery, treaties, and borders, that was first responsible for
inequalities of property as well.¹¹⁴

This in turn meant that there was no intrinsic difference between
private property and political power—at least, insofar as that power was
based in violence. As time went on, Roman emperors also began claiming
something like _dominium_, insisting that within their dominions, they
had absolute freedom—in fact, that they were not bound by laws.¹¹⁵ At
the same time, as Roman society shifted from a republic of slave-holders
to arrangements that increasingly resembled later feudal Europe, with
magnates on their great estates surrounded by dependent peasants, debt
servants, and an endless variety of slaves—with whom they could largely
do as they pleased. The barbarian invasions that overthrew the empire
merely formalized the situation, largely eliminating chattel slavery,
but at the same time introducing the notion that the noble classes were
really descendants of the Germanic conquerors, and that the common
people were inherently subservient.

Still, even in this new Medieval world, the old Roman concept of freedom
remained. Freedom was simply power. When Medieval political theorists
spoke of “liberty,” they were normally referring to a lord’s right to do
whatever he wanted within his own domains. This was, again, usually
assumed to be not something originally established by agreement, but a
mere fact of conquest: one famous English legend holds that when, around
1290, King Edward I asked his lords to produce documents to demonstrate
by what right they held their franchises (or “liberties”), the Earl
Warenne presented the king only with his rusty sword.¹¹⁶ Like Roman
_dominium_, it was less a right than a power, and a power exercised
first and foremost over people—which is why in the Middle Ages it was
common to speak of the “liberty of the gallows,” meaning a lord’s right
to maintain his own private place of execution.

By the time Roman law began to be recovered and modernized in the
twelfth century, the term _dominium_ posed a particular problem, since
it had come, in ordinary church Latin of the time, to be used equally
for “lordship” and “private property.” Medieval jurists spent a great
deal of time and argument establishing whether there was indeed a
difference between the two. It was a particularly thorny problem
because, if property rights really were, as the _Digest_ insisted, a
form of absolute power, it was very difficult to see how anyone could
have it but a king—or even, for certain jurists, God.¹¹⁷

This is not the place to describe the resulting arguments, but I feel
it’s important to end here because in a way, it brings us full circle
and allows us to understand precisely how Liberals like Adam Smith were
able to imagine the world the way they did. This is a tradition that
assumes that liberty is essentially the right to do what one likes with
one’s own property. In fact, not only does it make property a right; it
treats rights themselves as a form of property. In a way, this is the
greatest paradox of all. We are so used to the idea of “having”
rights—that rights are something one can possess—that we rarely think
about what this might actually mean. In fact (as Medieval jurists were
well aware), one man’s right is simply another’s obligation. My right to
free speech is others’ obligation not to punish me for speaking; my
right to a trial by a jury of my peers is the responsibility of the
government to maintain a system of jury duty. The problem is just the
same as it was with property rights: when we are talking about
obligations owed by everyone in the entire world, it’s difficult to
think about it that way. It’s much easier to speak of “having” rights
and freedoms. Still, if freedom is basically our right to own things, or
to treat things as if we own them, then what would it mean to “own” a
freedom—wouldn’t it have to mean that our right to own property is
_itself_ a form of property? That does seem unnecessarily convoluted.
What possible reason would one have to want to define it this way?¹¹⁸

Historically, there is a simple—if somewhat disturbing—answer to this.
Those who have argued that we are the natural owners of our rights and
liberties have been mainly interested in asserting that we should be
free to give them away, or even to sell them.

Modern ideas of rights and liberties are derived from what, from the
time when Jean Gerson, Rector of the University of Paris, began to lay
them out around 1400, building on Roman law concepts, came to be known
as “natural rights theory.” As Richard Tuck, the premier historian of
such ideas, has long noted, it is one of the great ironies of history
that this was always a body of theory embraced not by the progressives
of that time, but by conservatives. “For a Gersonian, liberty was
property and could be exchanged in the same way and in the same terms as
any other property”—sold, swapped, loaned, or otherwise voluntarily
surrendered.¹¹⁹ It followed that there could be nothing intrinsically
wrong with, say, debt peonage, or even slavery. And this is exactly what
natural-rights theorists came to assert. In fact, over the next
centuries, these ideas came to be developed above all in Antwerp and
Lisbon, cities at the very center of the emerging slave trade. After
all, they argued, we don’t really know what’s going on in the lands
behind places like Calabar, but there is no intrinsic reason to assume
that the vast majority of the human cargo conveyed to European ships had
not sold themselves, or been disposed of by their legal guardians, or
lost their liberty in some other perfectly legitimate fashion. No doubt
some had not, but abuses will exist in any system. The important thing
was that there was nothing inherently unnatural or illegitimate about
the idea that freedom _could_ be sold.¹²⁰

Before long, similar arguments came to be employed to justify the
absolute power of the state. Thomas Hobbes was the first to really
develop this argument in the seventeenth century, but it soon became
commonplace. Government was essentially a contract, a kind of business
arrangement, whereby citizens had voluntarily given up some of their
natural liberties to the sovereign. Finally, similar ideas have become
the basis of that most basic, dominant institution of our present
economic life: wage labor, which is, effectively, the renting of our
freedom in the same way that slavery can be conceived as its sale.¹²¹

It’s not only our freedoms that we own; the same logic has come to be
applied even to our own bodies, which are treated, in such formulations,
as really no different than houses, cars, or furniture. We own
ourselves, therefore outsiders have no right to trespass on us.¹²²
Again, this might seem an innocuous, even a positive notion, but it
looks rather different when we take into consideration the Roman
tradition of property on which it is based. To say that we own ourselves
is, oddly enough, to cast ourselves as both master and slave
simultaneously. “We” are both owners (exerting absolute power over our
property), and yet somehow, at the same time, the things being owned
(being the object of absolute power). The ancient Roman household, far
from having been forgotten in the mists of history, is preserved in our
most basic conception of ourselves—and, once again, just as in property
law, the result is so strangely incoherent that it spins off into
endless paradoxes the moment one tries to figure out what it would
actually mean in practice. Just as lawyers have spent a thousand years
trying to make sense of Roman property concepts, so have philosophers
spent centuries trying to understand how it could be possible for us to
have a relation of domination over ourselves. The most popular
solution—to say that each of us has something called a “mind” and that
this is completely separate from something else, which we can call “the
body,” and that the first thing holds natural dominion over the
second—flies in the face of just about everything we now know about
cognitive science. It’s obviously untrue, but we continue to hold onto
it anyway, for the simple reason that none of our everyday assumptions
about property, law, and freedom would make any sense without it.¹²³


Conclusions

The first four chapters of this book describe a dilemma. We don’t really
know how to think about debt. Or, to be more accurate, we seem to be
trapped between imagining society in the Adam Smith mode, as a
collection of individuals whose only significant relations are with
their own possessions, happily bartering one thing for another for the
sake of mutual convenience, with debt almost entirely abolished from the
picture, and a vision in which debt is everything, the very substance of
all human relations—which of course leaves everyone with the
uncomfortable sense that human relations are somehow an intrinsically
tawdry business, that our very responsibilities to one another are
already somehow necessarily based in sin and crime. It’s not an
appealing set of alternatives.

In the last three chapters I have tried to show that there is another
way of looking at things, and then to describe how it is that we got
here. This is why I developed the concept of human economies: ones in
which what is considered really important about human beings is the fact
that they are each a unique nexus of relations with others—therefore,
that no one could ever be considered exactly equivalent to anything or
anyone else. In a human economy, money is not a way of buying or trading
human beings, but a way of expressing just how much one cannot do so.

I then went on to describe how all this can begin to break down: how
humans can become objects of exchange: first, perhaps, women given in
marriage; ultimately, slaves captured in war. What all these relations
have in common, I observed, was violence. Whether it is Tiv girls being
tied up and beaten for running away from their husbands, or husbands
being herded into slave ships to die on faraway plantations, that same
principle always applies: it is only by the threat of sticks, ropes,
spears, and guns that one can tear people out of those endlessly
complicated webs of relationship with others (sisters, friends, rivals
…) that render them unique, and thus reduce them to something that can
be traded.

All of this, it is important to emphasize, can happen in places where
markets in ordinary, everyday goods—clothing, tools, foodstuffs—do not
even exist. In fact, in most human economies, one’s most important
possessions could never be bought and sold for the same reasons that
people can’t: they are unique objects, caught up in a web of
relationships with human beings.¹²⁴

My old professor John Comaroff used to tell a story about carrying out a
survey in Natal, in South Africa. He had spent most of a week driving
from homestead to homestead in a jeep with a box full of questionnaires
and a Zulu-speaking interpreter, driving past apparently endless herds
of cattle. After about six days, his interpreter suddenly started and
pointed into the middle of one herd. “Look!” he said. “That’s the same
cow! That one there—with the red spot on its back. We saw it three days
ago in a place ten miles from here. I wonder what happened? Did someone
get married? Or maybe there was a settlement to some dispute.”

In human economies, when this ability to rip people from their contexts
does appear, it is most often seen as an end in itself. One can already
see a hint of this among the Lele. Important men would occasionally
acquire war captives from far away as slaves, but it was almost always
to be sacrificed at their funeral.¹²⁵ The squelching of one man’s
individuality was seen as somehow swelling the reputation, the social
existence, of the other.¹²⁶ In what I’ve been calling heroic societies,
of course this kind of addition and subtraction of honor and disgrace is
lifted from a somewhat marginal practice to become the very essence of
politics. As endless epics, sagas, and eddas attest, heroes become
heroes by making others small. In Ireland and Wales, we can observe how
this very ability to degrade others, to remove unique human beings from
their hearths and families and thus render them anonymous units of
accounting—the Irish slave-girl currency, the Welsh washerwomen—is
itself the highest expression of honor.

In heroic societies, the role of violence is not hidden—it’s glorified.
Often, it can form the basis of one’s most intimate relations. In the
_Iliad_, Achilles sees nothing shameful in his relation with his
slave-girl, Briseis, whose husband and brothers he killed; he refers to
her as his “prize of honor,” but almost in the very same breath, he also
insists that, just any decent man must love and care for his household
dependents, “so I from my heart loved this one, even though I won her
with my spear.”¹²⁷

That such relations of intimacy can often develop between men of honor
and those they have stripped of their dignity, history can well attest.
After all, the annihilation of any possibility of equality also
eliminates any question of debt, of any relation other than power. It
allows a certain clarity. This is presumably why emperors and kings have
such a notorious tendency to surround themselves with slaves or eunuchs.

There is something more here, though. If one looks across the expanse of
history, one cannot help but notice a curious sense of identification
between the most exalted and the most degraded; particularly, between
emperors and kings, and slaves. Many kings surround themselves with
slaves, appoint slave ministers—there have even been, as with the
Mamluks in Egypt, actual dynasties of slaves. Kings surround themselves
with slaves for the same reason that they surround themselves with
eunuchs: because the slaves and criminals have no families or friends,
no possibility of other loyalties—or at least that, in principle, they
shouldn’t. But in a way, kings should really be like that too. As many
an African proverb emphasizes: a proper king has no relatives either, or
at least, he acts as if he does not.¹²⁸ In other words, the king and
slave are mirror images, in that unlike normal human beings who are
defined by their commitments to others, they are defined _only_ by
relations of power. They are as close to perfectly isolated, alienated
beings as one can possibly become.

At this point we can finally see what’s really at stake in our peculiar
habit of defining ourselves simultaneously as master and slave,
reduplicating the most brutal aspects of the ancient household in our
very concept of ourselves, as masters of our freedoms, or as owners of
our very selves. It is the only way that we can imagine ourselves as
completely isolated beings. There is a direct line from the new Roman
conception of liberty—not as the ability to form mutual relationships
with others, but as the kind of absolute power of “use and abuse” over
the conquered chattel who make up the bulk of a wealthy Roman man’s
household—to the strange fantasies of liberal philosophers like Hobbes,
Locke, and Smith, about the origins of human society in some collection
of thirty- or forty-year-old males who seem to have sprung from the
earth fully formed, then have to decide whether to kill each other or
begin to swap beaver pelts.¹²⁹

European and American intellectuals, it is true, have spent much of the
last two hundred years trying to flee from the more disturbing
implications of this tradition of thought. Thomas Jefferson, that owner
of many slaves, chose to begin the Declaration of Independence by
directly contradicting the moral basis of slavery, writing “we hold
these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, and
that they are endowed by their Creator with certain inalienable
Rights …”—thus undercutting simultaneously any argument that Africans
were racially inferior, and also that they or their ancestors could ever
have been justly and legally deprived of their freedom. In doing so,
however, he did not propose some radically new conception of rights and
liberties. Neither have subsequent political philosophers. For the most
part, we’ve just kept the old ones, but with the word “not” inserted
here and there. Most of our most precious rights and freedoms are a
series of exceptions to an overall moral and legal framework that
suggests we shouldn’t really have them in the first place.

Formal slavery has been eliminated, but (as anyone who works from nine
to five can testify) the idea that you can alienate your liberty, at
least temporarily, endures. In fact, it determines what most of us have
to do for most of our waking hours, except, usually, on weekends. The
violence has been largely pushed out of sight.¹³⁰ But this is largely
because we’re no longer able to imagine what a world based on social
arrangements that did not require the continual threat of tasers and
surveillance cameras would even look like.



CHAPTER EIGHT  CREDIT VERSUS BULLION



_AND THE CYCLES OF HISTORY_


_Bullion is the accessory of war, and not of peaceful trade_.

—Geoffrey W. Gardiner

ONE MIGHT WELL ASK: If our political and legal ideas really are founded
on the logic of slavery, then how did we ever eliminate slavery? Of
course, a cynic might argue that we haven’t; we’ve just relabeled it.
The cynic would have a point: an ancient Greek would certainly have seen
the distinction between a slave and an indebted wage laborer as, at
best, a legalistic nicety.¹ Still, even the elimination of formal
chattel slavery has to be considered a remarkable achievement, and it is
worthwhile to wonder how it was accomplished. Especially since it was
not just accomplished once. The truly remarkable thing, if one consults
the historical record, is that slavery has been eliminated—or
effectively eliminated—many times in human history.

In Europe, for instance, the institution largely vanished in the
centuries following the collapse of the Roman empire—an historical
achievement rarely recognized by those of us used to referring to these
events as the beginning of “the Dark Ages.”² No one is quite sure how it
happened. Most agree that the spread of Christianity must have had
something to do with it, but that can’t have been the direct cause,
since the Church itself was never explicitly opposed to the institution
and in many cases defended it. Instead, the abolition appears to have
happened _despite_ the attitudes of both the intellectuals and the
political authorities of the time. Yet it did happen, and it had lasting
effects. On the popular level, slavery remained so universally detested
that even a thousand years later, when European merchants started trying
to revive the trade, they discovered that their compatriots would not
countenance slaveholding in their own countries—one reason why planters
were eventually obliged to acquire their slaves in Africa and set up
plantations in the New World.³ It is one of the great ironies of history
that modern racism—probably the single greatest evil of our last two
centuries—had to be invented largely because Europeans continued to
refuse to listen to the arguments of the intellectuals and jurists and
did not accept that anyone they believed to be a full and equal human
being could ever be justifiably enslaved.

What’s more, the demise of ancient slavery was not limited to Europe.
Remarkably, right around the same time—in the years around 600 ad—we
find almost exactly the same thing happening in India and China, where,
over the course of centuries, amidst much unrest and confusion, chattel
slavery largely ceased to exist. What all this suggests is that moments
of historical opportunity—moments when meaningful change is
possible—follow a distinct, even a cyclical pattern, one that has long
been far more coordinated across geographical space than we would ever
have imagined. There is a shape to the past, and it is only by
understanding it that we can begin to have a sense of the historical
opportunities that exist in the present.

[]

The easiest way to make these cycles visible is to reexamine exactly the
phenomenon we’ve been concerned with over the course of this book: the
history of money, debt, and credit. The moment we begin to map the
history of money across the last five thousand years of Eurasian
history, startling patterns begin to emerge. In the case of money, one
event stands out above all others: the invention of coinage. Coinage
appears to have arisen independently in three different places, almost
simultaneously: on the Great Plain of northern China, in the Ganges
river valley of northeast India, and in the lands surrounding the Aegean
Sea, in each case, between roughly 600 and 500 bc. This wasn’t due to
some sudden technological innovation: the technologies used in making
the first coins were, in each case, entirely different.⁴ It was a social
transformation. Why this happened in exactly this way is an historical
mystery. But this much we know: for some reason, in Lydia, India, and
China, local rulers decided that whatever longstanding credit systems
had existed in their kingdoms were no longer adequate, and they began to
issue tiny pieces of precious metals—metals that had previously been
used largely in international commerce, in ingot form—and to encourage
their subjects to use them in day-to-day transactions.

From there, the innovation spread. For more than a thousand years,
states everywhere started issuing their own coinage. But then, right
around 600 ad, about the time that slavery was disappearing, the whole
trend was suddenly thrown into reverse. Cash dried up. Everywhere, there
was a movement back to credit once again.

If we look at Eurasian history over the course of the last five thousand
years, what we see is a broad alternation between periods dominated by
credit money and periods in which gold and silver come to dominate—that
is, those during which at least a large share of transactions were
conducted with pieces of valuable metal being passed from hand to hand.

Why? The single most important factor would appear to be war. Bullion
predominates, above all, in periods of generalized violence. There’s a
very simple reason for that. Gold and silver coins are distinguished
from credit arrangements by one spectacular feature: they can be stolen.
A debt is, by definition, a record, as well as a relation of trust.
Someone accepting gold or silver in exchange for merchandise, on the
other hand, need trust nothing more than the accuracy of the scales, the
quality of the metal, and the likelihood that someone else will be
willing to accept it. In a world where war and the threat of violence
are everywhere—and this appears to have been an equally accurate
description of Warring States China, Iron Age Greece, and pre-Mauryan
India—there are obvious advantages to making one’s transactions simple.
This is all the more true when dealing with soldiers. On the one hand,
soldiers tend to have access to a great deal of loot, much of which
consists of gold and silver, and will always seek a way to trade it for
the better things in life. On the other, a heavily armed itinerant
soldier is the very definition of a poor credit risk. The economists’
barter scenario might be absurd when applied to transactions between
neighbors in the same small rural community, but when dealing with a
transaction between the resident of such a community and a passing
mercenary, it suddenly begins to make a great deal of sense.

For much of human history, then, an ingot of gold of silver, stamped or
not, has served the same role as the contemporary drug dealer’s suitcase
full of unmarked bills: an object without a history, valuable because
one knows it will be accepted in exchange for other goods just about
anywhere, no questions asked. As a result, while credit systems tend to
dominate in periods of relative social peace, or across networks of
trust (whether created by states or, in most periods, transnational
institutions like merchant guilds or communities of faith), in periods
characterized by widespread war and plunder, they tend to be replaced by
precious metal. What’s more, while predatory lending goes on in every
period of human history, the resulting debt crises appear to have the
most damaging effects at times when money is most easily convertible
into cash.

As a starting point to any attempt to discern the great rhythms that
define the current historical moment, let me propose the following
breakdown of Eurasian history according to the alternation between
periods of virtual and metal money. The cycle begins with the Age of the
First Agrarian Empires (3500–800 bc), dominated by virtual credit money.
This is followed by the Axial Age (800 bc-600 ad), which will be covered
in the next chapter, and which saw the rise of coinage and a general
shift to metal bullion. The Middle Ages (600–1450 ad), which saw a
return to virtual credit money, will be covered in chapter 10; chapter
11 will cover the next turn of the cycle, the Age of Capitalist Empires,
which began around 1450 with a massive planetary switch back to gold and
silver bullion, and which could only really be said to have ended in
1971, when Richard Nixon announced that the U.S. dollar would no longer
be redeemable in gold. This marked the beginning of yet another phase of
virtual money, one which has only just begun, and whose ultimate
contours are, necessarily, invisible. Chapter 12, the final chapter,
will be devoted to applying the insights of history to understanding
what it might mean and the opportunities it might throw open.


Mesopotamia     (3500–800 BC)

We have already had occasion to note the predominance of credit money in
Mesopotamia, the earliest urban civilization that we know about. In the
great temple and palace complexes, not only did money serve largely as
an accounting measure rather than physically changing hands, merchants
and tradespeople developed credit arrangements of their own. Most of
these took the physical form of clay tablets, inscribed with some
obligation of future payment, that were then sealed inside clay
envelopes and marked with the borrower’s seal. The creditor would keep
the envelope as a surety, and it would be broken open on repayment. In
some times or places at least, these _bullae_ appear to have become what
we would now call negotiable instruments, since the tablet inside did
not simply record a promise to pay the original lender, but was
designated “to the bearer”—in other words, a tablet recording a debt of
five shekels of silver (at prevailing rates of interest) could circulate
as the equivalent of a five-shekel promissory note—that is, as money.⁵

We don’t know how often this happened; how many hands such tablets would
typically pass through, how many transactions were based on credit, how
often merchants actually did weigh out silver in rough chunks to buy and
sell their merchandise, or when they were most likely to do so. No doubt
all this varied over time. Promissory notes usually circulated within
merchant guilds, or between inhabitants of the relatively well-off urban
neighborhoods where people knew one another well enough to trust them to
be accountable, but not so well that they could rely on one another for
more traditional forms of mutual aid.⁶ We know even less about the
marketplaces frequented by ordinary Mesopotamians, except that
tavern-keepers operated on credit, and hawkers and operators of market
stalls probably did as well.⁷

The origins of interest will forever remain obscure, since they preceded
the invention of writing. The terminology for interest in most ancient
languages is derived from some word for “offspring,” causing some to
speculate that it originates in loans of livestock, but this seems a bit
literal-minded. More likely, the first widespread interest-bearing loans
were commercial: temples and palaces would forward wares to merchants
and commercial agents, who would then trade them in nearby mountain
kingdoms or on trading expeditions overseas.⁸

The practice is significant because it implies a fundamental lack of
trust. After all, why not simply demand a share in the profits? This
seems more fair (a merchant who came back bankrupt would probably have
little means of paying anyway), and profit-sharing partnerships of this
sort became common practice in the later Middle East.⁹ The answer seems
to be that profit-sharing partnerships were typically contracted between
merchants, or anyway people of similar background and experience who had
ways of keeping track of one another. Palace or temple bureaucrats and
world-roaming merchant adventurers had little in common, and the
bureaucrats seem to have concluded that one could not normally expect a
merchant returned from a far-off land to be entirely honest about his
adventures. A fixed interest rate would render irrelevant whatever
elaborate tales of robbery, shipwreck, or attacks by winged snakes or
elephants a creative merchant might have concocted. The return was fixed
in advance.

This connection between borrowing and lying, incidentally, is an
important one to history. Herodotus remarked about the Persians: “To
tell a lie is considered by them the greatest disgrace, and next to that
to be in debt … especially because they think that one in debt must of
necessity tell lies.”¹⁰ (Later, Herodotus reported a story told to him
by a Persian about the origins of the gold that the Persians had
acquired in India: they stole it from the nests of giant ants.)¹¹
Jesus’s parable of the unforgiving servant makes a joke out of the
matter (“Ten thousand talents? No problem. Just give me a little more
time”), but even here, one can see how such endless falsehoods
contributed to a broader sense that a world in which moral relations are
conceived as debts is also, while in certain ways entertaining,
necessarily a world of corruption, guilt, and sin.

By the time of the earliest Sumerian documents, this world may not yet
have arrived. Still, the principle of lending at interest, even compound
interest, was already familiar to everyone. In 2402 bc, for instance, a
royal inscription by King Enmetena of Lagash—one of the earliest we
have—complains that his enemy, the King of Umma, had been occupying a
huge stretch of farmland that had rightfully belonged to Lagash for
decades. He announces: if one were to calculate the rental fees for all
that land, then the interest that would have been due on that rent,
compounded annually, it would reveal that Umma now owes Lagash four and
a half trillion liters of barley. The sum was, as in the parable,
intentionally preposterous.¹² It was just an excuse to start a war.
Still, he wanted everyone to know that he knew exactly how to do the
math.

Usury—in the sense of interest-bearing consumer loans—was also well
established by Enmetena’s time. The king ultimately had his war and won
it, and two years later, fresh off his victory, he was forced to publish
another edict: this one, a general debt cancellation within his kingdom.
As he later boasted, “he instituted freedom _(amargi)_ in Lagash. He
restored the child to its mother, and the mother to her child; he
cancelled all interest due.”¹³ This was, in fact, the very first such
declaration we have on record—and the first time in history that the
word “freedom” appears in a political document.

Enmetena’s text is a bit vague on the details, but a half-century later,
when his successor Uruinimgina declared a general amnesty during the New
Year’s ceremonies of 2350 bc, the terms are all spelled out, and they
conform to what was to become typical of such amnesties: cancelling not
only all outstanding loans, but all forms of debt servitude, even those
based on failure to pay fees or criminal penalties—the only thing
excepted being commercial loans.

Similar declarations are to be found again and again, in Sumerian and
later Babylonian and Assyrian records, and always with the same theme:
the restoration of “justice and equity,” the protection of widows and
orphans, to ensure—as Hammurabi was to put it when he abolished debts in
Babylon in 1761 bc—“that the strong might not oppress the weak.”¹⁴ In
the words of Michael Hudson,

The designated occasion for clearing Babylonia’s financial slate was the
New Year festival, celebrated in the spring. Babylonian rulers oversaw
the ritual of “breaking the tablets,” that is, the debt records,
restoring economic balance as part of the calendrical renewal of society
along with the rest of nature. Hammurabi and his fellow rulers signaled
these proclamations by raising a torch, probably symbolizing the sun-god
of justice Shamash, whose principles were supposed to guide wise and
fair rulers. Persons held as debt pledges were released to rejoin their
families. Other debtors were restored cultivation rights to their
customary lands, free of whatever mortgage liens had accumulated.¹⁵

Over the next several thousand years, this same list—cancelling the
debts, destroying the records, reallocating the land—was to become the
standard list of demands of peasant revolutionaries everywhere. In
Mesopotamia, rulers appear to have headed off the possibility of unrest
by instituting such reforms themselves, as a grand gesture of cosmic
renewal, a recreation of the social universe—in Babylonia, during the
same ceremony in which the king reenacts his god Marduk’s creation of
the physical universe. The history of debt and sin was wiped out, and it
was time to begin again. But it’s also clear what they saw as the
alternative: the world plunged into chaos, with farmers defecting to
swell the ranks of nomadic pastoralists, and ultimately, if the
breakdown continued, returning to overrun the cities and destroy the
existing economic order entirely.

[]


Egypt  (2650–716 BC)

Egypt represents an interesting contrast, since for most of its history,
it managed to avoid the development of interest-bearing debt entirely.

Egypt was, like Mesopotamia, extraordinarily rich by ancient standards,
but it was also a self-contained society, a river running through a
desert, and far more centralized than Mesopotamia. The pharaoh was a
god, and the state and temple bureaucracies had their hands in
everything: there were a dazzling array of taxes and a continual
distribution of allotments, wages, and payments from the state. Here,
too, money clearly arose as a means of account. The basic unit was the
_deben_, or “measure”—originally referring to measures of grain, and
later of copper or silver. A few records make clear the
catch-as-catch-can nature of most transactions:

In the 15th year of Ramses II [c. 1275 BC] a merchant offered the
Egyptian lady Erenofre a Syrian slave girl whose price, no doubt after
bargaining, was fixed at 4 _deben_ 1 _kite_ [about 373 grams] of silver.
Erenofre made up a collection of clothes and blankets to the value of 2
_deben_ 2 1/3 _kite_—the details are set out in the record—and then
borrowed a miscellany of objects from her neighbors—bronze vessels, a
pot of honey, ten shirts, ten _deben_ of copper ingots—till the price
was made up.¹⁶

Most merchants were itinerant, either foreigners or commercial agents
for the owners of large estates. There’s not much evidence for
commercial credit, however; loans in Egypt were still more likely to
take the form of mutual aid between neighbors.¹⁷

Substantial, legally enforceable loans, the kind that can lead to the
loss of lands or family members, are documented, but they appear to have
been rare—and much less pernicious, as the loans did not bear interest.
Similarly, we do occasionally hear of debt-bondservants, and even debt
slaves, but these seem to have been unusual phenomena and there’s no
suggestion that matters ever reached crisis proportions, as they so
regularly did in Mesopotamia and the Levant.¹⁸

In fact, for the first several thousand years, we seem to be in a
somewhat different world, where debt really was a matter of “guilt” and
treated largely as a criminal matter:

When a debtor failed to repay his debt on time, his creditor could take
him to court, where the debtor would be required to promise to pay in
full by a specific date. As part of his promise—which was under oath—the
debtor also pledged to undergo 100 blows and/or repay twice the amount
of the original loan if he failed to pay by the date specified.¹⁹

The “and/or” is significant. There was no formal distinction between a
fine and a beating. In fact, the entire purpose of the oath (rather like
the Cretan custom of having a borrower pretend to snatch the money)
seems to have been to create the justification for punitive action: so
the debtor could be punished as _either_ a perjurer or a thief.²⁰

By the time of the New Kingdom (1550–1070) there is more evidence for
markets, but it’s only by the time we reach the Iron Age, just before
Egypt was absorbed into the Persian empire, that we begin to see
evidence for Mesopotamian-style debt crises. Greek sources, for
instance, record that the Pharaoh Bakenranef (reigned 720–715 bc) issued
a decree abolishing debt bondage and annulling all outstanding
liabilities, since “he felt it would be absurd for a soldier, perhaps at
the moment when he was setting forth to fight for his fatherland, to be
hauled off to prison by his creditor for an unpaid loan”—which, if true,
is also one of the earliest mentions of a debt prison.²¹ Under the
Ptolemies, the Greek dynasty that ruled Egypt after Alexander, periodic
clean slates had become institutionized. It’s well known that the
Rosetta Stone, written both in Greek and Egyptian, proved to be the key
that made it possible to translate Egyptian hieroglyphics. Few are aware
of what it actually says. The stela was originally raised to announce an
amnesty, both for debtors and for prisoners, declared by Ptolemy V in
196 bc.²²


China  (2200–771 BC)

We can say almost nothing about Bronze Age India, since its writing
remains indecipherable, and not much more about Early China. What little
we do know—mainly culled from dribs and drabs in later literary
sources—suggests that the earliest Chinese states were far less
bureaucratic than their western cousins.²³ There being no centralized
temple or palace system with priests and administrators managing the
storerooms and recording inputs and outputs, there was also little
incentive to create a single, uniform unit of account. Instead, the
evidence suggests a different path, with social currencies of various
sorts still holding sway in the countryside and being converted to
commercial purposes in dealings between strangers.

Later sources recall that early rulers “used pearls and jade as their
superior method of payment, gold as their middle method of payment, and
knives and spades as their lower method of payment.”²⁴ The author can
only be talking about gifts here, and hierarchical ones at that: kings
and great magnates rewarding their followers for services in theory
rendered voluntarily. In most places, long strings of cowrie shells
figure prominently, but even here, though we often hear of “the cowrie
money of early China,” and it’s easy enough to find texts in which the
value of sumptuous gifts are _measured_ in cowries, it’s never clear
whether people were really carrying them around to buy and sell things
in the marketplace.²⁵

The most likely interpretation is that they were carrying the shells,
but for a long time marketplaces themselves were of minor significance,
so this use was not nearly as important as the usual uses for social
currencies: marriage presents, fines, fees, and tokens of honor.²⁶ At
any rate, all sources insist that there was a wide variety of currencies
in circulation. As David Scheidel, one of the premier contemporary
scholars of early money, notes:

In pre-imperial China, money took the form of cowrie shells, both
originals and—increasingly—bronze imitations, tortoise shells, weighed
gold and (rarely) silver bars, and most notably—from at least 1000 BC
onward—utensil money in the shape of spade blades and knives made of
bronze.²⁷

These were most often used between people who didn’t know each other
very well. For tabulating debts between neighbors, with local vendors,
or with anything having to do with the government, people appear to have
employed a variety of credit instruments: later Chinese historians
claimed that the earliest of these were knotted strings, rather like the
Inca _khipu_ system, and then later, notched strips of wood or bamboo.²⁸
As in Mesopotamia, these appear to have long predated writing.

We don’t really know when the practice of lending at interest first
reached China either, or whether Bronze Age China came to see the same
sorts of debt crises as occurred in Mesopotamia, but there are
tantalizing hints in later documents.²⁹ For instance, later Chinese
legends about the origin of coinage ascribed the invention to emperors
trying to relieve the effects of natural disasters. One early Han text
reports:

In ancient times, during the floods of Yu and the droughts of Tang, the
common people became so exhausted that they were forced to borrow from
one another in order to obtain food and clothing. [Emperor] Yu coined
money for his people from the gold of Mount Li and [Emperor] Tang did
likewise from the copper of Mount Yan. Therefore the world called them
benevolent.³⁰

Other versions are a little more explicit. The _Guanzi_, a collection
that in early imperial China became the standard primer on political
economy, notes “There were people who lacked even gruel to eat, and who
were forced to sell their children. To rescue these people, Tang coined
money.”³¹

The story is clearly fanciful (the real origins of coined money were at
least a thousand years later), and it is very hard to know what to make
of it. Could this reflect a memory of children being taken away as debt
sureties? On the face of it, it seems more like starving people selling
their children outright—a practice that was later to become commonplace
in certain periods of Chinese history.³² But the juxtaposition of loans
and the sale of children is suggestive, especially considering what was
happening on the other side of Asia at exactly the same time. The
_Guanzi_ later goes on to explain that these same rulers instituted the
custom of retaining 30 percent of the harvest in public granaries for
redistribution in emergencies, so as to ensure that this would never
happen again. In other words, they began to set up just the kind of
bureaucratic storage facilities that, in places like Egypt and
Mesopotamia, had been responsible for creating money as a unit of
account to begin with.



CHAPTER NINE  THE AXIAL AGE



_(800 BC – 600 AD)_


_Let us designate this period as the “axial age.” Extraordinary events
are crowded into this period. In China lived Confucius and Lao Tse, all
the trends in Chinese philosophy arose … In India it was the age of the
Upanishads and of Buddha; as in China, all philosophical trends,
including skepticism and materialism, sophistry and nihilism, were
developed_.

—Karl Jaspers, _Way to Wisdom_

THE PHRASE “THE AXIAL AGE” was coined by the German existentialist
philosopher Karl Jaspers.¹ In the course of writing a history of
philosophy, Jaspers became fascinated by the fact that figures like
Pythagoras (570–495 bc), the Buddha (563–483 bc), and Confucius (551–479
bc), were all alive at exactly the same time, and that Greece, India,
and China, in that period, all saw a sudden efflorescence of debate
between contending intellectual schools, each group apparently, unaware
of the others’ existence. Like the simultaneous invention of coinage,
why this happened had always been a puzzle. Jaspers wasn’t entirely sure
himself. To some extent, he suggested, it must have been an effect of
similar historical conditions. For most of the great urban civilizations
of the time, the early Iron Age was a kind of pause between empires, a
time when political landscapes were broken into a checkerboard of often
diminutive kingdoms and city-states, most often at constant war
externally and locked in constant political debate within. Each case
witnessed the development of something akin to a drop-out culture, with
ascetics and sages fleeing to the wilderness or wandering from town to
town seeking wisdom; in each, too, they were eventually reabsorbed into
the political order as a new kind of intellectual or spiritual elite,
whether as Greek sophists, Jewish prophets, Chinese sages, or Indian
holy men.

Whatever the reasons, the result, Jaspers argued, was the first period
in history in which human beings applied principles of reasoned inquiry
to the great questions of human existence. He observed that all these
great regions of the world, China, India, and the Mediterranean, saw the
emergence of remarkably parallel philosophical trends, from skepticism
to idealism—in fact, almost the entire range of positions about the
nature of the cosmos, mind, action, and the ends of human existence that
have remained the stuff of philosophy to this day. As one of Jaspers’
disciples later put it—overstating only slightly—“no really new ideas
have been added since that time.”²

For Jaspers, the period begins with the Persian prophet Zoroaster,
around 800 bc, and ends around 200 bc, to be followed by a Spiritual Age
that centers on figures like Jesus and Mohammed. For my own purposes, I
find it more useful to combine the two. Let us define the Axial Age,
then, as running from 800 bc to 600 ad.³ This makes the Axial Age the
period that saw the birth not only of all the world’s major
philosophical tendencies, but also, all of today’s major world
religions: Zoroastrianism, Prophetic Judaism, Buddhism, Jainism,
Hinduism, Confucianism, Taoism, Christianity, and Islam.⁴

The attentive reader may have noticed that the core period of Jasper’s
Axial age—the lifetimes of Pythagoras, Confucius, and the
Buddha—corresponds almost exactly to the period in which coinage was
invented. What’s more, the three parts of the world where coins were
first invented were also the very parts of the world where those sages
lived; in fact, they became the epicenters of Axial Age religious and
philosophical creativity: the kingdoms and city-states around the Yellow
River in China, the Ganges valley in northern India, and the shores of
the Aegean Sea.

What was the connection? We might start by asking: What is a coin? The
normal definition is that a coin is a piece of valuable metal, shaped
into a standardized unit, with some emblem or mark inscribed to
authenticate it. The world’s first coins appear to have been created
within the kingdom of Lydia, in western Anatolia (now Turkey), sometime
around 600 bc.⁵ These first Lydian coins were basically just round lumps
of electrum—a gold-silver alloy that occurred naturally in the nearby
Pactolus River—that had been heated, then hammered with some kind of
insignia. The very first, stamped only with a few letters, appear to
have been manufactured by ordinary jewelers, but these disappeared
almost instantly, replaced by coins manufactured in a newly established
royal mint. Greek cities on the Anatolian coast soon began to strike
their own coins, and they came to be adopted in Greece itself; the same
thing occurred in the Persian Empire after it absorbed Lydia in 547 bc.

In both India and China, we can observe the same pattern: invented by
private citizens, coinage was quickly monopolized by the state. The
first Indian money, which seems to have appeared at some point in the
sixth century, consisted of bars of silver trimmed down to uniform
weights, then punch-marked with some kind of official symbol.⁶ Most of
the examples discovered by archaeologists contain numerous additional
counter-punches, presumably added much in the way that a check or other
credit instrument is endorsed before being transferred. This strongly
suggests that they were being handled by people used to dealing with
more abstract credit instruments.⁷ Much early Chinese coinage also shows
signs of having evolved directly from social currencies: some were in
fact cast bronze in the shape of cowries, though others took the shape
of diminutive knives, disks, or spades. In every case, local governments
quickly stepped in—presumably within the space of about a generation.⁸
However, since in each of the three areas there was a plethora of tiny
states, this meant that each ended up with a wide variety of different
currency systems. For example, around 700 bc, northern India was still
divided into Janapadas or “tribal territories,” some of them monarchies
and some republics, and in the sixth century there were still at least
sixteen major kingdoms. In China, this was the period where the old Zhou
Empire first devolved into vying principalities (the “Spring and Autumn”
period, 722–481 bc), then splintered into the chaos of the “Warring
States” (475–221 bc.) Like the Greek city-states, all of the resulting
kingdoms, no matter how diminutive, aspired to issue their own official
currency.

Recent scholarship has shed a great deal of light on how this must have
happened. Gold, silver, and bronze—the materials from which coins were
made—had long been the media of international trade; but until that
time, only the rich had actually had much in their possession. A typical
Sumerian farmer may well have never had occasion to hold a substantial
piece of silver in his hand, except perhaps at his wedding. Most
precious metals took the form of wealthy women’s anklets and heirloom
chalices presented by kings to their retainers, or it was simply
stockpiled in temples, in ingot form, as sureties for loans. Somehow,
during the Axial Age, all this began to change. Large amounts of silver,
gold, and copper were dethesaurized, as the economic historians like to
say; it was removed from the temples and houses of the rich and placed
in the hands of ordinary people, was broken into tinier pieces, and
began to be used in everyday transactions.

How? Israeli Classicist David Schaps provides the most plausible
suggestion: most of it was stolen. This was a period of generalized
warfare, and it is in the nature of war that precious things are
plundered.

Soldiers who plunder may indeed go first for the women, the alcoholic
drinks, or the food, but they will also be looking around for things of
value that are easily portable. A long-term standing army will tend to
accumulate many things that are valuable and portable—and the most
valuable and portable items are precious metals and precious stones. It
may well have been the protracted wars among the states of these areas
that first produced a large population of people with precious metal in
their possession and a need for everyday necessities …

Where there are people who want to buy there will be people willing to
sell, as innumerable tracts on black markets, drug dealing, and
prostitution point out … The constant warfare of the archaic age of
Greece, of the Janapadas of India, of the Warring States of China, was a
powerful impetus for the development of market trade, and in particular
for market trade based on the exchange of precious metal, usually in
small amounts. If plunder brought precious metal into the hands of the
soldiers, the market will have spread it through the population.⁹

Now, one might object: but surely, war and plunder were nothing new. The
Homeric epics, for instance, show a well-nigh obsessive interest in the
division of the spoils. True, but what the Axial Age also saw—again,
equally in China, India, and the Aegean—was the rise of a new kind of
army, made up not of aristocratic warriors and their retainers, but
trained professionals. The period when the Greeks began to use coinage,
for instance, was also the period when they developed their famous
phalanx tactics, which required constant drill and training of the
hoplite soldiers. The results were so extraordinarily effective that
Greek mercenaries were soon being sought after from Egypt to Crimea. But
unlike the Homeric retainers, who could simply be ignored, an army of
trained mercenaries needs to be rewarded in some meaningful way. One
could perhaps provide them all with livestock, but livestock are hard to
transport; or with promissory notes, but these would be worthless in the
mercenaries’ own country. Allowing each a tiny share of the plunder does
seem an obvious solution.

These new armies were, directly or indirectly, under the control of
governments, and it took governments to turn these chunks of metal into
genuine currency. The main reason for this is simply scale: to create
enough coins that the people could begin to use them in everyday
transactions required mass production on a scale far beyond the
abilities of local merchants or smiths.¹⁰ Of course we have already seen
why governments might have incentive to do so: the existence of markets
was highly convenient for governments, and not just because it made it
so much easier for them to provision large standing armies. By insisting
that only their own coins were acceptable as fees, fines, or taxes,
governments were able to overwhelm the innumerable social currencies
that already existed in their hinterlands, and to establish something
like uniform national markets.

Actually, one theory is that the very first Lydian coins were invented
explicitly to pay mercenaries.¹¹ This might help explain why the Greeks,
who supplied most of the mercenaries, so quickly became accustomed to
the use of coins, and why the use of coinage spread so quickly across
the Hellenic world, so that by 480 bc there were at least one hundred
mints operating in different Greek cities, even though at that time,
none of the great trading nations of the Mediterranean had as yet showed
the slightest interest in them. The Phoenicians, for example, were
considered the greatest merchants and bankers of antiquity.¹² They were
also great inventors, having been the first to develop both the alphabet
and the abacus. Yet for centuries after the invention of coinage, they
preferred to continue conducting business as they always had, with
unwrought ingots and promissory notes.¹³ Phoenician cities struck no
coins until 365 bc, and while Carthage, the great Phoenician colony in
North Africa that came to dominate commerce in the Western
Mediterranean, did so a bit earlier, it was only when “forced to do so
to pay Sicilian mercenaries; and its issues were marked in Punic, ‘for
the people of the camp.’ ”¹⁴

On the other hand, in the extraordinary violence of the Axial Age, being
a “great trading nation” (rather than, say, an aggressive military power
like Persia, Athens, or Rome) was not, ultimately, a winning
proposition. The fate of the Phoenician cities is instructive. Sidon,
the wealthiest, was destroyed by the Persian emperor Artaxerxes III
after a revolt in 351 bc. Forty thousand of its inhabitants are said to
have committed mass suicide rather than surrender. Nineteen years later,
Tyre was destroyed after a prolonged siege by Alexander: ten thousand
died in battle, and the thirty thousand survivors were sold into
slavery. Carthage lasted longer, but when Roman armies finally destroyed
the city in 146 bc, hundreds of thousands of Carthaginians were said to
have been raped and slaughtered, and fifty thousand captives put on the
auction block, after which the city itself was razed and its fields
sowed with salt.

All this may bring home something of the level of violence amidst which
Axial Age thought developed.¹⁵ But it also leaves us asking: What
exactly was the ongoing relation among coinage, military power, and this
unprecedented outpouring of ideas?


The Mediterranean

Here again our best information is from the Mediterranean world, and I
have already provided some of its outlines. Comparing Athens—with its
far-flung naval empire—and Rome, we can immediately detect striking
similarities. In each city, history begins with a series of debt crises.
In Athens, the first crisis, the one that culminated in Solon’s reforms
of 594 bc, was so early that coinage could hardly have been a factor. In
Rome, too, the earliest crises seem to have proceeded the advent of
currency. Rather, in each case, coinage became a solution. In brief, one
might say that these conflicts over debt had two possible outcomes. The
first was that the aristocrats could win, and the poor remain “slaves of
the rich”—which in practice meant that most people would end up clients
of some wealthy patron. Such states were generally militarily
ineffective.¹⁶ The second was that popular factions could prevail,
institute the usual popular program of redistribution of lands and
safeguards against debt peonage, thus creating the basis for a class of
free farmers whose children would, in turn, be free to spend much of
their time training for war.¹⁷

Coinage played a critical role in maintaining this kind of free
peasantry—secure in their landholding, not tied to any great lord by
bonds of debt. In fact, the fiscal policies of many Greek cities
amounted to little more than elaborate systems for the distribution of
loot. It’s important to emphasize that few ancient cities, if any, went
so far as to outlaw predatory lending, or even debt peonage, entirely.
Instead, they threw money at the problem. Gold, and especially silver,
were acquired in war, or mined by slaves captured in war. Mints were
located in temples (the traditional place for depositing spoils), and
city-states developed endless ways to distribute coins, not only to
soldiers, sailors, and those producing arms or outfitting ships, but to
the populace generally, as jury fees, fees for attending public
assemblies, or sometimes just as outright distributions, as Athens did
most famously when they discovered a new vein of silver in the mines at
Laurium in 483 bc. At the same time, insisting that the same coins
served as legal tender for all payments due to the state guaranteed that
they would be in sufficient demand that markets would soon develop.

Many of the political crises in ancient Greek cities similarly turned on
the distribution of the spoils. Here is another incident recorded in
Aristotle, who provides a conservative take on the origins of a coup in
the city of Rhodes around 391 bc (“demagogues” here refers to the
leaders of the democracy):

The demagogues needed money to pay the people for attending the assembly
and serving on juries; for if the people did not attend, the demagogues
would lose their influence. They raised at least some of the money they
needed by preventing the disbursement of the money due the trireme
[warship] commanders under their contracts with the city to build and
fit triremes for the Rhodian navy. Since the trireme commanders were not
paid, they were unable in turn to pay their suppliers and workers, who
sued the trireme commanders. To escape these lawsuits the trireme
commanders banded together and overthrew the democracy.¹⁸

It was slavery, though, that made all this possible. As the figures
concerning Sidon, Tyre, and Carthage suggest, enormous numbers of people
were being enslaved in many of these conflicts, and, of course, many
slaves ended up working in the mines, producing even more gold, silver,
and copper. (The mines in Laurium reportedly employed ten to twenty
thousand of them.)¹⁹

Geoffrey Ingham calls the resulting system a “military-coinage
complex”—though I think it would be more accurate to call it a
“military-coinage-slavery complex.”²⁰ Anyway, that describes rather
nicely how it worked in practice. When Alexander set out to conquer the
Persian Empire, he borrowed much of the money with which to pay and
provision his troops, and he minted his first coins, used to pay his
creditors and continue to support the money, by melting down gold and
silver plundered after his initial victories.²¹ However, an
expeditionary force needed to be paid, and paid well: Alexander’s army,
which numbered some 120,000 men, required half a ton of silver a day
just for wages. For this reason, conquest meant that the existing
Persian system of mines and mints had to be reorganized around providing
for the invading army; and ancient mines, of course, were worked by
slaves. In turn, most slaves in mines were war captives. Presumably most
of the unfortunate survivors of the siege of Tyre ended up working in
such mines. One can see how this process might feed upon itself.²²

Alexander was also the man responsible for destroying what remained of
the ancient credit systems, since not only the Phoenicians but also the
old Mesopotamian heartland had resisted the new coin economy. His armies
not only destroyed Tyre; they also dethesaurized the gold and silver
reserves of Babylonian and Persian temples, the security on which their
credit systems were based, and insisted that all taxes to his new
government be paid in his own money. The result was to “release the
accumulated specie of century onto the market in a matter of months,”
something like 180,000 talents, or in contemporary terms, an estimated
$285 billion.²³

The Hellenistic successor kingdoms established by Alexander’s generals,
from Greece to India, employed mercenaries rather than national armies,
but the story of Rome is, again, similar to that of Athens. Its early
history, as recorded by official chroniclers like Livy, is one of
continual struggles between patricians and plebians, and of continual
crises over debt. Periodically, these would lead to what were called
moments of “the secession of the plebs,” when the commoners of the city
abandoned their fields and workshops, camped outside the city, and
threatened mass defection—an interesting halfway point between the
popular revolts of Greece and the strategy of exodus typically pursued
in Egypt and Mesopotamia. Here, too, the patricians were ultimately
faced with a decision: they could use agricultural loans to gradually
turn the plebian population into a class of bonded laborers on their
estates, or they could accede to popular demands for debt protection,
preserve a free peasantry, and employ the younger sons of free farm
families as soldiers.²⁴ As the prolonged history of crises, secessions,
and reforms makes clear, the choice was made grudgingly.²⁵ The plebs
practically had to force the senatorial class to take the imperial
option. Still, they did, and over time they gradually presided over the
establishment of a welfare system that recycled at least a share of the
spoils to soldiers, veterans, and their families.

It seems significant, in this light, that the traditional date of the
first Roman coinage—338 bc—is almost exactly the date when debt bondage
was finally outlawed (326 bc).²⁶ Again, coinage, minted from war spoils,
didn’t cause the crisis. It was used as a solution.

In fact, the entire Roman empire, at its height, could be understood as
a vast machine for the extraction of precious metals and their coining
and distribution to the military—combined with taxation policies
designed to encourage conquered populations to adopt coins in their
everyday transactions. Even so, for most of its history, use of coins
was heavily concentrated in two regions: in Italy and a few major
cities, and on the frontiers, where the legions were actually stationed.
In areas where there were neither mines nor military operations, older
credit systems presumably continued to operate.

I will add one final note here. In Greece as in Rome, attempts to solve
the debt crisis through military expansion were always, ultimately, just
ways of fending off the problem—and they only worked for a limited
period of time. When expansion stopped, everything returned to as it had
been before. Actually, it’s not clear that all forms of debt bondage
were ever entirely eliminated even in cities like Athens and Rome. In
cities that were not successful military powers, without any source of
income to set up welfare policies, debt crises continued to flare up
every century or so—and they often became far more acute than they ever
had in the Middle East, because there was no mechanism, short of
outright revolution, to declare a Mesopotamian-style clean slate. Large
populations, even in the Greek world, did, in fact, sink to the rank of
serfs and clients.²⁷

Athenians, as we’ve seen, seemed to assume that a gentleman normally
lived a step or two ahead of his creditors. Roman politicians were
little different. Of course much of the debt was money that members of
the senatorial class owed to each other: in a way, it’s just the usual
communism of the rich, extending credit to one another on easy terms
that they would never think to offer others. Still, under the late
Republic, history records many intrigues and conspiracies hatched by
desperate debtors, often aristocrats driven by relentless creditors to
make common cause with the poor.²⁸ If we hear less about this sort of
thing happening under the emperors, it’s probably because there were
fewer opportunities for protest; what evidence we have suggests that if
anything, the problem got much worse.²⁹ Around 100 ad, Plutarch wrote
about his own country as if it were under foreign invasion:

And as King Darius sent to the city of Athens his lieutenants Datis and
Artaphernes with chains and cords, to bind the prisoners they should
take; so these usurers, bringing into Greece boxes full of schedules,
bills, and obligatory contracts, as so many irons and fetters for the
shackling of poor criminals …

For at the very delivery of their money, they immediately ask it back,
taking it up at the same moment they lay it down; and they let out that
again to interest which they take for the use of what they have before
lent.

So that they laugh at those natural philosophers who hold that nothing
can be made of nothing and of that which has no existence; but with them
usury is made and engendered of that which neither is nor ever was.³⁰

The works of the early Christian fathers likewise resound with endless
descriptions of the misery and desperation of those caught in rich
lenders’ webs. In the end, through this means, that small window of
freedom that had been created by the plebs was completely undone, and
the free peasantry largely eliminated. By the end of the empire, most
people in the countryside who weren’t outright slaves had become,
effectively, debt peons to some rich landlord; a situation in the end
legally formalized by imperial decrees binding peasants to the land.³¹
Without a free peasantry to form the basis for the army, the state was
forced to rely more and more on arming and employing Germanic barbarians
from across the imperial frontiers—with results I need hardly relate.


India

In most ways, India could not be more different as a civilization than
the ancient Mediterranean—but to a remarkable degree, the same basic
pattern repeats itself there as well.

The Bronze Age civilization of the Indus Valley collapsed sometime
around 1600 bc; it would be about a thousand years before India saw the
emergence of another urban civilization. When it did, that civilization
was centered on the fertile plains that surrounded the Ganges farther
east. Here too we observe, at first, a checkerboard of different sorts
of government, from the famous “Ksatriya republics” with a populace in
arms and urban democratic assemblies, to elective monarchies, to
centralized empires like Kosala and Magadha.³² Both Gautama (the future
Buddha), and Mahavira (the founder of Jainism) were born in one of the
republics, though both ultimately found themselves teaching within the
great empires, whose rulers often became patrons of wandering ascetics
and philosophers.

Both kingdoms and republics produced their own silver and copper
coinage, but in some ways the republics were more traditional, since the
self-governing “populace in arms” consisted of the traditional Ksatriya
or warrior caste, who typically held their lands in common and had them
worked by serfs or slaves.³³ The kingdoms, on the other hand, were
founded on a fundamentally new institution: a trained, professional
army, open to young men of a wide variety of backgrounds, their
equipment supplied by central authorities (soldiers were obliged to
check their arms and armor when they entered cities), and provided with
generous salaries.

Whatever their origins, here too, coins and markets sprung up above all
to feed the machinery of war. Magadha, which ultimately came out on top,
did so largely because it controlled most of the mines. Kautilya’s
_Arthasastra_, a political treatise written by one of the chief
ministers for the Mauryan dynasty that succeeded it (321–185 bc), stated
the matter precisely: “The treasury is based upon mining, the army upon
the treasury; he who has army and treasury may conquer the whole wide
earth.”³⁴ The government drew its personnel first of all from a landed
class, which provided trained administrators, but even more, full-time
soldiers: the salaries of each rank of soldier and administrator were
carefully stipulated. These armies could be huge. Greek sources report
that Magadha could put to the field a force of 200,000 infantry, 20,000
horses, and about 4,000 elephants—and that Alexander’s men mutinied
rather than have to face them. Whether on campaign or in garrison, they
were inevitably accompanied by a range of different sorts of camp
followers—petty traders, prostitutes, and hired servants—which, with the
soldiers, seems to have been the very medium through which a cash
economy had originally taken form.³⁵ By Kautilya’s time, a few hundred
years later, the state was inserting itself into every aspect of the
process: Kautilya suggests paying soldiers apparently generous wages,
then secretly replacing hawkers with government agents who could charge
them twice the normal rates for supplies, as well as organizing
prostitutes under a ministry in which they could be trained as spies, so
as to make detailed reports on their clients’ loyalties.

Thus was the market economy, born of war, gradually taken over by the
government. Rather than stifle the spread of currency, the process seems
to have doubled and even tripled it: the military logic was extended to
the entire economy, the government systematically setting up its
granaries, workshops, trading houses, warehouses, and jails, staffed by
salaried officials, and all selling products on the market so as to
collect the pieces of silver paid off to soldiers and officials and put
them back into the royal treasuries again.³⁶ The result was a
monetarization of daily life unlike anything India was to see for
another two thousand years.³⁷

Something similar seems to have happened with slavery, which was quite
commonplace at the time of the rise of the great armies—again, unlike
almost any other point in Indian history—but was gradually brought under
government control.³⁸ By Kautilya’s time, most war captives were not
sold in marketplaces but relocated to government villages on newly
reclaimed land. They were not allowed to leave, and these government
villages were, at least according to the regulations, remarkably dreary
places: veritable work camps, with all forms of festive entertainment
officially prohibited. Slave hirelings were mostly convicts, rented by
the state during their terms.

With their armies, spies, and administration controlling everything, the
new Indian kings evinced little interest in the old priestly caste and
its Vedic ritual, though many kept up a lively interest in the new
philosophical and religious ideas that seem to have been cropping up
everywhere at the time. As time went on, however, the war machine began
to sputter. It’s not clear exactly why this happened. By the time of
emperor Aśoka (273–232 bc), the Mauryan dynasty controlled almost all of
present-day India and Pakistan, but the Indian version of the
military-coinage-slavery complex was showing definite signs of strain.
Perhaps the clearest sign was the debasement of the coinage, which over
the course of two centuries or so had gone from almost pure silver to
about fifty percent copper.³⁹

Aśoka, famously, began his reign in conquest: in 265 bc, destroying the
Kalingas, one of the last remaining Indian republics, in a war in which
hundreds of thousands of human beings were, according to his own
account, killed or carried off into slavery. Aśoka later claimed to have
been so disturbed and haunted by the carnage that he renounced war
altogether, embraced Buddhism, and declared that from that time on, his
kingdom would be governed by principles of _ahimsa_, or nonviolence.
“Here in my kingdom,” he declared in an edict inscribed on one of the
great granite pillars in his capital of Patna, which so dazzled the
Greek ambassador Megasthenes, “no living being must be killed and
sacrificed.”⁴⁰ Such a statement obviously can’t be taken literally:
Aśoka might have replaced sacrificial ritual with vegetarian feasts, but
he didn’t abolish the army, abandon capital punishment, or even outlaw
slavery. But his rule marked a revolutionary shift in ethos. Aggressive
war was abandoned, and much of the army does seems to have been
demobilized, along with the network of spies and state bureaucrats, with
the new, proliferating mendicant orders (Buddhists, Jains, and also
world-renouncing Hindus) given official state support to preach to the
villages on questions of social morality. Aśoka and his successors
diverted substantial resources to these religious orders, with the
result that, over the next centuries, thousands of stupas and
monasteries were built across the subcontinent.⁴¹

Aśoka’s reforms are useful to contemplate here because they help reveal
just how mistaken some of our basic assumptions are: particularly, that
money equals coins, and that more coins in circulation means more
commerce and a greater role for private merchants. In reality, the
Magadha state promoted markets but had been suspicious of private
merchants, seeing them largely as competitors.⁴² Merchants had been
among the earliest and most ardent supporters of the new religions
(Jains, owing to their rigorous enforcement of rules against harm to any
living creature, were obliged to become, effectively, a mercantile
caste). Mercantile interests fully supported Aśoka’s reforms. Yet the
result was not an increase in the use of cash in everyday affairs but
exactly the opposite.

Early Buddhist economic attitudes have long been considered a bit
mysterious. On the one hand, monks could not own property as
individuals; they were expected to live an austere communistic life with
little more than a robe and begging bowl as personal possessions, and
they were strictly forbidden to so much as touch anything made of gold
or silver. On the other hand, however suspicious of precious metals,
Buddhism had always had a liberal attitude toward credit arrangements.
It is one of the few of the great world religions that has never
formally condemned usury.⁴³ Taken in the context of the times, however,
there’s nothing particularly mysterious about any of this. It makes
perfect sense for a religious movement that rejected violence and
militarism, but that was in no way opposed to commerce.⁴⁴ As we shall
see, while Aśoka’s own empire was not long to endure, soon to be
replaced by a succession of ever weaker and mostly smaller states,
Buddhism took root. The decline of the great armies eventually led to
the near-disappearance of coinage, but also to a veritable efflorescence
of increasingly sophisticated forms of credit.


China

Until about 475 bc, northern China was still nominally an empire, but
the emperors had devolved into figureheads and a series of de facto
kingdoms had emerged. The period from 475 to 221 bc is referred as the
“Warring States period”; at that point, even the pretense of unity was
cast aside. Ultimately, the country was reunited by the state of Qin,
who established a dynasty that was then immediately overthrown by a
series of massive popular insurrections, ushering in the Han dynasty
(206 bc-220 ad), founded by a previously obscure rural constable and
peasant leader named Liu Bao, who was the first Chinese leader to adopt
the Confucian ideology, exam system, and pattern of civil administration
that were to continue for almost two thousand years.

Still, the golden age of Chinese philosophy was the period of chaos that
preceded unification, and this followed the typical Axial Age pattern:
the same fractured political landscape, the same rise of trained,
professional armies and the creation of coined money largely in order to
pay them.⁴⁵ We also see the same government policies designed to
encourage the development of markets, chattel slavery on a scale not
seen before or since in Chinese history, the appearance of itinerant
philosophers and religious visionaries, battling intellectual schools,
and eventually, attempts by political leaders to transform the new
philosophies into religions of state.⁴⁶

There were also significant differences, starting with the currency
system. China never minted gold or silver coins. Merchants used precious
metals in the form of bullion, but the coins in actual circulation were
basically small change: cast bronze disks, usually with a hole in the
middle so that they could be strung together. Such strings of “cash”
were produced in extraordinary numbers, and very large amounts had to be
assembled for large-scale transactions: when wealthy men wished to make
donations to temples, for instance, they had to use oxcarts to carry the
money. The most plausible explanation is that, especially after
unification, Chinese armies were enormous—some Warring States armies
numbered up to a million—but not nearly as professional or well paid as
those of kingdoms farther west, and from Qin and Han times on, rulers
were careful to ensure that this remained the case, to make sure the
army never became an independent power base.⁴⁷

There was also a notable difference in that the new religious and
philosophical movements in China were from their very beginnings also
social movements. Elsewhere, they only gradually became so. In ancient
Greece, philosophy began with cosmological speculation; philosophers
were more likely to be individual sages, perhaps surrounded by a few
ardent disciples, as founders of movements.⁴⁸ Under the Roman empire,
schools of philosophy like the Stoics, Epicureans, Neo-Platonists did
become movements of a sort: at least in the sense that they had
thousands of educated adherents, who “practiced” philosophy not only by
reading, writing, and debating, but even more by meditation, diet, and
exercise. Still, philosophical movements were basically confined to the
civic elite; it was only with the rise of Christianity and other
religious movements that philosophy moved beyond it.⁴⁹ One can observe a
similar evolution in India, from individual Brahman world-renouncers,
forest sages, and wandering mendicants with theories about the nature of
the soul or the composition of the material universe; to philosophical
movements of the Buddhists, Jains, Ājīvika, and others mostly long
forgotten; to, finally, mass religious movements with thousands of
monks, shrines, schools, and networks of lay supporters.

In China, while many of the founders of the “hundred schools” of
philosophy that blossomed under the Warring States were wandering sages
who spent their days moving from city to city trying to catch the ears
of princes, others were leaders of social movements from the very start.
Some of these movements didn’t even have leaders, like the School of the
Tillers, an anarchist movement of peasant intellectuals who set out to
create egalitarian communities in the cracks and fissures between
states.⁵⁰ The Mohists, egalitarian rationalists whose social base seems
to have been urban artisans, not only were philosophically opposed to
war and militarism, but organized battalions of military engineers who
would actively discourage conflicts by volunteering to fight in any war
against the side of the aggressor. Even the Confucians, for all the
importance they attached to courtly ritual, were in their early days
mainly known for their efforts in popular education.⁵¹


Materialism I: The Pursuit of Profit

What is one to make of all this? The popular education campaigns of the
period perhaps provide a clue. The Axial Age was the first time in human
history when familiarity with the written word was no longer limited to
priests, administrators, and merchants, but had become necessary to full
participation in civic life. In Athens, it was taken for granted that
only a country bumpkin would be entirely illiterate.

Without mass literacy, neither the emergence of mass intellectual
movements, nor the spread of Axial Age ideas would have been possible.
By the end of the period, these ideas had produced a world where even
the leaders of barbarian armies descending on the Roman empire felt
obliged to take a position on the question of the Mystery of the
Trinity, and where Chinese monks could spend time debating the relative
merits of the eighteen schools of Classical Indian Buddhism.

No doubt the growth of markets played a role too, not only helping to
free people from the proverbial shackles of status or community, but
encouraging a certain habit of rational calculation, of measuring inputs
and outputs, means and ends, all of which must inevitably have found
some echoes in the new spirit of rational inquiry that begins to appear
in all the same times and places. Even the word “rational” is telling:
it derives, of course, from “ratio”—how many of X go into Y—a sort of
mathematical calculation previously used mainly by architects and
engineers, but which, with the rise of markets, everyone who didn’t want
to get cheated at the marketplace had to learn how to do. Still, we must
be careful here. After all, money in itself was nothing new. Sumerian
farmers and tradesmen were already perfectly capable of making such
calculations in 3500 bc; but none, as far as we know, were so impressed
that they concluded, like Pythagoras, that mathematical ratios were the
key to understanding the nature of the universe and the movement of
celestial bodies, and that all things were ultimately composed of
numbers—and they certainly hadn’t formed secret societies based on
sharing this understanding, debating and purging and excommunicating one
another.⁵²

To understand what had changed, we have to look, again, at the
particular _kind_ of markets that were emerging at the beginning of the
Axial Age: impersonal markets, born of war, in which it was possible to
treat even neighbors as if they were strangers.

Within human economies, motives are assumed to be complex. When a lord
gives a gift to a retainer, there is no reason to doubt that it is
inspired by a genuine desire to benefit that retainer, even if it is
also a strategic move designed to ensure loyalty, and an act of
magnificence meant to remind everyone else that he is great and the
retainer small. There is no sense of contradiction here. Similarly,
gifts between equals are usually fraught with many layers of love, envy,
pride, spite, communal solidarity, or any of a dozen other things.
Speculating on such matters is a major form of daily entertainment.
What’s missing, though, is any sense that the most selfish
(“self-interested”) motive is necessarily the real one: those
speculating on hidden motives are just as likely to assume that someone
is secretly trying to help a friend or harm an enemy as to acquire some
advantage for him- or herself.⁵³ Neither is any of this likely to have
changed much in the rise of early credit markets, where the value of an
IOU was as much dependent on assessments of its issuer’s character as on
his disposable income, and motives of love, envy, pride, etc. could
never be completely set aside.

Cash transactions between strangers were different, and all the more so
when trading is set against a background of war and emerges from
disposing of loot and provisioning soldiers; when one often had best not
ask where the objects traded came from, and where no one is much
interested in forming ongoing personal relationships anyway. Here,
transactions really do become simply a figuring-out of how many of X
will go for how many of Y, of calculating proportions, estimating
quality, and trying to get the best deal for oneself. The result, during
the Axial Age, was a new way of thinking about human motivation, a
radical simplification of motives that made it possible to begin
speaking of concepts like “profit” and “advantage”—and imagining that
this is what people are _really_ pursuing, in every aspect of existence,
as if the violence of war or the impersonality of the marketplace has
simply allowed them to drop the pretense that they ever cared about
anything else. It was this, in turn, that allowed human life to seem
like it could be reduced to a matter of means-to-end calculation, and
hence something that could be examined using the same means that one
used to study the attraction and repulsion of celestial bodies.⁵⁴ If the
underlying assumption very much resembles those of contemporary
economists, it’s no coincidence—but with the difference that, in an age
when money, markets, states, and military affairs were all intrinsically
connected, money was needed to pay armies to capture slaves to mine gold
to produce money; when “cutthroat competition” often did involve the
literal cutting of throats, it never occurred to anyone to imagine that
selfish ends could be pursued by peaceful means. Certainly, this picture
of humanity does begin to appear, with startling consistency, across
Eurasia, wherever we also see coinage and philosophy appear.

China provides an unusually transparent case in point. Already in
Confucius’s time, Chinese thinkers were speaking of the pursuit of
profit as the driving force in human life. The actual term used was
_li_, a word first used to refer to the increase of grain one harvests
from a field over and above what one originally planted (the pictogram
represents a sheaf of wheat next to a knife).⁵⁵ From there it came to
mean commercial profit, and thence, a general term for “benefit” or
“payback.” The following story, which purports to tell the reaction of a
merchant’s son named Lü Buwei on learning that an exiled prince was
living nearby, illustrates the progression nicely:

On returning home, he said to his father, “What is the profit on
investment that one can expect from plowing fields?”

“Ten times the investment,” replied his father.

“And the return on investment in pearls and jades is how much?”

“A hundredfold.”

“And the return on investment from establishing a ruler and securing the
state would be how much?”

“It would be incalculable.”⁵⁶

Lü adopted the prince’s cause and eventually contrived to make him King
of Qin. He went on to became first minister for the king’s son, Qin Shi
Huang, helping him defeat the other Warring States to became the first
Emperor of China. We still have a compendium of political wisdom that Lü
commissioned for the new emperor, which contains such military advice as
the following:

As a general principle, when an enemy’s army comes, it seeks some
profit. Now if they come and find the prospect of death instead, they
will consider running away the most profitable thing to do. When all
one’s enemies consider running to be the most profitable thing to do, no
blades will cross.

This is the most essential point in military matters.⁵⁷

In such a world, heroic considerations of honor and glory, vows to gods
or desire for vengeance, were at best weaknesses to be manipulated. In
the numerous manuals on statecraft produced at the time, everything was
cast as a matter of recognizing interest and advantage, calculating how
to balance that which will profit the ruler against that which will
profit the people, determining when the ruler’s interests are the same
as the people’s and when they contradict.⁵⁸ Technical terms drawn from
politics, economics, and military strategy (“return on investment,”
“strategic advantage”) blended and overlapped.

The predominant school of political thought under the Warring States was
that of the Legalists, who insisted that in matters of statecraft, a
ruler’s interests were the only consideration, even if rulers would be
unwise to admit this. Still, the people could be easily manipulated,
since they had the same motivations: the people’s pursuit of profit,
wrote Lord Shang, is utterly predictable, “just like the tendency of
water to flow downhill.”⁵⁹ Shang was harsher than most of his fellow
Legalists in that he believed that widespread prosperity would
ultimately harm the ruler’s ability to mobilize his people for war, and
therefore that terror was the most efficient instrument of governance,
but even he insisted that this regime be clothed as a regime of law and
justice.

Wherever the military-coinage-slavery complex began to take hold, we
find political theorists propounding similar ideas. Kautilya was no
different: the title of his book, the _Arthasastra_, is usually
translated as “manual of statecraft,” since it consists of advice to
rulers, but its more literal translation is “the science of material
gain.”⁶⁰ Like the Legalists, Kautilya emphasized the need to create a
pretext that governance was a matter of morality and justice, but in
addressing the rulers themselves, he insisted that “war and peace are
considered solely from the point of view of profit”—of amassing wealth
to create a more effective army, of using the army to dominate markets
and control resources to amass more wealth, and so on.⁶¹ In Greece we’ve
already met Thrasymachos. True, Greece was slightly different. Greek
city-states did not have kings, and the collapse of private interests
and affairs of state was in principle universally denounced as tyranny.
Still, in practice, what this meant was that city-states, and even
political factions, ended up acting in precisely the same coldly
calculating way as Indian or Chinese sovereigns. Anyone who has ever
read Thucydides’ Melian dialogue—in which Athenian generals present the
population of a previously friendly city with elegantly reasoned
arguments for why the Athenians have determined that it is to the
advantage of their empire to threaten them with collective massacre if
they are not willing to become tribute-paying subjects, and why it is
equally in the interests of the Melians to submit—is aware of the
results.⁶²

Another striking feature of this literature is its resolute materialism.
Goddesses and gods, magic and oracles, sacrificial ritual, ancestral
cults, even caste and ritual status systems all either disappear or are
sidelined, no longer treated as ends in themselves but as yet mere tools
to be used for the pursuit of material gain.

That intellectuals willing to produce such theories should win the ears
of princes is hardly surprising. Neither is it particularly surprising
that other intellectuals should have been so offended by this sort of
cynicism that they began to make common cause with the popular movements
that inevitably began to form against those princes. But as is so often
the case, oppositional intellectuals were faced with two choices: either
adopt the reigning terms of debate, or try to come up with a diametrical
inversion. Mo Di, the founder of Mohism, took the first approach. He
turned the concept of li, profit, into something more like “social
utility,” and then he attempted to demonstrate that war itself is, by
definition, an unprofitable activity. For example, he wrote, campaigns
can only be fought in spring and autumn, and each had equally
deleterious effects:

If in the spring then the people miss their sowing and planting, if in
the autumn, they miss their reaping and harvesting. Even if they miss
only one season, then the number of people who will die of cold and
hunger is incalculable. Now let us calculate the army’s equipment, the
arrows, standards, tents, armor, shields, and sword hilts; the number of
these which will break and perish and not come back … So also with oxen
and horses …⁶³

His conclusion: if one could add up the total costs of aggression in
human lives, animal lives, and material damage, one would be forced to
the conclusion that they never outweighed the benefits—even for the
victor. In fact, Mo Di took this sort of logic so far that he ended up
arguing that the only way to optimize the overall profit of humanity was
to abandon the pursuit of private profit entirely and adopt a principle
of what he called “universal love”—essentially arguing that if one takes
the principle of market exchange to its logical conclusion, it can only
lead to a kind of communism.

The Confucians took the opposite approach, rejecting the initial
premise. A good example is most of the opening of Mencius’
much-remembered conversation with King Hui:

“Venerable Sir,” the King greeted him, “since you have not counted a
thousand miles too far to come here, may I suppose that you also have
something with which you may profit my kingdom?”

Mencius replied:

“Why must Your Majesty necessarily use this word ‘profit’? What I have
are only these two topics: benevolence and righteousness, and nothing
else.”⁶⁴

Still, the end-point was roughly the same. The Confucian ideal of ren,
of humane benevolence, was basically just a more complete inversion of
profit-seeking calculation than Mo Di’s universal love; the main
difference was that the Confucians added a certain aversion to
calculation itself, preferring what might almost be called an art of
decency. Taoists were later to take this even further with their embrace
of intuition and spontaneity. All were so many attempts to provide a
mirror image of market logic. Still, a mirror image is, ultimately, just
that: the same thing, only backwards. Before long we end up with an
endless maze of paired opposites—egoism versus altruism, profit versus
charity, materialism versus idealism, calculation versus
spontaneity—none of which could ever have been imagined except by
someone starting out from pure, calculating, self-interested market
transactions.⁶⁵


Materialism II: Substance

_As in the near presence of death, despise poor flesh, this refuse of
blood and bones, this web and tissue of nerves and veins and arteries_.

—Marcus Aurelius, _Meditations 2.2_

_Taking pity on the hungry wolf, Wenshuang announced, “I do not covet
this filthy bag of meat. I give it over to you that I may quickly
acquire a body of more enduring strength. This donation will help
benefit us both.”_

_—Discourse on the Pure Land 21.12_

As I’ve already observed, China was unusual because philosophy there
began with debates about ethics and only later turned to speculations
about the nature of the cosmos. In both Greece and India, cosmological
speculation came first. In each, too, questions about the nature of the
physical universe quickly give way to speculation about mind, truth,
consciousness, meaning, language, illusion, world-spirits, cosmic
intelligence, and the fate of the human soul.

This particular maze of mirrors is so complex and dazzling that it’s
extraordinarily difficult to discern the starting point—that is, what,
precisely, is being reflected back and forth. Here anthropology can be
helpful, as anthropologists have the unique advantage of being able to
observe how human beings who have not previously been part of these
conversations react when first exposed to Axial Age concepts. Every now
and then too, we are presented with moments of exceptional clarity: ones
that reveal the essence of our own thought to be almost exactly the
opposite of what we thought it to be.

Maurice Leenhardt, a Catholic missionary who had spent many long years
teaching the Gospel in New Caledonia, experienced such a moment in the
1920s, when he asked one of his students, an aged sculptor named
Boesoou, how he felt about having been introduced to spiritual ideas:

Once, waiting to assess the mental progress of the Canaques I had taught
for many years, I risked the following suggestion: “In short, we
introduced the notion of the spirit to your way of thinking?”

He objected, “Spirit? Bah! You didn’t bring us the spirit. We already
knew the spirit existed. We have always acted in accord with the spirit.
What you’ve brought us is the body.”⁶⁶

The notion that humans had souls appeared to Boesoou to be self-evident.
The notion that there was such a thing as the body, apart from the soul,
a mere material collection of nerves and tissues—let alone that the body
is the prison of the soul; that the mortification of the body could be a
means to the glorification or liberation of the soul—all this, it turns
out, struck him as utterly new and exotic.

Axial Age spirituality, then, is built on a bedrock of materialism. This
is its secret; one might almost say, the thing that has become invisible
to us.⁶⁷ But if one looks at the very beginnings of philosophical
inquiry in Greece and India—the point when there was as yet no
difference between what we’d now call “philosophy” and what we’d now
call “science”—this is exactly what one finds. “Theory,” if we can call
it that, begins with the questions: “What substance is the world made
of?” “What is the underlying material behind the physical forms of
objects in the world?” “Is everything made up of varying combinations of
certain basic elements (earth, air, water, fire, stone, motion, mind,
number …), or are these basic elements just the forms taken by some even
more elementary substance (for instance, as NyĀya and later Democritus
proposed, atomic particles …)”⁶⁸ In just about every case, some notion
of God, Mind, Spirit, some active organizing principle that gave form to
and was not itself substance, emerged as well. But this was the kind of
spirit that, like Leenhardt’s God, only emerges in relation to inert
matter.⁶⁹

To connect this impulse, too, with the invention of coinage might seem
like pushing things a bit far but, at least for the Classical world,
there is an emerging scholarly literature—first set off by Harvard
literary theorist Marc Shell, and more recently set forth by British
classicist Richard Seaford in a book called _Money and the Early Greek
Mind—_that aims to do exactly that.⁷⁰

In fact, some of the historical connections are so uncannily close that
they are very hard to explain any other way. Let me give an example.
After the first coins were minted around 600 bc in the kingdom of Lydia,
the practice quickly spread to Ionia, the Greek cities of the adjacent
coast. The greatest of these was the great walled metropolis of Miletus,
which also appears to have been the first Greek city to strike its own
coins. It was Ionia, too, that provided the bulk of the Greek
mercenaries active in the Mediterranean at the time, with Miletus their
effective headquarters. Miletus was also the commercial center of the
region, and, perhaps, the first city in the world where everyday market
transactions came to be carried out primarily in coins instead of
credit.⁷¹ Greek philosophy, in turn, begins with three men: Thales, of
Miletus (c. 624 bc–c. 546 bc), Anaximander, of Miletus (c. 610 bc–c. 546
bc), and Anaximenes, of Miletus (c. 585 bc–c. 525 bc)—in other words,
men who were living in that city at exactly the time that coinage was
first introduced.⁷² All three are remembered chiefly for their
speculations on the nature of the physical substance from which the
world ultimately sprang. Thales proposed water, Anaximenes, air.
Anaximander made up a new term, _apeiron_, “the unlimited,” a kind of
pure abstract substance that could not itself be perceived but was the
material basis of everything that could be. In each case, the assumption
was that this primal substance, by being heated, cooled, combined,
divided, compressed, extended, or set in motion, gave rise to the
endless particular stuffs and substances that humans actually encounter
in the world, from which physical objects are composed—and was also that
into which all those forms would eventually dissolve.

It was something that could turn into everything. As Seaford emphasizes,
so was money. Gold, shaped into coins, is a material substance that is
also an abstraction. It is both a lump of metal and something more than
a lump of metal—it’s a drachma or an obol, a unit of currency which (at
least if collected in sufficient quantity, taken to the right place at
the right time, turned over to the right person) could be exchanged for
absolutely any other object whatsoever.⁷³

For Seaford, what was genuinely new about coins was their
double-sidedness: the fact that they were both valuable pieces of metal
and, at the same time, something more. At least within the communities
that created them, ancient coins were always worth more than the gold,
silver, or copper of which they were composed. Seaford refers to this
extra value by the inelegant term “fiduciarity,” which comes from the
term for public trust, the confidence a community places in its
currency.⁷⁴ True, at the height of Classical Greece, when there were
hundreds of city-states producing different currencies according to a
number of different systems of weights and denominations, merchants
often did carry scales and treat coins—particularly foreign coins—like
so many chunks of silver, just as Indian merchants seem to have treated
Roman coins; but within a city, that city’s currency had a special
status, since it was always acceptable at face value when used to pay
taxes, public fees, or legal penalties. This is, incidentally, why
ancient governments were so often able to introduce base metal into
their coins without leading to immediate inflation; a debased coin might
have lost value when traded overseas, but at home, it was still worth
just as much when purchasing a license, or entering the public
theater.⁷⁵ This is also why, during publc emergencies, Greek city-states
would occasionally strike coins made entirely of bronze or tin, which
everyone would agree, while the emergency lasted, to treat as if they
were really made of silver.⁷⁶

This is the key to Seaford’s argument about materialism and Greek
philosophy. A coin was a piece of metal, but by giving it a particular
shape, stamped with words and images, the civic community agreed to make
it something more. But this power was not unlimited. Bronze coins could
not be used forever; if one debased the coinage, inflation would
eventually set in. It was as if there was a tension there, between the
will of the community and the physical nature of the object itself.
Greek thinkers were suddenly confronted with a profoundly new type of
object, one of extraordinary importance—as evidenced by the fact that so
many men were willing to risk their lives to get their hands on it—but
whose nature was a profound enigma.

Consider this word, “materialism.” What does it mean to adopt a
“materialist” philosophy? What is “material,” anyway? Normally, we speak
of “materials” when we refer to objects that we wish to make into
something else. A tree is a living thing. It only becomes “wood” when we
begin to think about all the other things you could carve out of it. And
of course you can carve a piece of wood into almost anything. The same
is true of clay, or glass, or metal. They’re solid and real and
tangible, but also abstractions, because they have the potential to turn
into almost anything else—or, not precisely that; one can’t turn a piece
of wood into a lion or an owl, but one can turn it into an image of a
lion or an owl—it can take on almost any conceivable form. So already in
any materialist philosophy, we are dealing with an opposition between
form and content, substance and shape; a clash between the idea, sign,
emblem, or model in the creator’s mind, and the physical qualities of
the materials on which it is to be stamped, built, or imposed, from
which it will be brought into reality.⁷⁷ With coins this rises to an
even more abstract level because that emblem can no longer be conceived
as the model in one person’s head, but is rather the mark of a
collective agreement. The images stamped on Greek coins (Miletus’ lion,
Athens’ owl) were typically the emblems of the city’s god, but they were
also a kind of collective promise, by which citizens assured one another
that not only would the coin be acceptable in payment of public debts,
but in a larger sense, that everyone would accept them, for any debts,
and thus, that they could be use to acquire anything anyone wanted.

The problem is that this collective power is not unlimited. It only
really applies within the city. The farther you go outside, into places
dominated by violence, slavery, and war—the sort of place where even
philosophers taking a cruise might end up on the auction block—the more
it turns into a mere lump of precious metal.⁷⁸

The war between Spirit and Flesh, then, between the noble Idea and ugly
Reality, the rational intellect versus stubborn corporeal drives and
desires that resist it, even the idea that peace and community are not
things that emerge spontaneously but that need to be stamped onto our
baser material natures like a divine insignia stamped into base
metal—all those ideas that came to haunt the religious and philosophical
traditions of the Axial Age, and that have continued to surprise people
like Boesoou ever since—can already be seen as inscribed in the nature
of this new form of money.

It would be foolish to argue that all Axial Age philosophy was simply a
meditation on the nature of coinage, but I think Seaford is right to
argue that this is a critical starting place: one of the reasons that
the pre-Socratic philosophers began to frame their questions in the
peculiar way they did, asking (for instance): What are Ideas? Are they
merely collective conventions? Do they exist, as Plato insisted, in some
divine domain beyond material existence? Or do they exist in our minds?
Or do our minds themselves ultimately partake of that divine immaterial
domain? And if they do, what does this say about our relation to our
bodies?

[]

In India and China, the debate took different forms, but materialism was
always the starting point. We only know the ideas of most truly
materialist thinkers from the works of their intellectual enemies: as is
the case with the Indian king PĀyĀsi, who enjoyed debating Buddhist and
Jain philosophers, taking the position that the soul does not exist,
that human bodies are nothing but particular configurations of air,
water, earth, and fire, their consciousness the result of the elements’
mutual interaction, and that when we die, the elements simply
dissolve.⁷⁹ Clearly, though, such ideas were commonplace. Even the Axial
Age religions are often startlingly lacking in the plethora of
supernatural forces seen before and after: as witnessed by continued
debates over whether Buddhism even _is_ a religion, since it rejects any
notion of a supreme being, or whether Confucius’ admonitions that one
should continue to venerate one’s ancestors was merely a way of
encouraging filial piety, or based on a belief that dead ancestors did,
in some sense, continue to exist. The fact that we have to ask says
everything. Yet at the same time, what endures, above all, from that
age—in institutional terms—are what we call the “world religions.”

What we see then is a strange kind of back-and-forth, attack and
riposte, whereby the market, the state, war, and religion all
continually separate and merge with one another. Let me summarize it as
briefly as I can:

1) Markets appear to have first emerged, in the Near East at least, as a
side effect of government administrative systems. Over time, however,
the logic of the market became entangled in military affairs, where it
became almost indistinguishable from the mercenary logic of Axial Age
warfare, and then, finally, that logic came to conquer government
itself; to define its very purpose.

2) As a result: everywhere we see the military-coinage-slavery complex
emerge, we also see the birth of materialist philosophies. They are
materialist, in fact, in both senses of the term: in that they envision
a world made up of material forces, rather than divine powers, and in
that they imagine the ultimate end of human existence to be the
accumulation of material wealth, with ideals like morality and justice
being reframed as tools designed to satisfy the masses.

3) Everywhere, too, we find philosophers who react to this by exploring
ideas of humanity and the soul, attempting to find a new foundation for
ethics and morality.

4) Everywhere some of these philosophers made common cause with social
movements that inevitably formed in the face of these new and
extraordinarily violent and cynical elites. The result was something new
to human history: popular movements that were also intellectual
movements, due to the assumption that those opposing existing power
arrangements did so in the name of some kind of theory about the nature
of reality.

5) Everywhere, these movements were first and foremost peace movements,
in that they rejected the new conception of violence, and especially
aggressive war, as the foundation of politics.

6) Everywhere too, there seems to have been an initial impulse to use
the new intellectual tools provided by impersonal markets to come up
with a new basis for morality, and everywhere, it foundered. Mohism,
with its notion of social profit, flourished briefly and then collapsed.
It was replaced by Confucianism, which rejected such ideas outright. We
have already seen that reimagining moral responsibility in terms of
debt—an impulse that cropped up in both Greece and India—while almost
inevitable given the new economic circumstances, seems to prove
uniformly unsatisfying.⁸⁰ The stronger impulse is to imagine another
world where debt—and with it, all other worldly connections—can be
entirely annihilated, where social attachments are seen as forms of
bondage; just as the body is a prison.

7) Rulers’ attitudes changed over time. At first, most appear to have
affected an attitude of bemused tolerance toward the new philosophical
and religious movements while privately embracing some version of
cynical realpolitik, But as warring cities and principalities were
replaced by great empires, and especially, as those empires began to
reach the limits of their expansion, sending the
military-coinage-slavery complex into crisis, all this suddenly changed.
In India, Aśoka tried to re-found his kingdom on Buddhism; in Rome,
Constantine turned to the Christians; in China, the Han emperor Wu-Ti
(157–87 BC), faced with a similar military and financial crisis, adopted
Confucianism as the philosophy of state. Of the three, only Wu Ti was
ultimately successful: the Chinese empire endured, in one form or
another, for two thousand years, almost always with Confucianism as its
official ideology. In Constantine’s case the Western empire fell apart,
but the Roman church endured. Aśoka’s project could be said to be the
least successful. Not only did his empire fall apart, replaced by an
endless series of weaker, usually fragmentary kingdoms, but Buddhism
itself was largely driven out of his one-time territories, though it did
establish itself much more firmly in China, Nepal, Tibet, Sri Lanka,
Korea, Japan, and much of Southeast Asia.

8) The ultimate effect was a kind of ideal division of spheres of human
activity that endures to this day: on the one hand the market, on the
other, religion. To put the matter crudely: if one relegates a certain
social space simply to the selfish acquisition of material things, it is
almost inevitable that soon someone else will come to set aside another
domain in which to preach that, from the perspective of ultimate values,
material things are unimportant; that selfishness—or even the self—are
illusory, and that to give is better than to receive. If nothing else,
it is surely significant that all the Axial Age religions emphasized the
importance of charity, a concept that had barely existed before. Pure
greed and pure generosity are complementary concepts; neither could
really be imagined without the other; both could only arise in
institutional contexts that insisted on such pure and single-minded
behavior; and both seem to have appeared together wherever impersonal,
physical, cash money also appeared on the scene.

As for the religious movements: it would be easy enough to write them
off as escapist, as promising the victims of the Axial Age empires
liberation in the next world as a way of letting them accept their lot
in this one, and convincing the rich that all they really owed the poor
were occasional charitable donations. Radical thinkers almost invariably
do write them off in this way. Surely, the willingness of the
governments themselves to eventually embrace them would seem to support
this conclusion. But the issue is more complicated. First of all, there
is something to be said for escapism. Popular uprisings in the ancient
world usually ended in the massacre of the rebels. As I’ve already
observed, physical escape, such as via exodus or defection, has always
been the most effective response to oppressive conditions since the
earliest times we know about. Where physical escape is not possible,
what, exactly, is an oppressed peasant supposed to do? Sit and
contemplate her misery? At the very least, otherworldly religions
provided glimpses of radical alternatives. Often they allowed people to
create other worlds within this one, liberated spaces of one sort or
another. It is surely significant that the only people who succeeded in
abolishing slavery in the ancient world were religious sects, such as
the Essenes—who did so, effectively, by defecting from the larger social
order and forming their own utopian communities.⁸¹ Or, in a smaller but
more enduring example: the democratic city-states of northern India were
all eventually stamped out by the great empires (Kautilya provides
extensive advice on how to subvert and destroy democratic
constitutions), but the Buddha admired the democratic organization of
their public assemblies and adopted it as the model for his followers.⁸²
Buddhist monasteries are still called _sangha_, the ancient name for
such republics, and continue to operate by the same consensus-finding
process to this day, preserving a certain egalitarian democratic ideal
that would otherwise have been entirely forgotten.

Finally, the larger historical achievements of these movements are not,
in fact, insignificant. As they took hold, things began to change. Wars
became less brutal and less frequent. Slavery faded as an institution,
to the point at which, by the Middle Ages, it had become insignificant
or even nonexistent across most of Eurasia. Everywhere too, the new
religious authorities began to seriously address the social dislocations
introduced by debt.



CHAPTER TEN  THE MIDDLE AGES



_(600 – 450 AD)_


_Artificial wealth comprises the things which of themselves satisfy no
natural need, for example money, which is a human contrivance_.

—St. Thomas Aquinas

IF THE AXIAL AGE saw the emergence of complementary ideals of commodity
markets and universal world religions, the Middle Ages were the period
in which those two institutions began to merge.

Everywhere, the age began with the collapse of empires. Eventually, new
states formed, but in these new states, the nexus between war, bullion,
and slavery was broken; conquest and acquisition for their own sake were
no longer celebrated as the end of all political life. At the same time,
economic life, from the conduct of international trade to the
organization of local markets, came to fall increasingly under the
regulation of religious authorities. One result was a widespread
movement to control, or even forbid, predatory lending. Another was a
return, across Eurasia, to various forms of virtual credit money.

Granted, this is not the way we’re used to thinking of the Middle Ages.
For most of us, “Medieval” remains a synonym for superstition,
intolerance, and oppression. Yet for most of the earth’s inhabitants, it
could only be seen as an extraordinary improvement over the terrors of
the Axial Age.

One reason for our skewed perception is that we’re used to thinking of
the Middle Ages as something that happened primarily in Western Europe,
in territories that had been little more than border outposts of the
Roman Empire to begin with. According to the conventional wisdom, with
the collapse of the empire, the cities were largely abandoned and the
economy “reverted to barter,” taking at least five centuries to recover.
Even for Europe, though, this is based on a series of unquestioned
assumptions that, as I’ve said, crumble the moment one starts seriously
poking at them. Chief among them is the idea that the absence of coins
means the absence of money. True, the destruction of the Roman war
machine also meant that Roman coins went out of circulation; and the few
coins produced within the Gothic or Frankish kingdoms that established
themselves over the ruins of the old empire were largely fiduciary in
nature.¹ Still, a glance at the “barbarian law codes” reveals that even
at the height of the Dark Ages, people were still carefully keeping
accounts in Roman money as they calculated interest rates, contracts,
and mortgages. Again, cities shriveled, and many were abandoned, but
even this was something of a mixed blessing. Certainly, it had a
terrible effect on literacy; but one must also bear in mind that ancient
cities could only be maintained by extracting resources from the
countryside. Roman Gaul, for instance, had been a network of cities,
connected by the famous Roman roads to an endless succession of slave
plantations, which were owned by the urban grandees.² After around 400
ad, the population of the towns declined radically, but the plantations
also disappeared. In the following centuries, many came to be replaced
by manors, churches, and even later, castles—where new local lords
extracted their own dues from the surrounding farmers. But one need only
do the math: since Medieval agriculture was no less efficient than
ancient agriculture (in fact, it rapidly became a great deal more so),
the amount of work required to feed a handful of mounted warriors and
clergymen could not possibly have been anything like that required to
feed entire cities. However oppressed Medieval serfs might have been,
their plight was nothing compared with that of their Axial Age
equivalents.

Still, the Middle Ages proper are best seen as having begun not in
Europe but in India and China, between 400 and 600 ad, and then sweeping
across much of the western half of Eurasia with the advent of Islam.
They only really reached Europe four hundred years later. Let us begin
our story, then, in India.


Medieval India  (Flight into Hierarchy)

I left off in India with Aśoka’s embrace of Buddhism, but I noted that
ultimately, his project foundered. Neither his empire nor his church was
to endure. It took a good deal of time, however, for this failure to
occur.

The Mauryans represented a high watermark of empire. The next five
hundred years saw a succession of kingdoms, most of them strongly
supportive of Buddhism. Stupas and monasteries sprang up everywhere, but
the states that sponsored them grew weaker and weaker; centralized
armies dissolved; soldiers, like officials, increasingly came to be paid
by land grants rather than salaries. As a result, the number of coins in
circulation steadily declined.³ Here too, the early Middle Ages
witnessed a dramatic decline of cities: where the Greek ambassador
Megasthenes described Aśoka’s capital of Patna as the largest city in
the world of his day, Medieval Arab and Chinese travelers described
India as a land of endless tiny villages.

As a result, most historians have come to write, much as they do in
Europe, of a collapse of the money economy; of commerce becoming a
“reversion to barter.” Here too, this appears to be simply untrue. What
vanished were the military means to extract resources from the peasants.
In fact, Hindu law-books written at the time show increasing attention
to credit arrangements, with a sophisticated language of sureties,
collateral, mortgages, promissory notes, and compound interest.⁴ One
need only consider how the Buddhist establishments popping up all over
India during these centuries were funded. While the earliest monks were
wandering mendicants, owning little more than their begging bowls, early
Medieval monasteries were often magnificent establishments with vast
treasuries. Still, in principle, their operations were financed almost
entirely through credit.

The key innovation was the creation of what were called the “perpetual
endowments” or “inexhaustible treasuries.” Say a lay supporter wished to
make a contribution to her local monastery. Rather than offering to
provide candles for a specific ritual, or servants to attend to the
upkeep of the monastic grounds, she would provide a certain sum of
money—or something worth a great deal of money—that would then be loaned
out in the name of the monastery, at the accepted 15-percent annual
rate. The interest on the loan would then be earmarked for that specific
purpose.⁵ An inscription discovered at the Great Monastery of Sanci
sometime around 450 ad provides a handy illustration. A woman named
Harisvamini donates the relatively modest sum of twelve _dinaras_ to the
“Noble Community of Monks.”⁶ The text carefully inscribes how the income
is to be divided up: the interest on five of the dinaras was to provide
daily meals for five different monks, the interest from another three
would pay to light three lamps for the Buddha, in memory of her parents,
and so forth. The inscription ends by saying that this was a permanent
endowment, “created with a document in stone to last as long as the moon
and the sun”: since the principal would never be touched, the
contribution would last forever.⁷

Some of these loans presumably went to individuals, others were
commercial loans to “guilds of bamboo-workers, braziers, and potters,”
or to village assemblies.⁸ We have to assume that in most cases the
money is an accounting unit: what were really being transacted were
animals, wheat, silk, butter, fruit, and all the other goods whose
appropriate rates of interest were so carefully stipulated in the
law-codes of the time. Still, large amounts of gold did end up flowing
into monastic coffers. When coins go out of circulation, after all, the
metal doesn’t simply disappear. In the Middle Ages—and this seems to
have been true across Eurasia—the vast majority of it ended up in
religious establishments, churches, monasteries, and temples, either
stockpiled in hoards and treasuries or gilded onto or cast into altars,
sanctums, and sacred instruments. Above all, it was shaped into images
of gods. As a result, those rulers who did try to put an Axial Age–style
coinage system back into circulation—invariably, to fund some project of
military expansion—often had to pursue self-consciously anti-religious
policies in order to do so. Probably the most notorious was one Harsa,
who ruled Kashmir from 1089 to 1101 ad, who is said to have appointed an
officer called the “Superintendent for the Destruction of the Gods.”
According to later histories, Harsa employed leprous monks to
systematically desecrate divine images with urine and excrement, thus
neutralizing their power, before dragging them off to be melted down.⁹
He is said to have destroyed more than four thousand Buddhist
establishments before being betrayed and killed, the last of his
dynasty—and his miserable fate was long held out as an example of where
the revival of the old ways was likely to lead one in the end.

For the most part, then, the gold remained sacrosanct, laid up in the
sacred places—though in India, over time these were increasingly Hindu
ones, not Buddhist. What we now see as traditional Hindu-village India
appears to have been largely a creation of the early Middle Ages. We do
not know precisely how it happened. As kingdoms continued to rise and
fall, the world inhabited by kings and princes became increasingly
distant from that of most people’s everyday affairs. During much of the
period immediately following the collapse of the Mauryan empire, for
instance, much of India was governed by foreigners.¹⁰ Apparently, this
increasing distance allowed local Brahmins to begin reshaping the
new—increasingly rural—society along strictly hierarchical principles.

They did it above all by seizing control of the administration of law.
The Dharmaśāstra, law-codes produced by Brahmin scholars between roughly
200 bc and 400 ad, give us a good idea of the new vision of society. In
it, old ideas like the Vedic conception of a debt to gods, sages, and
ancestors were resuscitated—but now, they applied only and specifically
to Brahmins, whose duty and privilege it was to stand in for all
humanity before the forces that controlled the universe.¹¹ Far from
being required to attain learning, members of the inferior classes were
forbidden to do so: the Laws of Manu, for instance, set down that any
Sudra (the lowest caste, assigned to farming and material production)
who so much as listened in on the teaching of the law or sacred texts
should have molten lead poured into their ears; on the occasion of a
repeat offense, have their tongues cut out.¹² At the same time Brahmins,
however ferociously they guarded their privileges, also adopted aspects
of once-radical Buddhist and Jain ideas like karma, reincarnation, and
_ahimsa_. Brahmins were expected to refrain from any sort of physical
violence, and even to become vegetarians. In alliance with
representatives of the old warrior caste, they also managed to win
control of most of the land in the ancient villages. Artisans and
craftsmen fleeing the decline or destruction of cities often ended up as
suppliant refugees, and, gradually, low-caste clients. The result were
increasingly complex local patronage systems in the
countryside—_jajmani_ systems, as they came to be known—where the
refugees provided services for the landowning castes, who took on many
of the roles once held by the state, providing protection and justice,
extracting labor dues, and so on—but also protected local communities
from actual royal representatives.¹³

This latter function is crucial. Foreign visitors were later to be awed
by the self-sufficiency of the traditional Indian village, with its
elaborate system of landowning castes, farmers, and such “service
castes” as barbers, smiths, tanners, drummers, and washermen, all
arranged in hierarchical order, each seen as making its own unique and
necessary contribution to their little society, all of it typically
operating entirely without the use of metal currency. It was only
possible for those reduced to the status of Sudras and Untouchables to
have a chance of accepting their lowly position because the exaction of
local landlords was, again, on nothing like the same scale as that under
earlier governments—under which villagers had to support cities of
upwards of a million people—and because the village community became an
effective means of holding the state and its representatives at least
partially at bay.

We don’t know the mechanisms that brought this world about, but the role
of debt was surely significant. The creation of thousands of Hindu
temples alone must have involved hundreds of thousands, even millions,
of interest-bearing loans—since, while Brahmins were themselves
forbidden to lend money at interest, temples were not. We can already
see, in the earliest of the new law-codes, the Laws of Manu, the way
that local authorities were struggling to reconcile old customs like
debt peonage and chattel slavery with the desire to establish an
overarching hierarchical system in which everyone knew their place. The
Laws of Manu carefully classify slaves into seven types depending on how
they were reduced to slavery (war, debt, self-sale …) and explain the
conditions under which each might be emancipated—but then go on to say
that Sudras can never really be emancipated, since, after all, they were
created to serve the other castes.¹⁴ Similarly, where earlier codes had
established a 15-percent annual rate of interest, with exceptions for
commercial loans,¹⁵ the new codes organized interest by caste: stating
that one could charge a maximum of 2 percent a month for a Brahmin, 3
percent for a Ksatriya (warrior), 4 percent for a Vaisya (merchant), and
5 percent for a Sudra—which is the difference between 24 percent
annually on the one extreme and a hefty 60 percent on the other.¹⁶ The
laws also identify five different ways interest can be paid, of which
the most significant for our concerns is “bodily interest”: physical
labor in the creditor’s house or fields, to be rendered until such time
as the principal is cleared. Even here, though, caste considerations
were paramount. No one could be forced into the service of anyone of
lower caste; moreover, since debts were enforceable on a debtor’s
children and even grandchildren, “until the principal is cleared” could
mean quite some time—as the Indian historian R.S. Sharma notes, such
stipulations “remind us of the present practice according to which
several generations of the same family have been reduced to the position
of hereditary ploughmen in consideration of some paltry sum advanced to
them.”¹⁷

Indeed, India has become notorious as a country in which a very large
part of the working population is laboring in effective debt peonage to
a landlord or other creditor. Such arrangements became even easier over
time. By about 1000 ad, restrictions on usury by members of the upper
castes in Hindu law-codes largely disappeared. On the other hand, 1000
ad was about the same time that Islam appeared in India—a religion
dedicated to eradicating usury altogether. So at the very least we can
say that these things never stopped being contested. And even Hindu law
of that time was far more humane than almost anything found in the
ancient world. Debtors were not, generally speaking, reduced to slavery,
and there is no widespread evidence of the selling of women or children.
In fact, overt slavery had largely vanished from the countryside by this
time. And debt peons were not even pawns, exactly; by law, they were
simply paying interest on a freely contracted agreement. Even when that
took generations, the law stipulated that even if the principal was
never paid, in the third generation, they would be freed.

There is a peculiar tension here: a kind of paradox. Debt and credit
arrangements may well have played a crucial role in creating the Indian
village system, but they could never really become their basis. It might
have made a certain sense to declare that, just as Brahmins had to
dispatch their debts to the gods, everyone should be, in a certain
sense, in debt to those above them. But in another sense, that would
have completely subverted the very idea of caste, which was that the
universe was a vast hierarchy in which different sorts of people were
assumed to be of fundamentally different natures, that these ranks and
grades were fixed forever, and that when goods and services moved up and
down the hierarchy, they followed not principles of exchange at all but
(as in all hierarchical systems) custom and precedent. The French
anthropologist Louis Dumont made the famous argument that one cannot
even really talk about “inequality” here, because to use that phrase
implies that one believes people should or could be equal, and this idea
was completely alien to Hindu conceptions.¹⁸ For them to have imagined
their responsibilities as debts would have been profoundly subversive,
since debts are by definition arrangements between equals—at least in
the sense that they are equal parties to a contract—that could and
should be repaid.¹⁹

Politically, it is never a particularly good idea to first tell people
they are your equals, and then humiliate and degrade them. This is
presumably why peasant insurrections, from Chiapas to Japan, have so
regularly aimed to wipe out debts, rather than focus on more structural
issues like caste systems, or even slavery.²⁰ The British Raj discovered
this to their occasional chagrin when they used debt
peonage—superimposed on the caste system—as the basis of their labor
system in colonial India. Perhaps the paradigmatic popular insurrection
was the Deccan riots of 1875, when indebted farmers rose up to seize and
systematically destroy the account books of local money-lenders. Debt
peonage, it would appear, is far more likely to inspire outrage and
collective action than is a system premised on pure inequality.


China:

Buddhism and the Economy of Infinite Debt

By Medieval standards, India was unusual for resisting the appeal of the
great Axial Age religions, but we observe the basic pattern: the decline
of empire, armies, and cash economy, the rise of religious authorities,
independent of the state, who win much of their popular legitimacy
through their ability to regulate emerging credit systems.

China might be said to represent the opposite extreme. This was the one
place where a late Axial Age attempt to yoke empire and religion
together was a complete success. True, here as elsewhere, there was an
initial period of breakdown: after the collapse of the Han dynasty
around 220 ad, the central state broke apart, cities shrank, coins
disappeared, and so on. But in China this was only temporary. As Max
Weber long ago pointed out, once one sets up a genuinely effective
bureaucracy, it’s almost impossible to get rid of it. And the Chinese
bureaucracy was uniquely effective. Before long, the old Han system
reemerged: a centralized state, run by Confucian scholar-gentry trained
in the literary classics, selected through a national exam system,
working in meticulously organized national and regional bureaus where
the money supply, like other economic matters, was continually monitored
and regulated. Chinese monetary theory was always chartalist. This was
partly just an effect of size: the empire and its internal market were
so huge that foreign trade was never especially important; therefore,
those running the government were well aware that they could turn pretty
much anything into money, simply by insisting that taxes be paid in that
form.

The two great threats to the authorities were always the same: the
nomadic peoples to the north (who they systematically bribed, but who
nonetheless periodically swept over and conquered sections of China) and
popular unrest and rebellion. The latter was almost constant, and on a
scale unknown anywhere else in human history. There were decades in
Chinese history when the rate of recorded peasant uprisings was roughly
1.8 _per hour._²¹ What’s more, such uprisings were frequently
successful. Most of the most famous Chinese dynasties that were not the
product of barbarian invasion (the Yuan or Qing) were originally peasant
insurrections (the Han, Tang, Sung, and Ming). In no other part of the
world do we see anything like this. As a result, Chinese statecraft
ultimately came down to funneling enough resources to the cities to feed
the urban population and keep the nomads at bay, without causing a
notoriously contumacious rural population to rise up in arms. The
official Confucian ideology of patriarchal authority, equal opportunity,
promotion of agriculture, light taxes, and careful government control of
merchants seemed expressly designed to appeal to the interests and
sensibilities of a (potentially rebellious) rural patriarch.²²

One need hardly add that in these circumstances, limiting the
depredations of the local village loan shark—the traditional bane of
rural families—was a constant government concern. Over and over we hear
the same familiar story: peasants down on their luck, whether due to
natural disaster or the need to pay for a parent’s funeral—would fall
into the hands of predatory lenders, who would seize their fields and
houses, forcing them to work or pay rent in what had once been their own
lands; the threat of rebellion would then drive the government to
institute a dramatic program of reforms. One of the first we know about
came in the form of a coup d’état in 9 ad, when a Confucian official
named Wang Mang seized the throne to deal (so he claimed) with a
nationwide debt crisis. According to proclamations made at the time, the
practice of usury had caused the effective tax rate (that is, the amount
of the average peasant’s harvest that ended up being carried off by
someone else) to rise from just over 3 percent, to 50 percent.²³ In
reaction, Wang Mang instituted a program reforming the currency,
nationalizing large estates, promoting state-run industries—including
public granaries—and banning private holding of slaves. Wang Mang also
established a state loan agency that would offer interest-free funeral
loans for up to ninety days for those caught unprepared by the death of
relatives, as well as long-term loans of 3 percent monthly or 10 percent
annual income rates for commercial or agricultural investments.²⁴ “With
this scheme,” one historian remarks, “Wang was confident that all
business transactions would be under his scrutiny and the abuse of usury
would be forever eradicated.”²⁵

Needless to say, it was not, and later Chinese history is full of
similar stories: widespread inequality and unrest followed by the
appointment of official commissions of inquiry, regional debt relief
(either blanket amnesties or annulments of all loans in which interest
had exceeded the principal), cheap grain loans, famine relief, laws
against the selling of children.²⁶ All this became the standard fare of
government policy. It was very unevenly successful; it certainly did not
create an egalitarian peasant utopia, but it prevented any widespread
return to Axial Age conditions.

We are used to thinking of such bureaucratic interventions—particularly
the monopolies and regulations—as state restriction on “the
market”—owing to the prevailing prejudice that sees markets as
quasi-natural phenomena that emerge by themselves, and governments as
having no role other than to squelch or siphon from them. I have
repeatedly pointed out how mistaken this is, but China provides a
particularly striking example. The Confucian state may have been the
world’s greatest and most enduring bureaucracy, but it actively promoted
markets, and as a result, commercial life in China soon became far more
sophisticated, and markets more developed, than anywhere else in the
world.

This despite the fact that Confucian orthodoxy was overtly hostile to
merchants and even the profit motive itself. Commercial profit was seen
as legitimate only as compensation for the labor that merchants expended
in transporting goods from one place to another, but never as fruits of
speculation. What this meant in practice was that they were pro-market
but anti-capitalist.

Again, this seems bizarre, since we’re used to assuming that capitalism
and markets are the same thing, but, as the great French historian
Fernand Braudel pointed out, in many ways they could equally well be
conceived as opposites. While markets are ways of exchanging goods
through the medium of money—historically, ways for those with a surplus
of grain to acquire candles and vice versa (in economic shorthand,
C-M-C’, for commodity-money-other commodity)—capitalism is first and
foremost the art of using money to get more money (M-C-M’). Normally,
the easiest way to do this is by establishing some kind of formal or de
facto monopoly. For this reason, capitalists, whether merchant princes,
financiers, or industrialists, invariably try to ally themselves with
political authorities to limit the freedom of the market, so as to make
it easier for them to do so.²⁷ From this perspective, China was for most
of its history the ultimate anti-capitalist market state.²⁸ Unlike later
European princes, Chinese rulers systematically refused to team up with
would-be Chinese capitalists (who always existed). Instead, like their
officials, they saw them as destructive parasites—though, unlike the
usurers, ones whose fundamentally selfish and antisocial motivations
could still be put to use in certain ways. In Confucian terms, merchants
were like soldiers. Those drawn to a career in the military were assumed
to be driven largely by a love of violence. As individuals, they were
not good people; but they were also necessary to defend the frontiers.
Similarly, merchants were driven by greed and basically immoral; yet if
kept under careful administrative supervision, they could be made to
serve the public good.²⁹ Whatever one might think of the principles, the
results are hard to deny. For most of its history, China maintained the
highest standard of living in the world—even England only really
overtook it in perhaps the 1820s, well past the time of the Industrial
Revolution.³⁰

Confucianism is not precisely a religion, perhaps; it is usually
considered more an ethical and philosophical system. So China too could
be considered something of a departure from the common Medieval pattern,
whereby commerce was, almost everywhere, brought under the control of
religion. But it wasn’t a complete departure. One need only consider the
remarkable economic role of Buddhism in this same period. Buddhism had
arrived in China through the Central Asia caravan routes and in its
early days was largely a religion promoted by merchants, but in the
chaos following the collapse of the Han dynasty in 220 ad, it began to
take popular roots. The Liang (502–557) and Tang (618–907) dynasties saw
outbreaks of passionate religious fervor, in which thousands of rural
young people across China would renounce their farms, shops, and
families to seek ordination as Buddhist monks and nuns; where merchants
or landed magnates pledged their entire fortunes to the propagation of
the Dharma; building projects hollowed out whole mountains to create
bodhisattvas and giant statues of the Buddha; and pageants where monks
and devotees ritually burned their heads and hands or, in some
instances, set themselves on fire. By the mid–fifth century, there were
dozens of such spectacular suicides; they became, as one historian put
it “a macabre kind of fashion.”³¹

Historians differ over their meaning. Certainly the passions unleashed
provided a dramatic alternative to the staid orthodoxy of the Confucian
literati, but it’s also surprising, to say the least, to see this in a
religion promoted above all by the commercial classes. The French
Sinologist Jacques Gernet observes:

It is clear that these suicides, so contrary to traditional morality,
aimed to redeem the sins of all beings, to compel the gods and men at
one and the same time. And they were staged: usually, in the fifth
century, a pyre was erected on a mountain. The suicide took place in the
presence of a large crowd uttering lamentations and bringing forward
rich offerings. People of all social ranks attended the spectacle
together. After the fire had burned out, the ashes of the monk were
collected and a stupa, a new place of worship, was created to house
them.³²

Gernet’s picture of dozens of Christ-like redeemers seems overstated,
but the precise meaning of these suicides was unclear—and widely
debated—even in the Middle Ages. Some contemporaries saw them as the
ultimate expression of contempt for the body; others as recognition of
the illusory nature of the self and all material attachments; yet
others, as the ultimate form of charity, the giving of that which can
only be most precious, one’s very physical existence, as a sacrifice to
the benefit of all living things; a sentiment that one tenth-century
biographer expressed in the following verses:

To give away the thing that is difficult to part with,

Is the best offering amongst the alms.

Let this impure and sinful body,

Turn into something like a diamond.³³

That is, an object of eternal value, an investment that can bear fruit
for all eternity.

I draw attention to this because this sentiment provides an elegant
illustration of a problem that seems to have first appeared in the world
with notions of pure charity that always seemed to accompany Axial Age
religions, and which provided endless philosophical conundrums. In human
economies, it does not appear to have occurred to anyone that any act
_could_ be either purely selfish or purely altruistic. As I noted in
chapter five, an act of absolute selfless giving can only also be
absolutely antisocial—hence in a way, inhuman. It is merely the mirror
image of an act of theft or even murder; hence, it makes a certain sort
of sense that suicide be conceived as the ultimate selfless gift. Yet
this is the door that necessarily opens as soon as one develops a notion
of “profit” and then tries to conceive its opposite.

This tension seems to hang over the economic life of Medieval Chinese
Buddhism, which, true to its commercial origins, retained a striking
tendency to employ the language of the marketplace. “One purchases
felicity, and sells one’s sins,” wrote one monk, “just as in commercial
operations.”³⁴ Nowhere was this so true as in those schools, such as the
School of the Three Stages, that adopted the notion of “karmic
debt”—that each of the sins of one’s accumulated past lives continues as
a debt needing to be discharged. An obscure and unusual view in
classical Indian Buddhism, the notion of karmic debt took on a powerful
new life in China.³⁵ As one Three Stages text puts it, we all know that
insolvent debtors will be reborn as animals or slaves; but in reality,
we are all insolvent debtors, because acquiring the money to repay our
temporal debts necessarily means acquire new, spiritual ones, since
every means of acquiring wealth will necessarily involve exploiting,
damaging, and causing suffering to other living beings.

Some use their power and authority as officials in order to bend the law
and seize wealth. Some prosper in the marketplace … They engage in an
excess of lies and cheat and extort profits from others. Still others,
farmers, burn the mountains and marshes, flood the fields, plough and
mill, destroying the nests and burrows of animals …

There is no avoiding the fact of our past debts, and it is difficult to
comprehend the number of separate lives it would require if you wanted
to pay them one by one.³⁶

As Gernet remarks, the idea of life as an endless burden of debt would
surely have struck a chord with Chinese villagers, for whom this was all
too often literally true; but, as he also points out, like their
counterparts in ancient Israel, they were also familiar with that sense
of sudden liberation that came with official amnesties. There was a way
to achieve that too. All that was required was to make regular donations
to some monastery’s Inexhaustible Treasury. The moment one does so, the
debts from every one of one’s past lives are instantly blotted out. The
author even provides a little parable, not unlike Jesus’s parable of the
ungrateful servant, but far more optimistic. How, it might be asked,
would a poor man’s tiny contribution possibly have such cosmic effects?

Answer: In a parable it is like a poor man burdened by a debt of one
thousand strings of coins to another person. He always suffers from his
debt, and the poor man is afraid whenever the debt-master comes to
collect.

He visits the rich man’s house and confesses he is beyond the time-limit
and begs forgiveness for his offense—he is poor and without a station in
life. He tells him that each day he makes a single coin he will return
it to the rich man. On hearing this, the rich man is very pleased and
forgives him for being overdue; moreover, the poor man is not dragged
away to jail.

Giving to the Inexhaustible Storehouse is also like this.³⁷

One might almost call this salvation on the installment plan—but the
implication is that the payments shall be made, like the interest
payments on the wealth when it is subsequently loaned out, for all
eternity.

Other schools concentrated not on karmic debt, but on one’s debt to
one’s parents. Where Confucians built their system of morality above all
on filial piety to fathers, Chinese Buddhists were primarily concerned
with mothers; with the care and suffering required in raising, feeding,
and educating children. A mother’s kindness is unlimited, her
selflessness absolute; this was seen to be embodied above all in the act
of breastfeeding, the fact that mothers transform their very flesh and
blood into milk; they feed their children with their own bodies. In
doing so, however, they allow unlimited love to be precisely quantified.
One author calculated that the average infant absorbs precisely 180
pecks of mother’s milk in its first three years of life, and this
constitutes its debt as an adult. The figure soon became canonical. To
repay this milk debt, or indeed one’s debt to one’s parents more
generally, was simply impossible. “If you stacked up jewels from the
ground up to the twenty-eighth heaven,” wrote one Buddhist author, “it
would not compare” with the value of your parent’s nurturance.³⁸ Even if
you were to “cut your own flesh to offer her three times a day for four
billion years,” wrote another, “it would not pay back even a single day”
of what your mother did for you.³⁹

The solution, however, is the same: donating money to the Inexhaustible
Treasuries. The result was an elaborate cycle of debts and forms of
redemption. A man begins with an unpayable milk-debt. The only thing of
comparable value is the Dharma, the Buddhist truth itself. One can thus
repay one’s parents by bringing them to Buddhism; indeed, this can be
done even after death, when one’s mother will otherwise wind up as a
hungry ghost in hell. If one makes a donation to the Inexhaustible
Treasuries in her name, sutras will be recited for her; she will be
delivered; the money, in the meantime, will be put partly to work as
charity, as pure gift, but partly, too, as in India, as interest-bearing
loans, earmarked for specific purposes for the furtherance of Buddhist
education, ritual, or monastic life.

The Chinese Buddhist approach to charity was nothing if not
multifaceted. Festivals often led to vast outpourings of contributions,
with wealthy adherents vying with one another in generosity, often
driving their entire fortunes to the monasteries, in the forms of
oxcarts laden with millions of strings of cash—a kind of economic
self-immolation that paralleled the spectacular monastic suicides. Their
contributions swelled the Inexhaustible Treasuries. Some would be given
to the needy, particularly in times of hardship. Some would be loaned.
One practice that hovered between charity and business was providing
peasants with alternatives to the local moneylender. Most monasteries
had attendant pawnshops where the local poor could place some valuable
possession—a robe, a couch, a mirror—in hock in exchange for
low-interest loans.⁴⁰ Finally, there was the business of the monastery
itself: that portion of the Inexhaustible Treasury turned over to the
management of lay brothers, and either put out at loan or invested.
Since monks were not allowed to eat the products of their own fields,
the fruit or grain had to be put on the market, further swelling
monastic revenues. Most monasteries came to be surrounded not only by
commercial farms but veritable industrial complexes of oil presses,
flour mills, shops, and hostels, often with thousands of bonded
workers.⁴¹ At the same time, the Treasuries themselves became—as Gernet
was perhaps the first to point out—the world’s first genuine forms of
concentrated finance capital. They were, after all, enormous
concentrations of wealth managed by what were in effect monastic
corporations, which were constantly seeking new opportunities for
profitable investment. They even shared the quintessential capitalist
imperative of continual growth; the Treasuries had to expand, since
according to Mahayana doctrine, genuine liberation would not be possible
until the whole world embraced the Dharma.⁴²

This was precisely the situation—huge concentrations of capital
interested in nothing more than profit—that Confucian economic policy
was supposed to prevent. Still, it took some time for Chinese
governments to recognize the threat. Government attitudes veered back
and forth. At first, especially in the chaotic years of the early Middle
Ages, monks were welcomed—even given generous land grants and provided
with convict laborers to reclaim forests and marshes, and tax-exempt
status for their business enterprises.⁴³ A few emperors converted, and
while most of the bureaucracy kept the monks at arm’s length, Buddhism
became especially popular with court women, as well as with eunuchs and
many scions of wealthy families. As time went on, though, administrators
turned from seeing monks as a boon to rural society to its potential
ruination. Already, by 511 ad, there were decrees condemning monks for
diverting grain that was supposed to be used for charitable purposes to
high-interest loans, and altering debt contracts—a government commission
had to be appointed to review the accounts and nullify any loans in
which interest was found to have exceeded principal. In 713 ad we have
another decree, confiscating two Inexhaustible Treasuries of the Three
Stages sect, whose members they accused of fraudulent solicitation.⁴⁴
Before long there were major campaigns of government repression, at
first often limited to certain regions, but over time, more often
empire-wide. During the most severe, carried out in 845 ad, a total of
4,600 monasteries were razed along with their shops and mills, 260,000
monks and nuns forcibly defrocked and returned to their families—but at
the same time, according to government reports, 150,000 temple serfs
released from bondage.

Whatever the real reasons behind the waves of repression (and these were
no doubt many), the official reason was always the same: a need to
restore the money supply. The monasteries were becoming so large, and so
rich, administrators insisted, that China was simply running out of
metal:

The great repressions of Buddhism under the Chou emperor Wu between 574
and 577, under Wu-tsung in 842–845, and finally in 955, presented
themselves primarily as measures of economic recovery: each of them
provided an opportunity for the imperial government to procure the
necessary copper for the minting of new coins.⁴⁵

One reason is that monks appear to have been systematically melting down
strings of coins, often hundreds of thousands at a time, to build
colossal copper or even gilded copper statues of the Buddha—along with
other objects such as bells and copper chimes, or even such
extravagances as mirrored halls or gilded copper roof tiles. The result,
according to official commissions of inquiry, was economically
disastrous: the price of metals would soar, coinage disappear, and rural
marketplaces cease to function, even as those rural people whose
children had not become monks often fell deeper into debt to the
monasteries.

[]

It perhaps stands to reason that Chinese Buddhism, a religion of
merchants that then took popular roots, should have developed in this
direction: a genuine theology of debt, even perhaps a practice of
absolute self-sacrifice, of abandoning everything, one’s fortune or even
one’s life, that ultimately led to collectively managed finance capital.
The reason that the result seems so weird, so full of paradoxes, is that
it is again an attempt to apply the logic of exchange to questions of
Eternity.

Recall an idea from earlier in the book: exchange, unless it’s an
instantaneous cash transaction, creates debts. Debts linger over time.
If you imagine all human relations as exchange, then insofar as people
do have ongoing relations with one another, those relations are laced
with debt and sin. The only way out is to annihilate the debt, but then
social relations vanish too. This is quite in accord with Buddhism,
whose ultimate aim is indeed the attainment of “emptiness,” absolute
liberation, the annihilation of all human and material attachments,
since these are all ultimately causes of suffering. For Mahayana
Buddhists, however, absolute liberation cannot be achieved by any one
being independently; the liberation of each depends on all the others;
therefore, until the end of time, such matters are in a certain sense
always in suspension.

In the meantime, exchange dominates: “One purchases felicity, and sells
one’s sins, just as in commercial operations.” Even acts of charity and
self-sacrifice are not purely generous; one is purchasing “merit” from
the bodhisattvas.⁴⁶ The notion of infinite debt comes in when this logic
slams up against the Absolute, or, one might perhaps better say, against
something that utterly defies the logic of exchange. Because there are
things that do. This would explain, for instance, the odd urge to first
quantify the exact amount of milk one has absorbed at one’s mother’s
breast, and then to say that there is no conceivable way to repay it.
Exchange implies interaction between equivalent beings. Your mother, on
the other hand, is not an equivalent being. She created you out of her
own flesh. This is exactly the point that I suggested the Vedic authors
were subtly trying to make when they talked about “debts” to the gods:
of course you cannot really “pay your debt to the universe”—that would
imply that (1) you and (2) everything that exists (including you) are in
some sense equivalent entities. This is clearly absurd. The closest you
can come to repayment is to simply recognize that fact. Such recognition
is the true meaning of sacrifice. Like Rospabé’s original money, a
sacrificial offering is not a way to pay a debt, but a way to
acknowledge the impossibility of the idea that there could ever be
repayment:

The parallel was not missed in certain mythological traditions.
According to one famous Hindu myth, two gods, the brothers Kartikeya and
Ganesha, had a quarrel over who should be the first to marry. Their
mother Parvati suggested a contest: the winner would be the one to most
quickly circle the entire universe. Kartikeya set off on the back of a
giant peacock. It took him three years to transverse the limits of the
cosmos. Ganesha bided his time, then, finally, walked in a circle around
his mother, remarking, “You are the universe to me.”

I’ve also argued that any system of exchange is always necessarily
founded on something else, something that, in its social manifestation
at least, is ultimately communism. With all those things that we treat
as eternal, that we assume will always be there—our mother’s love, true
friendship, sociality, humanity, belonging, the existence of the
cosmos—no calculation is necessary, or even ultimately possible; insofar
as there is give and take, they follow completely different principles.
What, then, happens to such absolute and unlimited phenomena when one
tries to imagine the world as a set of transactions—as exchange?
Generally, one of two things. We either ignore or deify them. (Mothers,
and caregiving women in general, are a classic case in point.) Or we do
both. What we treat as eternal in our actual relations with one another
vanishes and reappears as an abstraction, an absolute.⁴⁷ In the case of
Buddhism, this was framed as the inexhaustible merit of bodhisatt-vas,
who exist, in a certain sense, outside of time. They are at once the
model for the Inexhaustible Treasuries, and also their practical
foundation: one can only repay one’s endless karmic debt, or one’s
infinite milk-debt, by drawing on this equally infinite pool of
redemption, which, in turn, becomes the basis for the actual material
funds of the monasteries, which are equally eternal—a pragmatic form of
communism, in fact, since they were vast pools of wealth collectively
owned and collectively managed: the center of vast projects of human
cooperation, which were assumed to be similarly eternal. Yet at the same
time—here I think Gernet is right—this communism became the basis, in
turn, of something very much like capitalism. The reason was, above all,
the need for constant expansion. Everything—even charity—was an
opportunity to proselytize; the Dharma had to grow, ultimately, to
encompass everyone and everything, in order to effect the salvation of
all living beings.

[]

The Middle Ages were marked by a general move toward abstraction: real
gold and silver ended up largely in churches, monasteries, and temples,
money became virtual again, and at the same time, the tendency
everywhere was to set up overarching moral institutions meant to
regulate the process and, in particular, to establish certain
protections for debtors.

China was unusual in that it was one place where an Axial Age empire
managed to survive—though at first, only barely. Chinese governments did
manage to keep coins in circulation in most places most of the time.
This was made easier by their reliance exclusively on small-denomination
coins made of bronze. Even so, it clearly took enormous efforts.

As usual, we don’t know a lot about how everyday economic transactions
took place, but what we do know suggests that in small-scale
transactions, coins were probably most often used in dealing with
strangers. As elsewhere, local shopkeepers and merchants extended
credit. Most accounts seem to have been kept through the use of tally
sticks, strikingly similar to those used in England, except that rather
than hazelwood they were usually made of a split piece of notched
bamboo. Here, too, the creditor took one half, and the debtor held the
other; they were joined at the moment of repayment, and often broken
afterward to mark the cancellation of the debt.⁴⁸ To what degree were
they transferable? We don’t really know. Most of what we do know is from
casual references in texts that are mainly about something else:
anecdotes, jokes, and poetic allusions. The great collection of Taoist
wisdom, the _Leizi_, probably written during the Han dynasty, contains
one such:

There was a man of Sung who was strolling in the street and picked up a
half tally someone had lost. He took it home and stored it away, and
secretly counted the indentations of the broken edge. He told a
neighbor: “I shall be rich any day now.”⁴⁹

Rather like someone who finds a key and figures “just as soon as I can
figure out which lock …”⁵⁰ Another story tells of how Liu Bang, a
bibulous local constable and future founder of the Han dynasty, used to
go on all-night drinking binges, running up enormous tabs. Once, while
he lay collapsed in a drunken stupor in a wine-shop, the owner saw a
dragon hovering over his head—a sure sign of future greatness—and
immediately “broke the tally,” forgiving him his accumulated drinking
debts.⁵¹

Tallies weren’t just used for loans, but for any sort of contract—which
is why early paper contracts also had to be cut in half and one half
kept by each party.⁵² With paper contracts, there was a definite
tendency for the creditor’s half to function as an IOU and thus become
transferable. By 806 ad, for instance, right around the apogee of
Chinese Buddhism, merchants moving tea over long distances from the far
south of the country and officials transporting tax payments to the
capital, all of them concerned with the dangers of carrying bullion over
long distances, began to deposit their money with bankers in the capital
and devised a system of promissory notes. They were called “Flying
Cash,” also divided in half, like tallies, and redeemable for cash in
their branches in the provinces. They quickly started passing from hand
to hand and operated something like currency. The government first tried
to forbid their use, then a year or two later—and this became a familiar
pattern in China—when it realized that it could not suppress them,
switched gears and established a bureau empowered to issue such notes
themselves.⁵³

By the early Song dynasty (960–1279 ad), local banking operations all
over China were running similar operations, accepting cash and bullion
for safekeeping and allowing depositors to use their receipts as
promissory notes, as well as trading in government coupons for salt and
tea. Many of these notes came to circulate as de facto money.⁵⁴ The
government, as usual, first tried to ban the practice, then control it
(granting a monopoly to sixteen leading merchants), then, finally, set
up a government monopoly—the Bureau of Exchange Medium, established in
1023—and before long, aided by the newly invented printing press, was
operating factories in several cities employing thousands of workers and
producing literally millions of notes.⁵⁵

At first, this paper money was meant to circulate for a limited time
(notes would expire after two, then three, then seven years), and was
redeemable in bullion. Over time, especially as the Song came under
increasing military pressure, the temptation to simply print money with
little or no backup became overwhelming—and, moreover, Chinese
governments were rarely completely willing to accept their own paper
money for tax purposes. Combine this with the fact that the bills were
worthless outside China, and it’s rather surprising that the system
worked at all. Certainly, inflation was a constant problem and the money
would have to be recalled and reissued. Occasionally the whole system
would break down, but then people would resort to their own expedients:
“privately issued tea checks, noodle checks, bamboo tallies, wine
tallies, etc.”⁵⁶ Still, the Mongols, who ruled China from 1271 to 1368
ad, chose to maintain the system, and it was only abandoned in the
seventeenth century.

This is important to note because the conventional account tends to
represent China’s experiment with paper money as a failure, even, for
Metallists, proof that “fiat money,” backed only by state power, will
always eventually collapse.⁵⁷ This is especially odd, since the
centuries when paper money was in use are usually considered the most
economically dynamic in Chinese history. Surely, if the United States
government was eventually forced to abandon the use of federal reserve
notes in 2400 ad, no one would be arguing that this showed that the very
idea was always intrinsically unworkable. Nonetheless, the main point
I’d like to emphasize here is that terms like “fiat money,” however
common, are deceptive. Almost all of the new forms of paper money that
emerged were not originally created by governments at all; they were
simply ways of recognizing and expanding the use of credit instruments
that emerged from everyday economic transactions. If it was only China
that developed paper money in the Middle Ages, this was largely because
only in China was there a government large and powerful enough, but
also, sufficiently suspicious of its mercantile classes, to feel it had
to take charge of such operations.


The Near West:

Islam (Capital as Credit)

_Prices depend on the will of Allah; it is he who raises and lowers
them_.

—Attributed to the Prophet Mohammed

_The profit of each partner must be in proportion to the share of each
in the adventure_.

Islamic legal precept

For most of the Middle Ages, the economic nerve center of the world
economy and the source of its most dramatic financial innovations was
neither China nor India, but the West, which, from the perspective of
the rest of the world, meant the world of Islam. During most of this
period, Christendom, lodged in the declining empire of Byzantium and the
obscure semi-barbarous principalities of Europe, was largely
insignificant.

Since people who live in Western Europe have so long been in the habit
of thinking of Islam as the very definition of “the East,” it’s easy to
forget that, from the perspective of any other great tradition, the
difference between Christianity and Islam is almost negligible. One need
only pick up a book on, say, Medieval Islamic philosophy to discover
disputes between the Baghdad Aristoteleans and the neo-Pythagoreans in
Basra, or Persian Neo-Platonists—essentially, scholars doing the same
work of trying to square the revealed religion tradition beginning with
Abraham and Moses with the categories of Greek philosophy, and doing so
in a larger context of mercantile capitalism, universalistic missionary
religion, scientific rationalism, poetic celebrations of romantic love,
and periodic waves of fascination with mystical wisdom from the East.

From a world-historical perspective, it seems much more sensible to see
Judaism, Christianity, and Islam as three different manifestations of
the same great Western intellectual tradition, which for most of human
history has centered on Mesopotamia and the Levant, extending into
Europe as far as Greece and into Africa as far as Egypt, and sometimes
farther west across the Mediterranean or down the Nile. Economically,
most of Europe was until perhaps the High Middle Ages in exactly the
same situation as most of Africa: plugged into the larger world economy,
if at all, largely as an exporter of slaves, raw materials, and the
occasional exotica (amber, elephant tusks …), and importer of
manufactured goods (Chinese silks and porcelain, Indian calicoes, Arab
steel). To get a sense of comparative economic development (even if the
examples are somewhat scattered over time), consider the following
table:⁵⁸

Populations and Tax Revenue, 350 BC–1200 AD

[]

What’s more, for most of the Middle Ages, Islam was not only the core of
Western civilization; it was its expansive edge, working its way into
India, expanding in Africa and Europe, sending missionaries and winning
converts across the Indian Ocean.

The prevailing Islamic attitude toward law, government, and economic
matters was the exact opposite of that prevalent in China. Confucians
were suspicious of governance through strict codes of law, preferring to
rely on the inherent sense of justice of the cultivated scholar—a
scholar who was simply assumed to also be a government official.
Medieval Islam, on the other hand, enthusiastically embraced law, which
was seen as a religious institution derived from the Prophet, but tended
to view government, more often than not, as an unfortunate necessity, an
institution that the truly pious would do better to avoid.⁵⁹

In part this was because of the peculiar nature of Islamic government.
The Arab military leaders who, after Mohammed’s death in 632 ad,
conquered the Sassanian empire and established the Abbasid Caliphate,
always continued to see themselves as people of the desert, and never
felt entirely part of the urban civilizations they had come to rule.
This discomfort was never quite overcome—on either side. It took the
bulk of the population several centuries to convert to the conqueror’s
religion, and even when they did, they never seem to have really
identified with their rulers. Government was seen as military
power—necessary, perhaps, defend the faith, but fundamentally exterior
to society.

In part, too, it was because of the peculiar alliance between merchants
and common folk that came to be aligned against them. After Caliph
al-Ma’mum’s abortive attempt to set up a theocracy in 832 ad, the
government took a hands-off position on questions of religion. The
various schools of Islamic law were free to create their own educational
institutions and maintain their own separate system of religious
justice. Crucially, it was the _ulema_, the legal scholars, who were the
principal agents in the conversion of the bulk of the empire’s
population to Islam in Mesopotamia, Syria, Egypt, and North Africa in
those same years.⁶⁰ But—like the elders in charge of guilds, civic
associations, commercial sodalities, and religious brotherhoods—they did
their best to keep the government, with its armies and ostentation, at
arm’s length.⁶¹ “The best princes are those who visit religious
teachers,” one proverb put it, “the worst religious teachers are the
those who allow themselves to be visited by princes.”⁶² A Medieval
Turkish story brings it home even more pointedly:

The king once summoned Nasruddin to court.

“Tell me,” said the king, “you are a mystic, a philosopher, a man of
unconventional understandings. I have become interested in the issue of
value. It’s an interesting philosophical question. How does one
establish the true worth of a person, or an object? Take me for example.
If I were to ask you to estimate my value, what would you say?”

“Oh,” Nasruddin said, “I’d say about two hundred dinars.”

The emperor was flabbergasted. “What?! But this belt I’m wearing is
worth two hundred dinars!”

“I know,” said Nasruddin. “Actually, I was taking the value of the belt
into consideration.”

This disjuncture had profound economic effects. It meant that the
Caliphate, and later Muslim empires, could operate in many ways much
like the old Axial Age empires—creating professional armies, waging wars
of conquest, capturing slaves, melting down loot and distributing it in
the form of coins to soldiers and officials, demanding that those coins
be rendered back as taxes—but at the same time, without having nearly
the same effects on ordinary people’s lives.

Over the course of the wars of expansion, for example, enormous
quantities of gold and silver were indeed looted from palaces, temples,
and monasteries and stamped into coinage, allowing the Caliphate to
produce gold dinars and silver dirhams of remarkable purity—that is,
with next to no fiduciary element, the value of each coin corresponding
almost precisely to its weight in precious metal.⁶³ As a result, they
were able to pay their troops extraordinarily well. A soldier in the
Caliph’s army, for example, received almost four times the wages once
received by a Roman legionary.⁶⁴ We can, perhaps, speak of a kind of
“military-coinage-slavery” complex here—but it existed in a kind of
bubble. Wars of expansion, and trade with Europe and Africa, did produce
a fairly constant flow of slaves, but in dramatic contrast to the
ancient world, very few of them ended up laboring in farms or workshops.
Most ended up as decoration in the houses of the rich, or, increasingly
over time, as soldiers. Over the course of the Abbasid dynasty (750–1258
ad) in fact, the empire came to rely, for its military forces, almost
exclusively on Mamluks, highly trained military slaves captured or
purchased from the Turkish steppes. The policy of employing slaves as
soldiers was maintained by all of the Islamic successor states,
including the Mughals, and culminated in the famous Mamluk sultanate in
Egypt in the thirteenth century, but historically, it was
unprecedented.⁶⁵ In most times and places slaves are, for obvious
reasons, the very last people to be allowed anywhere near weapons. Here
it was systematic. But in a strange way, it also made perfect sense: if
slaves are, by definition, people who have been severed from society,
this was the logical consequence of the wall created between society and
the Medieval Islamic state.⁶⁶

Religious teachers appear to have done everything they could to prop up
the wall. One reason for the recourse to slave soldiers was their
tendency to discourage the faithful from serving in the military (since
it might mean fighting fellow believers). The legal system that they
created also ensured that it was effectively impossible for Muslims—or
for that matter Christian or Jewish subjects of the Caliphate—to be
reduced to slavery. Here al-Wahid seems to have been largely correct.
Islamic law took aim at just about all the most notorious abuses of
earlier, Axial Age societies. Slavery through kidnapping, judicial
punishment, debt, and the exposure or sale of children, even through the
voluntary sale of one’s own person—all were forbidden, or rendered
unenforceable.⁶⁷ Likewise with all the other forms of debt peonage that
had loomed over the heads of poor Middle Eastern farmers and their
families since the dawn of recorded history. Finally, Islam strictly
forbade usury, which it interpreted to mean any arrangement in which
money or a commodity was lent at interest, for any purpose whatsoever.⁶⁸

In a way, one can see the establishment of Islamic courts as the
ultimate triumph of the patriarchal rebellion that had begun so many
thousands of years before: of the ethos of the desert or the steppe,
real or imagined, even as the faithful did their best to keep the
heavily armed descendants of actual nomads confined to their camps and
palaces. It was made possible by a profound shift in class alliances.
The great urban civilizations of the Middle East had always been
dominated by a de facto alliance between administrators and merchants,
both of whom kept the rest of the population either in debt peonage or
in constant peril of falling into it. In converting to Islam, the
commercial classes, so long the arch-villains in the eyes of ordinary
farmers and townsfolk, effectively agreed to change sides, abandon all
their most hated practices, and become instead the leaders of a society
that now defined itself against the state.

It was possible because from the beginning, Islam had a positive view
toward commerce. Mohammed himself had begun his adult life as a
merchant; and no Islamic thinker ever treated the honest pursuit of
profit as itself intrinsically immoral or inimical to faith. Neither did
the prohibitions against usury—which for the most part were scrupulously
enforced, even in the case of commercial loans—in any sense mitigate
against the growth of commerce, or even the development of complex
credit instruments.⁶⁹ To the contrary, the early centuries of the
Caliphate saw an immediate efflorescence in both.

Profits were still possible because Islamic jurists were careful to
allow for certain service fees, and other considerations—notably,
allowing goods bought on credit to be priced slightly higher than those
bought for cash—that ensured that bankers and traders still had an
incentive to provide credit services.⁷⁰ Still, these incentives were
never enough to allow banking to become a full-time occupation: instead,
almost any merchant operating on a sufficiently large scale could be
expected to combine banking with a host of other moneymaking activities.
As a result, credit instruments soon became so essential to trade that
almost anyone of prominence was expected to keep most of his or her
wealth on deposit, and to make everyday transactions, not by counting
out coins, but by inkpot and paper. Promissory notes were called _sakk_,
“checks”, or _ruq’a_, “notes.” Checks could bounce. One German
historian, picking through a multitude of old Arabic literary sources,
recounts that:

About 900 a great man paid a poet in this way, only the banker refused
the check, so that the disappointed poet composed a verse to the effect
that he would gladly pay a million on the same plan. A patron of the
same poet and singer (936) during a concert wrote a check in his favor
on a banker for five hundred dinars. When paying, the banker gave the
poet to understand that it was customary to charge one dirham discount
on each dinar, i.e., about ten per cent. Only if the poet would spend
the afternoon and evening with him, he would make no deduction …

By about 1000 the banker had made himself indispensable in Basra: every
trader had his banking account, and paid only in checks on his bank in
the bazaar.…⁷¹

Checks could be countersigned and transferred, and letters of credit
(_suftaja_) could travel across the Indian Ocean or the Sahara.⁷² If
they did not turn into de facto paper money, it was because, since they
operated completely independent of the state (they could not be used to
pay taxes, for instance), their value was based almost entirely on trust
and reputation.⁷³ Appeal to the Islamic courts was generally voluntary
or mediated by merchant guilds and civic associations. In such a
context, having a famous poet compose verses making fun of you for
bouncing a check was probably the ultimate disaster.

When it came to finance, instead of interest-bearing investments, the
preferred approach was partnerships, where (often) one party would
supply the capital, the other carry out the enterprise. Instead of fixed
return, the investor would receive a share of the profits. Even labor
arrangements were often organized on a profit-sharing basis.⁷⁴ In all
such matters, reputation was crucial—in fact, one lively debate in early
commercial law was over the question of whether reputation could (like
land, labor, money, or other resources) itself be considered a form of
capital. It sometimes happened that merchants would form partnerships
with no capital at all, but only their good names. This was called
“partnership of good reputation.” As one legal scholar explained:

As for the credit partnership, it is also called the “partnership of the
penniless” (_sharika al-mafalis_). It comes about when two people form a
partnership without any capital in order to buy on credit and then sell.
It is designated by this name partnership of good reputations because
their capital consists of their status and good reputations; for credit
is extended only to him who has a good reputation among people.⁷⁵

Some legal scholars objected to the idea that such a contract could be
considered legally binding, since it was not based on an initial outlay
of material capital; others considered it legitimate, provided the
partners make an equitable partition of the profits—since reputation
cannot be quantified. The remarkable thing here is the tacit recognition
that, in a credit economy that operates largely without state mechanisms
of enforcement (without police to arrest those who commit fraud, or
bailiffs to seize a debtor’s property), a significant part of the value
of a promissory note is indeed the good name of the signatory. As Pierre
Bourdieu was later to point out in describing a similar economy of trust
in contemporary Algeria: it’s quite possible to turn honor into money,
almost impossible to convert money into honor.⁷⁶

These networks of trust, in turn, were largely responsible for the
spread of Islam over the caravan routes of Central Asia and the Sahara,
and especially across the Indian Ocean, the main conduit of Medieval
world trade. Over the course of the Middle Ages, the Indian Ocean
effectively became a Muslim lake. Muslim traders appear to have played a
key role in establishing the principle that kings and their armies
should keep their quarrels on dry land; the seas were to be a zone of
peaceful commerce. At the same time, Islam gained a toehold in trade
emporia from Aden to the Moluccas because Islamic courts were so
perfectly suited to provide those functions that made such ports
attractive: means of establishing contracts, recovering debts, creating
a banking sector capable of redeeming or transferring letters of
credit.⁷⁷ The level of trust thereby created between merchants in the
great Malay entrepôt Malacca, gateway to the spice islands of Indonesia,
was legendary. The city had Swahili, Arab, Egyptian, Ethiopian, and
Armenian quarters, as well as quarters for merchants from different
regions of India, China, and Southeast Asia. Yet it was said that its
merchants shunned enforceable contracts, preferring to seal transactions
“with a handshake and a glance at heaven.”⁷⁸

In Islamic society, the merchant became not just a respected figure, but
a kind of paragon: like the warrior, a man of honor able to pursue
far-flung adventures; unlike him, able to do so in a fashion damaging to
no one. The French historian Maurice Lombard draws a striking, if
perhaps rather idealized, picture of him “in his stately town-house,
surrounded by slaves and hangers-on, in the midst of his collections of
books, travel souvenirs, and rare ornaments,” along with his ledgers,
correspondence, and letters of credit, skilled in the arts of
double-entry book-keeping along with secret codes and ciphers, giving
alms to the poor, supporting places of worship, perhaps, dedicating
himself to the writing of poetry, while still able to translate his
general creditworthiness into great capital reserves by appealing to
family and partners.⁷⁹ Lombard’s picture is to some degree inspired by
the famous _Thousand and One Nights_ description of Sindbad, who, having
spent his youth in perilous mercantile ventures to faraway lands,
finally retired, rich beyond dreams, to spend the rest of his life
amidst gardens and dancing girls, telling tall tales of his adventures.
Here’s a glimpse, from the eyes of a humble porter (also named Sindbad)
when first summoned to see him by the master’s page:

He found it to be a goodly mansion, radiant and full of majesty, till he
brought him to a grand sitting room wherein he saw a company of nobles
and great lords seated at tables garnished with all manner of flowers
and sweet-scented herbs, besides great plenty of dainty viands and
fruits dried and fresh and confections and wines of the choicest
vintages. There also were instruments of music and mirth and lovely
slave girls playing and singing. All the company was ranged according to
rank, and in the highest place sat a man of worshipful and noble aspect
whose bearded sides hoariness had stricken, and he was stately of
stature and fair of favor, agreeable of aspect and full of gravity and
dignity and majesty. So Sindbad the Porter was confounded at that which
he beheld and said in himself, “By Allah, this must be either some
king’s palace, or a piece of Paradise!”⁸⁰

It’s worth quoting not only because it represents a certain ideal, a
picture of the perfect life, but because there’s no real Christian
parallel. It would be impossible conceive of such an image appearing in,
say, a Medieval French romance.

The veneration of the merchant was matched by what can only be called
the world’s first popular free-market ideology. True, one should be
careful not to confuse ideals with reality. Markets were ever entirely
independent from the government. Islamic regimes did employ all the
usual strategies of manipulating tax policy to encourage the growth of
markets, and they periodically tried to intervene in commercial law.⁸¹
Still, there was a very strong popular feeling that they shouldn’t. Once
freed from its ancient scourges of debt and slavery, the local bazaar
had become, for most, not a place of moral danger, but the very
opposite: the highest expression of the human freedom and communal
solidarity, and thus to be protected assiduously from state intrusion.

There was a particular hostility to anything that smacked of
price-fixing. One much-repeated story held that the Prophet himself had
refused to force merchants to lower prices during a shortage in the city
of Medina, on the grounds that doing so would be sacrilegious, since, in
a free-market situation, “prices depend on the will of God.”⁸² Most
legal scholars interpreted Mohammed’s decision to mean that any
government interference in market mechanisms should be considered
similarly sacrilegious, since markets were designed by God to regulate
themselves.⁸³

If all this bears a striking resemblance to Adam Smith’s “invisible
hand” (which was also the hand of Divine Providence), it might not be a
complete coincidence. In fact, many of the specific arguments and
examples that Smith uses appear to trace back directly to economic
tracts written in Medieval Persia. For instance, not only does his
argument that exchange is a natural outgrowth of human rationality and
speech already appear both in both Ghazali (1058–1111 ad), and Tusi
(1201–1274 ad); both use exactly the same illustration: that no one has
ever observed two dogs exchanging bones.⁸⁴ Even more dramatically,
Smith’s most famous example of division of labor, the pin factory, where
it takes eighteen separate operations to produce one pin, already
appears in Ghazali’s _Ihya_, in which he describes a needle factory,
where it takes twenty-five different operations to produce a needle.⁸⁵

The differences, however, are just as significant as the similarities.
One telling example: like Smith, Tusi begins his treatise on economics
with a discussion of the division of labor; but where for Smith, the
division of labor is actually an outgrowth of our “natural propensity to
truck and barter” in pursuit of individual advantage, for Tusi, it was
an extension of mutual aid:

Let us suppose that each individual were required to busy himself with
providing his own sustenance, clothing, dwelling-place and weapons,
first acquiring the tools of carpentry and the smith’s trade, then
readying thereby tools and implements for sowing and reaping, grinding
and kneading, spinning and weaving … Clearly, he would not be capable of
doing justice to any one of them. But when men render aid to each other,
each one performing one of these important tasks that are beyond the
measure of his own capacity, and observing the law of justice in
transactions by giving greatly and receiving in exchange of the labor of
others, then the means of livelihood are realized, and the succession of
the individual and the survival of the species are assured.⁸⁶

As a result, he argues, divine providence has arranged us to have
different abilities, desires, and inclinations. The market is simply one
manifestation of this more general principle of mutual aid, of the
matching of, abilities (supply) and needs (demand)—or to translate it
into my own earlier terms, it is not only founded on, but is itself an
extension of the kind of baseline communism on which any society must
ultimately rest.

All this is not to say that Tusi was in any sense a radical egalitarian.
Quite the contrary. “If men were equal,” he insists, “they would all
perish.” We need differences between rich and poor, he insisted, just as
much as we need differences between farmers and carpenters. Still, once
you start from the initial premise that markets are primarily about
cooperation rather than competition—and while Muslim economic thinkers
did recognize and accept the need for market competition, they never saw
competition as its essence⁸⁷—the moral implications are very different.
Nasruddin’s story about the quail eggs might have been a joke, but
Muslim ethicists did often enjoin merchants to drive a hard bargain with
the rich so they could charge less, or pay more, when dealing with the
less fortunate.⁸⁸

Ghazali’s take on the division of labor is similar, and his account of
the origins of money is if anything even more revealing. It begins with
what looks much like the myth of barter, except that, like all Middle
Eastern writers, he starts not with imaginary primitive tribesmen, but
with strangers meeting in an imaginary marketplace.

Sometimes a person needs what he does not own and he owns what he does
not need. For example, a person has saffron but needs a camel for
transportation and one who owns a camel does not presently need that
camel but he wants saffron. Thus, there is the need for an exchange.
However, for there to be an exchange, there must be a way to measure the
two objects, for the camel-owner cannot give the whole camel for a
quantity of saffron. There is no similarity between saffron and camel so
that equal amount of that weight and form can be given. Likewise is the
case of one who desires a house but owns some cloth or desires a slave
but owns socks, or desires flour but possesses a donkey. These goods
have no direct proportionality so one cannot know how much saffron will
equal a camel’s worth. Such barter transactions would be very
difficult.⁸⁹

Ghazali also notes that there might also be a problem of one person not
even needing what the other has to offer, but this is almost an
afterthought; for him, the real problem is conceptual. How do you
compare two things with no common qualities? His conclusion: it can only
be done by comparing both to a third thing with no qualities at all. For
this reason, he explains, God created dinars and dirhams, coins made out
of gold and silver, two metals that are otherwise no good for anything:

_Dirhams_ and _dinars_ are not created for any particular purpose; they
are useless by themselves; they are just like stones. They are created
to circulate from hand to hand, to govern and to facilitate
transactions. They are symbols to know the value and grades of goods.⁹⁰

They can be symbols, units of measure, because of this very lack of
usefulness, indeed lack of any particular feature other than value:

A thing can only be exactly linked to other things if it has no
particular special form or feature of its own—for example, a mirror that
has no color can reflect all colors. The same is the case with money—it
has no purpose of its own, but it serves as medium for the purpose of
exchanging goods.⁹¹

From this it also follows that lending money at interest must be
illegitimate, since it means using money as an end in itself: “Money is
not created to earn money.” In fact, he says, “in relation to other
goods, _dirhams_ and _dinars_ are like prepositions in a sentence,”
words that, as the grammarians inform us, are used to give meaning to
other words, but can only do because they have no meaning in themselves.
Money is a thus a unit of measure that provides a means of assessing the
value of goods, but also one that operates as such only if it stays in
constant motion. To enter in monetary transactions in order to obtain
even more money, even if it’s a matter of M-C-M’, let alone M-M’, would
be, according to Ghazali, the equivalent of kidnapping a postman.⁹²

Whereas Ghazali speaks only of gold and silver, what he describes—money
as symbol, as abstract measure, having no qualities of its own, whose
value is only maintained by constant motion—is something that would
never have occurred to anyone were it not in an age when it was
perfectly normal for money to be employed in purely virtual form.

[]

Much of our free-market doctrine, then, appears to have been originally
borrowed piecemeal from a very different social and moral universe.⁹³
The mercantile classes of the Medieval Near West had pulled off an
extraordinary feat. By abandoning the usurious practices that had made
them so obnoxious to their neighbors for untold centuries before, they
were able to become—alongside religious teachers—the effective leaders
of their communities: communities that are still seen as organized, to a
large extent, around the twin poles of mosque and bazaar.⁹⁴ The spread
of Islam allowed the market to become a global phenomenon, operating
largely independent of governments, according to its own internal laws.
But the very fact that this was, in a certain way, a genuine free
market, not one created by the government and backed by its police and
prisons—a world of handshake deals and paper promises backed only by the
integrity of the signer—meant that it could never really become the
world imagined by those who later adopted many of the same ideas and
arguments: one of purely self-interested individuals vying for material
advantage by any means at hand.


The Far West:

Christendom (Commerce, Lending, and War)

_Where there is justice in war, there is also justice in usury_.

—Saint Ambrose

Europe, as I mentioned, came rather late to the Middle Ages and for most
of it was something of a hinterland. Still, the period began much as it
did elsewhere, with the disappearance of coinage. Money retreated into
virtuality. Everyone continued to calculate costs in Roman currency,
then, later, in Carolingian “imaginary money”—the purely conceptual
system of pounds, shillings, and pence used across Western Europe to
keep accounts well into the seventeenth century.

Local mints did gradually come back into operation, producing coins in
an endless variety of weight, purity, and denominations. How these
related to the pan-European system, though, was a matter of
manipulation. Kings regularly issued decrees revaluing their own coins
in relation to the money of account, “crying up” the currency by, say,
declaring that henceforth, one of their _ecus_ or _escudos_ would no
longer be worth 1/12 but now 1/8 of a shilling (thus effectively raising
taxes) or “crying down” the value of their coins by doing the reverse
(thus effectively reducing their debts).⁹⁵ The real gold or silver
content of coins was endlessly readjusted, and currencies were
frequently called in for re-minting. Meanwhile, most everyday
transactions dispensed with cash entirely, operating through tallies,
tokens, ledgers, or transactions in kind. As a result, when the
Scholastics came to address such matters in the thirteenth century, they
quickly adopted Aristotle’s position that money was a mere social
convention: that it was, basically, whatever human beings decided that
it was.⁹⁶

All this fit the broader Medieval pattern: actual gold and silver, such
of it as was still around, was increasingly laid up in sacred places; as
centralized states disappeared, the regulation of markets was
increasingly in the hands of the Church.

At first, the Catholic attitudes toward usury were just as harsh as
Muslim ones, and attitudes toward merchants, considerably harsher. In
the first case, they had little choice, as many Biblical texts were
quite explicit. Consider Exodus 22:25:

If you lend money to My people, to the poor among you, you are not to
act as a creditor to him; you shall not charge him interest.

Both the Psalms (15:5, 54:12) and Prophets (Jeremiah 9.6, Nehemiah 5:11)
were explicit in assigning usurers to death and hellfire. What’s more,
the early Christian Fathers, who laid the foundation of Church teachings
on social issues in the waning years of the Roman empire, were writing
amidst the ancient world’s last great debt crisis, one that was
effectively in the process of destroying the empire’s remaining free
peasantry.⁹⁷ While few were willing to condemn slavery, all condemned
usury.

Usury was seen above all as an assault on Christian charity, on Jesus’s
injunction to treat the poor as they would treat the Christ himself,
giving without expectation of return and allowing the borrower to decide
on recompense (Luke 6:34–35). In 365 ad, for instance, St. Basil
delivered a sermon on usury in Cappadocia that set the standard for such
issues:

The Lord gave His own injunction quite plainly in the words, “from him
that would borrow of thee turn not thou away.”⁹⁸

But what of the money lover? He sees before him a man under stress of
necessity bent to the ground in supplication. He sees him hesitating at
no act, no words, of humiliation. He sees him suffering undeserved
misfortune, but he is merciless. He does not reckon that he is a
fellow-creature. He does not give in to his entreaties. He stands stiff
and sour. He is moved by no prayers; his resolution is broken by no
tears. He persists in refusal …⁹⁹

That is, until the suppliant mentions “interest.”

Basil was particularly offended by the crass dishonesty by which
moneylenders operated; their abuse of Christian fellowship. The man in
need comes seeking a friend, the rich man pretends to be one. In fact
he’s a secret enemy, and everything he says is a lie. Witness, St. Basil
said, how the rich man will always at first swear mighty oaths that he
has no money to his name:

Then the suppliant mentions interest, and utters the word security. All
is changed. The frown is relaxed; with a genial smile he recalls old
family connection. Now it is “my friend.”

“I will see,” says he, “if I have any money by me. Yes, there is that
sum which a man I know has left in my hands on deposit for profit. He
stipulated a very heavy rate of interest. However, I shall certainly
take something off, and give it to you on better terms.” With pretences
of this kind and talk like this he fawns on the wretched victim, and
induces him to swallow the bait. Then he binds him with a written
security, adds loss of liberty to the trouble of his pressing poverty,
and is off. The man who has made himself responsible for interest that
he cannot pay has accepted voluntary slavery for life.¹⁰⁰

The borrower, coming home with his newfound money, at first rejoices.
But quickly, “the money slips away,” interest accumulates, and his
possessions are sold off. Basil grows poetic in describing the debtor’s
plight. It’s as if time itself has become his enemy. Every day and night
conspires against him, as they are the parents of interest. His life
becomes a “sleepless daze of anxious uncertainty,” as he is humiliated
in public; while at home, he is constantly hiding under the couch at
every unexpected knock on the door, and can barely sleep, startled awake
by nightmare visions of his creditor standing over his pillow.¹⁰¹

Probably the most famous ancient homily on usury, though, was Saint
Ambrose’s _De Tobia_, pronounced over several days in Milan in 380 bc.
He reproduces the same vivid details as Basil: fathers forced to sell
their children, debtors who hanged themselves out of shame. Usury, he
observes, must be considered a form of violent robbery, even murder.¹⁰²
Ambrose, though, added one small proviso that was later to have enormous
influence. His sermon was the first to carefully examine every Biblical
reference to moneylending, which meant that he had to address the one
problem later authors always had to struggle with—the fact that, in the
Old Testament, usury is not quite forbidden to everyone. The key
sticking point is always Deuteronomy 23:19–20:

Thou shalt not lend upon usury to thy brother; usury of money, usury of
victuals, usury of any thing that is lent upon usury.

Unto a stranger thou mayest lend upon usury; but unto thy brother thou
shalt not lend upon usury.

So who then is this “stranger” or (a better translation of the Hebrew
_nokri_, “foreigner”)? Presumably, one against whom robbery and murder
would have been justified as well. After all, the ancient Jews lived
amidst tribes like the Amalekites, on whom God had specifically
instructed them to make war. If by extracting interest one is, as he
puts it, fighting without a sword, then it is only legitimate to do so
from those “whom it would not be a crime to kill.”¹⁰³ For Ambrose,
living in Milan, all this was something of a technicality. He included
all Christians and all those subject to Roman law as “brothers”; there
weren’t, then, lot of Amalekites around.¹⁰⁴ Later, the “Exception of St.
Ambrose,” as it came to be known, was to become extremely important.

All of these sermons—and there were many of them—left certain critical
questions unanswered. What _should_ the rich man do when receiving a
visit from his troubled neighbor? True, Jesus had said to give without
expectation of return, but it seemed unrealistic to expect most
Christians to do that. And even if they did, what sort of ongoing
relationships would that create? St. Basil took the radical position.
God had given us all things in common, and he had specifically
instructed the rich to give their possessions to the poor. The communism
of the Apostles—who pooled all their wealth, and took freely what they
needed—was thus the only proper model for a truly Christian society.¹⁰⁵
Few of the other Christian Fathers were willing to take things this far.
Communism was the ideal, but in this fallen and temporary world, they
argued, it was simply unrealistic. The Church must accept existing
property arrangements, but also come up with spiritual arguments to
encourage the rich to nonetheless act with Christian charity. Many of
these employed distinctly commercial metaphors. Even Basil was willing
to indulge in this sort of thing:

Whenever you provide for the destitute on account of the Lord, it is
both a gift and a loan. It is a gift because you entertain no hope in
recovering it, a loan because of our Lord’s munificence in paying you
back on his behalf, when, having taken a small sum for the poor, he will
give you back a vast sum in return. “For he who takes pity on the poor,
lends to God.”¹⁰⁶

Since Christ is in the poor, a gift of charity is a loan to Jesus, to be
repaid with interest inconceivable on earth.

Charity, however, is a way of maintaining hierarchy, not undermining it.
What Basil is talking about here really has nothing to do with debt, and
playing with such metaphors seems ultimately to serve only to underline
the fact that the rich man doesn’t _owe_ the poor suppliant anything,
any more than God is in any way legally bound to save the soul of anyone
who feeds a beggar. “Debt” here dissolves into a pure hierarchy (hence,
“the Lord”) where utterly different beings provide each other utterly
different kinds of benefit. Later theologians were to explicitly confirm
this: human beings live in time, noted St. Thomas Aquinas, so it makes
sense to say that sin is a debt of punishment we owe to God. But God
lives outside of time. By definition, he cannot owe anything to anyone.
His grace can therefore only be a gift given with no obligation.¹⁰⁷

This, in turn, provides an answer to the question: What are they really
asking the rich man to do? The Church opposed usury, but it had little
to say about relations of feudal dependency, where the rich man provides
charity and the poor suppliant shows his gratitude in other ways.
Neither, when these kinds of arrangements began to emerge across the
Christian West, did the Church offer significant objections.¹⁰⁸ Former
debt peons were gradually transformed into serfs or vassals. In some
ways, the relationship was not much different, since vassalage was, in
theory, a voluntary, contractual relationship. Just as a Christian has
to be able to freely choose to submit himself to “the Lord,” so did a
vassal have to agree to make himself someone else’s man. All this proved
perfectly consonant with Christianity.

Commerce, on the other hand, remained a problem. There was not much of a
leap between condemning usury as the taking of “whatever exceeds the
amount loaned” and condemning any form of profit-taking. Many—Saint
Ambrose among them—were willing to take that leap. Where Mohammed
declared that an honest merchant deserved a place by the seat of God in
heaven, men like Ambrose wondered if an “honest merchant” could actually
exist. Many held that one simply could not be both a merchant and a
Christian.¹⁰⁹ In the early Middle Ages, this was not a pressing
issue—especially since so much commerce was conducted by foreigners. The
conceptual problems, however, were never resolved. What did it mean that
one could only lend to “strangers”? Was it just usury, or was even
commerce tantamount to war?

[]

Probably the most notorious, and often catastrophic, way that this
problem worked itself out in the High Middle Ages was in relations
between Christians and Jews. In the years since Nehemiah, Jewish
attitudes toward lending had themselves changed. In the time of
Augustus, Rabbi Hillel had effectively rendered the sabbatical year a
dead letter, by allowing two parties to place a rider on any particular
loan contract agreeing that it would not apply. While both the Torah and
the Talmud stand opposed to loans on interest, exceptions were made in
dealing with Gentiles—particularly as, over the course of the eleventh
and twelfth centuries, European Jews were excluded from almost any other
line of work.¹¹⁰ This in turn made it harder to contain the practice, as
witnessed in the common joke, current in twelfth-century ghettos to
justify usury between Jews. It consisted, it is said, of reciting
Deuteronomy 23:20 in interrogative tones to make it mean the opposite of
its obvious sense: ‘Unto a foreigner thou mayest lend upon usury, but
unto thy brother thou shalt not lend upon usury?’¹¹¹

On the Christian side, in 1140 ad the “Exception of Saint Ambrose” found
its way into Gratian’s _Decretum_, which came to be considered the
definitive collection of canon law. At the time, economic life fell very
much under the jurisdiction of the Church. While that might appear to
leave Jews safely outside the system, in reality, matters were more
complicated. For one thing, while both Jews and Gentiles would
occasionally attempt to make recourse to the Exception, the prevailing
opinion was that it only really applied to Saracens or others with whom
Christendom was literally at war. After all, Jews and Christians lived
in the same towns and villages. If one were to concede that the
Exception allowed Jews and Christians the right to lend to each other at
interest, it would also mean that they had the right to murder one
another.¹¹² No one really wanted to say that. On the other hand, real
relations between Christians and Jews often did seem to skate perilously
close to this unfortunate ideal—though obviously the actual murder
(apart from mere economic aggression) was all on one side.

In part this was due to the habit of Christian princes of exploiting,
for their own purposes, the fact that Jews did sit slightly outside the
system. Many encouraged Jews to operate as moneylenders, under their
protection, simply because they also knew that protection could be
withdrawn at any time. The kings of England were notorious in this
regard. They insisted that Jews be excluded from merchant and craft
guilds, but granted them the right to charge extravagant rates of
interest, backing up the loans by the full force of law.¹¹³ Debtors in
Medieval England were regularly thrown in prisons until their families
settled with the creditor.¹¹⁴ Yet the same regularly happened to the
Jews themselves. In 1210 ad, for example, King John ordered a tallage,
or emergency levy, to pay for his wars in France and Ireland. According
to one contemporary chronicler “all the Jews throughout England, of both
sexes, were seized, imprisoned, and tortured severely, in order to do
the king’s will with their money.” Most who where put to torture offered
all they had and more—but on that occasion, one particularly wealthy
merchant, a certain Abraham of Bristol, who the king decided owed him
ten thousand marks of silver (a sum equivalent to about a sixth of
John’s total annual revenue), became famous for holding out. The king
therefore ordered that one of his molars be pulled out daily, until he
paid. After seven had been extracted, Abraham finally gave in.¹¹⁵

John’s successor, Henry III (1216–1272 ad), was in the habit of turning
over Jewish victims to his brother the Earl of Cornwall, so that, as
another chronicler put it, “those whom one brother had flayed, the other
might embowel.”¹¹⁶ Such stories about the extraction of Jewish teeth,
skin, and intestines are, I think, important to bear in mind when
thinking about Shakespeare’s imaginary Merchant of Venice demanding his
“pound of flesh.”¹¹⁷ It all seems to have been a bit of a guilty
projection of terrors that Jews had never really visited on Christians,
but that had been directed the other way around.

The terror inflicted by kings carried in it a peculiar element of
identification: the persecutions and appropriations were an extension of
the logic whereby kings effectively treated debts owed to Jews as
ultimately owed to themselves, even setting up a branch of the Treasury
(“the Exchequer of the Jews”) to manage them.¹¹⁸ This was of course much
in keeping with the popular English impression of their kings as
themselves a group of rapacious Norman foreigners. But it also gave the
kings the opportunity to periodically play the populist card,
dramatically snubbing or humiliating their Jewish financiers, turning a
blind eye or even encouraging pogroms by townsfolk who chose to take the
Exception of Saint Ambrose literally, and treat moneylenders as enemies
of Christ who could be murdered in cold blood. Particularly gruesome
massacres occurred in Norwich in 1144 ad, and in France, in Blois in
1171. Before long, as Norman Cohn put it, “what had once been a
flourishing Jewish culture had turned into a terrorized society locked
in perpetual warfare with the greater society around it.”¹¹⁹

One mustn’t exaggerate the Jewish role in lending. Most Jews had nothing
to do with the business, and those who did were typically bit players,
making minor loans of grain or cloth for a return in kind. Others
weren’t even really Jews. Already in the 1190s, preachers were
complaining about lords who would work hand in glove with Christian
moneylenders claiming they were “our Jews”—and thus under their special
protection.¹²⁰ By the 1100s, most Jewish moneylenders had long since
been displaced by Lombards (from Northern Italy) and Cahorsins (from the
French town of Cahors)—who established themselves across Western Europe,
and became notorious rural usurers.¹²¹

The rise of rural usury was itself a sign of a growing free peasantry
(there had been no point in making loans to serfs, since they had
nothing to repossess). It accompanied the rise of commercial farming,
urban craft guilds, and the “commercial revolution” of the High Middle
Ages, all of which finally brought Western Europe to a level of economic
activity comparable to that long since considered normal in other parts
of the world. The Church quickly came under considerable popular
pressure to do something about the problem, and at first, it did try to
tighten the clamps. Existing loopholes in the usury laws were
systematically closed, particularly the use of mortgages. These latter
began as an expedient: as in Medieval Islam, those determined to dodge
the law could simply present the money, claim to be buying the debtor’s
house or field, and then “rent” it back to the debtor until the
principal was repaid. In the case of a mortgage, the house was in theory
not even purchased but pledged as security, but any income from it
accrued to the lender. In the eleventh century this became a favorite
trick of monasteries. In 1148 it was made illegal: henceforth, all
income was to be subtracted from the principal. Similarly, in 1187
merchants were forbidden to charge higher prices when selling on
credit—the Church thereby going much further than any school of Islamic
law ever had. In 1179 usury was made a mortal sin and usurers were
excommunicated and denied Christian burial.¹²² Before long, new orders
of itinerant friars like the Franciscans and Dominicans organized
preaching campaigns, traveling town to town, village to village,
threatening moneylenders with the loss of their eternal souls if they
did not make restitution to their victims.

All this was echoed by a heady intellectual debate in the newly founded
universities, not so much as to whether usury was sinful and illegal,
but precisely why. Some argued that it was theft of another’s material
possessions; others that it constituted a theft of time, charging others
for something that belonged only to God. Some held that it embodied the
sin of Sloth, since like the Confucians, Catholic thinkers usually held
that a merchant’s profit could only be justified as payment for his
labor (i.e., in transporting goods to wherever they were needed),
whereas interest accrued even if the lender did nothing at all. Soon the
rediscovery of Aristotle, who returned in Arabic translation (and the
influence of Muslim sources like Ghazali and Ibn Sina), added new
arguments: that treating money as an end in itself defied its true
purpose; that charging interest was unnatural, in that it treated mere
metal as if it were a living thing that could breed or bear fruit.¹²³

But as the Church authorities soon discovered, when one starts something
like this, it’s very hard to keep a lid on it. Soon, new popular
religious movements were appearing everywhere, and many took up the same
direction so many had in late Antiquity, not only challenging commerce
but questioning the very legitimacy of private property. Most were
labeled heresies and violently suppressed, but many of the same
arguments were taken up amongst the mendicant orders themselves. By the
thirteenth century, the great intellectual debate was between the
Franciscans and the Dominicans over “apostolic poverty”—basically, over
whether Christianity could be reconciled with property of any sort.

At the same time, the revival of Roman law—which, as we’ve seen, began
from the assumption of absolute private property—put new intellectual
weapons in the hands of those who wished to argue that, at least in the
case of commercial loans, usury laws should be relaxed. The great
discovery in this case was the notion of _interesse_, which is where our
word “interest” originally comes from: a compensation for loss suffered
because of late payment.¹²⁴ The argument soon became that if a merchant
made a commercial loan even for some minimal period (say, a month), it
was not usurious for him to charge a percentage for each month
afterward, since this was a penalty, not rental for the money, and it
was justified as compensation for the profit he _would_ have made, had
he placed it in some profitable investment, as any merchant would
ordinarily be expected to do.¹²⁵

[]

The reader may be wondering how it could have been possible for usury
laws to move in two opposite directions simultaneously. The answer would
seem to be that politically, the situation in Western Europe was
remarkably chaotic. Most kings were weak, their holdings fractured and
uncertain; the Continent was a checkerboard of baronies, principalities,
urban communes, manors, and church estates. Jurisdictions were
constantly being renegotiated—usually by war. Merchant capitalism of the
sort long familiar in the Muslim Near West only really managed to
establish itself—quite late, compared with the situation in the rest of
the Medieval world—when merchant capitalists managed to secure a
political foothold in the independent city-states of northern Italy—most
famously, Venice, Florence, Genoa, and Milan—followed by the German
cities of the Hanseatic League.¹²⁶ Italian bankers ultimately managed to
free themselves from the threat of expropriation by themselves taking
over governments, and by doing so, acquiring their own court systems
(capable of enforcing contracts) and even more critically, their own
armies.¹²⁷

What jumps out, in comparison with the Muslim world, are these links of
finance, trade, and violence. Whereas Persian and Arab thinkers assumed
that the market emerged as an extension of mutual aid, Christians never
completely overcame the suspicion that commerce was really an extension
of usury, a form of fraud only truly legitimate when directed against
one’s mortal enemies. Debt was, indeed, sin—on the part of both parties
to the transaction. Competition was essential to the nature of the
market, but competition was (usually) nonviolent warfare. There was a
reason why, as I’ve already observed, the words for “truck and barter”
in almost all European languages were derived from terms meaning
“swindle,” “bamboozle,” or “deceive.” Some disdained commerce for that
reason. Others embraced it. Few would have denied that the connection
was there.

One need only examine the way that Islamic credit instruments—or for
that matter, the Islamic ideal of the merchant adventurer—were
eventually adopted to see just how intimate this connection really was.

It is often held that the first pioneers of modern banking were the
Military Order of the Knights of the Temple of Solomon, commonly known
as the Knights Templar. A fighting order of monks, they played a key
role in financing the Crusades. Through the Templars, a lord in southern
France might take out a mortgage on one of his tenements and receive a
“draft” (a bill of exchange, modeled on the Muslim _suftaja_, but
written in a secret code) redeemable for cash from the Temple in
Jerusalem. In other words, Christians appear to have first adopted
Islamic financial techniques to finance attacks against Islam.

The Templars lasted from 1118 to 1307, but they finally went the way of
so many Medieval trading minorities: King Phillip IV, deep in debt to
the order, turned on them, accusing them of unspeakable crimes; their
leaders were tortured and ultimately killed, and their wealth was
expropriated.¹²⁸ Much of the problem was that they lacked a powerful
home base. Italian banking houses such as the Bardi, Peruzzi, and Medici
did much better. In banking history, the Italians are most famous for
their complex joint-stock organization and for spearheading the use of
Islamic-style bills of exchange.¹²⁹ At first these were simple enough:
basically just a form of long-distance money-changing. A merchant could
present a certain amount in florins to a banker in Italy and receive a
notarized bill registering the equivalent in the international money of
account (Carolingian derniers), due in, say, three months’ time, and
then after it came due, either he or his agent could cash it for an
equivalent amount of local currency in the Champagne fairs, which were
both the great yearly commercial emporia, and great financial clearing
houses, of the European High Middle Ages. But they quickly morphed into
a plethora of new, creative forms, mainly a way of navigating—or even
profiting from—the endlessly complicated European currency situation.¹³⁰

Most of the capital for these banking enterprises derived from the
Mediterranean trade in Indian Ocean spices and Eastern luxuries. Yet
unlike the Indian Ocean, the Mediterranean was a constant war zone.
Venetian galleys doubled as both merchant vessels and warships, replete
with cannon and marines, and the differences between trade, crusade, and
piracy often depended on the balance of forces at any given moment.¹³¹
The same was true on land: where Asian empires tended to separate the
sphere of warriors and merchants, in Europe they often overlapped:

All up and down Central Europe, from Tuscany to Flanders, from Brabant
to Livonia, merchants not only supplied warriors—as they did all over
Europe—they sat in governments that made war and, sometimes, buckled on
armor and went into battle themselves. Such places make a long list: not
only Florence, Milan, Venice, and Genoa, but also Augsburg, Nuremberg,
Strasbourg, and Zurich; not only Lübeck, Hamburg, Bremen, and Danzig,
but also Bruges, Ghent, Leiden, and Cologne. Some of them—Florence,
Nuremberg, Siena, Bern, and Ulm come to mind—built considerable
territorial states.¹³²

The Venetians were only the most famous in this regard. They created a
veritable mercantile empire over the course of the eleventh century,
seizing islands like Crete and Cyprus and establishing sugar plantations
that eventually—anticipating a pattern eventually to become all too
familiar in the New World—came to be staffed largely by African
slaves.¹³³ Genoa soon followed suit; one of their most lucrative
businesses was raiding and trading along the Black Sea to acquire slaves
to sell to the Mamluks in Egypt or to work mines leased from the
Turks.¹³⁴ The Genoese republic was also the inventor of a unique mode of
military financing, which might be known as war by subscription, whereby
those planning expeditions sold shares to investors in exchange for the
rights to an equivalent percentage of the spoils. It was precisely the
same galleys, with the same “merchant adventurers” aboard, who would
eventually pass through the pillars of Hercules to follow the Atlantic
coast to Flanders or the Champagne fairs, carrying cargoes of nutmeg or
cayenne, silks and woolen goods—along with the inevitable bills of
exchange.¹³⁵

[]

It would be instructive, I think, to pause a moment to think about this
term, “merchant adventurer.” Originally it just meant a merchant who
operated outside his own country. It was around this same time, however,
at the height of the fairs of Champagne and the Italian merchant
empires, between 1160 and 1172, that the term “adventure” began to take
on its contemporary meaning. The man most responsible for it was the
French poet Chretien de Troyes, author of the famous Arthurian
romances—most famous, perhaps, for being the first to tell the story of
Sir Percival and the Holy Grail. The romances were a new sort of
literature featuring a new sort of hero, the “knight-errant,” a warrior
who roamed the world in search of, precisely, “adventure”—in the
contemporary sense of the word: perilous challenges, love, treasure, and
renown. Stories of knightly adventure quickly became enormously popular,
Chretein was followed by innumerable imitators, and the central
characters in the stories—Arthur and Guinevere, Lancelot, Gawain,
Percival, and the rest—became known to everyone, as they are still. This
courtly ideal of the gallant knight, the quest, the joust, romance and
adventure, remains central to our image of the Middle Ages.¹³⁶

The curious thing is that it bears almost no relation to reality.
Nothing remotely like a real “knight-errant” ever existed. “Knights” had
originally been a term for freelance warriors, drawn from the younger
or, often, bastard sons of the minor nobility. Unable to inherit, many
were forced to band together to seek their fortunes. Many became little
more than roving bands of thugs, in an endless pursuit of
plunder—precisely the sort of people who made merchants’ lives so
dangerous. Culminating in the twelfth century, there was a concerted
effort to bring this dangerous population under the control of the civil
authorities: not only the code of chivalry, but the tournament, the
joust—all these were more than anything else ways of keeping them out of
trouble, as it were, in part by setting knights against each other, in
part by turning their entire existence into a kind of stylized
ritual.¹³⁷ The ideal of the lone wandering knight, in search of some
gallant adventure, on the other hand, seems to have come out of nowhere.

This is important, since it lies at the very heart of our image of the
Middle Ages—and the explanation, I think, is revealing. We have to
recall that merchants had begun to achieve unprecedented social and even
political power around this time, but that, in dramatic contrast to
Islam, where a figure like Sindbad—the successful merchant
adventurer—could serve as a fictional exemplar of the perfect life,
merchants, unlike warriors, were never seen as paragons of much of
anything.

It’s likely no coincidence that Chretien was living in Troyes, at the
very heartland of the Champagne fairs that had become, in turn, the
commercial hub of Western Europe.¹³⁸ While he appears to have modeled
his vision of Camelot on the elaborate court life under his patron Henri
the Liberal (1152–1181), Count of Champagne, and his wife Marie,
daughter of Eleanor of Aquitaine, the real court was staffed by low-born
_commerçants_, who served as serjeants of the fairs—leaving most real
knights in the role of onlookers, guards, or—at
tournaments—entertainers.

This is not to say that tournaments did not become a kind of economic
focus in their own right, according to one early twentieth-century
Medievalist, Amy Kelly:

The biographer of Guillaume le Marechal gives an idea of how this rabble
of courtly routiers amused itself on the jousting fields of western
Europe. To the tournaments, occurring in a brisk season about twice a
month from Pentecost to the feast of St John, flocked the young bloods,
sometimes three thousand strong, taking possession of the nearest town.
Thither also flocked horse dealers from Lombardy and Spain, from
Brittany and the Low Countries, as well as armorers, haberdashers for
man and beast, usurers, mimes and story-tellers, acrobats, necromancers,
and other gentlemen of the lists, the field, the road. Entertainers of
every stripe found liberal patronage … There were feasts in upper
chambers, and forges rang in the smithies all night long. Brawls with
grisly incidents—a cracked skull, a gouged eye—occurred as the betting
progressed and the dice flew. To cry up their champions in the field
came ladies of fair name and others of no name at all.

The hazards, the concourse, the prizes, keyed men to the pitch of war.
The stakes were magnificent, for the victor held his prize, horse and
man, for ransom. And for these ransoms fiefs went in gage or the hapless
victim fell into the hands of usurers, giving his men, and in extremity,
himself, as hostages. Fortunes were made and lost on the point of a
lance and many a mother’s son failed to ride home.¹³⁹

So, it was not only that the merchants supplied the materials that made
the fairs possible; Since vanquished knights technically owed their
lives to the victors, merchants ended up, in their capacity as
moneylenders, making good business out of liquidating their assets.
Alternately, a knight might borrow vast sums to outfit himself in
magnificence, hoping to impress some fair lady (with handsome dowry)
with his victories; others, to take part in the continual whoring and
gambling that always surrounded such events. Losers would end up having
to sell their armor and horses, and this created the danger that they
would go back to being highwaymen, foment pogroms (if their creditors
were Jews) or, if they had lands, make new fiscal demands on those
unfortunate enough to live on them.

Others turned to war, which itself tended to drive the creation of new
markets.¹⁴⁰ In one of the most dramatic of such incidents, in November
1199, a large number of knights at a tournament at the castle of Écry in
Champagne, sponsored by Henry’s son, Theobald, were seized by a great
religious passion, abandoned their games, and swore a vow to instead
retake the Holy Land. The crusader army then proceeded to commission the
Venetian fleet for transport in exchange for a promise of a 50-percent
share in all resulting profits. In the end, rather than proceeding to
the Holy Land, they ended up sacking the (much wealthier, Orthodox)
Christian city of Constantinople after a prolonged and bloody siege. A
Flemish count named Baldwin was installed as “Latin Emperor of
Constantinople,” but attempting to govern a city that had been largely
destroyed and stripped of everything of value ensured that he and his
barons soon ended up in great financial difficulties. In a gigantic
version of what was happening on the small scale in so many tournaments,
they were ultimately reduced to stripping the metal off the church roofs
and auctioning holy relics to pay back their Venetian creditors. By
1259, Baldwin had sunk to the point of taking out a mortgage on his own
son, who was taken back to Venice as security for a loan.¹⁴¹

All this does not really answer the question: Whence, then, this image
of the solitary knight-errant, wandering the forests of a mythic Albion,
challenging rivals, confronting ogres, fairies, wizards, and mysterious
beasts? The answer should be clear by now. Really, this is just a
sublimated, romanticized image of the traveling merchants themselves:
men who did, after all, set off on lonely ventures through wilds and
forests, whose outcome was anything but certain.¹⁴²

And what of the Grail, that mysterious object that all the
knights-errant were ultimately seeking? Oddly enough, Richard Wagner,
composer of the opera _Parzifal_, first suggested that the Grail was a
symbol inspired by the new forms of finance.¹⁴³ Where earlier epic
heroes sought after, and fought over, piles of real, concrete gold and
silver—the Nibelung’s hoard—these new ones, born of the new commercial
economy, pursued purely abstract forms of value. No one, after all, knew
precisely what the Grail was. Even the epics disagree: sometimes it’s a
plate, sometimes a cup, sometimes a stone. (Wolfram von Eschenbach
imagined it to be a jewel knocked from Lucifer’s helmet in a battle at
the dawn of time.) In a way it doesn’t matter. The point is that it’s
invisible, intangible, but at the same time of infinite, inexhaustible
value, containing everything, capable of making the wasteland flower,
feeding the world, providing spiritual sustenance, and healing wounded
bodies. Marc Shell even suggested that it would best be conceived as a
blank check, the ultimate financial abstraction.¹⁴⁴


What, Then, Were the Middle Ages?

_Each of us is a mere symbolon of a man, the result of bisection, like
the flat fish, two out of one, and each of us is constantly searching
for his corresponding symbolon_.

—Plato, _The Symposium_

There is one way that Wagner got it wrong: the introduction of financial
abstraction was not a sign that Europe was leaving the Middle Ages, but
that it was finally, belatedly, entering it.

Wagner’s not really to blame here. Almost everyone gets this wrong,
because the most characteristic Medieval institutions and ideas arrived
so late in Europe that we tend to mistake them for the first stirrings
of modernity. We’ve already seen this with bills of exchange, already in
use in the East by 700 or 800 ad, but only reaching Europe several
centuries later. The independent university—perhaps the quintessential
Medieval institution—is another case in point. Nalanda was founded in
427 ad, and there were independent institutions of higher learning all
over China and the Near West (from Cairo to Constantinople) centuries
before the creation of similar institutions in Oxford, Paris, and
Bologna.

If the Axial Age was the age of materialism, the Middle Ages were above
all else the age of transcendence. The collapse of the ancient empires
did not, for the most part, lead to the rise of new ones.¹⁴⁵ Instead,
once-subversive popular religious movements were catapulted into the
status of dominant institutions. Slavery declined or disappeared, as did
the overall level of violence. As trade picked up, so did the pace of
technological innovation; greater peace brought greater possibilities
not only for the movement of silks and spices, but also of people and
ideas. The fact that monks in Medieval China could devote themselves to
translating ancient treatises in Sanskrit, and that students in madrasas
in Medieval Indonesia could debate legal terms in Arabic, is testimony
to the profound cosmopolitanism of the age.

Our image of the Middle Ages as an “age of faith”—and hence, of blind
obedience to authority—is a legacy of the French Enlightenment. Again,
it makes sense only if you think of the “Middle Ages” as something that
happened primarily in Europe. Not only was the Far West an unusually
violent place by world standards, the Catholic Church was
extraordinarily intolerant. It’s hard to find many Medieval Chinese,
Indian, or Islamic parallels, for example, to the burning of “witches”
or the massacre of heretics. More typical was the pattern that prevailed
in certain periods of Chinese history, when it was perfectly acceptable
for a scholar to dabble in Taoism in his youth, become a Confucian in
middle age, then become a Buddhist on retirement. If there is an essence
to Medieval thought, it lies not in blind obedience to authority, but
rather in a dogged insistence that the values that govern our ordinary
daily affairs—particularly those of the court and marketplace—are
confused, mistaken, illusory, or perverse. True value lay elsewhere, in
a domain that cannot be directly perceived, but only approached through
study or contemplation. But this in turn made the faculties of
contemplation, and the entire question of knowledge, an endless problem.
Consider for example the great conundrum, pondered by Muslim, Christian,
and Jewish philosophers alike: What does it mean to simultaneously say
that we can only know God through our faculties of Reason, but that
Reason itself partakes of God? Chinese philosophers were struggling with
similar conundrums when they asked, “Do we read the classics or do the
classics read us?” Almost all the great intellectual debates of the age
turned on this question in one way or another. Is the world created by
our minds, or our minds by the world?

We can see the same tensions within predominant theories of money.
Aristotle had argued that gold and silver had no intrinsic value in
themselves, and that money therefore was just a social convention,
invented by human communities to facilitate exchange. Since it had “come
about by agreement, therefore it is within our power to change it or
render it useless” if we all decide that that’s what we want to do.¹⁴⁶
This position gained little traction in the materialist intellectual
environment of the Axial Age, but by the later Middle Ages, it had
become standard wisdom. Ghazali was among the first to embrace it. In
his own way he took it even further, insisting that the fact that a gold
coin has no intrinsic value _is_ the basis of its value as money, since
this very lack of intrinsic value is what allows it to “govern,”
measure, and regulate the value of other things. But at the same time,
Ghazali denied that money was a social convention. It was given us by
God.¹⁴⁷

Ghazali was a mystic, and a political conservative, so one might argue
that he ultimately shied away from the most radical implications of his
own ideas. But one could also ask whether, in the Middle Ages, arguing
that money was an arbitrary social convention was really all that
radical a position. After all, when Christian and Chinese thinkers
insisted that it was, it was almost always as a way of saying that money
is whatever the king or the emperor wished it to be. In that sense,
Ghazali’s position was perfectly consonant with the Islamic desire to
protect the market from political interference by saying that it fell
properly under the aegis of religious authorities.

[]

The fact that Medieval money took such abstract, virtual forms—checks,
tallies, paper money—meant that questions like these (“What does it mean
to say that money is a symbol?”) cut to the core of the philosophical
issues of the day. Nowhere is this so true as in the history of the word
“symbol” itself. Here we encounter some parallels so extraordinary that
they can only be described as startling.

When Aristotle argued that coins are merely social conventions, the term
he used was _symbolon_—from which our own word “symbol” is derived.
Symbolon was originally the Greek word for “tally”—an object broken in
half to mark a contract or agreement, or marked and broken to record a
debt. So our word “symbol” traces back originally to objects broken to
record debt contracts of one sort or another. This is striking enough.
What’s really, remarkable, though, is that the contemporary Chinese word
for “symbol,” fu, or _fu hao_, has almost exactly the same origin.¹⁴⁸

Let’s start with the Greek term _“symbolon.”_ Two friends at dinner
might create a symbolon if they took some object—a ring, a knucklebone,
a piece of crockery—and broke it in half. Any time in the future when
either of them had need of the other’s help, they could bring their
halves as reminders of the friendship. Archeologists have found hundreds
of little broken friendship tablets of this sort in Athens, often made
of clay. Later they became ways of sealing a contract, the object
standing in the place of witnesses.¹⁴⁹ The word was also used for tokens
of every sort: those given to Athenian jurors entitling them to vote, or
tickets for admission to the theater. It could be used refer to money
too, but only if that money had no intrinsic value: bronze coins whose
value was fixed only by local convention.¹⁵⁰ Used for written documents,
a symbolon could also be passport, contract, commission, or receipt. By
extension, it came to mean: omen, portent, symptom, or finally, in the
now-familiar sense, symbol.

The path to the latter appears to have been twofold. Aristotle fixed on
the fact that a tally could be anything: what the object was didn’t
matter; all that mattered was that there was a way to break it in half.
It is exactly so with language: words are sounds we use to refer to
objects, or to ideas, but the relation is arbitrary: there’s no
particular reason, for example, that English-speakers should choose
“dog” to refer to an animal and “god” to refer to a deity, rather than
the other way around. The only reason is social convention: an agreement
between all speakers of a language that this sound shall refer to that
thing. In this sense, all words were arbitrary tokens of agreement.¹⁵¹
So, of course, is money—for Aristotle, not only worthless bronze coins
that we agree to treat as if they were worth a certain amount, but all
money, even gold, is just a symbolon, a social convention.¹⁵²

All this came to seem almost commonsensical in the thirteenth century of
Thomas Aquinas, when rulers could change the value of currency simply by
issuing a decree. Still, Medieval theories of symbols derived less from
Aristotle than from the Mystery Religions of Antiquity, where “symbolon”
came to refer to certain cryptic formulae or talismans that only
initiates could understand.¹⁵³ It thus came to mean a concrete token,
perceptible to the senses, that could only be understood in reference to
some hidden reality entirely beyond the domain of sensory experience.¹⁵⁴

The theorist of the symbol whose work was most widely read and respected
in the Middle Ages was a sixth-century Greek Christian mystic whose real
name has been lost to history, but who is known by his pseudonym
Dionysius the Areopagite.¹⁵⁵ Dionysius took up the notion in this latter
sense to confront what was to become the great intellectual problem of
the age: How is it possible for humans to have knowledge of God? How can
we, whose knowledge is confined to what our senses can perceive of the
material universe, have knowledge of a being whose nature is absolutely
alien to that material universe—“that infinity beyond being,” as he puts
it, “that oneness that is beyond intelligence”?¹⁵⁶ It would be
impossible were it not for the fact that God, being all-powerful, can do
anything, and therefore, just as he places his own body in the
Eucharist, so can he reveal himself to our minds through an endless
variety of material shapes. Intriguingly, Dionysius warns us that we
cannot begin to understand how symbols work until we rid ourselves of
the notion that divine things are likely to be beautiful. Images of
luminous angels and celestial chariots are only likely to confuse us,
since we will be tempted to imagine that that’s what heaven is actually
like, and in fact we cannot possibly conceive of what heaven is like.
Instead, effective symbols are, like the original symbolon, homely
objects selected apparently at random; often, ugly, ridiculous things,
whose very incongruity reminds us that they are _not_ God; of the fact
that God “transcends all materiality,” even as, in another sense, they
are God.¹⁵⁷ But the notion that they are in any sense tokens of
agreement between equals is gone entirely. Symbols are gifts, absolute,
free, hierarchical gifts, presented by a being so far above us that any
thought of reciprocity, debt, or mutual obligation is simply
inconceivable.¹⁵⁸

Compare the Greek dictionary above to the following, from a Chinese
dictionary:

FU. To agree with, to tally. The two halves of a tally.

• evidence; proof of identity, credentials

• to fulfill a promise, to keep one’s word

• to reconcile

• the mutual agreement between Heaven’s appointment and human affairs

• a tally, a check

• an imperial seal or stamp

• a warrant, a commission, credentials

• like fitting the two halves of a tally, in exact agreement

• a symbol, a sign …¹⁵⁹

The evolution is almost exactly the same. Like _symbola, fu_ can be
tallies, contracts, official seals, warrants, passports, or credentials.
As promises, they can embody an agreement, a debt contract, or even a
relation of feudal vassalage—since a minor lord agreeing to become
another man’s vassal would split a tally just as he would if borrowing
grain or money. The common feature seems to be a contract between two
parties that begin as equal, in which one agrees to become subordinate.
Later, as the state became more centralized, we mainly hear about fu
presented to officials as a means of conveying order: the official would
take the left half with him when posted to the provinces, and when the
emperor wished to send an important command, he would send the right
half with the messenger to make sure that the official knew it was
actually the imperial will.¹⁶⁰

We’ve already seen how paper money seems to have developed from paper
versions of such debt contracts, ripped in half and reunited. For
Chinese theorists, of course, Aristotle’s argument that money was simply
a social convention was hardly radical; it was simply assumed. Money was
whatever the emperor established it to be. Though even here there was a
slight proviso, as evidenced in the entry above, that “fu” could also
refer to “the mutual agreement between heaven’s appointment and human
affairs.” Just as officials were appointed by the emperor, the emperor
was ultimately appointed by a higher power, and he could only rule
effectively as long as he kept its mandate, which is why propitious
omens were called “fu,” signs that heaven approved of the ruler, just as
natural disasters were a sign that he had strayed.¹⁶¹

Here Chinese ideas did grow a bit closer to the Christian ones. But
Chinese conceptions of the cosmos had one crucial difference: since
there was no emphasis on the absolute gulf between our world and the one
beyond it, contractual relations with the gods were by no means out of
the question. This was particularly true in Medieval Taoism, where monks
were ordained through a ceremony called “rending the tally,” ripping
apart a piece of paper that represented a contract with heaven.¹⁶² It
was the same with the magical talismans, also called “fu,” which an
adept might receive from his master. These were literally tallies: the
adept kept one; the other half was said to be retained by the gods. Such
talismanic fu took the form of diagrams, said to represent a form of
celestial writing, comprehensible only to the gods, which committed them
to assist the bearer, often giving the adept the right to call on armies
of divine protectors with whose help he could slay demons, cure the
sick, or otherwise attain miraculous powers. But they could also become,
like Dionysius’ symbola, objects of contemplation, by which one’s mind
can ultimately attain some knowledge of the invisible world beyond our
own.¹⁶³

Many of the most compelling visual symbols to emerge from Medieval China
trace back to such talismans: the River Symbol, or, for that matter, the
yin-yang symbol that seems to have developed out of it.¹⁶⁴ Just looking
at a yin-yang symbol, it is easy enough to imagine the left and right
(sometimes, too, called “male” and “female”) halves of a tally.

[]

A tally does away with the need for witnesses; if the two surfaces
agree, then everyone knows that the agreement between the contracting
parties exists as well. This is why Aristotle saw it as a fit metaphor
for words: word A corresponds to concept B because there is a tacit
agreement that we shall act as if it does. The striking thing about
tallies is that even though they might begin as simple tokens of
friendship and solidarity, in almost all the later examples, what the
two parties actually agree to create is a relation of inequality: of
debt, obligation, subordination to another’s orders. This is in turn
what makes it possible to use the metaphor for the relation between the
material world and that more powerful world that ultimately gives it
meaning. The two sides are the same. Yet what they create is absolute
difference. Hence for a Medieval Christian mystic, as for Medieval
Chinese magicians, symbols could be literal fragments of heaven—even if
for the first, they provided a language whereby one could have some
understanding of beings one could not possibly interact with; while for
the second, they provided a way of interacting, even making practical
arrangements, with beings whose language one could not possibly
understand.

On one level, this is just another version of the dilemmas that always
arise when we try to reimagine the world through debt—that peculiar
agreement between two equals that they shall no longer be equals, until
such time as they become equals once again. Still, the problem took on a
peculiar piquancy in the Middle Ages, when the economy became, as it
were, spiritualized. As gold and silver migrated to holy places,
ordinary transactions everywhere came to be carried out primarily
through credit. Inevitably, arguments about wealth and markets became
arguments about debt and morality, and arguments about debt and morality
became arguments about the nature of our place in the universe. As we’ve
seen, the solutions varied considerably. Europe and India saw a return
to hierarchy: society became a ranked order of Priests, Warriors,
Merchants, and Farmers (or in Christendom, just Priests, Warriors, and
Farmers). Debts between the orders were considered threatening because
they implied the potential of equality, and they often led to outright
violence. In China, in contrast, the principle of debt often became the
governing principle of the cosmos: karmic debts, milk-debts, debt
contracts between human beings and celestial powers. From the point of
view of the authorities, all these led to excess, and potentially to
vast concentrations of capital that might throw the entire social order
out of balance. It was the responsibility of government to intervene
constantly to keep markets running smoothly and equitably, thus avoiding
new outbreaks of popular unrest. In the world of Islam, where
theologians held that God recreated the entire universe at every
instant, market fluctuations were instead seen as merely another
manifestation of divine will.

The striking thing is that the Confucian condemnation of the merchant,
and the Islamic celebration of the merchant, ultimately led to the same
thing: prosperous societies with flourishing markets, but where the
elements never came together to create the great merchant banks and
industrial firms that were to become the hallmark of modern capitalism.
It’s especially striking in the case of Islam. Certainly, the Islamic
world produced figures who would be hard to describe as anything but
capitalists. Large-scale merchants were referred to as _sĀhib al-mĀl_,
“owners of capital,” and legal theorists spoke freely about the creation
and expansion of capital funds. At the height of the Caliphate, some of
these merchants were in possession of millions of dinars and seeking
profitable investment. Why did nothing like modern capitalism emerge? I
would highlight two factors. First, Islamic merchants appear to have
taken their free-market ideology seriously. The marketplace did not fall
under the direct supervision of the government; contracts were made
between individuals—ideally, “with a handshake and a glance at
heaven”—and thus honor and credit became largely indistinguishable. This
is inevitable: you can’t have cutthroat competition where there is no
one stopping people from literally cutting one another’s throats.
Second, Islam also took seriously the principle, later enshrined in
classical economic theory but only unevenly observed in practice, that
profits are the reward for risk. Trading enterprises were assumed to be,
quite literally, adventures, in which traders exposed themselves to the
dangers of storm and shipwreck, savage nomads, forests, steppes, and
deserts, exotic and unpredictable foreign customs, and arbitrary
governments. Financial mechanisms designed to avoid these risks were
considered impious. This was one of the objections to usury: if one
demands a fixed rate of interest, the profits are guaranteed. Similarly,
commercial investors were expected to share the risk. This made most of
the forms of finance and insurance that were to later develop in Europe
impossible.¹⁶⁵

In this sense the Buddhist monasteries of early Medieval China represent
the opposite extreme. The Inexhaustible Treasuries were inexhaustible
because, by continually lending their money out at interest and never
otherwise touching their capital, they could guarantee effectively
risk-free investments. That was the entire point. By doing so, Buddhism,
unlike Islam, produced something very much like what we now call
“corporations”—entities that, through a charming legal fiction, we
imagine to be persons, just like human beings, but immortal, never
having to go through all the human untidiness of marriage, reproduction,
infirmity, and death. To put it in properly Medieval terms, they are
very much like angels.

Legally, our notion of the corporation is very much a product of the
European High Middle Ages. The legal idea of a corporation as a “fictive
person” (_persona ficta_)—a person who, as Maitland, the great British
legal historian, put it, “is immortal, who sues and is sued, who holds
lands, has a seal of his own, who makes regulations for those natural
persons of whom he is composed”¹⁶⁶—was first established in canon law by
Pope Innocent IV in 1250 ad, and one of the first kinds of entities it
applied to were monasteries—as also to universities, churches,
municipalities, and guilds.¹⁶⁷

The idea of the corporation as an angelic being is not mine,
incidentally. I borrowed it from the great Medievalist Ernst
Kantorowicz, who pointed out that all this was happening right around
the same time that Thomas Aquinas was developing the notion that angels
were really just the personification of Platonic Ideas.¹⁶⁸ “According to
the teachings of Aquinas,” he notes, “every angel represented a
species.”

Little wonder then that finally the personified collectives of the
jurists, which were juristically immortal species, displayed all the
features otherwise attributed to angels … The jurists themselves
recognized that there was some similarity between their abstractions and
the angelic beings. In this respect, it may be said that the political
and legal world of thought of the later Middle Ages began to be
populated by immaterial angelic bodies, large and small: they were
invisible, ageless, sempiternal, immortal, and sometimes even
ubiquitous; and they were endowed with a _corpus intellectuale_ or
_mysticum_ [an intellectual or mystical body] which could stand any
comparison with the “spiritual bodies” of the celestial beings.¹⁶⁹

All this is worth emphasizing because while we are used to assuming that
there’s something natural or inevitable about the existence of
corporations, in historical terms, they are actually strange, exotic
creatures. No other great tradition came up with anything like it.¹⁷⁰
They are the most peculiarly European addition to that endless
proliferation of metaphysical entities so characteristic of the Middle
Ages—as well as the most enduring.

They have, of course, changed a great deal over time. Medieval
corporations owned property, and they often engaged in complex financial
arrangements, but in no case were they profit-seeking enterprises in the
modern sense. The ones that came closest were, perhaps unsurprisingly,
monastic orders—above all, the Cistercians—whose monasteries became
something like the Chinese Buddhist ones, surrounded by mills and
smithies, practicing rationalized commercial agriculture with a
workforce of “lay brothers” who were effectively wage laborers, spinning
and exporting wool. Some even talk about “monastic capitalism.”¹⁷¹
Still, the ground was only really prepared for capitalism in the
familiar sense of the term when the merchants began to organize
themselves into eternal bodies as a way to win monopolies, legal or de
facto, and avoid the ordinary risks of trade. An excellent case in point
was the Society of Merchant Adventurers, charted by King Henry IV in
London in 1407, who, despite the romantic-sounding name, were mainly in
the business of buying up British woolens and selling them in the
Flanders fairs. They were not a modern joint-stock company, but a rather
old-fashioned Medieval merchant guild, but they provided a structure
whereby older, more substantial merchants could simply provide loans to
younger ones, and they managed to secure enough of an exclusive control
over the woolen trade that substantial profits were pretty much
guaranteed.¹⁷² When such companies began to engage in armed ventures
overseas, though, a new era of human history might be said to have
begun.



CHAPTER ELEVEN  AGE OF THE GREAT CAPITALIST EMPIRES



_(1450–1971 AD)_


_“Eleven pesos, then; and as you can’t pay me the eleven pesos, that
makes another eleven pesos—twenty-two in all: eleven for the serape and
the petate and eleven because you can’t pay. Is that right, Crisiero?”_

_Crisiero had no knowledge of figures, so it was very natural that he
said, “That is right, patrón.”_

_Don Arnulfo was a decent, honorable man. Other landowners were a good
deal less softhearted with their peons_.

_“The shirt is five pesos. Right? Very well. And as you can’t pay for
it, that’s five pesos. And as you remain in my debt for the five pesos,
that’s five pesos. And as I shall never have the money from you, that’s
five pesos. So that makes five and five and five and five. That’s twenty
pesos. Agreed?”_

_“Yes, patrón, agreed.”_

_The peon can get the shirt nowhere else when he needs one. He can get
credit nowhere but from his master, for whom he works and from whom he
can never get away as long as he owes him a centavo_.

—B. Traven, _The Carreta_

THE EPOCH THAT BEGAN with what we’re used to calling the “Age of
Exploration” was marked by so many things that were genuinely new—the
rise of modern science, capitalism, humanism, the nation-state—that it
may seem odd to frame it as just another turn of an historical cycle.
Still, from the perspective I’ve been developing in this book, that is
what it was.

The era begins around 1450 with a turn away from virtual currencies and
credit economies and back to gold and silver. The subsequent flow of
bullion from the Americas sped the process immensely, sparking a “price
revolution” in Western Europe that turned traditional society
upside-down. What’s more, the return to bullion was accompanied by the
return of a whole host of other conditions that, during the Middle Ages,
had been largely suppressed or kept at bay: vast empires and
professional armies, massive predatory warfare, untrammeled usury and
debt peonage, but also materialist philosophies, a new burst of
scientific and philosophical creativity—even the return of chattel
slavery. It was in no way a simple repeat performance. All the Axial Age
pieces reappeared, but they came together in an entirely different way.

[]

The 1400s are a peculiar period in European history. It was a century of
endless catastrophe: large cities were regularly decimated by the Black
Death; the commercial economy sagged and in some regions collapsed
entirely; whole cities went bankrupt, defaulting on their bonds; the
knightly classes squabbled over the remnants, leaving much of the
countryside devastated by endemic warfare. Even in geopolitical terms
Christendom was staggering, with the Ottoman Empire not only scooping up
what remained of Byzantium but pushing steadily into central Europe, its
forces expanding on land and sea.

At the same time, from the perspective of many ordinary farmers and
urban laborers, times couldn’t have been much better. One of the
perverse effects of the bubonic plague, which killed off about one-third
of the European workforce, was that wages increased dramatically. It
didn’t happen immediately, but this was largely because the first
reaction of the authorities was to enact legislation freezing wages, or
even attempting to tie free peasants back to the land again. Such
efforts were met with powerful resistance, culminating in a series of
popular uprisings across Europe. These were squelched, but the
authorities were also forced to compromise. Before long, so much wealth
was flowing into the hands of ordinary people that governments had to
start introducing new laws forbidding the lowborn to wear silks and
ermine, and to limit the number of feast days, which, in many towns and
parishes, began eating up one-third or even half of the year. The
fifteenth century is, in fact, considered the heyday of Medieval festive
life, with its floats and dragons, maypoles and church ales, its Abbots
of Unreason and Lords of Misrule.¹

Over the next centuries, all this was to be destroyed. In England, the
festive life was systematically attacked by Puritan reformers; then
eventually by reformers everywhere, Catholic and Protestant alike. At
the same time its economic basis in popular prosperity dissolved.

Why this happened has been a matter of intense historical debate for
centuries. This much we know: it began with a massive inflation. Between
1500 and 1650, for instance, prices in England increased 500 percent,
but wages rose much more slowly, so that in five generations, real wages
fell to perhaps 40 percent of what they had been. The same thing
happened everywhere in Europe.

Why? The favorite explanation, ever since a French lawyer named Jean
Bodin first proposed it in 1568, was the vast influx of gold and silver
that came pouring into Europe after the conquest of the New World. As
the value of precious metals collapsed, the argument went, the price of
everything else skyrocketed, and wages simply couldn’t keep up.² There
is some evidence to support this. The height of popular prosperity
around 1450 did correspond to a period when bullion—and therefore,
coin—was in particularly short supply.³ The lack of cash played havoc
with international trade in particular; in the 1460s, we hear of ships
full of wares forced to turn back from major ports, as no one had any
cash on hand to buy from them. The problem only started to turn around
later in the decade, with a sudden burst of silver mining in Saxony and
the Tirol, followed by the opening of new sea routes to the Gold Coast
of West Africa. Then came the conquests of Cortés and Pizarro. Between
1520 and 1640, untold tons of gold and silver from Mexico and Peru were
transported across the Atlantic and Pacific in Spanish treasure ships.

The problem with the conventional story is that very little of that gold
and silver lingered very long in Europe. Most of the gold ended up in
temples in India, and the overwhelming majority of the silver bullion
was ultimately shipped off to China. The latter is crucial. If we really
want to understand the origins of the modern world economy, the place to
start is not in Europe at all. The real story is of how China abandoned
the use of paper money. It’s a story worth telling briefly, because very
few people know it.

[]

After the Mongols conquered China in 1271, they kept the system of paper
money in place, and even made occasional (if usually disastrous)
attempts to introduce it in the other parts of their empire. In 1368,
however, they were overthrown by another of China’s great popular
insurrections, and a former peasant leader was once again installed in
power.

During their century of rule, the Mongols had worked closely with
foreign merchants, who became widely detested. Partly as a result, the
former rebels, now the Ming dynasty, were suspicious of commerce in any
form, and they promoted a romantic vision of self-sufficient agrarian
communities. This had some unfortunate consequences. For one thing, it
meant the maintenance of the old Mongol tax system, paid in labor and in
kind; especially since that, in turn, was based on a quasi-caste system
in which subjects were registered as farmers, craftsmen, or soldiers and
forbidden to change their jobs. This proved extraordinarily unpopular.
While government investment in agriculture, roads, and canals did set
off a commercial boom, much of this commerce was technically illegal,
and taxes on crops were so high that many indebted farmers began to flee
their ancestral lands.⁴

Typically, such floating populations can be expected to seek just about
anything but regular industrial employment; here as in Europe, most
preferred a combination of odd jobs, peddling, entertainment, piracy, or
banditry. In China, many also turned prospector. There was a minor
silver rush, with illegal mines cropping up everywhere. Uncoined silver
ingots, instead of official paper money and strings of bronze coins,
soon became the real money of the off-the-books informal economy. When
the government attempted to shut down illegal mines in the 1430s and
1440s, their efforts sparked local insurrections, in which miners would
make common cause with displaced peasants, seize nearby cities, and
sometimes threaten entire provinces.⁵

In the end, the government gave up even trying to suppress the informal
economy. Instead, they swung the other way entirely: stopped issuing
paper money, legalized the mines, allowed silver bullion to become the
recognized currency for large transactions, and even gave private mints
the authority to produce strings of cash.⁶ This, in turn, allowed the
government to gradually abandon the system of labor exactions and
substitute a uniform tax system payable in silver.

Effectively, the Chinese government had gone back to its old policy of
encouraging markets and merely intervening to prevent any undue
concentrations of capital. It quickly proved spectacularly successful,
and Chinese markets boomed. Indeed, many speak of the Ming as having
accomplished something almost unique in world history: this was a time
when the Chinese population was exploding, but living standards markedly
improved.⁷ The problem was that the new policy meant that the regime had
to ensure an abundant supply of silver in the country, so as to keep its
price low and minimize popular unrest—but as it turned out, the Chinese
mines were very quickly exhausted. In the 1530s, new silver mines were
discovered in Japan, but these were exhausted in a decade or two as
well. Before long, China had to turn to Europe and the New World.

Now, since Roman times, Europe had been exporting gold and silver to the
East: the problem was that Europe had never produced much of anything
that Asians wanted to buy, so it was forced to pay in specie for silks,
spices, steel, and other imports. The early years of European expansion
were largely attempts to gain access either to Eastern luxuries or to
new sources of gold and silver with which to pay for them. In those
early days, Atlantic Europe really had only one substantial advantage
over its Muslim rivals: an active and advanced tradition of naval
warfare, honed by centuries of conflict in the Mediterranean. The moment
when Vasco da Gama entered the Indian Ocean in 1498, the principle that
the seas should be a zone of peaceful trade came to an immediate end.
Portuguese flotillas began bombarding and sacking every port city they
came across, then seizing control of strategic points and extorting
protection money from unarmed Indian Ocean merchants for the right to
carry on their business unmolested.

At almost exactly the same time, Christopher Columbus—a Genoese mapmaker
seeking a short-cut to China—touched land in the New World, and the
Spanish and Portuguese empires stumbled into the greatest economic
windfall in human history: entire continents full of unfathomable
wealth, whose inhabitants, armed only with Stone Age weapons, began
conveniently dying almost as soon as they arrived. The conquest of
Mexico and Peru led to the discovery of enormous new sources of precious
metal, and these were exploited ruthlessly and systematically, even to
the point of largely exterminating the surrounding populations to
extract as much precious metal as quickly as possible. As Kenneth
Pomeranz has recently pointed out, none of this would have been possible
were it not for the practically unlimited Asian demand for precious
metals.

Had China in particular not had such a dynamic economy that changing its
metallic base could absorb the staggering quantities of silver mined in
the New World over three centuries, those mines might have become
unprofitable within a few decades. The massive inflation of
silver-denominated prices in Europe from 1500 to 1640 indicates a
shrinking value for the metal there even with Asia draining off much of
the supply.⁸

By 1540, a silver glut caused a collapse in prices across Europe; the
American mines would, at this point, simply have stopped functioning,
and the entire project of American colonization foundered, had it not
been for the demand from China.⁹ Treasure galleons moving toward Europe
soon refrained from unloading their cargoes, instead rounding the horn
of Africa and proceeding across the Indian Ocean toward Canton. After
1571, with the foundation of the Spanish city of Manila, they began to
move directly across the Pacific. By the late sixteenth century, China
was importing almost fifty tons of silver a year, about 90 percent of
its silver, and by the early seventeenth century, 116 tons, or over 97
percent.¹⁰ Huge amounts of silk, porcelain, and other Chinese products
had to be exported to pay for it. Many of these Chinese products, in
turn, ended up in the new cities of Central and South America. This
Asian trade became the single most significant factor in the emerging
global economy, and those who ultimately controlled the financial
levers—particularly Italian, Dutch, and German merchant bankers—became
fantastically rich.

But how exactly did the new global economy cause the collapse of living
standards in Europe? One thing we do know: it clearly was _not_ by
making large amounts of precious metal available for everyday
transactions. If anything, the effect was the opposite. While European
mints were stamping out enormous numbers of rials, thalers, ducats, and
doubloons, which became the new medium of trade from Nicaragua to
Bengal, almost none found their way into the pockets of ordinary
Europeans. Instead, we hear constant complaints about the shortage of
currency. In England:

For much of the Tudor period the circulating medium was so small that
the taxable population simply did not have sufficient coin in which to
pay the benevolences, subsidies, and tenths levied upon them, and time
and time again household plate, the handiest near money that most people
possessed, had to be surrendered.¹¹

This was the case in most of Europe. Despite the massive influx of metal
from the Americas, most families were so low on cash that they were
regularly reduced to melting down the family silver to pay their taxes.

This was because taxes _had_ to be paid in metal. Everyday business in
contrast continued to be transacted much as it had in the Middle Ages,
by means of various forms of virtual credit money: tallies, promissory
notes, or, within smaller communities, simply by keeping track of who
owed what to whom. What really caused the inflation is that those who
ended up in control of the bullion—governments, bankers, large-scale
merchants—were able to use that control to begin changing the rules,
first by insisting that gold and silver _were_ money, and second by
introducing new forms of credit-money for their own use while slowly
undermining and destroying the local systems of trust that had allowed
small-scale communities across Europe to operate largely without the use
of metal currency.

This was a political battle, even if it was also a conceptual argument
about the nature of money. The new regime of bullion money could only be
imposed through almost unparalleled violence—not only overseas, but at
home as well. In much of Europe, the first reaction to the “price
revolution” and accompanying enclosures of common lands was not very
different from what had so recently happened in China: thousands of
one-time peasants fleeing or being forced out of their villages to
become vagabonds or “masterless men,” a process that culminated in
popular insurrections. The reaction of European governments, however,
was entirely different. The rebellions were crushed, and this time, no
subsequent concessions were forthcoming. Vagabonds were rounded up,
exported to the colonies as indentured laborers, and drafted into
colonial armies and navies—or, eventually, set to work in factories at
home.

Almost all of this was carried out through a manipulation of debt. As a
result, the very nature of debt, too, became once again one of the
principal bones of contention.


Part I:

Greed, Terror, Indignation, Debt

No doubt scholars will never stop arguing about the reasons for the
great “price revolution”—largely because it’s not clear what kind of
tools can be applied. Can we really use the methods of modern economics,
which were designed to understand how contemporary economic institutions
operate, to describe the political battles that led to the creation of
those very institutions?

This is not just a conceptual problem. There are moral dangers here. To
take what might seem an “objective,” macro-economic approach to the
origins of the world economy would be to treat the behavior of early
European explorers, merchants, and conquerors as if they were simply
rational responses to opportunities—as if this were just what anyone
would have done in the same situation. This is what the use of equations
so often does: make it seem perfectly natural to assume that, if the
price of silver in China is twice what it is in Seville, and inhabitants
of Seville are capable of getting their hands on large quantities of
silver and transporting it to China, then clearly they will, even if
doing so requires the destruction of entire civilizations. Or if there
is a demand for sugar in England, and enslaving millions is the easiest
way to acquire labor to produce it, then it is inevitable that some will
enslave them. In fact, history makes it quite clear that this is not the
case. Any number of civilizations have probably been in a position to
wreak havoc on the scale that the European powers did in the sixteenth
and seventeenth centuries (Ming China itself was an obvious candidate),
but almost none actually did so.¹²

Consider, for instance, how the gold and silver from the American mines
were extracted. Mining operations began almost immediately upon the fall
of the Aztec capital of Tenochtitlán in 1521. While we are used to
assuming that the Mexican population was devastated simply as an effect
of newly introduced European diseases, contemporary observers felt that
the dragooning of the newly conquered natives to work in the mines was
at least equally responsible.¹³ In _The Conquest of America_, Tzvetan
Todorov offers a compendium of some of the most chilling reports, mostly
from Spanish priests and friars who, even when committed in principle to
the belief that the extermination of the Indians was the judgment of
God, could not disguise their horror at scenes of Spanish soldiers
testing the blades of their weapons by eviscerating random passers-by,
and tearing babies off their mother’s backs to be eaten by dogs. Such
acts might perhaps be written off as what one would expect when a
collection of heavily armed men—many of violent criminal background—are
given absolute impunity; but the reports from the mines imply something
far more systematic. When Fray Toribio de Motolinia wrote of the ten
plagues that he believed God had visited on the inhabitants of Mexico,
he listed smallpox, war, famine, labor exactions, taxes (which caused
many to sell their children to moneylenders, others to be tortured to
death in cruel prisons), and the thousands who died in the building of
the capital city. Above all, he insisted, were the uncountable numbers
who died in the mines:

The eighth plague was the slaves whom the Spaniards made in order to put
them to work in the mines. At first those who were already slaves of the
Aztecs were taken; then those who had given evidence of insubordination;
finally all those who could be caught. During the first years after the
conquest, the slave traffic flourished, and slaves often changed master.
They produced so many marks on their faces, in addition to the royal
brand, that they had their faces covered with letters, for they bore the
marks of all who had bought and sold them.

The ninth plague was the service in the mines, to which the heavily
laden Indians traveled sixty leagues or more to carry provisions … When
their food gave out they died, either at the mines or on the road, for
they had no money to buy food and there was no one to give it to them.
Some reached home in such a state that they died soon after. The bodies
of those Indians and of the slaves who died in the mines produced such a
stench that it caused a pestilence, especially at the mines of Oaxaca.
For half a league around these mines and along a great part of the road
one could scarcely avoid walking over dead bodies or bones, and the
flocks of birds and crows that came to fatten themselves upon the
corpses were so numerous that they darkened the sun.”¹⁴

Similar scenes were reported in Peru, where whole regions were
depopulated by forced service in the mines, and Hispaniola, where the
indigenous population was eradicated entirely.¹⁵

When dealing with conquistadors, we are speaking not just of simple
greed, but greed raised to mythic proportions. This is, after all, what
they are best remembered for. They never seemed to get enough. Even
after the conquest of Tenochtitlán or Cuzco, and the acquisition of
hitherto-unimaginable riches, the conquerors almost invariably regrouped
and started off in search of more treasure.

Moralists throughout the ages have inveighed against the endlessness of
human greed, just as they have against our supposedly endless lust for
power. What history actually reveals, though, is that while humans may
be justly accused of having a proclivity to accuse _others_ of acting
like conquistadors, few really act this way themselves. Even for the
most ambitious of us, our dreams are more like Sindbad’s: to have
adventures, to acquire the means to settle down and live an enjoyable
life, and then, to enjoy it. Max Weber of course argued that the essence
of capitalism is the urge—which he thought first appeared in
Calvinism—never to settle down, but to engage in endless expansion. But
the conquistadors were good Medieval Catholics, even if ones usually
drawn from the most ruthless and unprincipled elements of Spanish
society. Why the unrelenting drive for more and more and more?

It might help, I think, to go back to the very onset of Hernán Cortés’s
conquest of Mexico: What were his immediate motives? Cortés had migrated
to the colony of Hispaniola in 1504, dreaming of glory and adventure,
but for the first decade and a half, his adventures had largely
consisted of seducing other people’s wives. In 1518, however, he managed
to finagle his way into being named commander of an expedition to
establish a Spanish presence on the mainland. As Bernal Díaz del
Castillo, who accompanied him, later wrote, around this time

He began to adorn himself and be more careful of his appearance than
before. He wore a plume of feathers, with a medallion and a gold chain,
and a velvet cloak trimmed with loops of gold. In fact he looked like a
bold and gallant Captain. However, he had no money to defray the
expenses I have spoken about, for at the time he was very poor and much
in debt, despite the fact that he had a good estate of Indians and was
getting gold from the mines. But all this he spent on his person, on
finery for his wife, whom he had recently married, and on entertaining
guests …

When some merchant friends of his heard that he had obtained his command
as Captain General, they lent him four thousand gold pesos in coin and
another four thousand in goods secured on his Indians and estates. He
then ordered two standards and banners to be made, worked in gold with
the royal arms and a cross on each side with a legend which said,
“Comrades, let us follow the sign of the Holy Cross with true faith, and
through it we shall conquer.”¹⁶

In other words, he’d been living beyond his means, got himself in
trouble, and decided, like a reckless gambler, to double down and go for
broke. Unsurprising, then, that when the governor at the last minute
decided to cancel the expedition, Cortés ignored him and sailed for the
mainland with six hundred men, offering each an equal share in the
expedition’s profits. On landing he burned his boats, effectively
staking everything on victory.

Let us skip, then, from the beginning of Díaz’s book to its final
chapter. Three years later, through some of the most ingenious,
ruthless, brilliant, and utterly dishonorable behavior by a military
leader ever recorded, Cortés had his victory. After eight months of
grueling house-to-house warfare and the death of perhaps a hundred
thousand Aztecs, Tenochtitlán, one of the greatest cities of the world,
lay entirely destroyed. The imperial treasury was secured, and the time
had come, then, for it to be divided in shares amongst the surviving
soldiers.

Yet according to Díaz, the result among the men was outrage. The
officers connived to sequester most of the gold, and when the final
tally was announced, the troops learned that they would be receiving
only fifty to eighty pesos each. What’s more, the better part of their
shares was immediately seized again by the officers in their capacity of
creditors—since Cortés had insisted that the men be billed for any
replacement equipment and medical care they had received during the
siege. Most found they had actually lost money on the deal. Díaz writes:

We were all very deeply in debt. A crossbow was not to be purchased for
less than forty or fifty pesos, a musket cost one hundred, a sword
fifty, and a horse from 800 to 1000 pesos, and above. Thus extravagantly
did we have to pay for everything! A surgeon, who called himself Mastre
Juan, who had tended some very bad wounds, charged wildly inflated fees,
and so did a quack named Murcia, who was an apothecary and a barber and
also treated wounds, and there were thirty other tricks and swindles for
which payment was demanded of our shares as soon as we received them.

Serious complaints were made about this, and the only remedy that Cortés
provided was to appoint two trustworthy persons who knew the prices of
goods and could value anything that we had bought on credit. An order
went out that whatever price was placed on our purchases or the
surgeon’s cures must be accepted, but that if we had no money, our
creditors must wait two years for payment.¹⁷

Spanish merchants soon arrived charging wildly inflated prices for basic
necessities, causing further outrage, until:

Our general becoming weary of the continual reproaches which were thrown
out against him, saying he had stolen everything for himself, and the
endless petitions for loans and advance in pay, determined at once to
get rid of the most troublesome fellows, by forming settlements in those
provinces which appeared most eligible for this purpose.¹⁸

These were the men who ended up in control of the provinces, and who
established local administration, taxes, and labor regimes. Which makes
it a little easier to understand the descriptions of Indians with their
faces covered by names like so many counter-endorsed checks, or the
mines surrounded by miles of rotting corpses. We are not dealing with a
psychology of cold, calculating greed, but of a much more complicated
mix of shame and righteous indignation, and of the frantic urgency of
debts that would only compound and accumulate (these were, almost
certainly, interest-bearing loans), and outrage at the idea that, after
all they had gone through, they should be held to owe anything to begin
with.

And what of Cortés? He had just pulled off perhaps the greatest act of
theft in world history. Certainly, his original debts had now been
rendered inconsequential. Yet he somehow always seemed to find himself
in new ones. Creditors were already starting to repossess his holdings
while he was off on an expedition to Honduras in 1526; on his return, he
wrote the Emperor Charles V that his expenses were such that “all I have
received has been insufficient to relive me from misery and poverty,
being at the moment I write in debt for upwards of five hundred ounces
of gold, without possessing a single peso towards it.”¹⁹ Disingenuous,
no doubt (Cortés at the time owned his own personal palace), but only a
few years later, he was reduced to pawning his wife’s jewelry to help
finance a series of expeditions to California, hoping to restore his
fortunes. When those failed to turn a profit, he ended up so besieged by
creditors that he had to return to Spain to petition the emperor in
person.²⁰

[]

If all this seems suspiciously reminiscent of the fourth Crusade, with
its indebted knights stripping whole foreign cities of their wealth and
still somehow winding up only one step ahead of their creditors, there
is a reason. The financial capital that backed these expeditions came
from more or less the same place (if in this case Genoa, not Venice).
What’s more, that relationship, between the daring adventurer on the one
hand, the gambler willing to take any sort of risk, and on the other,
the careful financier, whose entire operations are organized around
producing steady, mathematical, inexorable growth of income, lies at the
very heart of what we now call “capitalism.”

As a result, our current economic system has always been marked by a
peculiar dual character. Scholars have long been fascinated by Spanish
debates that ensued, in Spanish universities like Santander, about the
humanity of the Indians (Did they have souls? Could they have legal
rights? Was it legitimate to forcibly enslave them?), just as they have
argued about the real attitudes of the conquistadors (was it contempt,
revulsion, or even grudging admiration for their adversaries?)²¹ The
real point is that at the key moments of decision, none of this
mattered. Those making the decisions did not feel they were in control
anyway; those who were did not particularly care to know the details. To
take a telling example: after the earliest years of the gold and silver
mines described by Motolinia, where millions of Indians were simply
rounded up and marched off to their deaths, colonists settled on a
policy of debt peonage: the usual trick of demanding heavy taxes,
lending money at interest to those who could not pay, and then demanding
that the loans be repaid with work. Royal agents regularly attempted to
forbid such practices, arguing that the Indians were now Christian and
that this violated their rights as loyal subjects of the Spanish crown.
But as with almost all such royal efforts to act as protector of the
Indians, the result was the same. Financial exigencies ended up taking
precedence. Charles V himself was deeply in debt to banking firms in
Florence, Genoa, and Naples, and gold and silver from the Americas made
up perhaps one-fifth of his total revenue. In the end, despite a lot of
initial noise and the (usually quite sincere) moral outrage on the part
of the king’s emissaries, such decrees were either ignored or, at best,
enforced for a year or two before being allowed to slip into abeyance.²²

[]

All of this helps explain why the Church had been so uncompromising in
its attitude toward usury. It was not just a philosophical question; it
was a matter of moral rivalry. Money always has the potential to become
a moral imperative unto itself. Allow it to expand, and it can quickly
become a morality so imperative that all others seem frivolous in
comparison. For the debtor, the world is reduced to a collection of
potential dangers, potential tools, and potential merchandise.²³ Even
human relations become a matter of cost-benefit calculation. Clearly
this is the way the conquistadors viewed the worlds that they set out to
conquer.

It is the peculiar feature of modern capitalism to create social
arrangements that essentially force us to think this way. The structure
of the corporation is a telling case in point—and it is no coincidence
that the first major joint-stock corporations in the world were the
English and Dutch East India companies, ones that pursued that very same
combination of exploration, conquest, and extraction as did the
conquistadors. It is a structure designed to eliminate all moral
imperatives but profit. The executives who make decisions can argue—and
regularly do—that, if it were their own money, of course they would not
fire lifelong employees a week before retirement, or dump carcinogenic
waste next to schools. Yet they are morally bound to ignore such
considerations, because they are mere employees whose only
responsibility is to provide the maximum return on investment for the
company’s stockholders. (The stockholders, of course, are not given any
say.)

The figure of Cortés is instructive for another reason. We are speaking
of a man who, in 1521, had conquered a kingdom and was sitting atop a
vast pile of gold. Neither did he have any intention of giving it
away—even to his followers. Five years later, he was claiming to be a
penniless debtor. How was this possible?

The obvious answer would be: Cortés was not a king, he was a subject of
the King of Spain, living within the legal structure of a kingdom that
insisted that, if he were not good at managing his money, he would lose
it. Yet as we’ve seen, the king’s laws could be ignored in other cases.
What’s more, even kings were not entirely free agents. Charles V was
continually in debt, and when his son Philip II—his armies fighting on
three different fronts at once—attempted the old Medieval trick of
defaulting, all his creditors, from the Genoese Bank of St. George to
the German Fuggers and Welsers, closed ranks to insist that he would
receive no further loans until he started honoring his commitments.²⁴

Capital, then, is not simply money. It is not even just wealth that can
be turned into money. But neither is it just the use of political power
to help one use one’s money to make more money. Cortés was trying to do
exactly that: in classical Axial Age fashion, he was attempting to use
his conquests to acquire plunder, and slaves to work the mines, with
which he could pay his soldiers and suppliers cash to embark on even
further conquests. It was a tried-and-true formula. But for all the
other conquistadors, it provided a spectacular failure.

This would seem to mark the difference. In the Axial Age, money was a
tool of empire. It might have been convenient for rulers to promulgate
markets in which everyone would treat money as an end in itself; at
times, rulers might have even come to see the whole apparatus of
government as a profit-making enterprise; but money always remained a
political instrument. This is why when the empires collapsed and armies
were demobilized, the whole apparatus could simply melt away. Under the
newly emerging capitalist order, the logic of money was granted
autonomy; political and military power were then gradually reorganized
around it. True, this was a financial logic that could never have
existed without states and armies behind it in the first place. As we
have seen in the case of Medieval Islam, under genuine free-market
conditions—in which the state is not involved in regulating the market
in any significant way, even in enforcing commercial contracts—purely
competitive markets will not develop, and loans at interest will become
effectively impossible to collect. It was _only_ the Islamic prohibition
against usury, really, that made it possible for them to create an
economic system that stood so far apart from the state.

Martin Luther was making this very point in 1524, right around the time
that Cortés was first beginning to have trouble with his creditors. It
is all very well, Luther said, for us to imagine that all might live as
true Christians, in accordance with the dictates of the Gospel. But in
fact there are few who are really capable of acting this way:

Christians are rare in this world; therefore the world needs a strict,
hard, temporal government that will compel and constrain the wicked not
to rob and to return what they borrow, even though a Christian ought not
to demand it, or even hope to get it back. This is necessary in order
that the world not become a desert, peace may not perish, and trade and
society not be utterly destroyed; all of which would happen if we were
to rule the world according to the Gospel and not drive and compel the
wicked, by laws and the use of force, to do what is right … Let no one
think that the world can be ruled without blood; the sword of the ruler
must be red and bloody; for the world will and must be evil, and the
sword is God’s rod and vengeance upon it.²⁵

“Not to rob and to return what they borrow”—a telling juxtaposition,
considering that in Scholastic theory, lending money at interest had
itself been considered theft.

And Luther _was_ referring to interest-bearing loans here. The story of
how he got to this point is telling. Luther began his career as a
reformer in 1520 with fiery campaigns against usury; in fact, one of his
objections to the sale of Church indulgences was that it was itself a
form of spiritual usury. These positions won him enormous popular
support in towns and villages. However, he soon realized that he’d
unleashed a genie that threatened to turn the whole world upside-down.
More radical reformers appeared, arguing that the poor were not morally
obliged to repay the interest on usurious loans, and proposing the
revival of Old Testament institutions like the sabbatical year. They
were followed by outright revolutionary preachers who began once again
questioning the very legitimacy of aristocratic privilege and private
property. In 1525, the year after Luther’s sermon, there was a massive
uprising of peasants, miners, and poor townsfolk across Germany: the
rebels, in most cases, representing themselves as simple Christians
aiming to restore the true communism of the Gospels. Over a hundred
thousand were slaughtered. Already in 1524, Luther had a sense that
matters were spilling out of control and that he would have to choose
sides: in that text, he did so. Old Testament laws like the Sabbatical
year, he argued, are no longer binding; the Gospel merely describes
ideal behavior; humans are sinful creatures, so law is necessary; while
usury is a sin, a four to five-percent rate of interest is currently
legal under certain circumstances; and while collecting that interest is
sinful, under _no_ circumstances is it legitimate to argue that for that
reason, borrowers have the right to break the law.²⁶

The Swiss Protestant reformer Zwingli was even more explicit. God, he
argued, gave us the divine law: to love thy neighbor as thyself. If we
truly kept this law, humans would give freely to one another, and
private property would not exist. However, Jesus excepted, no human
being has ever been able to live up to this pure communistic standard.
Therefore, God has also given us a second, inferior, human law, to be
enforced by the civil authorities. While this inferior law cannot compel
us to act as we really ought to act (“the magistrate can force no one to
lend out what belongs to him without hope of recompense or profit”)—at
least it can make us follow the lead of the apostle Paul, who said: “Pay
all men what you owe.”²⁷

Soon afterward, Calvin was to reject the blanket ban on usury entirely,
and by 1650, almost all Protestant denominations had come to agree with
his position that a reasonable rate of interest (usually five percent)
was not sinful, provided the lenders act in good conscience, do not make
lending their exclusive business, and do not exploit the poor.²⁸
(Catholic doctrine was slower to come around, but it did ultimately
accede by passive acquiescence.)

If one looks at how all this was justified, two things jump out. First,
Protestant thinkers all continued to make the old Medieval argument
about _interesse:_ that “interest” is really compensation for the money
that the lender _would_ have made had he been able to place his money in
some more profitable investment. Originally, this logic was just applied
to commercial loans. Increasingly, it was now applied to all loans. Far
from being unnatural, then, the growth of money was now treated as
completely expected. All money was assumed to be capital.²⁹ Second, the
assumption that usury is something that one properly practices on one’s
enemies, and therefore, by extension, that all commerce partakes
something of the nature of war, never entirely disappears. Calvin, for
instance, denied that Deuteronomy only referred to the Amalekites;
clearly, he said, it meant that usury was acceptable when dealing with
Syrians or Egyptians; indeed with all nations with whom the Jews
traded.³⁰ The result of opening the gates was, at least tacitly, to
suggest that one could now treat _anyone_, even a neighbor, as a
foreigner.³¹ One need only observe how European merchant adventurers of
the day actually were treating foreigners, in Asia, Africa, and the
Americas, to understand what this might mean in practice.

Or, one might look closer to home. Take the story of another well-known
debtor of the time, the Margrave Casimir of Brandenburg-Ansbach
(1481–1527), of the famous Hohenzollern dynasty:

Casimir was the son of Margrave Friedrich the Elder of Brandenburg, who
has come to be known as one of the “mad princes” of the German
Renaissance. Sources differ on just how mad he actually was. One
contemporary chronicle describes him as “somewhat deranged in his head
from too much racing and jousting;” most agree that he was given to fits
of inexplicable rage, as well as to the sponsorship of wild, extravagant
festivals, said often to have degenerated into wild bacchanalian
orgies.³²

All agree, however, that he was poor at managing his money. At the
beginning of 1515, Friedrich was in such financial trouble—he is said to
have owed 200,000 guilders—that he alerted his creditors, mostly fellow
nobles, that he might soon be forced to temporarily suspend interest
payments on his debts. This seems to have caused a crisis of faith, and
within a matter of weeks, his son Casimir staged a palace coup—moving,
in the early hours of February 26, 1515, to seize control of the castle
of Plassenburg while his father was distracted with the celebration of
Carnival, then forcing him to sign papers abdicating for reason of
mental infirmity. Friedrich spent the rest of his life confined in
Plassenburg, denied all visitors and correspondence. When at one point
his guards requested that the new Margrave provide a couple guilders so
he could pass the time gambling with them, Casimir made a great public
show of refusal, stating (ridiculously, of course) that his father had
left his affairs in such disastrous shape that he could not possibly
afford to.³³

Casimir dutifully doled out governorships and other prize offices to his
father’s creditors. He tried to get his house in order, but this proved
surprisingly difficult. His enthusiastic embrace of Luther’s reforms in
1521 clearly had as much to do with the prospect of getting his hands on
Church lands and monastic assets than with any particular religious
fervor. Yet at first, the disposition of Church property remained moot,
and Casimir himself compounded his problems by running up gambling debts
of his own said to have amounted to nearly 50,000 guilders.³⁴

Placing his creditors in charge of the civil administration had
predictable effects: increasing exactions on his subjects, many of whom
became hopelessly indebted themselves. Unsurprisingly, Casimir’s lands
in the Tauber Valley in Franconia became one of the epicenters of the
revolt of 1525. Bands of armed villagers assembled, declaring they would
obey no law that did not accord with “the holy word of God.” At first,
the nobles, isolated in their scattered castles, offered little
resistance. The rebel leaders—many of them local shopkeepers, butchers,
and other prominent men from nearby towns—began with a largely orderly
campaign of tearing down castle fortifications, their knightly occupants
being offered guarantees of safety if they cooperated, agreed to abandon
their feudal privileges, and swore oaths to abide by the rebels’ Twelve
Articles. Many complied. The real venom of the rebels was reserved for
cathedrals and monasteries, dozens of which were sacked, pillaged, and
destroyed.

Casimir’s reaction was to hedge his bets. At first he bided his time,
assembling an armed force of about two thousand experienced soldiers,
but refusing to intervene as rebels pillaged several nearby monasteries;
in fact, negotiating with the various rebel bands in such apparent good
faith that many believed he was preparing to join them “as a Christian
brother.”³⁵ In May, however, after the knights of the Swabian League
defeated the rebels of the Christian Union to the south, Casimir swung
into action, his forces brushing aside poorly disciplined rebel bands to
sweep through his own territories like a conquering army, burning and
pillaging villages and towns, slaughtering women and children. In every
town he set up punitive tribunals, and seized all looted property, which
he kept, even as his men also expropriated any wealth still to be found
in the region’s cathedrals, ostensibly as emergency loans to pay his
troops.

It seems significant that Casimir was, of all the German princes, both
the longest to waver before intervening, and the most savagely vengeful
once he did. His forces became notorious not only for executing accused
rebels, but systematically chopping off the fingers of accused
collaborators, his executioner keeping a grim ledger of amputated body
parts for later reimbursement—a kind of carnal inversion of the account
ledgers that had caused him so much trouble in his life. At one point,
in the town of Kitzingen, Casimir ordered the gouging out of the eyes of
fifty-eight burghers who had, he declared, “refused to look at him as
their lord.” Afterward he received the following bill:³⁶

  --------------------------------------- ----------
  80 beheaded                             
  69 eyes put out or fingers cut off      114½ fl.
  from this to deduct                     
  Received from the Rothenburgers         10 fl.
  Received from Ludwig von Hutten         2 fl.
  Remainder                               
  Plus 2 months’ pay at 8 fl. per month   16 fl.
  Total                                   118½ fl.
  --------------------------------------- ----------

[Signed] Augustin, the executioner, who the Kitzingers call “Master
Ouch.”

The repression eventually inspired Casimir’s brother Georg (later known
as “the Pious”) to write a letter asking him if Casimir was intending to
take up a trade—since, as Georg gently reminded him, he could not very
well continue to be a feudal overlord if his peasants were all dead.³⁷

With such things happening, it is hardly surprising that men like Thomas
Hobbes came to imagine the basic nature of society as a war of all
against all, from which only the absolute power of monarchs could save
us. At the same time, Casimir’s behavior—combining as it does a general
attitude of unprincipled, cold-blooded calculation with outbursts of
almost inexplicably vindictive cruelty—seems, like that of Cortés’s
angry foot soldiers when unleashed on the Aztec provinces, to embody
something essential about the psychology of debt. Or, more precisely,
perhaps, about the debtor who feels he has done nothing to deserve being
placed in his position: the frantic urgency of having to convert
everything around oneself into money, and rage and indignation at having
been reduced to the sort of person who would do so.


Part II:

The World of Credit and the World of Interest

_Of all the beings that have existence only in the minds of men, nothing
is more fantastical and nice than Credit; it is never to be forced; it
hangs upon opinion; it depends upon our passions of hope and fear; it
comes many times unsought-for, and often goes away without reason; and
once lost, it is hardly to be quite recovered_.

—Charles Davenant, 1696

_He that has lost his credit is dead to the world_.

—English and German Proverb

The peasants’ visions of communistic brotherhood did not come out of
nowhere. They were rooted in real daily experience: of the maintenance
of common fields and forests, of everyday cooperation and neighborly
solidarity. It is out of such homely experience of everyday communism
that grand mythic visions are always built.³⁸ Obviously, rural
communities were also divided, squabbling places, since communities
always are—but insofar as they are communities at all, they are
necessarily founded on a ground of mutual aid. The same, incidentally,
can be said of members of the aristocracy, who might have fought
endlessly over love, land, honor, and religion, but nonetheless still
cooperated remarkably well with one another when it really mattered
(most of all, when their position as aristocrats was threatened); just
as the merchants and bankers, much as they competed with one another,
managed to close ranks when it really mattered. This is what I refer to
as the “communism of the rich,” and it is a powerful force in human
history.³⁹

The same, as we’ve seen repeatedly, applies to credit. There are always
different standards for those one considers friends or neighbors. The
inexorable nature of interest-bearing debt, and the alternately savage
and calculating behavior of those enslaved to it, are typical above all
of dealings between strangers: it’s unlikely that Casimir felt much more
kinship with his peasants than Cortés did with the Aztecs (in fact, most
likely less, since Aztec warriors were at least aristocrats). Inside the
small towns and rural hamlets, where the state was mostly far away,
Medieval standards survived intact, and “credit” was just as much a
matter of honor and reputation as it had ever been. The great untold
story of our current age is of how these ancient credit systems were
ultimately destroyed.

Recent historical research, notably that of Craig Muldrew, who has
sifted through thousands of inventories and court cases from sixteenth-
and seventeenth-century England, has caused us to revise almost all our
old assumptions about what everyday economic life at that time was like.
Of course, very little of the American gold and silver that reached
Europe actually ended up in the pockets of ordinary farmers, mercers, or
haberdashers.⁴⁰ The lion’s share stayed in the coffers of either the
aristocracy or the great London merchants, or else in the royal
treasury.⁴¹ Small change was almost nonexistent. As I’ve already pointed
out, in the poorer neighborhoods of cities or large towns, shopkeepers
would issue their own lead, leather, or wooden token money; in the
sixteenth century this became something of a fad, with artisans and even
poor widows producing their own currency as a way to make ends meet.⁴²
Elsewhere, those frequenting the local butcher, baker, or shoemaker
would simply put things on the tab. The same was true of those attending
weekly markets, or selling neighbors milk or cheese or candle-wax. In a
typical village, the only people likely to pay cash were passing
travelers, and those considered riff-raff: paupers and ne’er-do-wells so
notoriously down on their luck that no one would extend credit to them.
Since everyone was involved in selling something, however just about
everyone was both creditor and debtor; most family income took the form
of promises from other families; everyone knew and kept count of what
their neighbors owed one another; and every six months or year or so,
communities would held a general public “reckoning,” cancelling debts
out against each other in a great circle, with only those differences
then remaining when all was done being settled by use of coin or
goods.⁴³

The reason that this upends our assumptions is that we’re used to
blaming the rise of capitalism on something vaguely called “the
market”—the breakup of older systems of mutual aid and solidarity, and
the creation of a world of cold calculation, where everything had its
price. Really, English villagers appear to have seen no contradiction
between the two. On the one hand, they believed strongly in the
collective stewardship of fields, streams, and forests, and the need to
help neighbors in difficulty. On the other hand, markets were seen as a
kind of attenuated version of the same principle, since they were
entirely founded on trust. Much like the Tiv women with their gifts of
yams and okra, neighbors assumed they ought to be constantly slightly in
debt to one another. At the same time, most seem to have been quite
comfortable with the idea of buying and selling, or even with market
fluctuations, provided it didn’t get to the point of threatening honest
families’ livelihoods.⁴⁴ Even when loans at interest began to be
legalized in 1545, that did not ruffle too many feathers, as long as it
took place within that same larger moral framework: lending was
considered an appropriate vocation, for example, for widows with no
other source of income, or as a way for neighbors to share in the
profits from some minor commercial venture. William Stout, a Quaker
merchant from Lancashire, spoke glowingly of Henry Coward, the tradesman
in whose shop he first apprenticed:

My master then had a full trade of groceries, ironmongerware, and
several other goods, and very much respected and trusted, not only by
the people of his own religious profession, but by all others of all
professions and circumstances … His credit was so much, that any who had
money to dispose of lodged it with him to put out to interest or to make
use of it.⁴⁵

In this world, trust was everything. Most money literally was trust,
since most credit arrangements were handshake deals. When people used
the word “credit,” they referred above all to a reputation for honesty
and integrity; and a man or woman’s honor, virtue, and respectability,
but also, reputation for generosity, decency, and good-natured
sociability, were at least as important considerations when deciding
whether to make a loan as were assessments of net income.⁴⁶ As a result,
financial terms became indistinguishable from moral ones. One could
speak of others as “worthies,” as “a woman of high estimation” or “a man
of no account,” and equally of “giving credit” to someone’s words when
one believes what they say (“credit” is from the same root as “creed” or
“credibility”), or of “extending credit” to them, when one takes them at
their word that they will pay one back.

One should not idealize the situation. This was a highly patriarchal
world: a man’s wife or daughter’s reputation for chastity was as much a
part of his “credit” as his own reputation for kindness or piety. What’s
more, almost all people below the age of 30, male or female, were
employed as servants in someone else’s household—as farmhands,
milkmaids, apprentices—and as such, were of “no account” at all.⁴⁷
Finally, those who lost credibility in the eyes of the community became,
effectively, pariahs, and descended into the criminal or semi-criminal
classes of rootless laborers, beggars, harlots, cutpurses, hawkers,
pedlars, fortune-tellers, minstrels, and other such “masterless men” or
“women of ill repute.”⁴⁸

Cold cash was employed largely between strangers, or when paying rents,
tithes, and taxes to landlords, bailiffs, priests, and other superiors.
The landed gentry and wealthy merchants, who eschewed handshake deals,
would often use cash with one another, especially to pay off bills of
exchange drawn on London markets.⁴⁹ Above all, gold and silver were used
by the government to purchase arms and pay soldiers, and amongst the
criminal classes themselves. This meant that coins were most likely to
be used both by the sort of people who ran the legal system—the
magistrates, constables, and justices of the peace—and by those violent
elements of society they saw it as their business to control.

[]

Over time, this led to an increasing disjuncture of moral universes. For
most, who tried to avoid entanglement in the legal system just as much
as they tried to avoid the affairs of soldiers and criminals, debt
remained the very fabric of sociability. But those who spent their
working lives within the halls of government and great commercial houses
gradually began to develop a very different perspective, whereby cash
exchange was normal and it was debt that came to be seen as tinged with
criminality.

Each perspective turned on a certain tacit theory of the nature of
society. For most English villagers, the real font and focus of social
and moral life was not so much the church as the local ale-house—and
community was embodied above all in the conviviality of popular
festivals like Christmas or May Day, with everything that such
celebrations entailed: the sharing of pleasures, the communion of the
senses, all the physical embodiment of what was called “good
neighborhood.” Society was rooted above in the “love and amity” of
friends and kin, and it found expression in all those forms of everyday
communism (helping neighbors with chores, providing milk or cheese for
old widows) that were seen to flow from it. Markets were not seen as
contradicting this ethos of mutual aid. It was, much as it was for Tusi,
an extension of mutual aid—and for much the same reason: because it
operated entirely through trust and credit.⁵⁰

England might not have produced a great theorist like Tusi, but one can
find the same assumptions echoed in most of the Scholastic writers, as
for instance in Jean Bodin’s _De Republica_, widely circulated in
English translation after 1605. “Amity and friendship,” Bodin wrote,
“are the foundation of all human and civil society”—they constitute that
“true, natural justice” on which the whole legal structure of contracts,
courts, and even government must necessarily be built.⁵¹ Similarly, when
economic thinkers reflected on the origins of the money, they spoke of
“trusting, exchanging, and trading.”⁵² It was simply assumed that human
relations came first.

As a result, all moral relations came to be conceived as debts. “Forgive
us our debts”—this was the period, the very end of the Middle Ages, that
this translation of the Lord’s Prayer gained such universal popularity.
Sins are debts to God: unavoidable, but perhaps manageable, since at the
end of time our moral debts and credits will be all canceled out against
each other in God’s final Reckoning. The notion of debt inserted itself
into even the most intimate of human relations. Like the Tiv, Medieval
villagers would sometimes refer to “flesh debts,” but the notion was
completely different: it referred to the right of either partner in a
marriage to demand sex from the other, which in principle either could
do whenever he or she desired. The phrase “paying one’s debts” thus
developed connotations, much as the Roman phrase “doing one’s duty” had,
centuries before. Geoffrey Chaucer even makes a pun out of “tally”
(French: _taille_) and “tail” in the Shipman’s Tale, a story about a
woman who pays her husband’s debts with sexual favors: “and if so I be
faille, I am youre wyf, score it upon my taille.”⁵³

Even London merchants would occasionally appeal to the language of
sociability, insisting that in the final analysis, all trade is built on
credit, and credit is really just an extension of mutual aid. In 1696,
for instance, Charles Davenant wrote that even if there were a general
collapse of confidence in the credit system, it could not last long,
because eventually, when people reflected on the matter and realized
that credit is simply an extension of human society,

They will find, that no trading nation ever did subsist, and carry on
its business by real stock [that is, just coin and merchandise]; that
trust and confidence in each other, are as necessary to link and hold a
people together, as obedience, love, friendship, or the intercourse of
speech. And when experience has taught man how weak he is, depending
only on himself, he will be willing to help others, and call upon the
assistance of his neighbors, which of course, by degrees, must set
credit again afloat.⁵⁴

Davenant was an unusual merchant (his father was a poet). More typical
of his class were men like Thomas Hobbes, whose _Leviathan_, published
in 1651, was in many ways an extended attack on the very idea that
society is built on any sort of prior ties of communal solidarity.

Hobbes might be considered the opening salvo of the new moral
perspective, and it was a devastating one. When _Leviathan_ came out,
it’s not clear what scandalized its readers more: its relentless
materialism (Hobbes insisted that humans were basically machines whose
actions could be understood by one single principle: that they tended to
move toward the prospect of pleasure and away from the prospect of
pain), or its resultant cynicism (if love, amity, and trust are such
powerful forces, Hobbes asked, why is it that even within our families,
we lock our most valuable possessions in strongboxes?) Still, Hobbes’
ultimate argument—that humans, being driven by self-interest, cannot be
trusted to treat each other justly of their own accord, and therefore
that society only emerges when they come to realize that it is to their
long-term advantage to give up a portion of their liberties and accept
the absolute power of the King—differed little from arguments that
theologians like Martin Luther had been making a century earlier. Hobbes
simply substituted scientific language for biblical references.⁵⁵

I want to draw particular attention to the underlying notion of
“self-interest.”⁵⁶ It is in a real sense the key to the new philosophy.
The term first appears in English right around Hobbes’ time, and it is,
indeed, directly borrowed from _interesse_, the Roman law term for
interest payments. When it was first introduced, most English authors
seemed to view the idea that all human life can be explained as the
pursuit of self-interest as a cynical, foreign, Machiavellian idea, one
that sat uncomfortably with traditional English mores. By the eighteenth
century, most in educated society accepted it as simple common sense.

But why “interest”? Why make a general theory of human motivation out of
a word that originally meant “penalty for late payment on a loan”?

Part of the term’s appeal was that it derived from bookkeeping. It was
mathematical. This made it seem objective, even scientific. Saying we
are all really pursuing our own self-interest provides a way to cut past
the welter of passions and emotions that seem to govern our daily
existence, and to motivate most of what we actually observe people to do
(not only out of love and amity, but also envy, spite, devotion, pity,
lust, embarrassment, torpor, indignation, and pride) and discover that,
despite all this, most really important decisions are based on the
rational calculation of material advantage—which means that they are
fairly predictable as well. “Just as the physical world is ruled by the
laws of movement,” wrote Helvétius, in a passage reminiscent of Lord
Shang, “no less is the moral universe ruled by laws of interest.”⁵⁷ And
of course it was on this assumption that all the quadratic equations of
economic theory could ultimately be built.⁵⁸

The problem is that the origin of the concept is not rational at all.
Its roots are theological, and the theological assumptions underpinning
it never really went away. “Self-interest” is first attested to in the
writings of the Italian historian Francesco Guicciadini (who was, in
fact, a friend of Machiavelli), around 1510, as a euphemism for St.
Augustine’s concept of “self-love.” For Augustine, the “love of God”
leads us to benevolence toward our fellows; self-love, in contrast,
refers to the fact that, since the Fall of Man, we are cursed by
endless, insatiable desires for self-gratification—so much so that, if
left to our own devices, we will necessarily fall into universal
competition, even war. Substituting “interest” for “love” must have
seemed an obvious move, since the assumption that love is the primary
emotion was precisely what authors like Guicciadini were trying to get
away from. But it kept that same assumption of insatiable desires under
the guise of impersonal math, since what is “interest” but the demand
that money _never cease_ to grow? The same was true when it became the
term for investments—“I have a twelve-percent interest in that
venture”—it is money placed in the continual pursuit of profit.⁵⁹ The
very idea that human beings are motivated primarily by “self-interest,”
then, was rooted in the profoundly Christian assumption that we are all
incorrigible sinners; left to our own devices, we will not simply pursue
a certain level of comfort and happiness and then stop to enjoy it; we
will never cash in the chips, like Sindbad, let alone question why we
need to buy chips to begin with. And as Augustine already anticipated,
infinite desires in a finite world means endless competition, which in
turn is why, as Hobbes insisted, our only hope of social peace lies in
contractual arrangements and strict enforcement by the apparatus of the
state.

[]

The story of the origins of capitalism, then, is not the story of the
gradual destruction of traditional communities by the impersonal power
of the market. It is, rather, the story of how an economy of credit was
converted into an economy of interest; of the gradual transformation of
moral networks by the intrusion of the impersonal—and often
vindictive—power of the state. English villagers in Elizabethan or
Stuart times did not like to appeal to the justice system, even when the
law was in their favor—partly on the principle that neighbors should
work things out with one another, but mainly, because the law was so
extraordinarily harsh. Under Elizabeth, for example, the punishment for
vagrancy (unemployment) was, for first offense, to have one’s ears
nailed to a pillory; for repeat offenders, death.⁶⁰

The same was true of debt law, especially since debts could often, if
the creditor was sufficiently vindictive, be treated as a crime. In
Chelsea around 1660,

Margaret Sharples was prosecuted for stealing cloth, “which she had
converted into a petticoat for her own wearing,” from Richard Bennett’s
shop. Her defense was that she had bargained with Bennett’s servant for
the cloth, “but having not money sufficient in her purse to pay for it,
took it away with purpose to pay for it so soon as she could: and that
she afterwards agreed with Mr Bennett of a price for it.” Bennett
confirmed that this was so: after agreeing to pay him 22 shillings,
Margaret “delivered a hamper with goods in it as a pawn for security of
the money, and four shillings ninepence in money.” But “soon after he
disliked upon better consideration to hold agreement with her: and
delivered the hamper and goods back,” and commenced formal legal
proceedings against her.⁶¹

As a result, Margaret Sharples was hanged.

Obviously, it was the rare shopkeeper who wished to see even his most
irritating client on the gallows. Therefore decent people tended to
avoid the courts entirely. One of the most interesting discoveries of
Craig Muldrew’s research is that the more time passed, the less true
this became.

Even in the late Middle Ages, in the case of really large loans, it was
not unusual for creditors to lodge claims in local courts—but this was
really just a way of ensuring that there was a public record (remember
that most people at the time were illiterate). Debtors were willing to
go along with the proceedings in part, it would seem, because if there
was any interest being charged, it meant that if they did default, the
lender was just as guilty in the eyes of the law as they were. Less than
one-percent of these cases were ever brought to judgment.⁶² The
legalization of interest began to change the nature of the playing
field. In the 1580s, when interest-bearing loans began to become common
between villagers, creditors also began to insist on the use of signed,
legal bonds; this led to such an explosion of appeals to the courts that
in many small towns, almost every household seemed to be caught up in
debt litigation of some sort or other. Only a tiny proportion of these
suits were ever brought to judgment, either: the usual expedient was
still to rely on the simple threat of punishment to encourage debtors to
settle out of court.⁶³ Still, as a result, the fear of debtor’s
prison—or worse—came to hang over everyone, and sociability itself came
to take on the color of crime. Even Mr. Coward, the kindly shopkeeper,
was eventually laid low. His good credit itself became a problem,
especially as he felt honor-bound to use it to help the less fortunate:

He also dealt in merchandise with loose partners, and became concerned
much with persons of declining circumstances, where neither profit nor
credit could be got; and he gave uneasiness to his wife, by his
frequenting some houses of no good character. And she was a very
indolent woman, and drew money privately from him, and his circumstances
became so burdensome that he daily expected to be made a prisoner.
Which, with the shame of forfeiting his former reputation, it drew him
into despair and broke his heart, so that he kept to his house for some
time and died of grief and shame.⁶⁴

It is perhaps not surprising, when one consults contemporary sources
about what those prisons were like, particularly for those who were not
of aristocratic origins. Mr. Coward would surely have known, as the
conditions at the most notorious, like Fleet and Marshalsea, caused
periodic scandals when exposed in parliament or the popular press,
filling the papers with stories of shackled debtors “covered with filth
and vermin, and suffered to die, without pity, of hunger and jail
fever,” as the aristocratic roués placed in the elite side of the same
jails lived lives of comfort, visited by manicurists and prostitutes.⁶⁵

The criminalization of debt, then, was the criminalization of the very
basis of human society. It cannot be overemphasized that in a small
community, everyone normally was both lender and borrower. One can only
imagine the tensions and temptations that must have existed in a
communities—and communities, much though they are based on love, in
fact, _because_ they are based on love, will always also be full of
hatred, rivalry and passion—when it became clear that with sufficiently
clever scheming, manipulation, and perhaps a bit of strategic bribery,
they could arrange to have almost anyone they hated imprisoned or even
hanged. What was it that Richard Bennett really had against Margaret
Sharples? We’ll never know the back-story, but it’s a pretty safe bet
that there was one. The effects on communal solidarity must have been
devastating. The sudden accessibility of violence really did threaten to
transform what had been the essence of sociality into a war of all
against all.⁶⁶ It’s not surprising then, that by the eighteenth century,
the very notion of personal credit had acquired a bad name, with both
lenders and borrowers considered equally suspect.⁶⁷ The use of coins—at
least among those who had access to them—had come to seem moral in
itself.

[]

Understanding all this allows us to see some of the European authors
considered in earlier chapters in an entirely new light. Take Panurge’s
encomium on debt: it turns out that the real joke is not the suggestion
that debt ties communities together (any English or French peasant of
the day would have simply assumed this), or even that _only_ debt ties
communities together; it is putting the sentiment in the mouth of a
wealthy scholar who’s really an inveterate criminal—that is, holding up
popular morality as a mirror to make fun of the very upper classes who
claimed to disapprove of it. Or consider Adam Smith:

It is not from the benevolence of the butcher, the brewer, or the baker,
that we expect our dinner, but from their regard to their own interest.
We address ourselves, not to their humanity but to their self-love, and
never talk to them of our own necessities but of their advantages.⁶⁸

The bizarre thing here is that, at the time Smith was writing, this
simply wasn’t true.⁶⁹ Most English shopkeepers were still carrying out
the main part of their business on credit, which meant that customers
appealed to their benevolence all the time. Smith could hardly have been
unaware of this. Rather, he is drawing a utopian picture. He wants to
imagine a world in which everyone used cash, in part because he agreed
with the emerging middle-class opinion that the world would be a better
place if everyone really did conduct themselves this way, and avoid
confusing and potentially corrupting ongoing entanglements. We should
all just pay the money, say “please” and “thank you,” and leave the
store. What’s more, he uses this utopian image to make a larger point:
that even if all businesses operated like the great commercial
companies, with an eye only to self-interest, it wouldn’t matter. Even
the “natural selfishness and rapacity” of the rich, with all their “vain
and insatiable desires” will still, through the logic of the invisible
hand, lead to the benefit of all.⁷⁰

In other words, Smith simply imagined the role of consumer credit in his
own day, just as he had his account of the origins of money.⁷¹ This
allowed him to ignore the role of both benevolence _and_ malevolence in
economic affairs; both the ethos of mutual aid that forms the necessary
foundation of anything that would look like a free market (that is, one
which is not simply created and maintained by the state), _and_ the
violence and sheer vindictiveness that had actually gone into creating
the competitive, self-interested markets that he was using as his model.

Nietzsche, in turn, was taking up Smith’s premises, that life is
exchange, but laying bare everything (the torture, murder, mutilation)
that Smith preferred not to have to talk about. Now that we have seen
just a little of the social context, it’s difficult to read Nietzsche’s
otherwise puzzling descriptions of ancient hunters and herdsmen keeping
accounts of debts and demanding each others’ eyes and fingers without
immediately thinking of Casimir’s executioner, who actually did present
his master with a bill for gouged eyes and severed fingers. What he is
really describing is what it took to produce a world in which the son of
a prosperous middle-class reverend, such as himself, could simply assume
that all human life is premised on calculated, self-interested exchange.


Part III:

Impersonal Credit-money

One reason that historians took so long to notice the elaborate
popular-credit systems of Tudor and Stuart England is that intellectuals
of the time spoke about money in the abstract; they rarely mentioned it.
For the educated classes, “money” soon came to mean gold and silver.
Most wrote as if it could be taken for granted that gold and silver had
always been used as money for all nations in history and, presumably,
always would be.

This not only flew in the face of Aristotle; it directly contradicted
the discoveries of European explorers of the time, who were finding
shell money, bead money, feather money, salt money, and an endless
variety of other currencies everywhere they went.⁷² Yet all this just
caused economic thinkers to dig in their heels. Some appealed to alchemy
to argue that the monetary status of gold and silver had a natural
basis: gold (which partook of the sun) and silver (which partook of the
moon) were the perfected, eternal forms of metal toward which all baser
metals tend to evolve.⁷³ Most, however, didn’t feel that much
explanation was required; the intrinsic value of precious metals was
simply self-evident. As a result, when royal advisors or London
pamphleteers discussed economic problems, the issues they debated were
always the same: How do we keep bullion from leaving the country? What
do we do about the crippling shortage of coin? For most, questions like
“How do we maintain trust in local credit systems?” simply did not
arise.

This was even more extreme in Britain than on the Continent, where
“crying up” or “crying down” the currency was still an option. In
Britain, after a disastrous attempt at devaluation under the Tudors,
such expedients were abandoned. Henceforth, debasement became a moral
issue. For the government to mix base metal into the pure eternal
substance of a coin was clearly wrong. So, to a lesser extent, was
coin-clipping, a near-universal practice in England, which might be
thought of as a kind of popular version of devaluation, since it
involved secretly shaving silver off the edges of coins and then
pressing them down so they seemed like they were still the original
size.

What’s more, those new forms of virtual money that began to emerge in
the new age were firmly rooted in these same assumptions. This is
critical, because it helps explain what might otherwise seem a bizarre
contradiction: How is it that this age of ruthless materialism, in which
the notion that money was a social convention was definitively rejected,
also saw the rise of paper money, along with a whole host of new credit
instruments and forms of financial abstraction that have become so
typical of modern capitalism? True, most of these—checks, bonds, stocks,
annuities—had their origins in the metaphysical world of the Middle
Ages. Yet in this new age, they underwent an enormous efflorescence.

If one looks at the actual history, though, it quickly becomes clear
that all of these new forms of money in no way undermined the assumption
that money was founded on the “intrinsic” value of gold and silver: in
fact, they reinforced it. What seems to have happened is that, once
credit became unlatched from real relations of trust between individuals
(whether merchants or villagers), it became apparent that money could,
in effect, be produced simply by saying it was there; but that, when
this is done in the amoral world of a competitive marketplace, it would
almost inevitably lead to scams and confidence games of every
sort—causing the guardians of the system to periodically panic, and seek
new ways to latch the value of the various forms of paper back onto gold
and silver.

This is the story normally told as “the origins of modern banking.” From
our perspective, though, what it reveals is just how closely bound
together war, bullion, and these new credit instruments were. One need
only consider the paths _not_ traveled. For instance: there was no
intrinsic reason why a bill of exchange couldn’t be endorsed over to a
third party, then become generally transferable—thus, in effect turning
it into a form of paper money. This is how paper money first emerged in
China. In Medieval Europe there were periodic movements in that
direction, but for a variety of reasons, they did not go far.⁷⁴
Alternately, bankers can produce money by issuing book credits for more
than they have on cash reserve. This is considered the very essence of
modern banking, and it can lead to the circulation of private bank
notes.⁷⁵ Some moves were made in this direction as well, especially in
Italy, but it was a risky proposition, since there was always the danger
of depositors panicking and making a run, and most Medieval governments
threatened extremely harsh penalties on bankers unable to make
restitution in such cases: as witnessed by the example of Francesch
Castello, beheaded in front of his own bank in Barcelona in 1360.⁷⁶

Where bankers effectively controlled Medieval governments, it proved
safer and more profitable to manipulate the government’s own finances.
The history of modern financial instruments, and the ultimate origins of
paper money, really begin with the issuing of municipal bonds—a practice
begun by the Venetian government in the twelfth century when, needing a
quick infusion of income for military purposes, it levied a compulsory
loan on its taxpaying citizens, for which it promised each of them five
percent annual interest, and allowed the “bonds” or contracts to become
negotiable, thus, creating a market in government debt. They [the
Venetian government?] tended to be quite meticulous about interest
payments, but since the bonds had no specific date of maturity, their
market prices often fluctuated wildly with the city’s political and
military fortunes, and so did resulting assessments of the likelihood
that they would be able to be repaid. Similar practices quickly spread
to the other Italian states and to northern European merchant enclaves
as well: the United Provinces of Holland financed their long war of
independence against the Hapsburgs (1568–1648) largely through a series
of forced loans, though they floated numerous voluntary bond issues as
well.⁷⁷

Forcing taxpayers to make a loan is, in one sense, simply demanding that
they pay their taxes early; but when the Venetian state first agreed to
pay interest—and in legal terms, this was again _interesse_, a penalty
for late payment—it was in principle penalizing itself for not
immediately giving the money back. It’s easy to see how this might raise
all sorts of questions about the legal and moral relation between people
and government. Ultimately, the commercial classes in those mercantile
republics that pioneered these new forms of financing did end up seeing
themselves as owning the government more than they saw themselves as
being in its debt. Not only the commercial classes: by 1650, a majority
of Dutch households held at least a little government debt.⁷⁸ However,
the true paradox only appears when one begins to “monetize” this
debt—that is, to take government promises to pay and allow them to
circulate as currency.

While already by the sixteenth century, merchants were using bills of
exchange to settle debts, government debt bonds—_rentes, juros_,
annuities—were the real credit money of the new age. It’s here that we
have to look for the real origins of the “price revolution” that
hammered once-independent townsfolk and villagers into the ground and
opened the way for most of them to ultimately be reduced to wage
laborers, working for those who had access to these higher forms of
credit. Even in Seville, where the treasure fleets from the New World
first touched port in the Old, bullion was not much used in day-to-day
transactions. Most of it was taken directly to the warehouses of Genoese
bankers operating from the port and stored for shipment east. But in the
process, it became the basis for complex credit schemes whereby the
value of the bullion was loaned to the emperor to fund military
operations, in exchange for papers entitling the bearer to
interest-bearing annuities from the government—papers that could in turn
be traded as if they were money. By such means, bankers could almost
endlessly multiply the actual value of gold and silver they held.
Already in the 1570s, we hear of fairs in places like Medina del Campo,
not far from Seville, that had become “veritable factories of
certificates,” with transactions carried out exclusively through
paper.⁷⁹ Since whether the Spanish government would actually pay their
debts, or how regularly, were always slightly uncertain, the bills would
tend to circulate at a discount—especially as _juros_ began circulating
throughout the rest of Europe—causing continual inflation.⁸⁰

It was only with the creation of the Bank of England in 1694 that one
can speak of genuine paper money, since its banknotes were in no sense
bonds. They were rooted, like all the others, in the king’s war debts.
This can’t be emphasized enough. The fact that money was no longer a
debt owed _to_ the king, but a debt owed _by_ the king, made it very
different than what it had been before. In many ways it had become a
mirror image of older forms of money.

The reader will recall that the Bank of England was created when a
consortium of forty London and Edinburgh merchants—mostly already
creditors to the crown—offered King William III a £1.2 million loan to
help finance his war against France. In doing so, they also convinced
him to allow them in return to form a corporation with a monopoly on the
issuance of banknotes—which were, in effect, promissory notes for the
money the king now owed them. This was the first independent national
central bank, and it became the clearinghouse for debts owed between
smaller banks; the notes soon developed into the first European national
paper currency. Yet the great public debate of the time, a debate about
the very nature of money, was about not paper but metal. The 1690s were
a time of crisis for British coinage. The value of silver had risen so
high that new British coins (the mint had recently developed the “milled
edge” familiar from coins nowadays, which made them clip-proof) were
actually worth less than their silver content, with predictable results.
Proper silver coins vanished; all that remained in circulation were the
old clipped ones, and these were becoming increasingly scarce. Something
had to be done. A war of pamphlets ensued, which came to a head in 1695,
one year after the founding of the bank. Charles Davenant’s essay on
credit, which I’ve already cited, was actually part of this particular
pamphlet-war: he proposed that Britain move to a pure credit money based
on public trust, and he was ignored. The Treasury proposed to call in
the coinage and reissue it at a 20- to 25-percent lower weight, so as to
bring it back below the market price for silver. Many who supported this
position took explicitly Chartalist positions, insisting that silver has
no intrinsic value anyway, and that money is simply a measure
established by the state.⁸¹ The man who won the argument, however, was
John Locke, the Liberal philosopher, at that time acting as advisor to
Sir Isaac Newton, then Warden of the Mint. Locke insisted that one can
no more make a small piece of silver worth more by relabeling it a
“shilling” than one can make a short man taller by declaring there are
now fifteen inches in a foot. Gold and silver had a value recognized by
everyone on earth; the government stamp simply attested to the weight
and purity of a coin, and—as he added in words veritably shivering with
indignation—for governments to tamper with this for their own advantage
was just as criminal as the coin-clippers themselves:

The use and end of the public stamp is only to be a guard and voucher of
the quality of silver which men contract for; and the injury done to the
public _faith_, in this point, is that which in clipping and false
coining heightens the _robbery_ into _treason.⁸²_

Therefore, he argued, the only recourse was to recall the currency and
restrike it at exactly the same value that it had before.

This was done, and the results were disastrous. In the years immediately
following, there was almost no coinage in circulation; prices and wages
collapsed; there was hunger and unrest. Only the wealthy were insulated,
since they were able to take advantage of the new credit money, trading
back and forth portions of the king’s debt in the form of banknotes. The
value of these notes, too, fluctuated a bit at first, but eventually
stabilized once they were made redeemable in precious metals. For the
rest, the situation only really improved once paper money, and,
eventually, smaller-denomination currency, became more widely available.
The reforms proceeded top-down, and very slowly, but they did proceed,
and they gradually came to create the world where even ordinary,
everyday transactions with butchers and bakers were carried out in
polite, impersonal terms, with small change, and therefore it became
possible to imagine everyday life itself as a matter of self-interested
calculation.

It’s easy enough to see why Locke would adopt the position that he did.
He was a scientific materialist. For him, “faith” in government—as in
the quote above—was not the citizens’ belief that the government will
keep its promises, but simply that it won’t lie to them; that it would,
like a good scientist, give them accurate information, and who wanted to
see human behavior as founded in natural laws that—like the laws of
physics that Newton had so recently described—were higher than those of
any mere government. The real question is why the British government
agreed with him and resolutely stuck to this position despite all the
immediate disasters. Soon afterward, in fact, Britain adopted the gold
standard (in 1717) and the British Empire maintained it, and with it the
notion that gold and silver _were_ money, down to its final days.

True, Locke’s materialism also came to be broadly accepted—even to be
the watchword of the age.⁸³ Mainly, though, the reliance on gold and
silver seemed to provide the only check on the dangers involved with the
new forms of credit-money, which multiplied very quickly—especially once
ordinary banks were allowed to create money too. It soon became apparent
that financial speculation, unmoored from any legal or community
constraints, was capable of producing results that seemed to verge on
insanity. The Dutch Republic, which pioneered the development of stock
markets, had already experienced this in the tulip mania of 1637—the
first of a series of speculative “bubbles,” as they came to be known, in
which future prices would first be bid through the ceiling by investors
and then collapse. A whole series of such bubbles hit the London markets
in the 1690s, in almost every case built around a new joint-stock
corporation formed, in imitation of the East India Company, around some
prospective colonial venture. The famous South Sea Bubble in 1720—in
which a newly formed trading company, granted a monopoly of trade with
the Spanish colonies, bought up a considerable portion of the British
national debt and saw its shares briefly skyrocket before collapsing in
ignominy—was only the culmination. Its collapse was followed the next
year by the collapse of John Law’s famous Banque Royale in France,
another central-bank experiment—similar to the Bank of England—that grew
so quickly that within a few years it had absorbed all the French
colonial trading companies, and most of the French crown’s own debt,
issuing its own paper money, before crashing into nothingness in 1721,
sending its chief executive fleeing for his life. In each case, this was
followed by legislation: in Britain, to forbid the creation of new
joint-stock companies (other than for the building of turnpikes and
canals), and in France, to eliminate paper money based in government
debt entirely.

It’s unsurprising, then, that Newtonian economics (if we may call it
that)—the assumption that one cannot simply create money, or even,
really, tinker with it—came to be accepted by almost everyone. There had
to be some solid, material foundation to all this, or the entire system
would go insane. True, economists were to spend centuries arguing about
what that foundation might be (was it really gold, or was it land, human
labor, the utility or desirability of commodities in general?) but
almost no one returned to anything like the Aristotelian view.

[]

Another way to look at this might be to say that the new age came to be
increasingly uncomfortable with the political nature of money. Politics,
after all, is the art of persuasion; the political is that dimension of
social life in which things really do become true if enough people
believe them. The problem is that in order to play the game effectively,
one can never acknowledge this: it may be true that, if I could convince
everyone in the world that I was the King of France, I would in fact
become the King of France; but it would never work if I were to admit
that this was the only basis of my claim. In this sense, politics is
very similar to magic—one reason both politics and magic tend, just
about everywhere, to be surrounded by a certain halo of fraud. These
suspicions were widely vaunted at the time. In 1711, the satirical
essayist Joseph Addison penned a little fantasy about the Bank of
England’s—and as a result, the British monetary system’s—dependence on
public faith in the political stability of the throne. (The Act of
Settlement of 1701 was the bill that guaranteed the royal succession,
and a sponge was a popular symbol for default). In a dream, he said,

I saw Public Credit, set on her throne in the Grocer’s Hall, the Great
Charter over her head, the Act of Settlement full in her view. Her touch
turned everything to gold. Behind her seat, bags filled with coin were
piled up to the ceiling. On her right the door flies open. The Pretender
rushes in, a sponge in one hand, and in the other a sword, which he
shakes at the Act of Settlement. The beautiful Queen sinks down
fainting. The spell by which she has turned all things around her into
treasure is broken. The money bags shrink like pricked bladders. The
piles of gold pieces are turned into bundles of rags or faggots of
wooden tallies.⁸⁴

If one does not believe in the king, then the money vanishes with him.

Thus kings, magicians, markets, and alchemists all fused in the public
imagination during this era, and we still talk about the “alchemy” of
the market, or “financial magicians.” In Goethe’s _Faust_ (1808), he
actually has his hero—in his capacity as alchemist-magician—pay a visit
to the Holy Roman Emperor. The Emperor is sinking under the weight of
endless debts that he has piled up paying for the extravagant pleasures
of his court. Faust, and his assistant, Mephistopheles, convince him
that he can pay off his creditors by creating paper money. It’s
represented as an act of pure prestidigitation. “You have plenty of gold
lying somewhere underneath your lands,” notes Faust. “Just issue notes
promising your creditors you’ll give it to them later. Since no one
knows how much gold there really is, there’s no limit to how much you
can promise.”⁸⁵

This kind of magical language almost never appears in the Middle Ages.⁸⁶
It would appear that it’s only in a resolutely materialist age that this
ability to simply produce things by saying that they are there comes to
be seen as a scandalous, even diabolical. And the surest sign that one
has entered such a materialist age is precisely the fact that it is seen
so. We have already observed Rabelais, at the very beginning of the age,
reverting to language almost identical to that used by Plutarch when he
railed against moneylenders in Roman times—“laughing at those natural
philosophers who hold that nothing can be made of nothing,” as they
manipulate their books and ledgers to demand back money they never
actually had. Panurge just turned it around: no, it’s by borrowing that
I make something out of nothing, and become a kind of god.

But consider the following lines, often attributed to Lord Josiah
Charles Stamp, director of the Bank of England:

The modern banking system manufactures money out of nothing. The process
is perhaps the most astounding piece of sleight of hand that was ever
invented. Banking was conceived in iniquity and born in sin. Bankers own
the earth; take it away from them, but leave them with the power to
create credit, and with the stroke of a pen they will create enough
money to buy it back again … If you wish to remain slaves of Bankers,
and pay the cost of your own slavery, let them continue to create
deposits.⁸⁷

It seems extremely unlikely that Lord Stamp ever really said this, but
the passage has been cited endlessly—in fact, it’s probably the single
most often-quoted passage by critics of the modern banking system.
However apocryphal, it clearly strikes a chord, and apparently for the
same reason: bankers are creating something out of nothing. They are not
only frauds and magicians. They are evil, because they’re playing God.

But there’s a deeper scandal than mere prestidigitation. If Medieval
moralists did not raise such objections, it was not just because they
were comfortable with metaphysical entities. They had a much more
fundamental problem with the market: greed. Market motives were held to
be inherently corrupt. The moment that greed was validated, and
unlimited profit was considered a perfectly viable end in itself, this
political, magical element became a genuine problem, because it meant
that even those actors—the brokers, stock-jobbers, traders—who
effectively made the system run had no convincing loyalty to anything,
even to the system itself.

Hobbes, who first developed this vision of human nature into an explicit
theory of society, was well aware of this greed dilemma. It formed the
basis of his political philosophy. Even, he argued, if we are all
rational enough to understand that it’s in our long-term interest to
live in peace and security, our short-term interests are often such that
killing and plundering are the most obviously profitable courses to
take, and all it takes is a few to cast aside their scruples to create
utter insecurity and chaos. This was why he felt that markets could only
exist under the aegis of an absolutist state, which would force us to
keep our promises and respect one another’s property. But what happens
when we’re talking about a market in which it is state debts and state
obligations themselves that are being traded; when one cannot really
speak of a state monopoly on force because one is operating in an
international market where the primary currency is bonds that the state
depends on for its very ability to marshal military force?

Having made incessant war on all remaining forms of the communism of the
poor, even to the point of criminalizing credit, the masters of the new
market system discovered that they had no obvious justification left to
maintain even the communism of the rich—that level of cooperation and
solidarity required to keep the economic system running. True, for all
its endless strains and periodic breakdowns, the system has held out so
far. But as recent events have dramatically testified, it has never been
resolved.


Part IV:

So What Is Capitalism, Anyway?

We are used to seeing modern capitalism (along with modern traditions of
democratic government) as emerging only later: with the Age of
Revolutions—the industrial revolution, the American and French
revolutions—a series of profound breaks at the end of the eighteenth
century that only became fully institutionalized after the end of the
Napoleonic Wars. Here we come face to face with a peculiar paradox. It
would seem that almost all elements of financial apparatus that we’ve
come to associate with capitalism—central banks, bond markets,
short-selling, brokerage houses, speculative bubbles, securization,
annuities—came into being not only before the science of economics
(which is perhaps not too surprising), but also before the rise of
factories, and wage labor itself.⁸⁸ This is a genuine challenge to
familiar ways of thinking. We like to think of the factories and
workshops as the “real economy,” and the rest as superstructure,
constructed on top of it. But if this were really so, then how can it be
that the superstructure came first? Can the dreams of the system create
its body?

All this raises the question of what “capitalism” is to begin with, a
question on which there is no consensus at all. The word was originally
invented by socialists, who saw capitalism as that system whereby those
who own capital command the labor of those who do not. Proponents, in
contrast, tend to see capitalism as the freedom of the marketplace,
which allows those with potentially marketable visions to pull resources
together to bring those visions into being. Just about everyone agrees,
however, that capitalism is a system that demands constant, endless
growth. Enterprises have to grow in order to remain viable. The same is
true of nations. Just as five percent per annum was widely accepted, at
the dawn of capitalism, as the legitimate commercial rate of
interest—that is, the amount that any investor could normally expect her
money to be growing by the principle of _interesse_—so is five percent
now the annual rate at which any nation’s GDP really ought to grow. What
was once an impersonal mechanism that compelled people to look at
everything around them as a potential source of profit has come to be
considered the only objective measure of the health of the human
community itself.

Starting from our baseline date of 1700, then, what we see at the dawn
of modern capitalism is a gigantic financial apparatus of credit and
debt that operates—in practical effect—to pump more and more labor out
of just about everyone with whom it comes into contact, and as a result
produces an endlessly expanding volume of material goods. It does so not
just by moral compulsion, but above all by using moral compulsion to
mobilize sheer physical force. At every point, the familiar but
peculiarly European entanglement of war and commerce reappears—often in
startling new forms. The first stock markets in Holland and Britain were
based mainly in trading shares of the East and West India companies,
which were both military and trading ventures. For a century, one such
private, profit-seeking corporation governed India. The national debts
of England, France, and the others were based in money borrowed not to
dig canals and erect bridges, but to acquire the gunpowder needed to
bombard cities and to construct the camps required for the holding of
prisoners and the training of recruits. Almost all the bubbles of the
eighteenth century involved some fantastic scheme to use the proceeds of
colonial ventures to pay for European wars. Paper money was debt money,
and debt money was war money, and this has always remained the case.
Those who financed Europe’s endless military conflicts also employed the
government’s police and prisons to extract ever-increasing productivity
from the rest of the population.

As everybody knows, the world market system initiated by the Spaniards
and Portuguese empires first arose in the search for spices. It soon
settled into three broad trades, which might be labeled the arms trade,
the slave trade, and the drug trade. The last refers mostly to soft
drugs, of course, like coffee, tea, and the sugar to put in them, and
tobacco, but distilled liquor first appears at this stage of human
history as well, and as we all know, Europeans had no compunctions about
aggressively marketing opium in China as a way of finally putting an end
to the need to export bullion. The cloth trade only came later, after
the East India Company used military force to shut down the (more
efficient) Indian cotton export trade. One need only take a glance at
the book that preserves Charles Davenant’s 1696 essay on credit and
human fellowship: _The political and commercial works of that celebrated
writer Charles D’Avenant: relating to the trade and revenue of England,
the Plantation trade, the East-India trade and African trade_.
“Obedience, love, and friendship” might suffice to govern relations
between fellow Englishmen, then, but in the colonies, it was mainly just
obedience.

As I’ve described, the Atlantic slave trade can be imagined as a giant
chain of debt-obligations, stretching from Bristol to Calabar to the
headwaters of the Cross River, where the Aro traders sponsored their
secret societies; just as in the Indian Ocean trade, similar chains
connected Utrecht to Capetown to Jakarta to the Kingdom of Gelgel, where
Balinese kings arranged their cockfights to lure their own subjects to
gamble their freedom away. In either case, the end product was the same:
human beings so entirely ripped from their contexts, and hence so
thoroughly dehumanized, that they were placed outside the realm of debt
entirely.

The middlemen in these chains, the various commercial links of the debt
chain that connected the stock-jobbers in London with the Aro priests in
Nigeria, pearl divers in the Aru islands of Eastern Indonesia, Bengali
tea plantations, or Amazonian rubber-tappers, give one the impression of
having been sober, calculating, unimaginative men. At either end of the
debt chain, the whole enterprise seemed to turn on the ability to
manipulate fantasies, and to run a constant peril of slipping into what
even contemporary observers considered varieties of phantasmagoric
madness. On the one end were the periodic bubbles, propelled in part by
rumor and fantasy and in part by the fact that just about everyone in
cities like Paris and London with any disposable cash would suddenly
become convinced that they would somehow be able to profit from the fact
that everyone else was succumbing to rumor and fantasy.

Charles MacKay has left us some immortal descriptions of the first of
these, the famous “South Sea Bubble” of 1710. Actually, the South Sea
Company itself (which grew so large that at one point it bought up most
of the national debt) was just the anchor for what happened, a giant
corporation, its stock constantly ballooning in value, that seemed, to
put it in contemporary terms, “too big to fail.” It soon became the
model for hundreds of new start-up offerings:

Innumerable joint-stock companies started up everywhere. They soon
received the name Bubbles, the most appropriate imagination could
devise … Some of them lasted a week or a fortnight, and were no more
heard of, while others could not even live out that span of existence.
Every evening produced new schemes, and every morning new projects. The
highest of the aristocracy were as eager in this hot pursuit of gain as
the most plodding jobber in Cornhill.⁸⁹

The author lists, as arbitrary examples, eighty-six schemes, ranging
from the manufacture of soap or sailcloth, the provision of insurance
for horses, to a method to “make deal-boards out of sawdust.” Each
issued stock; each issue would appear, then be scooped up and avidly
traded back and forth in taverns, coffee-houses, alleys, and
haberdasheries across the city. In every case their price was quickly
bid through the ceiling—each new buyer betting, effectively, that he or
she could unload them to some even more gullible sucker before the
inevitable collapse. Sometimes people bid on cards and coupons that
would allow them no more than the right to bid on other shares later.
Thousands grew rich. Thousands more were ruined.

The most absurd and preposterous of all, and which shewed, more
completely than any other, the utter madness of the people, was one
started by an unknown adventurer, entitled “A _company for the carrying
on of an undertaking of great advantage, but nobody to know what it
is.”_

The man of genius who essayed this bold and successful inroad upon
public credulity merely stated in his prospectus that the required
capital was half a million, in five thousand shares of 1001. each,
deposit 21. per share. Each subscriber, paying his deposit, would be
entitled to 1001. per annum per share. How this immense profit was to be
obtained, he would not condescend to inform them at that time, but
promised that in a month the full particulars would be duly announced,
and call made for the remaining 981. of the subscription. Next morning,
at nine o’clock, this great man opened an office in Cornhill. Crowds
beset his door, and when he shut up at three o’clock, he found that no
less than one thousand shares had been subscribed for, and the deposits
paid.

He was philosopher enough to be contented with his venture, and set off
that same evening for the Continent. He was never heard of again.⁹⁰

If one is to believe MacKay, the entire population of London conceived
the simultaneous delusion, not that money could really be manufactured
out of nothing, but that other people were foolish enough to believe
that it could—and that, by that very fact, they actually could make
money out of nothing after all.

Moving to the other side of the debt chain, we find fantasies ranging
from the charming to the apocalyptic. In the anthropological literature,
there is everything from the beautiful “sea wives” of Aru pearl divers,
who will not yield up the treasures of the ocean unless courted with
gifts bought on credit from local Chinese shops,⁹¹ to the secret markets
where Bengali landlords purchase ghosts to terrorize insubordinate debt
peons; to Tiv flesh-debts, a fantasy of human society cannibalizing
itself; to finally, occasions at which, the Tiv nightmare appears to
have very nearly become true.⁹² One the most famous and disturbing was
the great Putumayo scandal of 1909–1911, in which the London reading
public was shocked to discover that the agents of the subsidiary of a
British rubber company operating in the Peruvian rainforest had created
their very own Heart of Darkness, exterminating tens of thousands of
Huitoto Indians—who the agents insisted on referring to only as
“cannibals”—in scenes of rape, torture, and mutilation that recalled the
very worst of the conquest four hundred years earlier.⁹³

In the debates that followed, the first impulse was to blame everything
on a system whereby the Indians were said to have been caught in a debt
trap, made completely dependent on the company store:

The root of the whole evil was the so called _patron_ or “peonage”
system—a variety of what used to be called in England the “truck
system”—by which the employee, forced to buy all his supplies at the
employer’s store, is kept hopelessly in debt, while by law he is unable
to leave his employment until his debt is paid … The _peon_ is thus, as
often as not, a _de facto_ slave; and since in the remoter regions of
the vast continent there is no effective government, he is wholly at the
mercy of his master.⁹⁴

The “cannibals” who ended up flogged to death, crucified, tied up and
used for target practice, or hacked to pieces with machetes for failure
to bring in sufficient quantities of rubber, had, the story went, fallen
into the ultimate debt trap; seduced by the wares of the company’s
agents, they’d ended up bartering away their very lives.

A later Parliamentary inquiry discovered that the real story was nothing
of the sort. The Huitoto had not been tricked into becoming debt peons
at all. It was the agents and overseers sent into the region who were,
much like the conquistadors, deeply indebted—in their case, to the
Peruvian company that had commissioned them, which was ultimately
receiving its own credit from London financiers. These agents had
certainly arrived with every intention of extending that web of credit
to include the Indians, but discovering the Huitoto to have no interest
in the cloth, machetes, and coins they had brought to trade with them,
they’d finally given up and just started rounding Indians up and forcing
them to accept loans at gunpoint, then tabulating the amount of rubber
they owed.⁹⁵ Many of the Indians massacred, in turn, had simply been
trying to run away.

In reality, then, the Indians had been reduced to slavery; it’s just
that, by 1907, no one could openly admit this. A legitimate enterprise
had to have some moral basis, and the only morality the company knew was
debt. When it became clear that the Huitoto rejected the premise,
everything went haywire, and the company ended up, like Casimir, caught
in a spiral of indignant terror that ultimately threatened to wipe out
its very economic basis.

[]

It is the secret scandal of capitalism that at no point has it been
organized primarily around free labor.⁹⁶ The conquest of the Americas
began with mass enslavement, then gradually settled into various forms
of debt peonage, African slavery, and “indentured service”—that is, the
use of contract labor, workers who had received cash in advance and were
thus bound for five-, seven-, or ten-year terms to pay it back. Needless
to say, indentured servants were recruited largely from among people who
were already debtors. In the 1600s there were at times almost as many
white debtors as African slaves working in southern plantations, and
legally they were at first in almost the same situation, since in the
beginning, plantation societies were working within a European legal
tradition that assumed slavery did not exist, so even Africans in the
Carolinas were classified, as contract laborers.⁹⁷ Of course this later
changed when the idea of “race” was introduced. When African slaves were
freed, they were replaced, on plantations from Barbados to Mauritius,
with contract laborers again: though now ones recruited mainly in India
or China. Chinese contract laborers built the North American railroad
system, and Indian “coolies” built the South African mines. The peasants
of Russia and Poland, who had been free landholders in the Middle Ages,
were only made serfs at the dawn of capitalism, when their lords began
to sell grain on the new world market to feed the new industrial cities
to the west.⁹⁸ Colonial regimes in Africa and Southeast Asia regularly
demanded forced labor from their conquered subjects, or, alternately,
created tax systems designed to force the population into the labor
market through debt. British overlords in India, starting with the East
India Company but continuing under Her Majesty’s government,
institutionalized debt peonage as their primary means of creating
products for sale abroad.

This is a scandal not just because the system occasionally goes haywire,
as it did in the Putumayo, but because it plays havoc with our most
cherished assumptions about what capitalism really is—particularly that,
in its basic nature, capitalism has something to do with freedom. For
the capitalists, this means the freedom of the marketplace. For most
workers, it means free labor. Marxists have questioned whether wage
labor is ultimately free in any sense (since someone with nothing to
sell but his or her body cannot in any sense be considered a genuinely
free agent), but they still tend to assume that free wage labor is the
basis of capitalism. And the dominant image in the history of capitalism
is the English workingman toiling in the factories of the industrial
revolution, and this image can be traced forward to Silicon Valley, with
a straight line in between. All those millions of slaves and serfs and
coolies and debt peons disappear, or if we must speak of them, we write
them off as temporary bumps along the road. Like sweatshops, this is
assumed to be a stage that industrializing nations had to pass through,
just as it is still assumed that all those millions of debt peons and
contract laborers and sweatshop workers who still exist, often in the
same places, will surely live to see their children become regular wage
laborers with health insurance and pensions, and _their_ children,
doctors and lawyers and entrepreneurs.

When one looks at the actual history of wage labor, even in countries
like England, that picture begins to melt away. In most of Medieval
northern Europe, wage labor had been mainly a lifestyle phenomenon. From
roughly the age of twelve or fourteen to roughly twenty-eight or thirty,
everyone was expected to be employed as a servant in someone else’s
household—usually on a yearly contract basis, for which they received
room, board, professional training, and usually a wage of some
sort—until they accumulated enough resources to marry and set up a
household of their own.⁹⁹ The first thing that “proletarianization” came
to mean was that millions of young men and women across Europe found
themselves effectively stuck in a kind of permanent adolescence.
Apprentices and journeymen could never become “masters,” and thus, never
actually grow up. Eventually, many began to give up and marry early—to
the great scandal of the moralists, who insisted that the new
proletariat were starting families they could not possibly support.¹⁰⁰

There is, and has always been, a curious affinity between wage labor and
slavery. This is not just because it was slaves on Caribbean sugar
plantations who supplied the quick-energy products that powered much of
early wage laborers’ work; not just because most of the scientific
management techniques applied in factories in the industrial revolution
can be traced back to those sugar plantations; but also because both the
relation between master and slave, and between employer and employee,
are in principle impersonal: whether you’ve been sold or you’re simply
rented yourself out, the moment money changes hands, _who_ you are is
supposed to be unimportant; all that’s important is that you are capable
of understanding orders and doing what you’re told.¹⁰¹

This is one reason, perhaps, that in principle, there was always a
feeling that both the buying of slaves and the hiring of laborers should
really not be on credit, but should employ cash. The problem, as I’ve
noted, was that for most of the history of British capitalism, the cash
simply didn’t exist. Even when the Royal Mint began to produce
smaller-denomination silver and copper coins, the supply was sporadic
and inadequate. This is how the “truck system” developed to begin with:
during the industrial revolution, factory owners would often pay their
workers with tickets or vouchers good only in local shops, with whose
owners they had some sort of informal arrangement, or, in more isolated
parts of the country, which they owned themselves.¹⁰² Traditional credit
relations with one’s local shopkeeper clearly took on an entirely new
complexion once the shopkeeper was effectively an agent of the boss.
Another expedient was to pay workers at least partly in kind—and notice
the very richness of the vocabulary for the sorts of things one was
assumed to be allowed to appropriate from one’s workplace, particularly
from the waste, excess, and side products: cabbage, chips, thrums,
sweepings, buggings, gleanings, sweepings, potchings, vails, poake,
coltage, knockdowns, tinge.¹⁰³ “Cabbage,” for instance, was the cloth
left over from tailoring, “chips” the pieces of board that dockworkers
had the right to carry from their workplace (any piece of timber less
than two feet long), “thrums” were taken from the warping-bars of looms,
and so on. And of course we have already heard about payment in the form
of cod, or nails.

Employers had a final expedient: wait for the money to show up, and in
the meantime, don’t pay anything—leaving their employees to get by with
_only_ what they could scrounge from their shop floors, or what their
families could finagle in outside employment, receive in charity,
preserve in savings pools with friends and families, or, when all else
failed, acquire on credit from the loan sharks and pawnbrokers who
rapidly came to be seen as the perennial scourge of the working poor.
The situation became such that, by the nineteenth century, any time a
fire destroyed a London pawnshop, working-class neighborhoods would
brace for the wave of domestic violence that would inevitably ensue when
many a wife was forced to confess that she’d long since secretly hocked
her husband’s Sunday suit.¹⁰⁴

We are, nowadays, used to associating factories eighteen months in
arrears for wages with a nation in economic free-fall, such as occurred
during the collapse of the Soviet Union; but owing to the hard-money
policies of the British government, who were always concerned above all
to ensure that their paper money didn’t float away in another
speculative bubble, in the early days of industrial capitalism, such a
situation was in no way unusual. Even the government was often unable to
find the cash to pay its own employees. In eighteenth-century London,
the Royal Admiralty was regularly over a year behind in paying the wages
of those who labored at the Deptford docks—one reason that they were
willing to tolerate the appropriation of chips, not to mention hemp,
canvas, steel bolts, and cordage. In fact, as Linebaugh has shown, the
situation only really began to take recognizable form around 1800, when
the government stabilized its finances, began paying cash wages on
schedule, and therefore tried to abolish the practice of what was now
relabeled “workplace pilfering”—which, meeting outraged resistance on
the part of the dockworkers, was made punishable by whipping and
imprisonment. Samuel Bentham, the engineer put in charge of reforming
the dockyards, had to turn them into a regular police state in order to
be able to institute a regime of pure wage labor—to which purpose he
ultimately conceived the notion of building a giant tower in the middle
to guarantee constant surveillance, an idea that was later borrowed by
his brother Jeremy for the famous Panopticon.¹⁰⁵

[]

Men like Smith and Bentham were idealists; even utopians. To understand
the history of capitalism, however, we have to begin by realizing that
the picture we have in our heads, of workers who dutifully punch the
clock at 8:00 a.m. and receive regular remuneration every Friday, on the
basis of a temporary contract that either party is free to break off at
any time, began as a utopian vision, was only gradually put into effect
even in England and North America, and has never, at any point, been the
main way of organizing production for the market, ever, anywhere.

This is actually why Smith’s work is so important. He created the vision
of an imaginary world almost entirely free of debt and credit, and
therefore, free of guilt and sin; a world where men and women were free
to simply calculate their interests in full knowledge that everything
had been prearranged by God to ensure that it will serve the greater
good. Such imaginary constructs are of course what scientists refer to
as “models,” and there’s nothing intrinsically wrong with them. Actually
I think a fair case can be made that we cannot think without them. The
problem with such models—at least, it always seems to happen when we
model something called “the market”—is that, once created, we have a
tendency to treat them as objective realities, or even fall down before
them and start worshipping them as gods. “We must obey the dictates of
the market!”

Karl Marx, who knew quite a bit about the human tendency to fall down
and worship our own creations, wrote _Das Capital_ in an attempt to
demonstrate that, even if we do start from the economists’ utopian
vision, so long as we also allow some people to control productive
capital, and, again, leave others with nothing to sell but their brains
and bodies, the results will be in many ways barely distinguishable from
slavery, and the whole system will eventually destroy itself. What
everyone seems to forget is the “as if” nature of his analysis.¹⁰⁶ Marx
was well aware that there were far more bootblacks, prostitutes,
butlers, soldiers, pedlars, chimneysweeps, flower girls, street
musicians, convicts, nannies, and cab drivers in the London of his day
than there were factory workers. He was never suggesting that that’s
what the world was actually like.

Still, if there is anything that the last several hundred years of world
history have shown, it’s that utopian visions can have a certain appeal.
This is as true of Adam Smith’s as of those ranged against it. The
period from roughly 1825 to 1975 is a brief but determined effort on the
part of a large number of very powerful people—with the avid support of
many of the least powerful—to try to turn that vision into something
like reality. Coins and paper money were, finally, produced in
sufficient quantities that even ordinary people could conduct their
daily lives without appeal to tickets, tokens, or credit. Wages started
to be paid on time. New sorts of shops, arcades, and galleries appeared,
where everyone paid in cash, or alternately, as time went on, by means
of impersonal forms of credit like installment plans. As a result, the
old puritanical notion that debt was sin and degradation began to take a
profound hold on many of those who came to consider themselves the
“respectable” working classes, who often took freedom from the clutches
of the pawnbroker and loan shark as a point of pride, which separated
them from drunkards, hustlers, and ditch-diggers as surely as the fact
that they weren’t missing teeth.

Speaking as someone brought up in that sort of working-class family (my
brother died at the age of 53, having refused to his dying day to
acquire a credit card), I can attest to the degree that, for those who
spend most of their waking hours working at someone else’s orders, the
ability to pull out a wallet full of banknotes that are unconditionally
one’s own can be a compelling form of freedom. It’s not surprising that
so many of the economists’ assumptions—most of those for which I have
been taking them to task over the course of this book—have been embraced
by the leaders of the historic workers’ movements, so much so that they
have come to shape our visions of what alternatives to capitalism might
be like. The problem is not just—as I demonstrated in chapter 7—that it
is rooted in a deeply flawed, even perverse, conception of human
freedom. The real problem is that, like all utopian dreams, it is
impossible. We could no more have a universal world market than we could
have a system in which everyone who wasn’t a capitalist was somehow able
to become a respectable, regularly paid wage laborer with access to
adequate dental care. A world like that has never existed and never
could exist. What’s more, the moment that even the prospect that this
might happen begins to materialize, the whole system starts to come
apart.


Part IV:

Apocalypse

Let us return, finally, to where we began: with Cortés and the Aztec
treasure. The reader might have asked herself, What did happen to it?
Did Cortés really steal it from his own men?

The answer seems to be that by the time the siege was over, there was
very little of it left. Cortés seems to have gotten his hands on much of
it long before the siege even began. A certain portion he had won by
gambling.

This story, too, is in Bernal Díaz, and it is strange and puzzling, but
also, I suspect, profound. Let me fill in some of the gaps in our story.
After burning his boats, Cortés began to assemble an army of local
allies, which was easy to do because the Aztecs were widely hated, and
then he began to march on the Aztec capital. Moctezuma, the Aztec
emperor, who had been monitoring the situation closely, concluded that
he needed to at least figure out what sort of people he was dealing
with, so he invited the entire Spanish force (only a few hundred men) to
be his official guests in Tenochtitlán. This eventually led to a series
of palace intrigues during which Cortés’s men briefly held the emperor
hostage before being forcibly expelled.

During the time when Moctezuma was being held captive in his own palace,
he and Cortés passed a good deal of their time playing an Aztec game
called _totoloque_. They played for gold, and Cortés, of course,
cheated. At one point, Moctezuma’s men brought the matter to the king’s
attention, but the king just laughed and made a joke of it—neither was
he concerned later when Pedro de Alvarado, Cortés’s chief lieutenant,
began cheating even more flagrantly, demanding gold for each point lost
and when he lost, paying only in worthless pebbles. Why Moctezuma
behaved so has remained something of an historical mystery. Díaz took it
as a gesture of lordly magnanimity, perhaps even a way of putting the
petty-minded Spaniards in their place.¹⁰⁷

One historian, Inga Clenninden, suggests an alternate interpretation.
Aztec games, she notes, tended to have a peculiar feature: there was
always a way that, by a freak stroke of luck, one could achieve total
victory. This seems to have been true, for instance, of their famous
ball games. Observers always wonder, viewing the tiny stone hoops set
high above the court, how anyone could ever possibly have managed to
score. The answer seems to be: they didn’t, at least not that way.
Normally the game had nothing to do with the hoop. The game was played
between two opposing squads, attired as for battle, knocking the ball
back and forth:

The normal method of scoring was through the slow accumulation of
points. But that process could be dramatically preempted. To send the
ball through one of the rings—a feat, given the size of the ball and the
ring, presumably rarer than a hole in one in golf—gave instant victory,
ownership of all the goods wagered, and the right to pillage the cloaks
of the onlookers.¹⁰⁸

Whoever scored the point won everything, down to the audience’s
clothing.

There were similar rules in board games, such as Cortés and Moctezuma
were playing: if, by some freak stroke of luck, one of the dice landed
on its edge, the game was over, and the winner took everything. This,
Clenninden suggests, must have been what Moctezuma was really waiting
for. After all, he was clearly in the middle of extraordinary events.
Strange creatures had appeared, apparently from nowhere, with unheard-of
powers. Rumors of epidemics, of the destruction of nearby nations, had
presumably already reached him. If ever there was a time that some
grandiose revelation was due from the gods, then surely this was it.

Such an attitude does seem to fit perfectly with the spirit of Aztec
culture gleaned from its literature, which exuded a sense of impending
catastrophe, perhaps astrologically determined, just possibly
avoidable—but probably not. Some have suggested that Aztecs must have
somehow been aware that they were a civilization skating on the brink of
ecological catastrophe; others, that the apocalyptic tone is
retrospective—since, after all, what we know of Aztec literature is
almost entirely gleaned from men and women who actually did experience
its complete destruction. Still, there does seem to be a certain frantic
quality in certain Aztec practices—the sacrifice of as many as tens of
thousands of war prisoners, most notably in the apparent belief that,
were the Sun not continually fed with human hearts, it would die and
world with it—that it’s hard to explain in any other way.

If Clenninden is right, for Moctezuma, he and Cortés were not simply
gambling for gold. Gold was trivial. The stakes were the entire
universe.

Moctezuma was above all a warrior, and all warriors are gamblers; but
unlike Cortés, he was clearly in every way a man of honor. As we’ve also
seen, the quintessence of a warrior’s honor, which is a greatness that
can only come from the destruction and degradation of others, is his
willingness to throw himself into a game where he risks that same
destruction and degradation himself—and, unlike Cortés, to play
graciously, and by the rules.¹⁰⁹ When the time came, it meant being
willing to stake everything.

He did. And as it turns out, nothing happened. No die landed on its
edge. Cortés continued to cheat, the gods sent no revelation, and the
universe was eventually destroyed.

If there’s something to be learned here—and as I say, I think there
is—it is that there may be a deeper, more profound relation between
gambling and apocalypse. Capitalism is a system that enshrines the
gambler as an essential part of its operation, in a way that no other
ever has; yet at the same time, capitalism seems to be uniquely
incapable of conceiving of its own eternity. Could these two facts be
linked?

I should be more precise here. It’s not entirely true that capitalism is
incapable of conceiving of its own eternity. On the one hand, its
exponents do often feel obliged to present it as eternal, because they
insist that is it is the only possible viable economic system: one that,
as they still sometimes like to say, “has existed for five thousand
years and will exist for five thousand more.” On the other hand, it does
seem that the moment a significant portion of the population begins to
actually believe this, and particularly, starts treating credit
institutions as if they really will be around forever, everything goes
haywire. Note here how it was the most sober, cautious, responsible
capitalist regimes—the seventeenth-century Dutch Republic, the
eighteenth-century British Commonwealth—the ones most careful about
managing their public debt—that saw the most bizarre explosions of
speculative frenzy, the tulip manias and South Sea bubbles.

Much of this seems to turn on the nature of national deficits and credit
money. The national debt is, as politicians have complained practically
since these things first appeared, money borrowed from future
generations. Still, the effects have always been strangely double-edged.
On the one hand, deficit financing is a way of putting even more
military power in the hands of princes, generals, and politicians; on
the other, it suggests that government owes something to those it
governs. Insofar as our money is ultimately an extension of the public
debt, then whenever we buy a newspaper or a cup of coffee, or even place
a bet on a horse, we are trading in promises, representations of
something that the government will give us at some time in the future,
even if we don’t know exactly what it is.¹¹⁰

Immanuel Wallerstein likes to point out that the French Revolution
introduced several profoundly new ideas in politics—ideas which, fifty
years before the revolution, the vast majority of educated Europeans
would have written off as crazy, but which, fifty years afterward, just
about anyone felt they had to at least pretend they thought were true.
The first is that social change is inevitable and desirable: that the
natural direction of history is for civilization to gradually improve.
The second is that the appropriate agent to manage such change is the
government. The third is that the government gains its legitimacy from
an entity called “the people.”¹¹¹ It’s easy to see how the very idea of
a national debt—a promise of continual future improvement (at the very
least, five percent annual improvement) made by government to
people—might itself have played a role in inspiring such a revolutionary
new perspective. Yet at the same time, when one looks at what men like
Mirabeau, Voltaire, Diderot, Siéyes—the _philosophes_ who first proposed
that notion of what we now call “civilization”—were actually arguing
about in the years immediately leading up to the revolution, it was even
more about the danger of apocalyptic catastrophe, of the prospect of
civilization as they knew it being destroyed by default and economic
collapse.

Part of the problem was the obvious one: the national debt is, first,
born of war; second, it is not owed to all the people equally, but above
all to capitalists—and in France at that time, “capitalist” meant,
specifically, “those who held pieces of the national debt.” The more
democratically inclined felt that the entire situation was opprobrious.
“The modern theory of the perpetuation of debt,” Thomas Jefferson wrote,
around this same time, “has drenched the earth with blood, and crushed
its inhabitants under burdens ever accumulating.”¹¹² Most Enlightenment
thinkers feared that it promised even worse. Intrinsic to the new,
“modern” notion of impersonal debt, after all, was the possibility of
bankruptcy.¹¹³ Bankruptcy, at that time, was indeed something of a
personal apocalypse: it meant prison, the dissolution of one’s estate;
for the least fortunate, it meant torture, starvation, and death. What
national bankruptcy would mean, at that point in history, nobody knew.
There were simply no precedents. Yet as nations fought greater and
bloodier wars, and their debts escalated geometrically, default began to
appear unavoidable.¹¹⁴ Abbe Sieyés first put forward his great scheme
for representative government, for instance, primarily as a way of
reforming the national finances, to fend off the inevitable catastrophe.
And when it happened, what would it look like? Would the money become
worthless? Would military regimes seize power, regimes across Europe be
likewise forced to default and fall like dominos, plunging the continent
into endless barbarism, darkness, and war? Many were already
anticipating the prospect of the Terror long before the revolution
itself.¹¹⁵

It’s a strange story because we are used to thinking of the
Enlightenment as the dawn of a unique phase of human optimism, borne on
assumptions that the advance of science and human knowledge would
inevitably make life wiser, safer, and better for everyone—a naïve faith
said to have peaked in the Fabian socialism of the 1890s, only to be
annihilated in the trenches of World War I. In fact, even the Victorians
were haunted by the dangers of degeneration and decline. Most of all,
Victorians shared the near-universal assumption that capitalism itself
would not be around forever. Insurrection seemed imminent. Many
Victorian capitalists operated under the sincere belief that they might,
at any moment, find themselves hanging from trees. In Chicago, for
instance, a friend once took me on a drive down a beautiful old street,
full of mansions from the 1870s: the reason, he explained, that it
looked like that, was that most of Chicago’s rich industrialists of the
time were so convinced that the revolution was immanent that they
collectively relocated along the road that led to the nearest military
base. Almost none of the great theorists of capitalism, from anywhere on
the political spectrum, from Marx to Weber, to Schumpeter, to von Mises,
felt that capitalism was likely to be around for more than another
generation or two at the most.

One could go further: the moment that the fear of imminent social
revolution no longer seemed plausible, by the end of World War II, we
were immediately presented with the specter of nuclear holocaust.¹¹⁶
Then, when that no longer seemed plausible, we discovered global
warming. This is not to say that these threats were not, and are not,
real. Yet it does seem strange that capitalism feels the constant need
to imagine, or to actually manufacture, the means of its own imminent
extinction. It’s in dramatic contrast to the behavior of the leaders of
socialist regimes, from Cuba to Albania, who, when they came to power,
immediately began acting as if their system would be around
forever—ironically enough, considering they in fact turned out to be
something of an historical blip.

Perhaps the reason is because what was true in 1710 is still true.
Presented with the prospect of its own eternity, capitalism—or anyway,
financial capitalism—simply explodes. Because if there’s no end to it,
there’s absolutely no reason not to generate credit—that is, future
money—infinitely. Recent events would certainly seem to confirm this.
The period leading up to 2009 was one in which many began to believe
that capitalism really was going to be around forever; at the very
least, no one seemed any longer to be able to imagine an alternative.
The immediate effect was a series of increasingly reckless bubbles that
brought the whole apparatus crashing down.



CHAPTER TWELVE   (1971–THE BEGINNING OF SOMETHING YET TO BE DETERMINED)


_Look at all these bums: If only there were a way of finding out how
much they owe_.

_—Repo Man_ (1984)

_Free your mind of the idea of deserving, of the idea of earning, and
you will begin to be able to think_.

—Ursula K. Le Guin, _The Dispossessed_

ON AUGUST 15, 1971, United States President Richard Nixon announced that
foreign-held U.S. dollars would no longer be convertible into gold—thus
stripping away the last vestige of the international gold standard.¹
This was the end of a policy that had been effective since 1931, and
confirmed by the Bretton Woods accords at the end of World War II: that
while United States citizens might no longer be allowed to cash in their
dollars for gold, all U.S. currency held outside the country was to be
redeemable at the rate of $35 an ounce. By doing so, Nixon initiated the
regime of free-floating currencies that continues to this day.

The consensus among historians is that Nixon had little choice. His hand
was forced by the rising costs of the Vietnam War—one that, like all
capitalist wars, had been financed by deficit spending. The United
States was in possession of a large proportion of the world’s gold
reserves in its vaults in Fort Knox (though increasingly less in the
late 1960s, as other governments, most famously Charles de Gaulle’s
France, began demanding gold for their dollars); most poorer countries,
in contrast, kept their reserves in dollars. The immediate effect of
Nixon’s unpegging the dollar was to cause the price of gold to
skyrocket; it hit a peak of $600 an ounce in 1980. This of course had
the effect of causing U.S. gold reserves to increase dramatically in
value. The value of the dollar, as denominated in gold, plummeted. The
result was a massive net transfer of wealth from poor countries, which
lacked gold reserves, to rich ones, like the United States and Great
Britain, that maintained them. In the United States, it also set off
persistent inflation.

Whatever Nixon’s reasons, though, once the global system of credit money
was entirely unpegged from gold, the world entered a new phase of
financial history—one that nobody completely understands. While I was
growing up in New York, I would hear occasional rumors of secret gold
vaults underneath the Twin Towers in Manhattan. Supposedly, these vaults
contained not just the U.S. gold reserves, but those of all the major
economic powers. The gold was said to be kept in the form of bars, piled
up in separate vaults, one for each country, and every year, when the
balance of accounts was calculated, workmen with dollies would adjust
the stocks accordingly, carting, say, a few million in gold out of the
vault marked “Brazil” and transfering them to the one marked “Germany,”
and so on.

Apparently a lot of people had heard these stories. At least, right
after the Towers were destroyed on September 11, 2001, one of the first
questions many New Yorkers asked was: What happened to the money? Was it
safe? Were the vaults destroyed? Presumably, the gold had melted. Was
this the real aim of the attackers? Conspiracy theories abounded. Some
spoke of legions of emergency workers secretly summoned to make their
way through miles of overheated tunnels, desperately carting off tons of
bullion even as rescue workers labored overhead. One particularly
colorful conspiracy theory suggested that the entire attack was really
staged by speculators who, like Nixon, expected to see the value of the
dollar crash and that of gold to skyrocket—either because the reserves
had been destroyed, or because they themselves had laid prior plans to
steal them.²

The truly remarkable thing about this story is that, after having
believed it for years, and then, in the wake of 9/11, having been
convinced by some more knowing friends that it was all a great myth
(“No,” one of them said resignedly, as if to a child, “the United States
keeps its gold reserves in Fort Knox”), I did a little research and
discovered that, no, actually, it’s true. The United States treasury’s
gold reserves are indeed kept at Fort Knox, but the Federal Reserve’s
gold reserves, and those of more than one hundred other central banks,
governments, and organizations, are stored in vaults under the Federal
Reserve building at 33 Liberty Street in Manhattan, two blocks away from
the Towers. At roughly five thousand metric tons (266 million troy
ounces), these combined reserves represent, according to the Fed’s own
website, somewhere between one-fifth and one-quarter of all the gold
that has ever been taken from the earth.

The gold stored at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York is secured in a
most unusual vault. It rests on the bedrock of Manhattan Island—one of
the few foundations considered adequate to support the weight of the
vault, its door, and the gold inside—eighty feet below street level and
fifty feet below sea level … To reach the vault, bullionladen pallets
must be loaded into one of the Bank’s elevators and sent down five
floors below street level to the vault floor … If everything is in
order, the gold is either moved to one or more of the vault’s 122
compartments assigned to depositing countries and official international
organizations or placed on shelves. “Gold stackers,” using hydraulic
lifts, do indeed shift them back and forth between compartments to
balance credits and debts, though the vaults have only numbers, so even
the workers don’t know who is paying whom.³

There is no reason to believe, however, that these vaults were in any
way affected by the events of September 11, 2001.

Reality, then, has become so odd that it’s hard to guess which elements
of grand mythic fantasies are really fantasy, and which are true. The
image of collapsed vaults, the melted bullion, of secret workers
scurrying deep below Manhattan with underground forklifts evacuating the
world economy—all this turns out not to be. But is it entirely
surprising that people were willing to consider it?⁴

In America, the banking system since the days of Thomas Jefferson has
shown a remarkable capacity to inspire paranoid fantasies: whether
centering on Freemasons, or Elders of Zion, or the Secret Order of the
Illuminati, or the Queen of England’s drug-money-laundering operations,
or any of a thousand other secret conspiracies and cabals. It’s the main
reason why it took so long for an American central bank to be
established to begin with. In a way there’s nothing surprising here. The
United States has always been dominated by a certain market populism,
and the ability of banks to “create money out of nothing”—and even more,
to prevent anyone else from doing so—has always been the bugaboo of
market populists, since it directly contradicts the idea that markets
are a simple expression of democratic equality. Still, since Nixon’s
floating of the dollar, it has become evident that it’s _only_ the
wizard behind the screen who seems to be maintaining the viability of
the whole arrangement. Under the free-market orthodoxy that followed, we
have all being asked, effectively, to accept that “the market” is a
self-regulating system, with the rising and falling of prices akin to a
force of nature, and simultaneously to ignore the fact that, in the
business pages, it is simply assumed that markets rise and fall mainly
in anticipation of, or reaction to, decisions regarding interest rates
by Alan Greenspan, or Ben Bernanke, or whoever is currently the chairman
of the Federal Reserve.⁵

[]

One element, however, tends to go flagrantly missing in even the most
vivid conspiracy theories about the banking system, let alone in
official accounts: that is, the role of war and military power. There’s
a reason why the wizard has such a strange capacity to create money out
of nothing. Behind him, there’s a man with a gun.

True, in one sense, he’s been there from the start. I have already
pointed out that modern money is based on government debt, and that
governments borrow money in order to finance wars. This is just as true
today as it was in the age of King Phillip II. The creation of central
banks represented a permanent institutionalization of that marriage
between the interests of warriors and financiers that had already begun
to emerge in Renaissance Italy, and that eventually became the
foundation of financial capitalism.⁶

Nixon floated the dollar in order to pay for the cost of a war in which,
during the period of 1970–1972 alone, he ordered more than four million
tons of explosives and incendiaries dropped on cities and villages
across Indochina—causing one senator to dub him “the greatest bomber of
all time.”⁷ The debt crisis was a direct result of the need to pay for
the bombs, or to be more precise, the vast military infrastructure
required to deliver them. This was what was causing such an enormous
strain on the U.S. gold reserves. Many hold that by floating the dollar,
Nixon converted the U.S. currency into pure “fiat money”—mere pieces of
paper, intrinsically worthless, that were treated as money only because
the United States government insisted that it should be. In that case,
one could well argue that U.S. military power was now the only thing
backing up the currency. In a certain sense this is true, but the notion
of “fiat money” assumes that money really “was” gold in the first place.
Really we are dealing with another variation of credit money.

Contrary to popular belief, the U.S. government can’t “just print
money,” because American money is not issued by the government at all,
but by private banks, under the aegis of the Federal Reserve System. The
Federal Reserve—despite the name—is technically not part of the
government at all, but a peculiar sort of public-private hybrid, a
consortium of privately owned banks whose chairman is appointed by the
United States president, with Congressional approval, but which
otherwise operates without public oversight. All dollar bills in
circulation in America are “Federal Reserve Notes”—the Fed issues them
as promissory notes, and commissions the U.S. mint to do the actual
printing, paying it four cents for each bill.⁸ The arrangement is just a
variation of the scheme originally pioneered by the Bank of England,
whereby the Fed “loans” money to the United States government by
purchasing treasury bonds, and then monetizes the U.S. debt by lending
the money thus owed by the government to other banks.⁹ The difference is
that while the Bank of England originally loaned the king gold, the Fed
simply whisks the money into existence by saying that it’s there. Thus,
it’s the Fed that has the power to print money.¹⁰ The banks that receive
loans from the Fed are no longer permitted to print money themselves,
but they are allowed to create virtual money by making loans at a
fractional reserve rate established by the Fed—though in the wake of the
current credit crisis, at time of this writing, there has been a move to
remove even these restrictions.

All this is a bit of a simplification: monetary policy is endlessly
arcane, and it does sometimes seem, intentionally so. (Henry Ford once
remarked that if ordinary Americans ever found out how the banking
system really worked, there would be a revolution tomorrow.) What is
remarkable for present purposes is not so much that American dollars are
created by banks, but that one apparently paradoxical result of Nixon’s
floating the currency was that these bank-created dollars themselves
replaced gold as the world’s reserve currency: that is, as the ultimate
store of value in the world, yielding the United States enormous
economic advantages.

Meanwhile, the U.S. debt remains, as it has been since 1790, a war debt:
the United States continues to spend more on its military than do all
other nations on earth put together, and military expenditures are not
only the basis of the government’s industrial policy; they also take up
such a huge proportion of the budget that by many estimations, were it
not for them, the United States would not run a deficit at all.

The U.S. military, unlike any other, maintains a doctrine of global
power projection: that it should have the ability, through roughly 800
overseas military bases, to intervene with deadly force absolutely
anywhere on the planet. In a way, though, land forces are secondary; at
least since World War II, the key to U.S. military doctrine has always
been a reliance on air power. The United States has fought no war in
which it did not control the skies, and it has relied on aerial
bombardment far more systematically than any other military—in its
recent occupation of Iraq, for instance, even going so far as to bomb
residential neighborhoods of cities ostensibly under its own control.
The essence of U.S. military predominance in the world is, ultimately,
the fact that it can, at will, drop bombs, with only a few hours’
notice, at absolutely any point on the surface of the planet.¹¹ No other
government has ever had anything remotely like this sort of capability.
In fact, a case could well be made that it is this very power that holds
the entire world monetary system, organized around the dollar, together.

[]

Because of United States trade deficits, huge numbers of dollars
circulate outside the country; and one effect of Nixon’s floating of the
dollar was that foreign central banks have little they can do with these
dollars except to use them to buy U.S. treasury bonds.¹² This is what is
meant by the dollar becoming the world’s “reserve currency.” These bonds
are, like all bonds, supposed to be loans that will eventually mature
and be repaid, but as economist Michael Hudson, who first began
observing the phenomenon in the early ’70s, noted, they never really do:

To the extent that these Treasury IOUs are being built into the world’s
monetary base they will not have to be repaid, but are to be rolled over
indefinitely. This feature is the essence of America’s free financial
ride, a tax imposed at the entire globe’s expense.¹³

What’s more, over time, the combined effect of low interest payments and
the inflation is that these bonds actually depreciate in value—adding to
the tax effect, or as I preferred to put it in the first chapter,
“tribute.” Economists prefer to call it “seigniorage.” The effect,
though, is that American imperial power is based on a debt that will
never—can never—be repaid. Its national debt has become a promise, not
just to its own people, but to the nations of the entire world, that
everyone knows will not be kept.

At the same time, U.S. policy was to insist that those countries relying
on U.S. treasury bonds as their reserve currency behaved in exactly the
opposite way as they did: observing tight money policies and
scrupulously repaying their debts.

As I’ve already observed, since Nixon’s time, the most significant
overseas buyers of U.S. treasury bonds have tended to be banks in
countries that were effectively under U.S. military occupation. In
Europe, Nixon’s most enthusiastic ally in this respect was West Germany,
which then hosted more than three hundred thousand U.S. troops. In more
recent decades the focus has shifted to Asia, particularly the central
banks of countries like Japan, Taiwan, and South Korea—again, all U.S.
military protectorates. What’s more, the global status of the dollar is
maintained in large part by the fact that it is, again since 1971, the
only currency used to buy and sell petroleum, with any attempt by OPEC
countries to begin trading in any currency stubbornly resisted by OPEC
members Saudi Arabia and Kuwait—also U.S. military protectorates. When
Saddam Hussein made the bold move of singlehandedly switching from the
dollar to the euro in 2000, followed by Iran in 2001, this was quickly
followed by American bombing and military occupation.¹⁴ How much
Hussein’s decision to buck the dollar really weighed into the U.S.
decision to depose him is impossible to know, but no country in a
position to make a similar switch can ignore the possibility. The
result, among policymakers particularly in the global South, is
widespread terror.¹⁵

In all this, the advent of the free-floating dollar marks not a break
with the alliance of warriors and financiers on which capitalism itself
was originally founded, but its ultimate apotheosis. Neither has the
return to virtual money led to a great return to relations of honor and
trust: quite the contrary. By 1971, the change had only just begun. The
American Express card, the first general-purpose credit card, had been
invented a mere thirteen years before, and the modern national
credit-card system had only really come into being with the advent of
Visa and MasterCard in 1968. Debit cards were later, creatures of the
1970s, and the current, largely cashless economy only came into being in
the 1990s. All of these new credit arrangements were mediated not by
interpersonal relations of trust but by profit-seeking corporations, and
one of the earliest and greatest political victories of the U.S.
credit-card industry was the elimination of all legal restrictions on
what they could charge as interest.

If history holds true, an age of virtual money should mean a movement
away from war, empire-building, slavery, and debt peonage (waged or
otherwise), and toward the creation of some sort of overarching
institutions, global in scale, to protect debtors. What we have seen so
far is the opposite. The new global currency is rooted in military power
even more firmly than the old was. Debt peonage continues to be the main
principle of recruiting labor globally: either in the literal sense, in
much of East Asia or Latin America, or in the subjective sense, whereby
most of those working for wages or even salaries feel that they are
doing so primarily to pay off interest-bearing loans. The new
transportation and communications technologies have just made it easier,
making it possible to charge domestics or factory workers thousands of
dollars in transportation fees, and then have them work off the debt in
distant countries where they lack legal protections.¹⁶ Insofar as
overarching grand cosmic institutions have been created that might be
considered in any way parallel to the divine kings of the ancient Middle
East or the religious authorities of the Middle Ages, they have not been
created to protect debtors, but to enforce the rights of creditors. The
International Monetary Fund is only the most dramatic case in point
here. It stands at the pinnacle of a great, emerging global
bureaucracy—the first genuinely global administrative system in human
history, enshrined not only in the United Nations, the World Bank, and
the World Trade Organization, but also the endless host of economic
unions and trade organizations and non-governmental organizations that
work in tandem with them—created largely under U.S. patronage. All of
them operate on the principle that (unless one is the United States
Treasury), “one has to pay one’s debts”—since the specter of default by
any country is assumed to imperil the entire world monetary system,
threatening, in Addison’s colorful image, to turn all the world’s sacks
of (virtual) gold into worthless sticks and paper.

All true. Still, we are speaking of a mere forty years here. But Nixon’s
gambit, what Hudson calls “debt imperialism,” has already come under
considerable strain. The first casualty was precisely the imperial
bureaucracy dedicated to the protection of creditors (other than those
that were owed money by the United States). IMF policies of insisting
that debts be repaid almost exclusively from the pockets of the poor
were met by an equally global movement of social rebellion (the
so-called “anti-globalization movement”—though the name is profoundly
deceptive), followed by outright fiscal rebellion in both East Asia and
Latin America. By 2000, East Asian countries had begun a systematic
boycott of the IMF. In 2002, Argentina committed the ultimate sin: they
defaulted—and got away with it. Subsequent U.S. military adventures were
clearly meant to terrify and overawe, but they do not appear to have
been very successful: partly because, to finance them, the United States
had to turn not just to its military clients, but increasingly, to
China, its chief remaining military rival. After the near-total collapse
of the U.S. financial industry, which despite having been very nearly
granted rights to make up money at will, _still_ managed to end up with
trillions in liabilities it could not pay, bringing the world economy to
a standstill, eliminating even the pretense that debt imperialism
guaranteed stability.

Just to give a sense of how extreme a financial crisis we are talking
about, here are some statistical charts culled from the pages of the St.
Louis Federal Reserve web page.¹⁷

Here is the amount of U.S. debt held overseas:

[]

Meanwhile, private U.S. banks reacted to the crash by abandoning any
pretense that we are dealing with a market economy, shifting all
available assets into the coffers of the Federal Reserve itself, which
purchased U.S. Treasuries:

[]

Allowing them, through yet another piece of arcane magic that none of us
could possibly understand, to end up, after an initial near-$400-billion
dip, with far larger reserves than they had ever had before.

[]

At this point, some U.S. creditors clearly feel they are finally in a
position to demand that their own political agendas be taken into
account.

CHINA WARNS U.S. ABOUT DEBT MONETIZATION

Seemingly everywhere he went on a recent tour of China, Dallas Fed
President Richard Fisher was asked to deliver a message to Federal
Reserve Chairman Ben Bernanke: “stop creating credit out of thin air to
purchase U.S. Treasuries.”¹⁸

Again, it’s never clear whether the money siphoned from Asia to support
the U.S. war machine is better seen as “loans” or as “tribute.” Still,
the sudden advent of China as a major holder of U.S. treasury bonds has
clearly altered the dynamic. Some might question why, if these really
are tribute payments, the United States’ major rival would be buying
treasury bonds to begin with—let alone agreeing to various tacit
monetary arrangements to maintain the value of the dollar, and hence,
the buying power of American consumers.¹⁹ But I think this is a perfect
case in point of why taking a very long-term historical perspective can
be so helpful.

From a longer-term perspective, China’s behavior isn’t puzzling at all.
In fact it’s quite true to form. The unique thing about the Chinese
empire is that it has, since the Han dynasty at least, adopted a
peculiar sort of tribute system whereby, in exchange for recognition of
the Chinese emperor as world-sovereign, they have been willing to shower
their client states with gifts far greater than they receive in return.
The technique seems to have been developed almost as a kind of trick
when dealing with the “northern barbarians” of the steppes, who always
threatened Chinese frontiers: a way to overwhelm them with such luxuries
that they would become complacent, effeminate, and unwarlike. It was
systematized in the “tribute trade” practiced with client states like
Japan, Taiwan, Korea, and various states of Southeast Asia, and for a
brief period from 1405 to 1433, it even extended to a world scale, under
the famous eunuch admiral Zheng He. He led a series of seven expeditions
across the Indian Ocean, his great “treasure fleet”—in dramatic contrast
to the Spanish treasure fleets of a century later—carrying not only
thousands of armed marines, but endless quantities of silks, porcelain,
and other Chinese luxuries to present to those local rulers willing to
recognize the authority of the emperor.²⁰ All this was ostensibly rooted
in an ideology of extraordinary chauvinism (“What could these barbarians
possibly have that we really need, anyway?”), but, applied to China’s
neighbors, it proved extremely wise policy for a wealthy empire
surrounded by much smaller but potentially troublesome kingdoms. In
fact, it was such wise policy that the U.S. government, during the Cold
War, more or less had to adopt it, creating remarkably favorable terms
of trade for those very states—Korea, Japan, Taiwan, certain favored
allies in Southeast Asia—that had been the traditional Chinese
tributaries; in this case, in order to contain China.²¹

Bearing all this in mind, the current picture begins to fall easily back
into place. When the United States was far and away the predominant
world economic power, it could afford to maintain Chinese-style
tributaries. Thus these very states, alone amongst U.S. military
protectorates, were allowed to catapult themselves out of poverty and
into first-world status.²² After 1971, as U.S. economic strength
relative to the rest of the world began to decline, they were gradually
transformed back into a more old-fashioned sort of tributary. Yet
China’s getting in on the game introduced an entirely new element. There
is every reason to believe that, from China’s point of view, this is the
first stage of a very long process of reducing the United States to
something like a traditional Chinese client state. And of course,
Chinese rulers are not, any more than the rulers of any other empire,
motivated primarily by benevolence. There is always a political cost,
and what that headline marked was the first glimmerings of what that
cost might ultimately be.

[]

All that I have said so far merely serves to underline a reality that
has come up constantly over the course of this book: that money has no
essence. It’s not “really” anything; therefore, its nature has always
been and presumably always will be a matter of political contention.
This was certainly true throughout earlier stages of U.S. history,
incidentally—as the endless nineteenth-century battles between goldbugs,
greenbackers, free bankers, bi-metallists and silverites so vividly
attest—or, for that matter, the fact that American voters were so
suspicious of the very idea of central banks that the Federal Reserve
system was only created on the eve of World War I, three centuries after
the Bank of England. Even the monetization of the national debt is, as
I’ve already noted, double-edged. It can be seen—as Jefferson saw it—as
the ultimate pernicious alliance of warriors and financiers; but it also
opened the way to seeing government itself as a moral debtor, of freedom
as something literally owed to the nation. Perhaps no one put it so
eloquently as Martin Luther King Jr., in his “I Have a Dream” speech,
delivered on the steps of the Lincoln Memorial in 1963:

In a sense we’ve come to our nation’s capital to cash a check. When the
architects of our republic wrote the magnificent words of the
Constitution and the Declaration of Independence, they were signing a
promissory note to which every American was to fall heir. This note was
a promise that all men, yes, black men as well as white men, would be
guaranteed the “unalienable Rights” of “Life, Liberty and the pursuit of
Happiness.” It is obvious today that America has defaulted on this
promissory note, insofar as her citizens of color are concerned. Instead
of honoring this sacred obligation, America has given the Negro people a
bad check, a check which has come back marked “insufficient funds.”

One can see the great crash of 2008 in the same light—as the outcome of
years of political tussles between creditors and debtors, rich and poor.
True, on a certain level, it was exactly what it seemed to be: a scam,
an incredibly sophisticated Ponzi scheme designed to collapse in the
full knowledge that the perpetrators would be able to force the victims
to bail them out. On another level it could be seen as the culmination
of a battle over the very definition of money and credit.

By the end of World War II, the specter of an imminent working-class
uprising that had so haunted the ruling classes of Europe and North
America for the previous century had largely disappeared. This was
because class war was suspended by a tacit settlement. To put it
crudely: the white working class of the North Atlantic countries, from
the United States to West Germany, were offered a deal. If they agreed
to set aside any fantasies of fundamentally changing the nature of the
system, then they would be allowed to keep their unions, enjoy a wide
variety a social benefits (pensions, vacations, health care …), and,
perhaps most important, through generously funded and ever-expanding
public educational institutions, know that their children had a
reasonable chance of leaving the working class entirely. One key element
in all this was a tacit guarantee that increases in workers’
productivity would be met by increases in wages: a guarantee that held
good until the late 1970s. Largely as a result, the period saw both
rapidly rising productivity and rapidly rising incomes, laying the basis
for the consumer economy of today.

Economists call this the “Keynesian era” since it was a time in which
John Maynard Keynes’ economic theories, which already formed the basis
of Roosevelt’s New Deal in the United States, were adopted by industrial
democracies pretty much everywhere. With them came Keynes’ rather casual
attitude toward money. The reader will recall that Keynes fully accepted
that banks do, indeed, create money “out of thin air,” and that for this
reason, there was no intrinsic reason that government policy should not
encourage this during economic downturns as a way of stimulating
demand—a position that had long been dear to the heart of debtors and
anathema to creditors.

Keynes himself had in his day been known to make some fairly radical
noises, for instance calling for the complete elimination of that class
of people who lived off other people’s debts—the “the euthanasia of the
rentier,” as he put it—though all he really meant by this was their
elimination through a gradual reduction of interest rates. As in so much
of Keynesianism, this was much less radical than it first appeared.
Actually it was thoroughly in the great tradition of political economy,
hearkening back to Adam Smith’s ideal of a debtless utopia but
especially David Ricardo’s condemnation of landlords as parasites, their
very existence inimical to economic growth. Keynes was simply proceeding
along the same lines, seeing rentiers as a feudal holdover inconsistent
with the true spirit of capital accumulation. Far from a revolution, he
saw it as the best way of avoiding one:

I see, therefore, the rentier aspect of capitalism as a transitional
phase which will disappear when it has done its work. And with the
disappearance of its rentier aspect much else in it besides will suffer
a sea-change. It will be, moreover, a great advantage of the order of
events which I am advocating, that the euthanasia of the rentier, of the
functionless investor, will be nothing sudden … and will need no
revolution.²³

When the Keynesian settlement was finally put into effect, after World
War II, it was offered only to a relatively small slice of the world’s
population. As time went on, more and more people wanted in on the deal.
Almost all of the popular movements of the period from 1945 to 1975,
even perhaps revolutionary movements, could be seen as demands for
inclusion: demands for political equality that assumed equality was
meaningless without some level of economic security. This was true not
only of movements by minority groups in North Atlantic countries who had
first been left out of the deal—such as those for whom Dr. King
spoke—but what were then called “national liberation” movements from
Algeria to Chile, or, finally, and perhaps most dramatically, in the
late 1960s and 1970s, feminism. At some point in the ’70s, things
reached a breaking point. It would appear that capitalism, as a system,
simply cannot extend such a deal to everyone. Quite possibly it wouldn’t
even remain viable if all its workers were free wage laborers; certainly
it will never be able to provide everyone in the world the sort of life
lived by, say, a 1960s auto worker in Michigan or Turin with his own
house, garage, and children in college—and this was true even before so
many of those children began demanding less stultifying lives. The
result might be termed a crisis of inclusion. By the late 1970s, the
existing order was clearly in a state of collapse, plagued
simultaneously by financial chaos, food riots, oil shock, widespread
doomsday prophecies of the end of growth and ecological crisis—all of
which, it turned out, proved to be ways of putting the populace on
notice that all deals were off.

The moment that we start framing the story this way, it’s easy to see
that the next thirty years, the period from roughly 1978 to 2009,
follows nearly the same pattern. Except that the deal, the settlement,
had changed. Certainly, when both Ronald Reagan in the United States and
Margaret Thatcher in the UK launched a systematic attack on the power of
labor unions, as well as on the legacy of Keynes, it was a way of
explicitly declaring that all previous deals were off. Everyone could
now have political rights—even, by the 1990s, most everyone in Latin
America and Africa—but political rights were to become economically
meaningless. The link between productivity and wages was chopped to
bits: productivity rates have continued to rise, but wages have
stagnated or even atrophied:²⁴

[]

This was accompanied, at first, by a return to “monetarism”: the
doctrine that even though money was no longer in any way based in gold,
or in any other commodity, government and central-bank policy should be
primarily concerned with carefully controlling the money supply to
ensure that it acted _as if_ it were a scarce commodity. Even as, at the
same time, the financialization of capital meant that most money being
invested in the marketplace was completely detached from any relation to
production of commerce at all, but had become pure speculation.

All this is not to say that the people of the world were not being
offered something: just that, as I say, the terms had changed. In the
new dispensation, wages would no longer rise, but workers were
encouraged to buy a piece of capitalism. Rather than euthanize the
rentiers, _everyone_ could now become rentiers—effectively, could grab a
chunk of the profits created by their own increasingly dramatic rates of
exploitation. The means were many and familiar. In the United States,
there were 401(k) retirement accounts and an endless variety of other
ways of encouraging ordinary citizens to play the market; but at the
same time, encouraging them to borrow. One of the guiding principles of
Thatcherism and Reaganism alike was that economic reforms would never
gain widespread support unless ordinary working people could at least
aspire to owning their own homes; to this was added, by the 1990s and
2000s, endless mortgage-refinancing schemes that treated houses, whose
value it was assumed would only rise, “like ATMs”—as the popular
catchphrase had it, though it turns out, in retrospect, it was really
more like credit cards. Then there was the proliferation of actual
credit cards, juggled against one another. Here, for many, “buying a
piece of capitalism” slithered undetectably into something
indistinguishable from those familiar scourges of the working poor: the
loan shark and the pawnbroker. It did not help here that in 1980, U.S.
federal usury laws, which had previously limited interest to between 7
and 10 percent, were eliminated by act of Congress. Just as the United
States had managed to largely get rid of the problem of political
corruption by making the bribery of legislators effectively legal (it
was redefined as “lobbying”), so the problem of loan-sharking was
brushed aside by making real interest rates of 25 percent, 50 percent,
or even in some cases (for instance for payday loans) 120 percent
annually, once typical only of organized crime, perfectly legal—and
therefore, enforceable no longer by just hired goons and the sort of
people who place mutilated animals on their victims’ doorsteps, but by
judges, lawyers, bailiffs, and police.²⁵

Any number of names have been coined to describe the new dispensation,
from the “democratization of finance” to the “financialization of
everyday life.”²⁶ Outside the United States, it came to be known as
“neoliberalism.” As an ideology, it meant that not just the market, but
capitalism (I must continually remind the reader that these are not the
same thing) became the organizing principle of almost everything. We
were all to think of ourselves as tiny corporations, organized around
that same relationship of investor and executive: between the cold,
calculating math of the banker, and the warrior who, indebted, has
abandoned any sense of personal honor and turned himself into a kind of
disgraced machine.

In this world, “paying one’s debts” can well come to seem the very
definition of morality, if only because so many people fail to do it.
For instance, it has become a regular feature of many sorts of business
in America that large corporations or even some small businesses, faced
with a debt, will almost automatically simply see what happens if they
do not pay—complying only if reminded, goaded, or presented with some
sort of legal writ. In other words, the principle of honor has thus been
almost completely removed from the marketplace.²⁷ As a result, perhaps,
the whole subject of debt becomes surrounded by a halo of religion.

Actually, one might even speak of a double theology, one for the
creditors, another for the debtors. It is no coincidence that the new
phase of American debt imperialism has also been accompanied by the rise
of the evangelical right, who—in defiance of almost all previously
existing Christian theology—have enthusiastically embraced the doctrine
of “supply-side economics,” that creating money and effectively giving
it to the rich is the most Biblically appropriate way to bring about
national prosperity. Perhaps the most ambitious theologian of the new
creed was George Gilder, whose book _Wealth and Poverty_ became a
best-seller in 1981, at the very dawn of what came to be known as the
Reagan Revolution. Gilder’s argument was that those who felt that money
could not simply be created were mired in an old-fashioned, godless
materialism that did not realize that just as God could create something
out of nothing, His greatest gift to humanity was creativity itself,
which proceeded in exactly the same way. Investors can indeed create
value out of nothing by their willingness to accept the risk entailed in
placing their faith in others’ creativity. Rather than seeing the
imitation of God’s powers of creation _ex nihilo_ as hubris, Gilder
argued that it was precisely what God intended: the creation of money
was a gift, a blessing, a channeling of grace; a promise, yes, but not
one that can be fulfilled, even if the bonds are continually rolled
over, because through faith (“in God we trust” again) their value
becomes reality:

Economists who themselves do not believe in the future of capitalism
will tend to ignore the dynamics of chance and faith that largely will
determine that future. Economists who distrust religion will always fail
to comprehend the modes of worship by which progress is achieved. Chance
is the foundation of change and the vessel of the divine.²⁸

Such effusions inspired evangelists like Pat Robertson to declare
supply-side economics “the first truly divine theory of
money-creation.”²⁹

Meanwhile, for those who could not simply create money, there was a
quite different theological dispensation. “Debt is the new fat,”
Margaret Atwood recently remarked, struck by how much the advertisements
that surround her daily on the bus in her native Toronto had abandoned
their earlier attempts to make riders panic about the creeping terrors
of sexual unattractiveness, but instead turned to providing advice on
how to free oneself from the much more immediate terrors of the repo
man:

There are even debt TV shows, which have a familiar religious-revival
ring to them. There are accounts of shopaholic binges during which you
don’t know what came over you and everything was a blur, with tearful
confessions by those who’ve spent themselves into quivering insomniac
jellies of hopeless indebtedness, and have resorted to lying, cheating,
stealing, and kiting cheques between bank accounts as a result. There
are testimonials by families and loved ones whose lives have been
destroyed by the debtor’s harmful behaviour. There are compassionate but
severe admonitions by the television host, who here plays the part of
priest or revivalist. There’s a moment of seeing the light, followed by
repentance and a promise never to do it again. There’s a penance
imposed—_snip, snip_ go the scissors on the credit cards—followed by a
strict curb-on-spending regimen; and finally, if all goes well, the
debts are paid down, the sins are forgiven, absolution is granted, and a
new day dawns, in which a sadder but more solvent man you rise the
morrow morn.³⁰

Here, risk-taking is in no sense the vessel of the divine. Quite the
opposite. But for the poor it’s always different. In a way, what Atwood
describes might be seen as the perfect inversion of the prophetic voice
of Reverend King’s “I Have a Dream” speech: whereas the first postwar
age was about collective claims on the nation’s debt to its humblest
citizens, the need for those who have made false promises to redeem
themselves, now those same humble citizens are taught to think of
themselves as sinners, seeking some kind of purely individual redemption
to have the right to any sort of moral relations with other human beings
at all.

At the same time, there is something profoundly deceptive going on here.
All these moral dramas start from the assumption that personal debt is
ultimately a matter of self-indulgence, a sin against one’s loved
ones—and therefore, that redemption must necessarily be a matter of
purging and restoration of ascetic self-denial. What’s being shunted out
of sight here is first of all the fact that _everyone_ is now in debt
(U.S. household debt is now estimated at on average 130 percent of
income), and that very little of this debt was accrued by those
determined to find money to bet on the horses or toss away on
fripperies. Insofar as it was borrowed for what economists like to call
discretionary spending, it was mainly to be given to children, to share
with friends, or otherwise to be able to build and maintain relations
with other human beings that are based on _something_ other than sheer
material calculation.³¹ One must go into debt to achieve a life that
goes in any way beyond sheer survival.

Insofar as there is a politics, here, it seems a variation on a theme
seen since the dawn of capitalism. Ultimately, it’s sociality itself
that’s treated as abusive, criminal, demonic. To this, most ordinary
Americans—including Black and Latino Americans, recent immigrants, and
others who were formerly excluded from credit—have responded with a
stubborn insistence on continuing to love one another. They continue to
acquire houses for their families, liquor and sound systems for parties,
gifts for friends; they even insist on continuing to hold weddings and
funerals, regardless of whether this is likely to send them skirting
default or bankruptcy—apparently figuring that, as long as everyone now
has to remake themselves as miniature capitalists, why shouldn’t they be
allowed to create money out of nothing too?

Granted, the role of discretionary spending itself should not be
exaggerated. The chief cause of bankruptcy in America is catastrophic
illness; most borrowing is simply a matter of survival (if one does not
have a car, one cannot work); and increasingly, simply being able to go
to college now almost necessarily means debt peonage for at least half
one’s subsequent working life.³² Still, it is useful to point out that
for real human beings survival is rarely enough. Nor should it be.

By the 1990s, the same tensions had begun to reappear on a global scale,
as the older penchant for loaning money for grandiose, state-directed
projects like the Aswan Dam gave way to an emphasis on microcredit.
Inspired by the success of the Grameen Bank in Bangladesh, the new model
was to identify budding entrepreneurs in poor communities and provide
them with small low-interest loans. “Credit,” the Grameen Bank insisted,
“is a human right.” At the same time the idea was to draw on the “social
capital”—the knowledge, networks, connections, and ingenuity that the
poor people of the world are already using to get by in difficult
circumstances—and convert it into a way of generating even more
(expansive) capital, able to grow at 5 to 20 percent annually.

As anthropologists like Julia Elyachar discovered, the result is
double-edged. As one unusually candid NGO consultant explained to her in
Cairo in 1995:

Money is empowerment. This is empowerment money. You need to be big,
need to think big. Borrowers here can be imprisoned if they don’t pay,
so why be worried?

In America we get ten offers for credit cards in the mail every day. You
pay incredible real interest rates for that credit, something like 40
percent. But the offer is there, so you get the card, and stuff your
wallet full of credit cards. You feel good. It should be the same thing
here, why not help them get into debt? Do I really care what they use
the money for, as long as they pay the loan back?³³

The very incoherence of the quote is telling. The only unifying theme
seems to be: people _ought_ to be in debt. It’s good in itself. It’s
empowering. Anyway, if they end up too empowered, we can also have them
arrested. Debt and power, sin and redemption, become almost
indistinguishable. Freedom is slavery. Slavery is freedom. During her
time in Cairo, Elyachar witnessed young graduates of an NGO training
program go on strike for their right to receive start-up loans. At the
same time, just about everyone involved took it for granted that most of
their fellow students, not to mention everyone else involved in the
program, was corrupt and exploiting the system as their personal cash
cow. Here too, aspects of economic life that had been based on
longstanding relations of trust were, through the intrusion of credit
bureaucracies, becoming effectively criminalized.

Within another decade, the entire project—even in South Asia, where it
began—began to appear suspiciously similar to the U.S. subprime mortgage
crisis: all sorts of unscrupulous lenders piled in, all sorts of
deceptive financial appraisals were passed off to investors, interest
accumulated, borrowers tried to collectively refuse payment, lenders
began sending in goons to seize what little wealth they had (corrugated
tin roofs, for example), and the end result has been an epidemic of
suicides by poor farmers caught in traps from which their families could
never, possibly, escape.³⁴

Just as in the 1945–1975 cycle, this new one culminated in another
crisis of inclusion. It proved no more possible to really turn everyone
in the world into micro-corporations, or to “democratize credit” in such
a way that every family that wanted to could have a house (and if you
think about it, if we have the means to build them, why shouldn’t they?
are there families who don’t “deserve” houses?) than it had been to
allow all wage laborers to have unions, pensions, and health benefits.
Capitalism doesn’t work that way. It is ultimately a system of power and
exclusion, and when it reaches the breaking point, the symptoms recur,
just as they had in the 1970s: food riots, oil shock, financial crisis,
the sudden startled realization that the current course was ecological
unsustainable, attendant apocalyptic scenarios of every sort.

In the wake of the subprime collapse, the U.S. government was forced to
decide who really gets to make money out of nothing: the financiers, or
ordinary citizens. The results were predictable. Financiers were “bailed
out with taxpayer money”—which basically means that their imaginary
money was treated as if it were real. Mortgage holders were,
overwhelmingly, left to the tender mercies of the courts, under a
bankruptcy law that Congress had a year before (rather suspiciously
presciently, one might add) made far more exacting against debtors.
Nothing was altered. All major decisions were postponed. The Great
Conversation that many were expecting never happened.

[]

We live, now, at a genuinely peculiar historical juncture. The credit
crisis has provided us with a vivid illustration of the principle set
out in the last chapter: that capitalism cannot really operate in a
world where people believe it will be around forever.

For most of the last several centuries, most people assumed that credit
could not be generated infinitely because they assumed that the economic
system itself was unlikely to endure forever. The future was likely to
be fundamentally different. Yet somehow, the anticipated revolutions
never happened. The basic structures of financial capitalism largely
remained in place. It’s only now, at the very moment when it’s becoming
increasingly clear that current arrangements are not viable, that we
suddenly have hit the wall in terms of our collective imagination.

There is very good reason to believe that, in a generation or so,
capitalism itself will no longer exist—most obviously, as ecologists
keep reminding us, because it’s impossible to maintain an engine of
perpetual growth forever on a finite planet, and the current form of
capitalism doesn’t seem to be capable of generating the kind of vast
technological breakthroughs and mobilizations that would be required for
us to start finding and colonizing any other planets. Yet faced with the
prospect of capitalism actually ending, the most common reaction—even
from those who call themselves “progressives”—is simply fear. We cling
to what exists because we can no longer imagine an alternative that
wouldn’t be even worse.

How did we get here? My own suspicion is that we are looking at the
final effects of the militarization of American capitalism itself. In
fact, it could well be said that the last thirty years have seen the
construction of a vast bureaucratic apparatus for the creation and
maintenance of hopelessness, a giant machine designed, first and
foremost, to destroy any sense of possible alternative futures. At its
root is a veritable obsession on the part of the rulers of the world—in
response to the upheavals of the 1960s and 1970s—with ensuring that
social movements cannot be seen to grow, flourish, or propose
alternatives; that those who challenge existing power arrangements can
never, under any circumstances, be perceived to win.³⁵ To do so requires
creating a vast apparatus of armies, prisons, police, various forms of
private security firms and police and military intelligence apparatus,
and propaganda engines of every conceivable variety, most of which do
not attack alternatives directly so much as create a pervasive climate
of fear, jingoistic conformity, and simple despair that renders any
thought of changing the world seem an idle fantasy. Maintaining this
apparatus seems even more important, to exponents of the “free market,”
even than maintaining any sort of viable market economy. How else can
one explain what happened in the former Soviet Union? One would
ordinarily have imagined that the end of the Cold War would have led to
the dismantling of the army and the KGB and rebuilding the factories,
but in fact what happened was precisely the other way around. This is
just an extreme example of what has been happening everywhere.
Economically, the apparatus is pure dead weight; all the guns,
surveillance cameras, and propaganda engines are extraordinarily
expensive and really produce nothing, and no doubt it’s yet another
element dragging the entire capitalist system down—along with producing
the illusion of an endless capitalist future that laid the groundwork
for the endless bubbles to begin with. Finance capital became the buying
and selling of chunks of that future, and economic freedom, for most of
us, was reduced to the right to buy a small piece of one’s own permanent
subordination.

In other words, there seems to have been a profound contradiction
between the political imperative of establishing capitalism as the only
possible way to manage anything, and capitalism’s own unacknowledged
need to limit its future horizons lest speculation, predictably, go
haywire. Once it did, and the whole machine imploded, we were left in
the strange situation of not being able to even imagine any other way
that things might be arranged. About the only thing we can imagine is
catastrophe.

[]

To begin to free ourselves, the first thing we need to do is to see
ourselves again as historical actors, as people who can make a
difference in the course of world events. This is exactly what the
militarization of history is trying to take away.

Even if we are at the beginning of the turn of a very long historical
cycle, it’s still largely up to us to determine how it’s going to turn
out. For instance: the last time we shifted from a bullion economy to
one of virtual credit money, at the end of the Axial Age and the
beginning of the Middle Ages, the immediate shift was experienced
largely as a series of great catastrophes. Will it be the same this time
around? Presumably a lot depends on how consciously we set out to ensure
that it won’t be. Will a return to virtual money lead to a move away
from empires and vast standing armies, and to the creation of larger
structures limiting the depredations of creditors? There is good reason
to believe that all these things will happen—and if humanity is to
survive, they will probably have to—but we have no idea how long it will
take, or what, if it does, it would really look like. Capitalism has
transformed the world in many ways that are clearly irreversible. What I
have been trying to do in this book is not so much to propose a vision
of what, precisely, the next age will be like, but to throw open
perspectives, enlarge our sense of possibilities; to begin to ask what
it would mean to start thinking on a breadth and with a grandeur
appropriate to the times.

Let me give an example. I’ve spoken of two cycles of popular movements
since World War II: the first (1945–1978), about demanding the rights of
national citizenship, the second (1978–2008), over access to capitalism
itself. It seems significant here that in the Middle East, in the first
round, those popular movements that most directly challenged the global
status quo tended to be inspired by Marxism; in the second, largely,
some variation on radical Islam. Considering that Islam has always
placed debt at the center of its social doctrines, it’s easy to
understand the appeal. But why not throw things open even more widely?
Over the last five thousand years, there have been at least two
occasions when major, dramatic moral and financial innovations have
emerged from the country we now refer to as Iraq. The first was the
invention of interest-bearing debt, perhaps sometime around 3000 bc; the
second, around 800 ad, the development of the first sophisticated
commercial system that explicitly rejected it. Is it possible that we
are due for another? For most Americans, it will seem an odd question,
since most Americans are used to thinking of Iraqis either as victims or
fanatics (this is how occupying powers always think about the people
they occupy), but it is worthy of note that the most prominent
working-class Islamist movement opposed to the U.S. occupation, the
Sadrists, take their name from one of the founders of contemporary
Islamic economics, Muhammad Baqir al-Sadr. True, much of what has since
come to pass for Islamic economics nowadays has proved decidedly
unimpressive.³⁶ Certainly in no sense does it pose a direct challenge to
capitalism. Still, one has to assume that among popular movements of
this sort, all kinds of interesting conversations about, say, the status
of wage labor must be taking place. Or perhaps it’s naïve to look for
any new breakthrough from the puritanical legacy of the old patriarchal
rebellion. Perhaps it will come out of feminism. Or Islamic feminism. Or
from some as yet completely unexpected quarter. Who’s to say? The one
thing we can be confident of is that history is not over, and that
surprising new ideas will certainly emerge.

[]

The one thing that’s clear is that new ideas won’t emerge without the
jettisoning of much of our accustomed categories of thought—which have
become mostly sheer dead weight, if not intrinsic parts of the very
apparatus of hopelessness—and formulating new ones. This is why I spent
so much of this book talking about the market, but also about the false
choice between state and market that so monopolized political ideology
for the last centuries that it made it difficult to argue about anything
else.

The real history of markets is nothing like what we’re taught to think
it is. The earlier markets that we are able to observe appear to be
spillovers, more or less; side effects of the elaborate administrative
systems of ancient Mesopotamia. They operated primarily on credit. Cash
markets arose through war: again, largely through tax and tribute
policies that were originally designed to provision soldiers, but that
later became useful in all sorts of other ways besides. It was only the
Middle Ages, with their return to credit systems, that saw the first
manifestations of what might be called market populism: the idea that
markets could exist beyond, against, and outside of states, as in those
of the Muslim Indian Ocean—an idea that was later to reappear in China
with the great silver revolts of the fifteenth century. It usually seems
to arise in situations where merchants, for one reason or another, find
themselves making common cause with common people against the
administrative machinery of some great state. But market populism is
always riddled with paradoxes, because it still does depend to some
degree on the existence of that state, and above all, because it
requires founding market relations, ultimately, in something other than
sheer calculation: in the codes of honor, trust, and ultimately
community and mutual aid, more typical of human economies.³⁷ This in
turn means relegating competition to a relatively minor element. In this
light, we can see that what Adam Smith ultimately did, in creating his
debt-free market utopia, was to fuse elements of this unlikely legacy
with that unusually militaristic conception of market behavior
characteristic of the Christian West. In doing so he was surely
prescient. But like all extraordinarily influential writers, he was also
just capturing something of the emerging spirit of his age. What we have
seen ever since is an endless political jockeying back and forth between
two sorts of populism—state and market populism—without anyone noticing
that they were talking about the left and right flanks of exactly the
same animal.

The main reason that we’re unable to notice, I think, is that the legacy
of violence has twisted everything around us. War, conquest, and slavery
not only played the central role in converting human economies into
market ones; there is literally no institution in our society that has
not been to some degree affected. The story told at the end of chapter
7, of how even our conceptions of “freedom” itself came to be
transformed, through the Roman institution of slavery, from the ability
to make friends, to enter into moral relations with others, into
incoherent dreams of absolute power, is only perhaps the most dramatic
instance—and most insidious, because it leaves it very hard to imagine
what meaningful human freedom would even be like.³⁸

If this book has shown anything, it’s exactly how much violence it has
taken, over the course of human history, to bring us to a situation
where it’s even possible to imagine that that’s what life is really
about. Especially when one considers how much of our own daily
experience flies directly in the face of it. As I’ve emphasized,
communism may be the foundation of all human relations—that communism
that, in our own daily life, manifests itself above all in what we call
“love”—but there’s always some sort of system of exchange, and usually,
a system of hierarchy built on top of it. These systems of exchange can
take an endless variety of forms, many perfectly innocuous. Still, what
we are speaking of here is a very particular type of calculating
exchange. As I pointed out in the very beginning: the difference between
owing someone a favor, and owing someone a debt, is that the amount of a
debt can be precisely calculated. Calculation demands equivalence. And
such equivalence—especially when it involves equivalence between human
beings (and it always seems to start that way, because at first, human
beings are always the ultimate values)—only seems to occur when people
have been forcibly severed from their contexts, so much so that they can
be treated as identical to something else, as in: “seven martin skins
and twelve large silver rings for the return of your captured brother,”
“one of your three daughters as surety for this loan of one hundred and
fifty bushels of grain” …

This in turn leads to that great embarrassing fact that haunts all
attempts to represent the market as the highest form of human freedom:
that historically, impersonal, commercial markets originate in theft.
More than anything else, the endless recitation of the myth of barter,
employed much like an incantation, is the economists’ way of fending off
any possibility of having to confront it. But even a moment’s reflection
makes it obvious. Who was the first man to look at a house full of
objects and to immediately assess them only in terms of what he could
trade them in for in the market likely to have been? Surely, he can only
have been a thief. Burglars, marauding soldiers, then perhaps debt
collectors, were the first to see the world this way. It was only in the
hands of soldiers, fresh from looting towns and cities, that chunks of
gold or silver—melted down, in most cases, from some heirloom treasure,
that like the Kashmiri gods, or Aztec breastplates, or Babylonian
women’s ankle bracelets, was both a work of art and a little compendium
of history—could become simple, uniform bits of currency, with no
history, valuable precisely for their lack of history, because they
could be accepted anywhere, no questions asked. And it continues to be
true. Any system that reduces the world to numbers can only be held in
place by weapons, whether these are swords and clubs, or nowadays,
“smart bombs” from unmanned drones.

It can also only operate by continually converting love into debt. I
know my use of the word “love” here is even more provocative, in its own
way, than “communism.” Still, it’s important to hammer the point home.
Just as markets, when allowed to drift entirely free from their violent
origins, invariably begin to grow into something different, into
networks of honor, trust, and mutual connectedness, so does the
maintenance of systems of coercion constantly do the opposite: turn the
products of human cooperation, creativity, devotion, love, and trust
back into numbers once again. In doing so, they make it possible to
imagine a world that is nothing more than a series of cold-blooded
calculations. Even more, by turning human sociality itself into debts,
they transform the very foundations of our being—since what else are we,
ultimately, except the sum of the relations we have with others—into
matters of fault, sin, and crime, and making the world into a place of
iniquity that can only be overcome by completing some great cosmic
transaction that will annihilate everything.

Trying to flip things around by asking, “What do we owe society?” or
even trying to talk about our “debt to nature” or some other
manifestation of the cosmos is a false solution—really just a desperate
scramble to salvage something from the very moral logic that has severed
us from the cosmos to begin with. In fact, it’s if anything the
culmination of the process, the process brought to a point of veritable
dementia, since it’s premised on the assumption that we’re so
absolutely, thoroughly disentangled from the world that we can just toss
all other human beings—or all other living creatures, even, or the
cosmos—in a sack, and then start negotiating with them. It’s hardly
surprising that the end result, historically, is to see our life itself
as something we hold on false premises, a loan long since overdue, and
therefore, to see existence itself as criminal. Insofar as there’s a
real crime here, though, it’s fraud. The very premise is fraudulent.
What could possibly be more presumptuous, or more ridiculous, than to
think it would be possible to negotiate with the grounds of one’s
existence? Of course it isn’t. Insofar as it is indeed possible to come
into any sort of relation with the Absolute, we are confronting a
principle that exists outside of time, or human-scale time, entirely;
therefore, as Medieval theologians correctly recognized, when dealing
with the Absolute, there can be no such thing as debt.


Conclusion:

Perhaps the World Really Does Owe You a Living

Much of the existing economic literature on credit and banking, when it
turns to the kind of larger historical questions treated in this book,
strikes me as little more than special pleading. True, earlier figures
like Adam Smith and David Ricardo were suspicious of credit systems, but
already by the mid–nineteenth century, economists who concerned
themselves with such matters were largely in the business of trying to
demonstrate that, despite appearances, the banking system really was
profoundly democratic. One of the more common arguments was that it was
really a way of funneling resources from the “idle rich,” who, too
unimaginative to do the work of investing their own money, entrusted it
to others, to the “industrious poor”—who had the energy and initiative
to produce new wealth. This justified the existence of banks, but it
also strengthened the hand of populists who demanded easy money
policies, protections for debtors, and so on—since, if times were rough,
why should the industrious poor, the farmers and artisans and small
businessmen, be the ones to suffer?

This gave rise to a second line of argument: that no doubt the rich were
the major creditors in the ancient world, but now the situation has been
reversed. So Ludwig von Mises, writing in the 1930s, around the time
when Keynes was calling for the euthanasia of the rentiers:

Public opinion has always been biased against creditors. It identifies
creditors with the idle rich and debtors with the industrious poor. It
abhors the former as ruthless exploiters and pities the latter as
innocent victims of oppression. It considers government action designed
to curtail the claims of the creditors as measures extremely beneficial
to the immense majority at the expense of a small minority of hardboiled
usurers. It did not notice at all that nineteenth-century capitalist
innovations have wholly changed the composition of the classes of
creditors and debtors. In the days of Solon the Athenian, of ancient
Rome’s agrarian laws, and of the Middle Ages, the creditors were by and
large the rich and the debtors the poor. But in this age of bonds and
debentures, mortgage banks, saving banks, life insurance policies, and
social security benefits, the masses of people with more moderate income
are rather themselves creditors.³⁹

Whereas the rich, with their leveraged companies, are now the principal
debtors. This is the “democratization of finance” argument and it is
nothing new: whenever there are some people calling for the elimination
of the class that lives by collecting interest, there will be others to
object that this will destroy the livelihood of widows and pensioners.

The remarkable thing is that nowadays, defenders of the financial system
are often prepared to use both arguments, appealing to one or the other
according to the rhetorical convenience of the moment. On the one hand,
we have “pundits” like Thomas Friedman, celebrating the fact that
“everyone” now owns a piece of Exxon or Mexico, and that rich debtors
are therefore answerable to the poor. On the other, Niall Ferguson,
author of _The Ascent of Money_, published in 2009, can still announce
as one of his major discoveries that:

Poverty is not the result of rapacious financiers exploiting the poor.
It has much more to do with the lack of financial institutions, with the
absence of banks, not their presence. Only when borrowers have access to
efficient credit networks can they escape from the clutches of loan
sharks, and only when savers can deposit their money in reliable banks
can it be channeled from the idle rich to the industrious poor.⁴⁰

Such is the state of the conversation in the mainstream literature. My
purpose here has been less to engage with it directly than to show how
it has consistently encouraged us to ask the wrong questions. Let’s take
this last paragraph as an illustration. What is Ferguson really saying
here? Poverty is caused by a lack of credit. It’s only if the
industrious poor have access to loans from stable, respectable
banks—rather than to loan sharks, or, presumably, credit card companies,
or payday loan operations, which now charge loan-shark rates—that they
can rise out of poverty. So actually Ferguson is not really concerned
with “poverty” at all, just with the poverty of some people, those who
are industrious and thus do not deserve to be poor. What about the
non-industrious poor? They can go to hell, presumably (quite literally,
according to many branches of Christianity). Or maybe their boats will
be lifted somewhat by the rising tide. Still, that’s clearly incidental.
They’re undeserving, since they’re not industrious, and therefore what
happens to them is really beside the point.

For me, this is exactly what’s so pernicious about the morality of debt:
the way that financial imperatives constantly try to reduce us all,
despite ourselves, to the equivalent of pillagers, eyeing the world
simply for what can be turned into money—and then tell us that it’s only
those who are willing to see the world as pillagers who deserve access
to the resources required to pursue anything in life _other_ than money.
It introduces moral perversions on almost every level. (“Cancel all
student loan debt? But that would be unfair to all those people who
struggled for years to pay back their student loans!” Let me assure the
reader that, as someone who struggled for years to pay back his student
loans and finally did so, this argument makes about as much sense as
saying it would be “unfair” to a mugging victim not to mug their
neighbors too.)

The argument might perhaps make sense if one agreed with the underlying
assumption—that work is by definition virtuous, since the ultimate
measure of humanity’s success as a species is its ability to increase
the overall global output of goods and services by at least 5 percent
per year. The problem is that it is becoming increasingly obvious that
if we continue along these lines much longer, we’re likely to destroy
everything. That giant debt machine that has, for the last five
centuries, reduced increasing proportions of the world’s population to
the moral equivalent of conquistadors would appear to be coming up
against its social and ecological limits. Capitalism’s inveterate
propensity to imagine its own destruction has morphed, in the last
half-century, into scenarios that threaten to bring the rest of the
world down with it. And there’s no reason to believe that this
propensity is ever going to go away. The real question now is how to
ratchet things down a bit, to move toward a society where people can
live more by working less.

I would like, then, to end by putting in a good word for the
non-industrious poor.⁴¹ At least they aren’t hurting anyone. Insofar as
the time they are taking time off from work is being spent with friends
and family, enjoying and caring for those they love, they’re probably
improving the world more than we acknowledge. Maybe we should think of
them as pioneers of a new economic order that would not share our
current one’s penchant for self-destruction.

[]

In this book I have largely avoided making concrete proposals, but let
me end with one. It seems to me that we are long overdue for some kind
of Biblical-style Jubilee: one that would affect both international debt
and consumer debt. It would be salutary not just because it would
relieve so much genuine human suffering, but also because it would be
our way of reminding ourselves that money is not ineffable, that paying
one’s debts is not the essence of morality, that all these things are
human arrangements and that if democracy is to mean anything, it is the
ability to all agree to arrange things in a different way. It is
significant, I think, that since Hammurabi, great imperial states have
invariably resisted this kind of politics. Athens and Rome established
the paradigm: even when confronted with continual debt crises, they
insisted on legislating around the edges, softening the impact,
eliminating obvious abuses like debt slavery, using the spoils of empire
to throw all sorts of extra benefits at their poorer citizens (who,
after all, provided the rank and file of their armies), so as to keep
them more or less afloat—but all in such a way as never to allow a
challenge to the principle of debt itself. The governing class of the
United States seems to have taken a remarkably similar approach:
eliminating the worst abuses (e.g., debtors’ prisons), using the fruits
of empire to provide subsidies, visible and otherwise, to the bulk of
the poulation; in more recent years, manipulating currency rates to
flood the country with cheap goods from China, but never allowing anyone
to question the sacred principle that we must all pay our debts.

At this point, however, the principle has been exposed as a flagrant
lie. As it turns out, we don’t “all” have to pay our debts. Only some of
us do. Nothing would be more important than to wipe the slate clean for
everyone, mark a break with our accustomed morality, and start again.

What is a debt, anyway? A debt is just the perversion of a promise. It
is a promise corrupted by both math and violence. If freedom (real
freedom) is the ability to make friends, then it is also, necessarily,
the ability to make real promises. What sorts of promises might
genuinely free men and women make to one another? At this point we can’t
even say. It’s more a question of how we can get to a place that will
allow us to find out. And the first step in that journey, in turn, is to
accept that in the largest scheme of things, just as no one has the
right to tell us our true value, no one has the right to tell us what we
truly owe.



NOTES


Chapter One

1. With the predictable results that they weren’t actually built to make
it easier for Malagasy people to get around in their own country, but
mainly to get products from the plantations to ports to earn foreign
exchange to pay for building the roads and railways to begin with.

2. The United States, for example, only recognized the Republic of Haiti
in 1860. France doggedly held on to the demand and the Republic of Haiti
was finally forced to pay the equivalent of $21 billion between 1925 and
1946, during most of which time they were under U.S. military
occupation.

3. Hallam 1866 V: 269–70. Since the government did not feel it
appropriate to pay for the upkeep of improvidents, prisoners were
expected to furnish the full cost of their own imprisonment. If they
couldn’t, they simply starved to death.

4. If we consider tax responsibilities to be debts, it’s the
overwhelming majority—and if nothing else the two are closely related,
since over the course history, the need to assemble money for tax
payments has always been the most frequent reason for falling into debt.

5. Finley 1960:63; 1963:24; 1974:80; 1981:106; 1983:108. And these are
only the ones I managed to track down. What he says for Greece and Rome
would appear to be equally true of Japan, India, or China.

6. Galey 1983.

7. Jacques de Vitry, in Le Goff 1990:64.

8. Kyokai, _Record of Miraculous Events in Japan_ (c. 822 ad), Tale 26,
cited in LaFleur 1986:36. Also Nakamura 1996:257–59.

9. ibid:36

10. ibid:37.

11. Simon Johnson, the IMF’s chief economist at the time, put it
concisely in a recent article in _The Atlantic:_ “Regulators,
legislators, and academics almost all assumed that the managers of these
banks knew what they were doing. In retrospect, they didn’t. AIG’s
Financial Products division, for instance, made $2.5 billion in pretax
profits in 2005, largely by selling underpriced insurance on complex,
poorly understood securities. Often described as ‘picking up nickels in
front of a steamroller,’ this strategy is profitable in ordinary years,
and catastrophic in bad ones. As of last fall, AIG had outstanding
insurance on more than $400 billion in securities. To date, the U.S.
government, in an effort to rescue the company, has committed about $180
billion in investments and loans to cover losses that AIG’s
sophisticated risk modeling had said were virtually impossible.”
(Johnson 2010) Johnson of course passes over the possibility that AIG
knew perfectly well what was eventually going to happen, but simply
didn’t care, since they knew the steamroller was going to flatten
someone else.

12. In contrast, England already had a national bankruptcy law in 1571.
An attempt to create a U.S. federal bankruptcy law in 1800 foundered;
there was one briefly in place between 1867 and 1878, aimed to relieve
indebted Civil War veterans, but it was eventually abolished on moral
grounds (see Mann 2002 for a good recent history). Bankruptcy reform in
America is more likely to make the terms harsher than the other way
around, as with the 2005 reforms, which Congress passed, on industry
urgings, just before the great credit crash.

13. The mortgage relief fund set up after the bailout, for example, has
only provided aid to a tiny percentage of claimants, and there has been
no movement toward liberalization of bankruptcy laws that had, in fact,
been made far harsher, under financial industry pressure, in 2005, just
two years before the meltdown.

14. “In Jail for Being in Debt,” Chris Serres & Glenin Howatt,
Minneapolis-St. Paul _Star Tribune_, June 9, 2010,
www.startribune.com/local/95692619.html.

15. “IMF warns second bailout would ‘threaten democracy.’ ” Angela
Jameson and Elizabeth Judge,
business.timesonline.co.uk/tol/business/economics/
article6928147.ece#cid=OTC-RSS&attr=1185799, accessed November 25, 2009


Chapter Two

1. Case, Fair, Gärtner, & Heather 1996:564. Emphasis in the original.

2. op cit.

3. Begg, Fischer, and Dornbuch (2005:384); Maunder, Myers, Wall, and
Miller (1991:310); Parkin & King (1995:65).

4. Stiglitz and Driffill 2000:521. Emphasis again in the original.

5. Aristotle _Politics I_.9.1257

6. Neither is it clear we are really speaking of barter here. Aristotle
used the term _métadosis_, which in his day normally meant “sharing” or
“sharing out.” Since Smith, this has usually been translated “barter,”
but as Karl Polanyi (1957a:93) has long since emphasized, this is
probably inaccurate, unless Aristotle was introducing an entirely new
meaning for the term. Theorists of the origin of Greek money from Laum
(1924) to Seaford (2004) have emphasized that customs of apportioning
goods (e.g., war booty, sacrificial meat), probably did play a key role
in the development of Greek currency. (For a critique of the
Aristotelian tradition, which does assume Aristotle is talking about
barter, see Fahazmanesh 2006.)

7. See Jean-Michel Servet (1994, 2001) for this literature. He also
notes that in the eighteenth century, these accounts suddenly vanished,
to be replaced by endless sightings of “primitive barter” in accounts of
Oceania, Africa, and the Americas.

8. _Wealth of Nations I_.2.1–2. As we’ll see, the line seems to be taken
from much older sources.

9. “If we should enquire into the principle of human mind on which this
disposition of trucking is founded, it is clearly the natural
inclination every one has to persuade. The offering of a shilling, which
to us appears to have so plain and simple meaning, is in reality
offering an argument to persuade one to do so and so as it is for his
interest” _(Lectures on Jurisprudence_, 56) It’s fascinating to note
that the assumption that the notion that exchange is the basis of our
mental functions, and manifests itself both in language (as the exchange
of words) and economics (as the exchange of material goods) goes back to
Smith. Most anthropologists attribute it to Claude Levi-Strauss
(1963:296).

10. The reference to shepherds implies he may be referring to another
part of the world, but elsewhere his examples, for instance of trading
deer for beaver, make it clear he’s thinking of the Northeast woodlands
of North America.

11. Wealth of Nations I.4.2.

12. Wealth of Nations I.4.3.

13. Wealth of Nations I.4.7.

14. The idea of an historical sequence from barter to money to credit
actually seems to appear first in the lectures of an Italian banker
named Bernardo Davanzati (1529–1606; so Waswo 1996); it was developed as
an explicit theory by German economic historians: Bruno Hildebrand
(1864), who posited a prehistoric stage of barter, an ancient stage of
coinage, and then, after some reversion to barter in the Middle Ages, a
modern stage of credit economy. It took canonical form in the work of
his student, Karl Bücher (1907). The sequence has now become universally
accepted common sense, and it reappears in at least tacit form in Marx,
and explicitly in Simmel—again, despite the fact that almost all
subsequent historical research has proved it wrong.

15. Though they did make an impression on many others. Morgan’s work in
particular (1851, 1877, 1881), which emphasized both collective property
rights and the extraordinary importance of women, with women’s councils
largely in control of economic life, so impressed many radical
thinkers—included Marx and Engels—that they became the basis of a kind
of counter-myth, of primitive communism and primitive matriarchy.

16. Anne Chapman (1980) goes if anything further, noting that if pure
barter is to be defined as concerned only with swapping objects, and not
with rearranging relations between people, it’s not clear that it has
ever existed. See also Heady 2005.

17. Levi-Strauss 1943; the translation is from Servet 1982:33.

18. One must imagine the temptation for a sexual variety must be fairly
strong, for young men and women accustomed to spending almost all of
their time with maybe a dozen other people the same age.

19. Berndt 1951:161, cf. Gudeman 2001: 124–25, who provides an analysis
quite similar to my own.

20. Berndt 1951:162.

21. Though as we will note later, it’s not exactly as if international
business deals now never involve music, dancing, food, drugs,
high-priced hookers, or the possibility of violence. For a random
example underlining the last two, see Perkins 2005.

22. Lindholm 1982:116.

23. Servet 2001:20-21 compiles an enormous number of such terms.

24. The point is so obvious that it’s amazing it hasn’t been made more
often. The only classical economist I’m aware of who appears to have
considered the possibility that deferred payments might have made barter
unnecessary is Ralph Hawtrey (1928:2, cited in Einzig 1949:375). All
others simply assume, for no reason, that all exchanges even between
neighbors must have necessarily been what economists like to call “spot
trades.”

25. Bohannan 1955, Barth 1969. cf. Munn 1986, Akin & Robbins 1998. A
good summary of the concept can be found in Gregory 1982:48–49. Gregory
gives one example of a highland Papua New Guinea system with six ranks
of valuables, with live pigs and cassowary birds on the top rank,
“pearl-shell pendants, pork sides, stone axes, cassowary-plume
headdresses, and cowrie-shell headbands” on the second, and so on.
Ordinarily items of items of consumption are confined to the last two,
which consist of luxury foods and staple vegetable foods, respectively.

26. See Servet 1998, Humphries 1985.

27. The classic essay here is Radford 1945.

28. In the 1600s, at least, actually called the old Carolingian
denominations “imaginary money”—everyone persisting in using pounds,
shillings, and pence (or livres, deniers, and sous) for the intervening
800 years, despite the fact that for most of that period, actual coins
were entirely different, or simply didn’t exist (Einaudi 1936).

29. Other examples of barter coexisting with money: Orlove 1986; Barnes
& Barnes 1989.

30. One of the disadvantages of having your book becomes a classic is
that often, people will actually check out such examples. (One of the
advantages is that even if they discover you were mistaken, people will
continue to cite you as an authority anyway.)

31. Innes 1913:378. He goes on to observe: “A moment’s reflection shows
that a staple commodity could not be used as money, because _ex
hypothesi_, the medium of exchange is equally receivable by all members
of the community. Thus if the fishers paid for their supplies in cod,
the traders would equally have to pay for their cod in cod, an obvious
absurdity.”

32. The temples appear to have come first; the palaces, which became
increasingly important over time, took over their system of
administration.

33. Smith was not dreaming about these: the current technical term for
such ingots is “hacksilber” (e.g., Balmuth 2001).

34. Compare Grierson 1977:17 for Egyptian parallels.

35. e.g., Hudson 2002:25, 2004:114

36. Innes 1913:381

37. Peter Spufford’s monumental _Money and Its Use in Medieval Europe_
(1988), which devotes hundreds of pages to gold and silver mining,
mints, and debasement of coinage, makes only two or three mentions of
various sorts of lead or leather token money or minor credit
arrangements by which ordinary people appear to have conducted the
overwhelming majority of their daily transactions. About these, he says,
“we can know next to nothing” (1988:336). An even more dramatic example
is the tally-stick, of which we will hear a good deal: the use of
tallies instead of cash was widespread in the Middle Ages, but there has
been almost no systematic research on the subject, especially outside
England.


Chapter Three

1. Heinsohn & Steiger (1989) even suggest the main reason their fellow
economists haven’t abandoned the story is that anthropologists have not
yet provided an equally compelling alternative. Still, almost all
histories of money continue to begin with fanciful accounts of barter.
Another expedient is to fall back on pure circular definitions: if
“barter” is an economic transaction that does not employ currency, then
any economic transaction that doesn’t involve currency, whatever its
form or content, must be barter. Glyn Davies (1996:11–13) thus describes
even Kwakiutl potlatches as “barter.”

2. We often forget that there was a strong religious element in all
this. Newton himself was in no sense an atheist—in fact, he tried to use
his mathematical abilities to confirm that the world really had been
created, as Bishop Ussher had earlier argued, sometime around October
23, 4004 bc.

3. Smith first uses the phrase “invisible hand” in his _Astronomy_
(III.2), but in _Theory of Moral Sentiments_ IV.1.10, he is explicit
that the invisible hand of the market is that of “Providence.” On
Smith’s theology in general see Nicholls 2003:35–43; on its possible
connection to Medieval Islam, see chapter 10 below.

4. Samuelson 1948:49. See Heinsohn and Steiger 1989 for a critique of
this position; also Ingham 2004.

5. Pigou 1949. Boianovsky 1993 provides a history of the term.

6. “We do not know of any economy in which systematic barter takes place
without the presence of money” (Fayazmanesh 2006:87)—by which he means,
in the sense of money of account.

7. On the government role of fostering the “self-regulating market” in
general, see Polanyi 1949. The standard economic orthodoxy, that if the
government just gets out of the way, a market will naturally emerge,
without any need to create appropriate legal, police, and political
institutions first, was dramatically disproved when free-market
ideologues tried to impose this model in the former Soviet Union in the
1990s.

8. Innes as usual puts it nicely: “The eye has never seen, nor the hand
touched a dollar. All that we can touch or see is a promise to pay or
satisfy a debt due for an amount called a dollar.” In the same way, he
notes, “All our measures are the same. No one has ever seen on ounce or
a foot or an hour. A foot is the distance between two fixed points, but
neither the distance nor the points have a corporeal existence”
(1914:155).

9. Note that this does assume some means of calculating such values—that
is, that money of account of some sort already exists. This might seem
obvious, but remarkable numbers of anthropologists seem to have missed
it.

10. To give some sense of scale, even the relatively circumscribed
commercial city-state of Hong Kong currently has roughly $23.3 billion
in circulation. At roughly 7 million people, that’s more than three
thousand Hong Kong dollars per inhabitant.

11. “State theory may be traced to the early nineteenth century and to
[Adam] Muller’s _New Theory of Money_, which attempted to explain money
value as an expression of communal trust and national will, and
culminated in [G.F.] Knapp’s _State Theory of Money_, first published in
German in 1905. Knapp considered it absurd to attempt to understand
money ‘without the idea of the state.’ Money is not a medium that
emerges from exchange. It is rather a means for accounting for and
settling debts, the most important of which are tax debts” (Ingham
2004:47.) Ingham’s book is an admirable statement of the Chartalist
position, and much of my argument here can be found in much greater
detail in it. However, as will later become apparent, I also part
company with him in certain respects.

12. In French: livres, sous, and deniers.

13. Einaudi 1936. Cipolla (1967) calls it “ghost money.”

14. On tallies: Jenkinson 1911, 1924; Innes 1913; Grandell 1977; Baxter
1989; Stone 2005.

15. Snell (1919:240) notes that kings while touring their domains would
sometimes seize cattle or other goods by right of “preemption” and then
pay in tallies, but it was very difficult to get their representatives
to later pay up: “Subjects were compelled to sell; and the worst of it
was that the King’s purveyors were in the habit of paying not in cash
down, but by means of an exchequer tally, or a beating … In practice it
was found no easy matter to recover under this system, which lent itself
to the worst exactions, and is the subject of numerous complaints in our
early popular poetry.”

16. It is also interesting to note, in this regard, that the Bank of
England still kept their own internal accounts using tally sticks in
Adam Smith’s time, and only abandoned the practice in 1826.

17. See Engels (1978) for a classic study of this sort of problem.

18. Appealing particularly to debtors, who were understandably drawn to
the idea that debt is simply a social arrangement that was in no sense
immutable but created by government policies that could just as easily
be reshuffled—not to mention, who would benefit from inflationary
policies.

19. On the tax, Jacob 1987; for the Betsimisaraka village study, Althabe
1968; for analogous Malagasy case studies, Fremigacci 1976, Rainibe
1982, Schlemmer 1983, Feeley-Harnik 1991. For colonial tax policy in
Africa more generally, Forstater 2005, 2006.

20. So, for instance, Heinsohn & Steiger 1989:188–189.

21. Silver was mined in the Midwest itself, and adopting bi-metallism,
with both gold and silver as potential backing for currency, was seen as
a move in the direction of free credit money, and to allow for the
creation of money by local banks. The late nineteenth century saw the
first creation of modern corporate capitalism in the United States and
it was fervently resisted, with the centralization of the banking system
being a major field of struggle, and mutualism—popular democratic (not
profit oriented) banking and insurance arrangements—one of the main
forms of resistance. The bi-metallists were the more moderate successors
of the Greenbackers, who called for a currency detached from money
altogether, such as Lincoln briefly imposed in wartime (Dighe (2002)
provides a good summary of the historical background.)

22. They only became ruby slippers in the movie.

23. Some have even suggested that Dorothy herself represents Teddy
Roosevelt, since syllabically, “dor-o-thee” is the same as “thee-o-dor”,
only backwards.

24. See Littlefield 1963 and Rockoff 1990 for a detailed argument about
_The Wizard of Oz_ as “monetary allegory.” Baum never admitted that the
book had a political subtext, but even those who doubt he put one in
intentionally (e.g., Parker 1994; cf. Taylor 2005) admit that such a
meaning was quickly attributed to it—there were already explicit
political references in the stage version of 1902, only two years after
the book’s original publication.

25. Reagan could as easily be argued to be a practitioner of extreme
military Keynesianism, using the Pentagon’s budget to create jobs and
drive economic growth; anyway, monetary orthodoxy was abandoned very
quickly even rhetorically among those actually managing the system.

26. See Ingham 2000.

27. Keynes 1930: 4–5

28. The argument is referred to as the paradox of banking. To provide an
extremely simplified version: say there was only one bank. Even if that
bank were to make you a loan of a trillion dollars based on no assets of
its own of any kind whatever, you would ultimately end up putting the
money back into the bank again, which would mean that the bank would now
have one trillion in debt, and one trillion in working assets, perfectly
balancing each other out. If the bank was charging you more for the loan
than it was giving you in interest (which banks always do), it would
also make a profit. The same would be true if you spent the
trillion—whoever ended up with the money would still have to put it into
the bank again. Keynes pointed out the existence of multiple banks
didn’t really change anything, provided bankers coordinated their
efforts, which, in fact, they always do.

29. I might note that this assumption echoes the logic of neoclassical
economic theory, which assumes that all basic institutional arrangements
that define the context of economic activity were agreed to by all
parties at some imaginary point in the past, and that since then,
everything has and will always continue to exist in equilibrium.
Interestingly, Keynes explicitly rejected this assumption in his theory
of money (Davidson 2006). Contemporary social contract theorists
incidentally make a similar argument, that there’s no need to assume
that this actually happened; it’s enough to say it could have and act as
if it did.

30. Aglietta is a Marxist, and one of the founders of the “Regulation
School,” Orléans, an adherent of the “economics of convention” favored
by Thevenot and Boltanski. Primordial debt theory has been mainly
developed by a group of researchers surrounding economists Michel
Aglietta and André Orléans, first in _La Violence de la Monnaie_ (1992),
which employed a psychoanalytic, Giradian framework, and then in a
volume called _Sovereignty, Legitimacy and Money_ (1995) and a
collection called _Sovereign Money_ (Aglietta, Andreau, etc. 1998),
co-edited by eleven different scholars. The latter two volumes abandon
the Girardian framework for a Dumontian one. In recent years the main
exponent of this position has been another Regulationist, Bruno Théret
(1992, 1995, 2007, 2008). Unfortunately almost none of this material has
ever been translated into English, though a summary of many of
Aglietta’s contributions can be found in Grahl (2000).

31. For instance, Randall Wray (1990, 1998, 2000) and Stephanie Bell
(1999, 2000) in the United States, or Geoffrey Ingham (1996, 1999, 2004)
in the United Kingdom. Michael Hudson and others in the ISCANEE group
have taken up elements of the idea, but have never to my knowledge fully
embraced it.

32. *Rna. Malamoud (1983:22) notes that already in the earliest text it
had both the meaning of “goods received in return for the promise to
hand back either the goods themselves or something of at least
equivalent value”, as well as “crime” or “fault.” So also Olivelle
1993:48, who notes *rna “can mean fault, crime, or guilt—often at the
same time.” It is not however the same as the word for “duty.” For a
typical example of early prayers for release from debt, see Atharva Veda
Book 6 Hymns 117, 118, and 119.

33. _Satapatha Brahmana_ 3.6.2.16

34. As Sylvain Lévi, Marcel Mauss’s mentor, remarked, if one takes the
Brahmanic doctrine seriously, “the only authentic sacrifice would be
suicide” (1898:133; so also A.B. Keith 1925:459). But of course no one
actually took things that far.

35. More precisely, it offered the sacrificer a way to break out of a
world in which everything, including himself, was a creation of the
gods, to fashion an immortal, divine body, ascend into heaven, and thus
be “born into a world he made himself” _(Satapatha Brahmana_ VI:2.2.27)
where all debts could be repaid, buy back his abandoned mortal body from
the gods (see, i.e., Lévi 1898:130–32, Malamoud 1983:31–32). This is
certainly one of the most ambitious claims ever made for the efficacy of
sacrifice, but some priests in China around that time were making
similar claims (Puett 2002).

36. Translated “saints” in the text with which I began the chapter, but
since it refers to the authors of the sacred texts, the usage seems
appropriate.

37. I am fusing here two slightly different versions: one in _Tattiriya
Sarphita_ (6.3.10.5), which says that all Brahmans are born _with_ a
debt, but only lists gods, Fathers, and sages, leaving out the duty of
hospitality, and the other in _Satapatha Brahmana_ (1.7.2.1–6) that says
all men are born _as_ a debt, listing all four—but which seems really to
be referring to males of twice-born castes. For a full discussion: see
Malamoud 1983 and Olivelle 1993:46-55, also Malamoud 1998.

38. Théret 1999:60–61

39. “The ultimate discharge of this fundamental debt is sacrifice of the
living to appease and express gratitude to the ancestors and deities of
the cosmos” (Ingham 2004:90).

40. op cit. He cites Hudson 2002:102–3, on the terms for “guilt” or
“sin,” but as we’ll see the point goes back to Grierson (1977:22–23).

41. Laum 1924. His argument about the origin of money in Greece in
temple distributions is intriguing and has found contemporary exponents
in Seaford (2004) and partly in Hudson (e.g., 2003) but is really a
theory of the origin of coinage.

42. More than I would ever dream of trying to cite. There are two
standard survey works on “primitive money,” by Quiggin and by Einzig,
both of which, curiously, came out in 1949. Both are outdated in their
analysis but contain a great deal of useful material.

43. English “pay” is from French _payer_, which in turn is derived from
Latin _pacare_, “to pacify,” “to make peace with.” _Pacare_ in turn is
related to _pacere_, “to come to terms with an injured party” (Grierson
1977:21).

44. Grierson 1977:20.

45. In fact, as Grierson notes, the authors often seemed to be
intentionally making fun of themselves, as in the Irish text that
specifies that one can demand compensation for a bee-sting, but only if
one first deducts the cost of the dead bee (Grierson 1977:26).

46. We have plenty of myths and hymns from ancient Mesopotamia, too, for
instance—but most were discovered in the ruins of ancient libraries that
were also full of records of court trials, business contracts, and
personal correspondence. In the case of the oldest Sanskrit texts,
religious literature is all we have. What’s more, since these were texts
passed on verbatim from teacher to student for thousands of years, we
can’t even say with any precision when and where they were written.

47. Interest-bearing loans certainly existed in Mesopotamia, but they
only appear in Egypt in Hellenistic times, and in the Germanic world
even later. The text speaks of “the tribute that I owe to Yama,” which
_could_ refer to “interest,” but the comprehensive review of early
Indian legal sources in Kane’s _History of Dharmasastra_ (1973
III:411–461) comes to no clear conclusion on when interest first
appeared; Kosambi (1994:148) estimates that it might have appeared in
500 bc but admits this is a guess.

48. Mesopotamia, Egypt, and China come most immediately to mind. The
notion that life is a loan from the gods does occur elsewhere: it seems
to crop up spontaneously in ancient Greece, around the same time as
money and interest-bearing loans do. “We are all owed as a debt to
death,” wrote the poet Simonides, around 500 bc. “The sentiment that
life was a loan to be repaid by death [became] an almost proverbial
saying” (Millet 1991a:6). No Greek author to my knowledge connects this
explicitly to sacrifice, though one could conceivably argue that Plato’s
character Cephalus does so implicitly in one passage of the _Republic_
(331d).

49. Hubert and Mauss (1964) provide a good survey of the ancient
literature in this regard.

50. Finley 1981:90

51. This was something of a legalistic distinction; what it really meant
in practice was that funds levied in Persia were technically considered
“gifts,” but it shows the power of the principle (Briant 2006:398–99)

52. Pharaonic Egypt and imperial China certainly did levy direct taxes,
in money, kind, or labor, in different proportions at different times.
In early India, the _gana-sangha_ republics do not seem to have demanded
taxes of their citizens, but the monarchies that ultimately replaced
them did (Rhys Davies 1922:198–200). My point is that taxes were not
inevitable and were often seen as marks of conquest.

53. I am following what I believe is still the predominant view; though
at least in some places Palaces were in charge of pretty much everything
from quite early on, and Temples quite subordinate (see Maekawa
1973–1974). There is lively debate about this, as with the balance of
temple, palace, clan, and individual holdings in different times and
places, but I have avoided going into such debates, however interesting,
unless they have a direct bearing on my argument.

54. I am following Hudson’s interpretation (2002), though others—e.g.
Steinkeller 1981, Mieroop 2002:64—suggest that interest may have instead
originated in rental fees.

55. For a good summary, Hudson 1993, 2002. The meaning of _amargi_ is
first noted in Falkenstein (1954), see also Kramer (1963:79, Lemche
(1979:16n34).

56. In ancient Egypt there were no loans at interest, and we know
relatively little about other early empires, so we don’t know how
unusual this was. But the Chinese evidence is at the very least
suggestive. Chinese theories of money were always resolutely Chartalist;
and in the standard story about the origins of coinage, since at least
Han times, the mythic founder of the Shang dynasty, upset to see so many
families having to sell their children during famines, created coins so
that the government could redeem the children and return them to their
families (see chapter 8, below).

57. What is sacrifice, after all, but a recognition that an act such as
taking an animal’s life, even if necessary for our sustenance, is not an
act to be taken lightly, but with an attitude of humility before the
cosmos?

58. Unless the recipient is owed money by the creditor, allowing
everyone to cancel their debts in a circle. This might seem an
extraneous point, but the circular cancellation of debts in this way
seems to have been quite a common practice in much of history: see, for
instance, the description of “reckonings” in chapter 11 below.

59. I am not ascribing this position to the authors of the Brahmanas
necessarily; only pursuing what I take to be the internal logic of the
argument, in dialogue with its authors.

60. Malamoud 1983:32.

61. Comte 1891:295

62. In France, particularly by political thinkers like Alfred Fouillé
and Léon Bourgeois. The latter, leader of the Radical Party in the
1890s, made the notion of social debt one of the conceptual foundations
for what his philosophy of “solidarism”—a form of radical republicanism
that, he argued, could provide a kind of middle-ground alternative to
both revolutionary Marxism and free-market liberalism. The idea was to
overcome the violence of class struggle by appealing to a new moral
system based on the notion of a shared debt to society—of which the
state, of course, was merely the administrator and representative
(Hayward 1959, Donzelot 1994, Jobert 2003). Emile Durkheim too was a
Solidarist politically.

63. As a slogan, the expression is generally attributed to Charles Gide,
the late-nineteenth-century French cooperativist, but became common in
Solidarist circles. It became an important principle in Turkish
socialist circles at the time (Aydan 2003), and, I have heard, though I
have not been able to verify, in Latin America.


Chapter Four

1. Hart 1986:638.

2. The technical term for this is “fiduciarity,” the degree to which its
value is based not on metal content but public trust. For a good
discussion of the fiduciarity of ancient currencies, see Seaford
2004:139–146. Almost all metal coins were overvalued. If the government
set the value below that of the metal, of course, people would simply
melt them down; if it’s set at exactly the metal value, the results are
usually deflationary. As Bruno Théret (2008:826–27) points out, although
Locke’s reforms, which set the value of the British sovereign at exactly
its weight in silver, were ideologically motivated, they had disastrous
economic effects. Obviously, if coinage is debased or the value
otherwise set too high in relation to the metal content, this can
produce inflation. But the traditional view, where, say, the Roman
currency was ultimately destroyed by debasement, is clearly false, since
it took centuries for inflation to occur (Ingham 2004:102–3).

3. Einzig 1949:104; similar gambling chits, in this case made of bamboo,
were used in Chinese towns in the Gobi desert (ibid: 108).

4. On English token money, see Williamson 1889; Whiting 1971; Mathias
1979b.

5. On cacao, Millon 1955; on Ethopian salt money, Einzig 1949:123–26.
Both Karl Marx (1857:223, 1867:182) and Max Weber (1978:673–74) were of
the opinion that money had emerged from barter between societies, not
within them. Karl Bücher (1904), and arguably Karl Polanyi (1968), held
something close to this position, at least insofar as they insisted that
modern money emerged from _external_ exchange. Inevitably there must
have been some sort of mutually reinforcing process between currencies
of trade and the local accounting system. Insofar as we can talk about
the “invention” of money in its modern sense, presumably this would be
the place to look, though in places like Mesopotamia this must have
happened long before the use of writing, and hence the history is
effectively lost to us.

6. Einzig (1949:266), citing Kulischer (1926:92) and Ilwof (1882:36).

7. _Genealogy of Morals_, 2.8.

8. As I remarked earlier, both Adam Smith and Nietzsche thus anticipate
Levi-Strauss’s famous argument that language is the “exchange of words.”
The remarkable thing here is that so many have managed to convince
themselves that in all this, Nietzsche is providing a radical
alternative to bourgeois ideology, even to the logic of exchange.
Deleuze and Guattari, most embarrassingly, insist that “the great book
of modern ethnology is not so much Mauss’ _The Gift_ as Nietzsche’s _On
the Genealogy of Morals_. At least it should be,” since, they say,
Nietzsche succeeds in interpreting “primitive society” in terms of debt,
where Mauss still hesitates to break with the logic of exchange
(1972:224–25). On their inspiration, Sarthou-Lajus (1997) has written
philosophy of debt as an alternative to bourgeois ideologies of
exchange, that, she claims, assume the prior autonomy of the person. Of
course what Nietzsche proposes is not an alternative at all. It’s
another aspect of the same thing. All this is a vivid reminder of how
easy it is to mistake radicalized forms of our own bourgeois tradition
as alternatives to it (Bataille [1993], who Deleuze and Guattari praise
as another alternative to Mauss in the same passage, is another
notorious example of this sort of thing).

9. _Genealogy of Morals_ 2.5.

10. Nietzsche had clearly been reading too much Shakespeare. There is no
record of the mutilation of debtors in the ancient world; there was a
good deal of mutilation of slaves, but they were by definition people
who could not be in debt. Mutilation for debt is occasionally attested
to in the Medieval period, but as we’ll see, Jews tended to be the
victims, since they were largely without rights, and certainly not the
perpetrators. Shakespeare turned the story around.

11. _Genealogy of Morals_ 2.19.

12. _Genealogy of Morals_ 2.21.

13. Freuchen 1961:154. It’s not clear what language this was said in,
considering that Inuit did not actually have an institution of slavery.
It’s also interesting because the passage would not make sense unless
there were _some_ contexts in which gift exchange _did_ operate, and
therefore, debts accrued. What the hunter is emphasizing is that it was
felt important that this logic did not extend to the basic means of
human existence, such as food.

14. To take an example, the Ganges Valley in the Buddha’s time was full
of arguments about the relative merits of monarchical and democratic
constitutions. Gautama, though the son of a king, sided with the
democrats, and many of the decision-making techniques used in democratic
assemblies of the time remain preserved in the organization of Buddhist
monasteries (Muhlenberger & Paine 1997.) Were it not for this we would
not know anything about them, or even be entirely sure that such
democratic polities existed.

15. For instance, buying back one’s ancestral land (Leviticus 25:25, 26)
or anything one had given to the Temple (Leviticus 27).

16. Here too, in the case of complete insolvency, the debtor might lose
his own freedom as well. See Houston (2006) for a good survey of the
contemporary literature on economic conditions in the time of the
prophets. I here follow a synthesis of his and Michael Hudson’s (1993)
reconstruction.

17. See for instance, Amos 2.6, 8.2, and Isaiah 58.

18. Nehemiah 5:3–7.

19. There continues to be intense scholarly debate about whether these
laws were in fact invented by Nehemiah and his priestly allies
(especially Ezra), and whether they were ever actually enforced in any
period: see Alexander 1938; North 1954; Finkelstein 1961, 1965;
Westbrook 1971; Lemke 1976, 1979; Hudson 1993; Houston 1996 for a few
examples. At first there were similar debates about whether Mesopotamian
“clean states” were actually enforced, until overwhelming evidence was
produced that they were. The bulk of the evidence now indicates that the
laws in Deuteronomy were enforced as well, though we can never know for
certain how effectively.

20. “Every seventh year you shall make a cancellation. The cancellation
shall be as follows: every creditor is to release the debts that he has
owing to him by his neighbor” (Deuteronomy 15:1–3). Those held in debt
bondage were also freed. Every 49 (or in some readings 50) years came
the Jubilee, when all family land was to be returned to its original
owners, and even family members who had been sold as slaves set free
(Leviticus 25:9).

21. Unsurprisingly, since the need to borrow was most often sparked by
the need to pay taxes imposed by foreign conquerors.

22. Hudson notes in Babylonian, clean slates were “called hubullum
(debt) masa’um (to wash), literally ‘a washing away of the debt
[records],’ that is, a dissolving of the clay tablets on which financial
obligations were inscribed” (1993:19).

23. Matthew 18: 23–34.

24. To give a sense of the figures involved, ten thousand talents in
gold is roughly equivalent to the entire Roman tax receipts from their
provinces in what’s now the Middle East. A hundred denarii is 1/60 of
one talent, and therefore worth 600,000 times less.

25. _Opheilēma_ in the Greek original, which meant “that which is owed,”
“financial debts,” and by extension, “sin.” This was apparently used to
translate the Aramaic _hoyween_, which also meant both “debt” and, by
extension, “sin.” The English here (as in all later Bible citations)
follows the King James version, which in this case is itself based on a
1381 translation of the Lord’s prayer by John Wycliffe. Most readers
will probably be more familiar with 1559 Book of Common Prayer version
that substitutes “And forgive us our trespasses, as we forgive them that
trespass against us.” However, the original is quite explicitly “debts.”

26. Changing these to “spiritual debts” doesn’t really change the
problem.

27. The prospect of sexual abuse in these situations clearly weighed
heavily on the popular imagination. “Some of our daughters are brought
unto bondage already” protested the Israelites to Nehemiah. Technically,
daughters taken in debt bondage were not, if virgins, expected to be
sexually available to creditors who did not wish to marry them or marry
them to their sons (Exodus 21:7–9; Wright 2009:130–33) though chattel
slaves were sexually available (see Hezser 2003), and often the roles
blurred in practice; even where laws theoretically protected them,
fathers must often have had little means to protect them or cause those
laws to be enforced. The Roman historian Livy’s account of the abolition
of debt bondage in Rome in 326 bc, for instance, featured a handsome
young man named Caius Publilius placed in bondage for a debt he’d
inherited from his father, and who was savagely beaten for refusing the
sexual advances of his creditor (Livy 8.28). When he appeared on the
streets and announced what had happened to him, crowds gathered and
marched on the Senate to demand that they abolish the institution.

28. Particularly if the slaves were foreigners captured in war. As we’ll
see, the common belief that there were no moral objections to slavery in
the ancient world is false. There were plenty. But aside from certain
radicals such as the Essenes, the institution was accepted as an
unfortunate necessity.

29. Hudson (2002:37) cites the Greek historian Diodorus Siculus (i.79)
who attributes this motive to the Egyptian pharaoh Bakenranef, though he
too emphasizes that military considerations were not the only ones, but
that cancellations reflected broader feelings about justice.

30. Oppenheim 1964:88. Oppenheim suggests that interest-free loans were
more common in the Levant, and that in Mesopotamia social equals were
more likely to charge each other interest but on easier terms, citing an
Old Assyrian merchant who speaks of “the rate one brother charges
another” (op cit). In ancient Greece, friendly loans between social
equals were known as _eranos_ loans, usually of sums raised by an
impromptu mutual-aid society and not involving the payment of interest
(Jones 1956:171–73; Vondeling 1961; Finley 1981:67–68; Millet
1991:153–155). Aristocrats often made such loans to one another, but so
did groups of slaves trying to pool money to buy back their freedom
(Harrill 1998:167). This tendency, for mutual aid to be most marked at
the very top and very bottom of the social scale is a consistent pattern
to this day.

31. Hence the constant invocation of the phrase “your brother,”
particularly in Deuteronomy, e.g., “you shall not lend at interest to
your brother” (23:20).


Chapter Five

1. As we’ll see in chapter seven, Plato begins _The Republic_ in exactly
the same way.

2. For a polite but devastating assessment, see Kahneman 2003.

3. Homans 1958, also Blau 1964; Levi-Strauss 1963:296. In anthropology,
the first to propose reciprocity as a universal principle was Richard
Thurnwald (1916), but it was made famous by Malinowski (1922).

4. One reason no known law code has ever been known to enforce the
principle; the penalty was always there to be commuted to something
else.

5. Atwood (2008:1). The author then proceeds to explore the nature of
our sense of economic morality by comparing the behavior of caged apes
with middle-class Canadian children to argue that all human relations
are indeed either exchange or forcible appropriation (ibid:49). Despite
the brilliance of many of its arguments, the result is a rather sad
testimony to how difficult it is for the scions of the North Atlantic
professional classes not to see their own characteristic ways of
imagining the world as simple human nature.

6. Seton’s father, a failed shipping magnate turned accountant, was,
Seton later wrote, so cold and abusive that his son spent much of his
youth in the woods trying to avoid him; after paying the debt—which
incidentally came to $537.50, a tidy but not insurmountable sum in
1881—he changed his name and spent much of the rest of his life trying
to develop more healthy child-rearing techniques.

7. Rev. W.H. Beatley in Levy-Bruhl 1923:411

8. Rev. Fr. Bulléon, in Levy-Bruhl 1923:425

9. This phrase was not coined by Marx, incidentally, but was apparently
a slogan current in the early French workers’ movement, first appearing
in print in the work of socialist Louis Blanc in 1839. Marx only took up
the phrase in his _Critique of the Gotha Programme_ in 1875, and even
then used it in a rather idiosyncratic way: for the principle he
imagined could apply on the level of society as a whole once technology
had reached the point of guaranteeing absolute material abundance. For
Marx, “communism” was both the political movement aiming to bring about
such a future society, and that society itself. I am drawing here more
on the alternate strain of revolutionary theory, evident most famously
perhaps in Peter Kropotkin’s _Mutual Aid_ (1902).

10. At least, unless there is some specific reason not to—for instance,
a hierarchical division of labor that says some people get coffee and
others do not.

11. What this means of course is that command economies—putting
government bureaucracies in charge of coordinating every aspect of the
production and distribution of goods and services within a given
national territory—tends to be much less efficient than other available
alternatives. This is obviously true, though if it “just doesn’t work”
at all, it’s hard to imagine how states like the Soviet Union could have
existed, let alone maintain themselves as world powers, in the first
place.

12. Evans-Pritchard 1940:182

13. Similarly, a middle-class pedestrian would be unlikely to ask a gang
member for directions, and might even run in fear if one approached him
to ask for the time, but this is again because of an assumption of a
tacit state of war existing between them.

14. Ibid, p. 183.

15. Richards 1939:197. Max Gluckman, remarking on such customs,
concludes that insofar as it is possible to speak of “primitive
communism,” it exists in consumption, rather than production, which
tends to be much more individually organized (1971:52).

16. A typical example: “if a cabin of hungry people meets another whose
provisions are not entirely exhausted, the latter share with the
newcomers the little which remains to them without waiting to be asked,
although they expose themselves thereby to the same danger of perishing
as those whom they help …” Lafitau 1974 Volume II:61.

17. Jesuit Relations (1635) 8:127, cited in Delâge 1993:54.

18. This is a common arrangement in certain parts of the world
(particularly the Andes, Amazonia, insular Southeast Asia, and
Melanesia), and invariably there is some rule whereby each half is
dependent on the other for something considered essential to human life.
One can only marry someone from the other side of the village, or maybe
one can only eat pigs raised on the other side, or perhaps one side
needs people from the other side to sponsor the rituals that initiate
its male children into manhood.

19. As I have suggested elsewhere, Graeber 2001:159–60; cf. Mauss 1947:
104–5.

20. I’m side-stepping the whole question of one-sided examples discussed
in Graeber 2001:218.

21. Marshall Sahlins (1972) coined the phrase “generalized reciprocity”
to describe this sort of relation, on the principle that if everything
circulates freely, eventually, all accounts will balance out. Marcel
Mauss was already making such an argument in lectures back in the 1930s
(1947), but he also recognized the problems: while this might be true of
Iroquois moieties, some relationships never balance out—for instance,
between mother and child. His solution, “alternating reciprocity”—that
we repay our parents by having children ourselves—is clearly drawn from
his study of the Vedas, but it ultimately demonstrates that if one has
already decided that all relations are based on reciprocity, one can
always define the term so broadly as to make it true.

22. _Hostis:_ see Benveniste 1972:72. The Latin terminology concerning
hospitality emphasizes the absolute mastery of the house by its (male)
owner as the precondition of any act of hospitality; Derrida (2000,
2001) argues that this points to a central contradiction in the very
concept of hospitality, since it implies an already-existing absolute
dominium or power over others, the kind that might be seen as taking its
most exploitative form in Lot’s offering his own daughters up to a crowd
of Sodomites to dissuade them from raping his houseguests. However, this
same principle of hospitality can be equally well documented in
societies—such as the Iroquois—that were anything but patriarchal.

23. Evans-Pritchard 1940:154, 158.

24. This is of course one reason why the very rich like to associate
mainly with one another.

25. In a less hostile vein one can speak of an exchange of prisoners,
notes, or compliments.

26. A good source on haggling: Uchendo 1967.

27. Bohannan 1964:47.

28. Not even a real business deal, since these may often involve a great
deal of collective wining and dining and giving of presents. More the
sort of imaginary business deal that appears in economics textbooks.

29. One need only glance at the vast anthropological literature on
“competitive feasting”: e.g., Valeri 2001.

30. Bourdieu 1965 is the key text, but he repeats the main points in
Bourdieu 1990:98–101.

31. Onvlee 1980:204.

32. Petronius 51; Pliny _Natural History_ 36.195; Dio 57.21.5–7.

33. “This king is of all men the most addicted to the making of gifts
and the shedding of blood. His gate is never without some poor man
enriched or some living man executed.”

34. Or even the very rich. Nelson Rockefeller, for example, used to
pride himself on never carrying a wallet. He didn’t need one. Every now
and then when he was working late and wanted cigarettes, he would borrow
some from the security people at the desk at Rockefeller Center, who
would then be able to boast that they had lent a Rockefeller money and
would rarely ask for it back. In contrast, “the sixteenth-century
Portuguese monarch Dom Manuel, newly rich from the Indies trade, adopted
the title ‘Lord of the Conquest, Navigation, and Commerce of Ethiopia,
Arabia, Persia, and India.’ Others called him the “grocer king.” (Ho
2004:227).

35. See Graeber 2001:175–76.

36. Even between strangers it’s a bit unusual: as Servet (1981, 1982)
has emphasized, most “primitive trade” takes place through trade
partnership and specialized regional middlemen.

37. I frame things this way because I am mainly interested here in
economics. If we were thinking simply of human relations, I suppose one
might say that at one extreme is killing, and at the other, giving
birth.

38. In fact, it seems essential to the nature of charity that, like a
gifts to a king, it can never lead to reciprocity. Even if it turns out
that the pathetic-looking beggar is really a god wandering the earth in
mortal form, or Harun al-Rashid, your reward will be entirely
disproportionate. Or consider all those stories about drunken
millionaires on a binge who, when they got their life back together,
hand out fancy cars or houses to their earlier benefactors. It’s easier
to imagine a panhandler giving you a fortune than returning an exact
equivalent to the dollar that you gave him.

39. Xenophon _Cyropedia_ VIII.6, Herodotus 3.8.9; see Briant
2006:193–194, 394–404, who acknowledges that something broadly along
these lines probably did take place, with a more impromptu gift system
under Cyrus and Cambyses being systematized under Darius.

40. Marc Bloch (1961:114–15), who adds “every act, especially if it was
repeated three or four times, was likely to be transformed into a
precedent—even if in the first instance it had been exceptional or even
frankly unlawful.”

41. The approach is often identified with British anthropologist A.M.
Hocart (1936). The important thing is that this does not necessarily
mean that these became their main or exclusive occupations: most of the
time, such people remained simple farmers like everybody else. Yet what
they did for the king, or later, on ritual occasions, for the community,
was seen as defining their essential nature, their identity within the
whole.

42. In fact, we may become indignant at her for an act of stinginess we
would never even consider stingy in anyone else—especially, ourselves.

43. A version has been published as: Sarah Stillman, “The missing white
girl syndrome: disappeared women and media activism” (Stillman, 2007):
publications.oxfam.org.uk/oxfam/display.asp?K=002J1246&sf_01=cat_class&st_01=620&sort=SORT_DATE/
d&m=84&dc=719

44. Karatani (2003:203–205) makes this point compellingly. The Kwakiutl
and other First Nations of the Northwest Coast are something of an
intermediary case—aristocratic, but at least in the period we know
about, using non-coercive means to gather resources (though Codere
1950.)

45. Georges Duby (1980) provides the definitive history of this concept,
which goes back to much older Indo-European ideas.

46. For a typical example of imaginary reciprocity between father and
son, see Oliver 1955:230. Anthropological theory buffs will notice that
I am here endorsing Edmund Leach’s (1961) position on the “circulating
connubium” problem. He later applied the same argument to the famous
“kula chain” (1983).

47. Actually, there are hierarchical relations that are explicitly
self-subverting: the one between teacher and student, for example, since
if the teacher is successful in passing her knowledge to the student,
there is no further basis for inequality.

48. Freuchen 1961: 154. It’s not clear what the original language was
here, considering that the Inuit did not have an institution of slavery.
Also, the passage would not make sense unless there were _some_ contexts
in which gift exchange did operate, and therefore, in which debts
accrued. What the hunter is emphasizing is that it was felt important
that this logic did not extend to basic needs like food.

49. Firth 1959:411–12 (also in Graeber 2001:175). His name was Tei
Reinga.

50. For one famous example: Chagnon 1996:170–76.

51. Similarly, two groups might form an alliance by contracting a
“joking relation,” in which any member of one could at least in theory
make similar outrageous demands of the other (Hébert 1958).

52. Marcel Mauss, in his famous “Essay on the Gift” (1924), often did,
and the results have sometimes confused debate for generations to come.

53. Mauss 1925, the Greek source being Posidonius. As usual one does not
know how literally to take this account. Mauss thought it likely
accurate; I suspect it might have happened once or twice.

54. As retold by William Ian Miller (1993:15–16). The first quote is
directly from the original, Egil’s Saga, chapter 78. Egil remained
ambivalent about the shield: he later took it to a wedding party and
contrived to drop it into a vat of sour whey. Afterward, concluding it
was ruined, he stripped it for its raw materials.

55. See, for instance, Wallace-Hadrill 1989.

56. Blaxter 1971:127–28.

57. Another anthropologist, for instance, defines patron-client
relations as “long-term contracted relations in which the client’s
support is exchanged for the patron’s protection; there is an ideology
which is morally charged and appears to rule out strict, open
accounting, but both parties keep some tacit rough account; the goods
and services exchanged are not similar, and there is no implication of
fair exchange or balance of satisfactions, since the client is markedly
weaker in power and needs the patron more than he is needed by him”
(Loizos 1977:115). Again, it both is and isn’t an exchange, it’s both a
matter of accounting and not a matter of accounting.

58. It’s exactly the same if one takes a job at a doughnut shop;
legally, it must be a free contract between equals, even if in order to
be able to say this we have to maintain the charming legal fiction that
one of them is an imaginary person named “Krispy Kreme.”

59. For instance the word “should,” in English, originally derives from
German _schuld_, meaning “guilt, fault, debt.” Benveniste provides
similar examples from other Indo-European languages (1963:58). East
Asian languages such as Chinese and Japanese rarely conflate the actual
words, but a similar identification of debt with sin, shame, guilt, and
fault can be easily documented (Malamoud 1988).

60. Plutarch _Moralia_ 303 B, also discussed in Finley 1981:152, Millett
1991a:42. Similarly, St. Thomas Aquinas made it a matter of Catholic
doctrine that sins were “debts of punishment” owed to God.

61. This is one reason why it’s so easy to dress up other sorts of
relationships as debts. Say one wishes to help out a friend in desperate
need of money but doesn’t want to embarrass her. Usually, the easiest
way to do it is to provide the money and then insist that it’s a loan
(and then let both parties conveniently forget it ever happened). Or
think of all the times and places where the rich acquire servants by
advancing what is ostensibly a loan.

62. One could argue that some equivalent of “please” and “thank you”
could be identified in any human language, if one were determined to
find them, but then the terms you find are often used so differently—for
instance, only in ritual contexts, or to hierarchical superiors—that
it’s hard to attach much significance to the fact. It is significant
that over the last century or so just about every human language that is
used in offices or to make transactions in shops has had to create terms
that do function as an exact equivalent of the English “please,” “thank
you,” and “you’re welcome.”

63. In Spanish one first asks a favor _(por favor)_, and then says
_gracias_, in order affirm you recognize one has been done for you,
since it derives from the Latin word _gratia_, meaning “influence, or
favor.” “Appreciate” is more monetary: if you say “I really appreciate
your doing that for me,” you are using a word that derives from Latin
_appretiare_, “to set a price.”

64. “You’re welcome,” first documented in Shakespeare’s time, derives
from Old English _wilcuma, wil_ being “pleasure” and _cuma_ being
“guest.” This is why people are still welcomed into a house. It is thus
like “be my guest,” implying that, no, if there is an obligation it’s on
my part, as any host is obliged to be generous to guests, and that
dispatching such obligations is a pleasure in itself. Still, it’s
significant that moralists rarely chide anyone for failure to say
“you’re welcome”—that one is much more optional.

65. Book I.12. This and other quotes are from the 2006 Penguin Screech
translation, in this case, p. 86.

66. Compare the Medieval Arab philosopher Ibn Miskaway: “The creditor
desires the well-being of the debtor in order to get his money back
rather than because of his love for him. The debtor, on the other hand,
does not take great interest in the creditor.” (in Hosseini 2003:36).

67. Appropriate, since Panurge’s entire discourse is nothing but a
comical elaboration of Marcelo Ficino’s argument that the entire
universe is driven by the power of love.


Chapter Six

1. From: Peter Carlson, “The Relatively Charmed Life of Neil Bush,” _The
Washington Post_, Sunday December 28, 2003, Page D01.

2. Grierson 1977:20.

3. To be fair to Grierson, he does later suggest that slavery played an
important part in the origins of money—though he never speculates about
the gender, which seems significant: slave girls also served as the
highest denomination of currency in Medieval Iceland (Williams 1937),
and in the Rig Veda, great gifts and payments are regularly designated
in “gold, cattle, and slave girls” (Chakravarti 1985:56–57). By the way,
I say “young” because elsewhere, when slaves are used as monetary units,
the unit is assumed to be a slave about 18–20 years old. A _cumal_ was
considered the equivalent in value of three milch cows or six heifers.

4. On _cumal_ see Nolan 1926, Einzig 1949:247–48, Gerriets 1978, 1981,
1985, Patterson 1982:168–69, Kelly 1998:112–13. Most merely emphasize
that _cumal_ were just used as units of account and we don’t know
anything about earlier practices. It’s notable, though, that in the law
codes, when several different commodities are used as units of account,
they will include that country’s most significant exports, and trade
currency (that’s why in Russian codes, the units were fur and silver).
This would imply a significant trade in female slaves in the period just
before written records.

5. So Bender 1996.

6. Here I am drawing on the detailed ethnographic survey work of Alain
Testart (2000, 2001, 2002). Testart does a magnificent job synthesizing
the evidence, though he too—as we’ll see in the next chapter—has some
equally strange blind spots in his conclusions.

7. “Although the rhetorical phrase ‘selling one’s daughter into
prostitution’ has wide currency … the actual arrangement is more often
presented as either a loan to the family or an advance payment for the
girl’s (usually unspecified or misrepresented) services. The interest on
these ‘loans’ is often 100 percent, and the principal may be increased
by other debts—for living expenses, medical care, bribes to
officials—accrued once the girl has begun work” (Bishop & Robinson
1998:105).

8. So Michael Hudson (cited in Wray 1999), but it’s clear enough if one
looks at the language of the original: “Thou shalt not covet thy
neighbour’s house, thou shalt not covet thy neighbour’s wife, nor his
manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his ox, nor his ass, nor any thing
that is thy neighbour’s” (Exodus 20:17, Deuteronomy 5:21).

9. Wampum is a good example: Indians never seem to have used it to buy
things from other members of the same community, although it was
regularly used in conducting trade with settlers (see Graeber
2001:117–150). Others, like Yurok shell money or some Papuan currencies,
are widely used as currencies in addition to their social functions, but
the first seems to have emerged from the second.

10. The most important texts on the “brideprice debate”: Evans-Pritchard
1931, Raglan 1931, Gray 1968, Comaroff 1980, Valeri 1994. One reason why
Evans-Pritchard originally proposed to change the name from “brideprice”
to “bridewealth” because the League of Nations had in 1926 outlawed the
practice as a form of slavery (Guyer 1994).

11. On Tiv kinship and economy: Duggan 1932; Abraham 1933; Downes 1933;
Akiga 1939; L. Bohannan 1952; P. Bohannan 1955, 1957, 1959; P. & L.
Bohannan 1953, 1968, Tseayo 1975; Keil 1979.

12. Akiga Sai 1939:106 for a good analysis of how this could happen. For
a later comparative reanalysis in regional perspective, see Fardon 1984,
1985.

13. Paul Bohannan puts it: “The _kem_ relationship of debt between a man
and his wife’s guardian is never broken, because _kem_ is perpetual, the
debt can never be fully paid.” (1957:73.) Otherwise the account is from
Akiga (1939:126–127).

14. Rospabé 1993:35.

15. Evans-Pritchard 1940:153.

16. As the ethnographer puts it, “that they are accepting the cattle
only in order to honour him and not because they are ready to take
cattle for the life of their dead kinsman.” (1940:153)

17. Op cit 154–155.

18. Morgan 1851:332. Morgan, a lawyer by training, is using a technical
term here, “condonation,” which the Oxford English Dictionary defines as
“the voluntary overlooking of an offence.”

19. Morgan 1851:333. The baseline was five fathoms for a man, ten for a
woman, but other factors might intervene (T. Smith 1983:236; Morgan
1851:331–34; Parker 1926). On “mourning wars” see Richter 1983; the
expression “putting his name upon the mat” is from Fenton 1978:315.
Incidentally I am assuming it’s a man who dies, since these are the
examples in the sources. It’s not clear if the same was done for women
who died naturally.

20. Evans-Pritchard 1940:155, 1951:109–11; Howell 1954:71–80, Gough
1971, Hutchinson 1996:62, 175–76.

21. Rospabe 1995:47–48, citing Peters 1947.

22. On mourning war: Richter 1983. Interestingly, something similar
occurred among the Nambikwara. I mentioned in chapter 3 that the feasts
held after barter could lead to seductions and jealous murders;
Levi-Strauss adds that the ordinary way of resolving such murders is for
the killer to marry the victim’s wife, adopt his children, and thus,
effectively, become the person the victim used to be (1943:123).

23. Though people did use them to commission certain fancy craft goods
(say, musical instruments) from specialists in other villages
(1963:54–55).

24. Douglas 1958: 112; also 1982:43.

25. Douglas (1963:58) estimates that a successful man will have spent at
minimum 300 raffia cloths in payments, and given away at least 300 more
as gifts, by the time he reached full social maturity.

26. As anthropologists often note, the fact that one traces descent
through the female line does not necessarily mean that women themselves
have a lot of power. It can; it did among the Iroquois, and it does
among Minangkabau right now. But it doesn’t necessarily.

27. Douglas 1963:144–45, which is an adoption of 1960:3–4.

28. She was in fact a conservative Catholic, married a Tory economist,
and tended to look with disdain on all liberal concerns.

29. As if to hammer this home, a man was actually considered to be owed
a life-debt for fathering female children (Douglas 1963:115)—that could
only be paid by allowing him to take one of his own daughters’ daughters
as a pawn. This only makes sense if we assume a principle that only men
can be owed a life, and therefore, in the case of women, the creation of
life was assumed to be given free. Men, as noted, could be pawns and
many were, but they were never traded.

30. Douglas 1966:150.

31. On “village-wives,” see particularly Douglas 1951, also 1963:128–40.

32. Douglas 1963:76; compare 1951:11. The author is clearly simply
repeating her informants’ explanation for the custom: the Lele didn’t
“have to” make such an arrangement; in fact, most African societies did
not.

33. Some village wives were literally princesses, since chiefs’
daughters invariably chose to marry age-sets in this way. The daughters
of chiefs were allowed to have sex with anyone they wanted, regardless
of age-set, and also had the right to refuse sex, which ordinary village
wives did not. Princesses of this sort were rare: there were only three
chiefs in all Lele territory. Douglas estimates that the number of Lele
women who became village wives, on the other hand, was about 10 percent
(1951).

34. For instance: 1960:4, 1963:145–46, 168–73, 1964:303. Obviously, men
could sometimes put a great deal of physical pressure on women, at
least, if everyone else agreed they had a moral right to do so, but even
here Douglas emphasizes most women had a good deal of room for maneuver.

35. On peacefulness, particularly, 1963:70–71.

36. 1963:170.

37. 1963:171.

38. Cost of slaves: 1963:36, 1982:46–47.

39. Partly, though, this was because the main purpose of male slaves was
to be sacrificed at important men’s funerals (1963:36).

40. See Graeber 2001, chapter 4. The great exception might seem to be
the cattle money of the Nuer, and similar pastoral peoples. Yet even
these were arguably adornment of the person of a sort.

41. Akiga Sai 1939: 121, 158–60.

42. So too when Tiv practiced marriage by capture: Akiga Sai
(1939:137–41).

43. Here I’m drawing on the classic “spheres of exchange” analysis by
Paul Bohannan (1955, 1959), supplemented by Dorward (1976) and Guyer
(2004:27–31).

44. So Akiga Sai 1939:241; P. Bohannan 1955:66, P. & L. Bohannnan
1968:233, 235. As charisma in general: East in Akiga Sai 1939:236,
Downes 1971:29.

45. See Abraham 1933:26; Akiga Sai 1939:246; P. Bohannan 1958:3; Downes
1971:27.

46. On witches in general: P. Bohannan 1957:187–88, 1958; Downes 1971:
32–25. On flesh debts (or _ikipindi):_ Abraham 1933:81–84; Downes
1971:36–40.

47. Akiga Sai 1939:257.

48. Akiga Sai 1939:260.

49. Following here Wilson 1951.

50. Paul Bohannan (1958:4) makes a similar but not identical argument.

51. Tiv migration stories (e.g. Abraham 1933:17–26; Akiga & Bohannan
1954; P. Bohannan 1954) do not explicitly say this, but they could
easily be read this way. Akiga’s story (1939:137) about Tiv migrants
painting what looked like sores on their women’s bodies so raiders would
not take them is particularly suggestive. Despite their lack of
government, Tiv did have a notoriously effective war organization, and
as Abrahams notes (1933:19), managed to successfully play the Fulani and
Jukun against each other by intervening in their own wars with each
other.

52. Some of these raids were not entirely unsuccessful. For a while, it
would appear, the nearby Jukun kingdom, which made several ultimately
unsuccessful efforts to incorporate the Tiv in the eighteenth century,
appear to have been selling Tiv captives to slave dealers operating on
the coast (Abraham 1933:19; Curtin 1965:255, 298; Latham 1973:29; Tambo
1976: 201–3.) It’s doubtless significant here that many Tiv insisted in
the 1930s that the Jukun were themselves cannibals, and that the origins
of the _mbatsav_ “organization” lay in certain chiefly titles that Tiv
acquired from them when they finally came to a political rapprochement
(Abraham 1933:33–35).

53. Jones 1958; Latham 1971; Northrup 1978:157–64; Herbert 2003:196. The
famous Medieval Arab traveler Ibn Battuta, who we’ve already met at the
court of the King of Singh in chapter 2, saw people using them as money
in the Niger region, not far away, in the 1340s.

54. Herbert (2003:181) estimates that Europeans imported about 20,000
tons of English brass and copper into Africa between 1699 and 1865. It
was manufactured in Bristol, Cheadle, and Birmingham. The vast majority
was exchanged for slaves

55. I base this number on the fact that 152,076 slaves are known to have
been exported from the Bight of Biafra as a whole in those years (Eltis,
Behrent, Richardson & Klein 2000). The slave trade at Old Calabar lasted
roughly from 1650 to 1841, during which time the port was by far the
largest in the Bight, and the exports from the Bight itself during its
height represent about 20 percent of all Africa (Lovejoy & Richardson
1999:337).

56. Sheridan 1958, Price 1980, 1989, 1991.

57. A larger variety of beads.

58. Barbot in Talbot 1926 I: 185–186.

59. Inkori (1982) demonstrates that in the late eighteenth century,
British ships docking in Old Calabar brought on average 400 muskets
each, and that between 1757 and 1806, the total number imported into the
Calabar-Cameroons region was 22,986. Rum and other liquor was, however,
a very minor import.

60. One common expedient, especially in the early years, was for
merchants to arrive at village markets with canoes full of wares,
exchange them for slaves, and then, if they didn’t come up to quota,
wait until nightfall and simply attack homesteads along the river,
carrying off anyone they could find (Clarkson in Northrup 1978:66, also
cited in Noah 1990:94.)

61. The existing scholarly literature is of little help in
reconstructing the history of how one form was transformed into the
other, since there are only works treating pawnship _either_ as a matter
of kinship (e.g., Douglas 1964, Fardon 1985, 1986), or of commerce
(e.g., Falola & Lovejoy 1994), but never comparing the two. As a result,
many basic questions remain unasked. Falola and Lovejoy, for instance,
suggest that pawns’ labor functions as interest, but the book contains
no information on whether interest-bearing loans even existed in the
parts of Africa where pawnship was practiced.

62. It’s also clear that this sort of pawnship must have developed from
something like the Lele institution. Many of the rules are the same: for
instance, much as among the Lele, if a girl was pledged, the creditor
often had the option of marrying her when she reached maturity, thus
cancelling the debt.

63. Lovejoy & Richardson 1999:349–51; 2001.

64. Equiano 1789:6–13.

65. Others included the Akunakuna, and the Efik, who were based in
Calabar itself. The Aro were Igbo-speakers, and the region a patchwork
of speakers of Igbo and Ibibio languages.

66. On the Aro in general, see Jones 1939; Ottenberg 1958; Afigbo 1971;
Ekejiuba 1972; Isichei 1976; Northrup 1978; Dike & Ekejiuba 1990; Nwauwa
1991.

67. Dike and Ekejiuba (1990:150) estimate that 70 percent of the slaves
sold to Europeans in the Bight of Biafra came from the Aro. Most of the
rest came from the other merchant societies.

68. One twentieth-century elder recalled, “a woman who commited adultery
would be sold by her husband and the husband kept the money. Thieves
were sold, and the money went to the elders whose responsibility it was
to make the decision.” (Northrup 1978: 69)

69. Northrup 1978:73

70. On Ekpe as debt enforcement in Calabar itself: Jones 1968, Latham
1973:35–41, Lovejoy & Richardson 1999:347–49. On the spread of Ekpe to
Arochukwe and throughout the region: Ruel 1969:250–258, Northrup
1978:109–110, Nwaka 1978, Ottenberg & Knudson 1985. Nwaka (1978:188)
writes: “The Ekpe society, the most widespread in the Cross River area,
formed the basis of local government. It performed executive and
judicial functions in areas where it operated. Through the agency of its
members, punishments were administered to public offenders, customs
enforced and the authority of the elders upheld. Ekpe laws to some
extent regulated the lives of most members of the community in such
matters as the cleaning of towns and streets, collection of debts and
other measures of public benefit.”

71. Latham 1963:38.

72. Taken from Walker 1875:120

73. Ottenberg & Ottenberg 1962:124.

74. Partridge 1905:72.

75. If one were seeking a pawn, one couldn’t simply take a random child
from a neighboring village, as his or her parents would quickly track
the child down.

76. In Lovejoy & Richardson 2001:74. For a parallel case in Ghana, see
Getz 2003:85.

77. Remarkably, Akiga Sai (1939:379–80) insists that, among the Tiv,
this was the origin of slavery: the seizing of hostages from the same
lineage as someone who refused to pay a debt. Say, he says, the debtor
still refuses to pay. They will keep their hostage fettered for a while,
then, finally, sell them in another country. “This is the origin of
slavery.”

78. So Harris 1972:128 writing of another Cross River district, Ikom:
one of the major suppliers of slaves for Calabar. There, she notes,
debtors were often obliged to pawn themselves when maternal and paternal
kin intervened to prevent them from selling off any more of their
relatives, with the result that they were finally enslaved and sent to
Calabar.

79. We do not know what proportion. King Eyo II told a British
missionary that slaves “were sold for different reasons—some as
prisoners of war, some for debt, some for breaking their country’s laws
and some by great men who hated them” (in Noah 1990:95). This suggests
that debt was not insignificant, especially since as Pier Larson
(2000:18) notes, all sources at the time would list “war,” since it was
considered the most legitimate. Compare Northrup (1978:76–80).

80. Reid 1983:8

81. op cit.

82. Reid 1983:10

83. Vickers (1996) provides an excellent history of Bali’s image in the
North Atlantic imagination, from “savage Bali” to terrestrial paradise.

84. Geertz & Geertz 1975; Boon 1977:121–24. Belo (1936:26) cites
informants in the 1920s that insisted that marriage by capture was a
fairly recent innovation, which emerged from gangs of young men stealing
women from enemy villages and, often, demanding that their fathers pay
money to get them back.

85. Boon 1977:74

86. Covarrubias (1937:12) notes that as early as 1619, Balinese women
were in great demand in slave markets in Reunion.

87. Boon 1977:28, van der Kraan 1983, Wiener 1995:27

88. Vickers 1996:61. I need only remark that the anthropological
literature on Bali, most notably Clifford Geertz’s famous essay on the
Balinese cockfight as “deep play” (1973), a space where Balinese people
can express their inner demons and tell stories about themselves, or his
conception of pre-colonial governments as “theater states” (1980) whose
politics centered around gathering the resources to create magnificent
rituals, might well be rethought in the light of all of this. There is a
peculiar blindness in this literature. Even Boon, after the above quote
about men hiding their daughters, proceeds on the very next page
(1977:75) to refer to that government’s “subjects” as really just a
“slightly taxed audience for its rituals,” as if the likely prospect of
the rape, murder and enslavement of one’s children didn’t really matter,
or, anyway, was not of explicitly political import.

89. All this is meant in part as a critique of Louis Dumont’s arguments
(1992) that the only truly egalitarian societies are modern ones, and
even those only by default: since their ultimate value is individualism,
and since each individual is valuable above all for the degree to which
he or she is unique, there can be no basis for saying that anyone is
intrinsically superior to anybody else. One can have the same effect
without any doctrine of “Western individualism” at all. The entire
concept of “individualism” needs to be seriously rethought.

90. Beattie 1960: 61.

91. True, in many traditional societies, penalties are given to men who
beat their wives excessively. But again, the assumption is that _some_
such behavior is at least par for the course.

92. On charivari, see for instance Davis 1975, Darnton 1984. Keith
Thomas (1972:630), who cites this very Nyoro story in an account of
English villages of that time, recounts a whole series of social
sanctions, such as dunking the “village scold,” that seem almost
entirely aimed at the violent control of women, but oddly, he claims
that charivari were directed at _men_ who beat their wives, despite the
fact that all other sources say the opposite.

93. Not quite all. Again, one might cite Iroquois society of the same
period as an example: it was in many senses a matriarchy, particularly
on the everyday household level, and women were not exchanged.

94. Taken from Trawick 2000:185, figure 11.

95. The diagram is reproduced from P. Bohannan 1957:87.

96. Akiga Sai 1939:161.

97. So too among the Lele, where Mary Douglas (1963:131) remarks that it
was considered acceptable to whip a village wife for refusing work or
sex, but this was no reflection on her status, since the same was true
of Lele wives married to just one man, too.


Chapter Seven

1. http.sumerianorg/prot-sum.htm, from a “Proto-Sumerian dictionary”

2. Florentius in Justinian’s Institutes (1.5.4.1). It is interesting to
note that when attempts are made to justify slavery, starting with
Aristotle, they generally focus not on the institution, which is not in
itself justifiable, but on the inferior qualities of some ethnic group
being enslaved.

3. Elwahid 1931. Clarence-Smith (2008:17n56) notes that al-Wahid’s book
itself emerged from within lively debates in the Middle East about the
role of slavery in Islam that had been going on at least since the
mid-nineteenth century.

4. Elwahid 1931: 101–10, and passim. An analogous list appears in
Patterson 1982:105.

5. The sale of children was always felt to be a sign of economic and
moral breakdown; even later Roman emperors like Diocletian, notes
al-Wahid, supported charities aimed to provide relief for poor families
explicitly so they would not have to resort to things like this (Elwahed
1931: 89–91).

6. Mitamura 1970.

7. Debt slavery, he notes, was practiced in early Roman history, but
this is because according to the laws of the twelve tablets, insolvent
debtors could actually be killed. In most places, where this was not
possible, debtors were not fully enslaved by reduced to pawns or peons
(see Testart 2000, 2002, for a full explanation of the different
possibilities).

8. Al-Wahid cites examples from Athenaeus of Greek patients who offered
themselves as slaves to doctors who had saved their lives (op cit:234)

9. Ulpian is precise: “In every branch of the law, a person who fails to
return from enemy hands is regarded as having died at the moment when he
was captured.” (Digest 49.15.18) The Lex Cornelia of 84–81 bc specifies
the need for remarriage.

10. Meillassoux 1996:106

11. Patterson 1982. “Slavery,” as he defines it, “is the permanent,
violent domination of natally alienated and generally dishonored
persons.” (1982:13)

12. He quotes Frederick Douglass here to great effect: “A man without
force is without the essential dignity of humanity. Human nature is so
constituted that it cannot honor a helpless man, although it can pity
him; and even that it cannot do long, if the signs of power do not
arise.” (in Patterson 1982:13)

13. Presumably an honorable woman as well, though in the case of women,
as we shall see, the question became inextricably caught up in questions
of fidelity and chastity.

14. Paul Houlm (in Duffy, MacShamhráin and Moynes 2005:431.) True, the
balance of trade seems to have shifted back and forth; at some periods
Irish ships were raiding English shores, and after 800 ad the Vikings
carried off thousands, briefly making Dublin the largest slave market in
Europe. Still, by this time, cumals do not appear to any longer have
been used as actual currency. There are some parallels here with Africa,
where in certain times and places affected by the trade, debts were
tallied up in slaves as well (Einzig 1949:153).

15. St. Patrick, one of the founders of the Irish church, was one of the
few of the early Church Fathers who was overtly and unconditionally
opposed to slavery.

16. Doherty 1980:78–83.

17. Gerriets 1978:128, 1981:171–72, 1985:338. This was in dramatic
contrast, incidentally, to Welsh laws from only two or three centuries
later, where the prices of all such objects are fastidiously specified
(Ellis 1926:379–81). The list of items incidentally is a random
selection from the Welsh codes.

18. Doherty 1980:73–74

19. This was true in Irish and in Welsh, and apparently, other Celtic
languages as well. Charles-Edwards (1978:130, 1993:555) actually
translates “honor price” as “face value.”

20. The one exception being an early ecclesiastical text: Einzig
1949:247–48, Gerriets 1978:71.

21. The main source on the monetary system is Gerriets (1978), a
dissertation that unfortunately was never published as a book. A table
of standard rates of exchange between cumal, cows, silver, etc, are also
to be found in Charles-Edwards 1993:478–85.

22. Gerriets 1978:53.

23. If you had lent a man your horse or sword and he didn’t return it in
time for a battle, causing loss of face, or even if a monk lent his cowl
to another monk who didn’t return it in time, causing him not to have
proper attire for an important synod, he could demand his honor price
(Fergus 1988:118).

24. The honor price of Welsh kings was far higher (Ellis 1926:144).

25. Provincial kings, who ranked higher, had an honor price of 14
cumals, and in theory there was a high king at Tara who ruled all
Ireland, but the position was often vacant or contested (Byrne 1973).

26. All of this is a simplification of what’s in fact an endlessly
complicated system, and some points, especially concerning marriage, of
which there are several varieties, with different integrations of
brideprice and dowry, remain obscure. In the case of clients, for
example, there were two initial payments by the lord, the honor price
being one of them; with “free clients,” however, the honor price was not
paid and the client was not reduced to servile status, (See Kelly 1988
for the best general summary.)

27. Dimetian Code II.24.12 (Howel 2006:559). A similar penalty is
specified for the killing of public officials from certain districts
(Ellis 1926:362).

28. “There is no evidence that goods themselves could be assigned
prices. That is, while Irish moneys could quantify the status of an
individual, they were not used to quantify the value of goods.”
(Gerriets 1985:338).

29. Sutton 2004:374.

30. Gallant 2000. One might also consider here the phrase “affair of
honor,” or for that matter, “honor killing”—which also make clear that
such sentiments are hardly confined to rural Greece.

31. In fact, one could just as easily turn the question around, and ask:
Why is it so insulting to suggest that a man’s sister is trading sex for
money in the first place? This one reason I say that concepts of honor
still shape our perceptions in ways we’re not aware of—there are plenty
of places in the world where the suggestion that a man’s wife is trading
sex for profit, or that his sister is engaged with multiple partners, is
more likely to be greeted with bemused good humor than with murderous
rage. We’ve already seen examples in the Gunwinggu and the Lele.

32. Obviously I am distinguishing the term here from the broader sense
of patriarchy used in much feminist literature, of any social system
based on male subordination of women. Clearly the origins of patriarchy
in this broader sense must be sought in a much earlier period of history
in both the Mediterranean and Near East.

33. The “Semitic infiltration” model is already to be found in such
classic sources as Saggs (1962). Generally speaking, the pattern seems
to be one of periodic urban crisis, the near-breakdown of riverine
society being followed by revival, apparently after the advent of a new
wave of Semitic pastoralists (Adams et al. 1974).

34. Rohrlich 1980 is a compelling example.

35. This is of course a vast simplification of a thesis mainly
identified with the anthropologist Jack Goody (1976, 1983, 1990). The
basic principle is that dowry is not so much a payment by the bride’s
father (it might come equally from both sides) but a kind of premature
inheritance. Goody has had very little to say about Mesopotamia, though,
and that little (1990:315–17) focuses almost exclusively on upper-class
practice.

36. Wilcke 1985, Westbrook 1988, Greengus 1990, Stol 1995:125–27. For
Mari: Lafont 1987; for Old Babylonian practice: Greengus 1966, 1969; for
Nuzi, Grosz 1983, 1989.

37. Our best sources are from the city of Nuzi c1500 bc, though Nuzi was
atypical in certain ways, mainly due to Hurrian influence. There,
marriage payments appear to have been made in stages, for instance, at
the birth of a first child (Grosz 1981:176)—a pattern familiar to
anthropologists from Melanesia, Africa, and numerous other parts of the
world.

38. Finkelstein 1966, VerSteeg 2000:121, 153n91. A father could claim
monetary damages against someone who falsely claimed that his daughter
was not a virgin, presumably because it would lower the bride-price
(Cooper 2002:101).

39. Bottéro 1992:113.

40. Stol 1995:126.

41. Cardascia 1959 on “matrimonial adoption” (also Mendelsohn 1949:8–12,
Greengus 1975). During times of famine, sometimes even the brideprice
was dispensed with, and a starving family might turn over their daughter
to a rich household in exchange for a promise to keep her alive.

42. Evans-Prichard 1931, Raglan 1931. It’s a little ironic that the
debate was occurring in England, since this was one of the few places
where it was, technically, legal to sell or even auction off one’s wife
(Menefee 1981; Stone 1990:143–48; see Pateman 1988). Stone notes that
while public “wife-sales” in English villages were apparently really
prearranged divorces, “the details of the ritual were designed to
emphasize the final nature of the transfer of property, by imitating as
closely as possible the sale of a cow or a sheep. A halter was used to
lead the wife from her home to the market, and from the market to the
house of her purchaser.” (1990:145) The practice, confined to the
popular classes, caused a scandal when documented in Hardy’s _Mayor of
Casterbridge_, but it was only completely abandoned in 1919.

43. Finley 1981:153–55; Stienkeller 2003; Mieroop 2005:27–28. Mieroop
notes that the earliest such contract is documented from
twenty-first-century Babylonia. This is an interesting example for the
early history of wage labor. As I’ve written elsewhere (Graeber
2006:66–69; 2007:91–94), wage-labor contracts in the ancient world were
primarily a matter of the rental of slaves—a practice that in
Mesopotamia is first documented only in neo-Babylonian times (Oppenheim
1964:78, VerSteeg 2000:70–71; for an Egyptian parallel VerSteeg
2002:197).

44. The entire issue has been complicated by Herodotus’ claim (1.199)
that all Babylonian women other than daughters of the elite were
expected to prostitute themselves at temples, once, to earn the money
for their dowries. This was certainly false, but it has caused the terms
of debate to become rather confused between people insisting on the
importance of “hierodules” or even claiming that all prostitution was
effectively sacred (e.g., Kramer 1969, Lambert 1992) and those rejecting
the entire notion as Orientalist fantasy (Arnaud 1973, Westenholz 1989,
Beard & Henderson 1997, Assante 2003). However, recently published texts
from Kish and Sippar make clear that sexual rituals involving temple
women, at least some of whom were paid for their services, definitely
did take place (Gallery 1980; Yoffee 1998; Stol 1995:138–39) The
devadasi analogy incidentally was first to my knowledge proposed in
Yoffee 1998:336. On devadasis in general: Orr 2000, Jordan 2003,
Vijaisri 2004.

45. Kramer 1963:116, Bahrani 2001: 59–60.

46. A similar reading can be found in Bottéro 1992:96, but without the
ambivalence, which Lerner (1980:247) emphasizes.

47. See Lerner 1980, Van Der Toorn 1989, Lambert 1992.

48. Also, in many places, small-scale female traders are likened to or
confused with prostitutes, simply because they have multiple ongoing
relationships with unrelated men (for a contemporary Kazakh example:
Nazpary 2001)—and the roles can sometimes overlap.

49. Diakonoff (1982). Loose bands of pastoral nomads or refugees, who
also sometimes doubled as soldiers, were often referred to generically
as _hapiru_ or _habiru_, both in Mesopotamia and to the West. This might
be the origin of the term “Hebrew,” another group that according to
their own histories had fled from bondage, wandered with their flocks in
the desert, and eventually descended as conquerors on urban society.

50. Herodotus 1.199, also Strabo 16.1.20.

51. Revelations 17.4–5. Revelations seems to follow the perspective of
the followers of Peter more than those of Paul. I observe in passing
that Rastafarianism, the main prophetic voice today that makes use of
the image of Babylon as corruption and oppression—though it does tend to
play down the imagery of sexual corruption—has in practice been very
much about the reassertion of patriarchal authority among the poor.

52. 1980:249–54; 1989:123–40. The main textual source is Driver & Miles
1935; also Cardascia 1969.

53. In Sumerian weddings, a bride’s father would cover her with a veil,
and the groom would remove it—it was by this act that he made her his
wife (Stol 1995:128). Not only does this demonstrate the degree to which
the veil was a symbol of encompassment in some man’s domestic authority;
it might also have been the source from which the later Assyrian
practice was eventually adopted.

54. My take on Confucianism follows Deng’s (1999) somewhat
unconventional approach. See Watson 1980 on the commoditization of
women; Gates 1989 on its relation to general decline of women’s freedoms
during the Song; there seems to have been another major setback during
the Ming dynasty—for a recent overview, Ko, Haboush, and Piggott (2003).
Testart (2000, 2001:148–49, 190) emphasizes that the case of China
confirms his “general sociological law,” that societies that practice
brideprice will also allow debt slavery (Testart, Lécrivain, Karadimas &
Govoroff 2001), since this was a place where the government vainly tried
to stop both. Another aspect of Confucianism was that male slavery was
seen as much more dubious than female slavery; though it never went as
far as in Korea, where after the invasion of Hideyoshi, a law was passed
decreeing that _only_ women could be enslaved.

55. Tambiah (1973, 1989) was the first to make what is now the standard
critique of Goody’s argument. Goody prefers to see these as indirect
dowry payments since they were normally passed to the family
(1990:178–97).

56. On Homeric honor: Finley 1954:118–19, Adkins 1972:14–16 Seaford
1994:6–7. Cattle are again the main unit of account, and silver. Is also
apparently used As Classicists have noted, the only actual acts of
buying and selling in the Homeric epics are with foreigners (Von Reden
1995:58–76, Seaford 2004:26–30, Finley 1954:67–70). Needless to say,
Homeric society lacked the legalistic precision of the Irish notion of
“honor price” but the principles were broadly the same, since _tīme_
could mean not only “honor” but “penalty” and “compensation.”

57. _Tīme_ is not used for the “price” of commodities in the _Iliad_ or
the _Odyssey_, but then prices of commodities are barely mentioned. It
is, however, used for “compensation,” in the sense of wergeld or
honor-price (Seaford 2004:198n46). The first attested use of _time_ as
purchase price is in the slightly later Homeric Hymn to Demeter (132)
where, as Seaford notes, it seems significant that in fact it refers to
a slave.

58. Aristotle, _Constitution of the Athenians_ 2.2. He is referring to
the great crisis leading to Solon’s reforms, the famous “shaking off of
burdens” of c. 594 bc.

59. Greek chattel slavery was in fact much more extreme than anything
that appears to have existed in the ancient Near East at the time (see
e.g., Westermann 1955; Finley 1974, 1981; Wiedemann 1981; Dandamaev
1984; Westbrook 1995), not only because most Near Eastern “slaves” were
not technically slaves at all but redeemable debt pawns, who therefore
at least in theory could not be arbitrarily abused, but because even
those who were absolute private property had greater rights.

60. “Self-sufficiency is an end and what is best” (Aristotle _Politics
12_56–58; see Finley 1974:109–11, Veyne 1979, for classic discussions of
what this meant in practice.)

61. The argument here follows Kurke 2002. On the public brothels, see
Halperin 1990, Kurke 1996. There actually were Temple prostitutes in
Greece too, mostly famously in Corinth, where Strabo (8.6.20) claimed
that the Temple of Aphrodite owned a thousand of them, apparently,
slaves who had been dedicated to the temple by pious worshippers.

62. As noted in the quote from David Sutton (2004) above. For a sampling
of the anthropological literature on honor in contemporary Greek
society, see: Campbell 1964, Peristiany 1965, Schneider 1971, Herzfeld
1980, 1985, Just 2001.

63. On the impropriety of women’s work outside the household, see Brock
1994. On segregation of women in general: Keuls 1985, Cohen 1987, Just
1989, Loraux 1993.

64. The evidence is overwhelming, but until recently has been largely
ignored. Llewellyn-Jones (2003) notes that the practice began as an
aristocratic affectation, but that by the fifth century, all respectable
women “were veiled daily and routinely, at least in public or in front
of non-related men” (ibid:14).

65. van Reden 1997:174, referencing Herodotus 7.233, Plutarch’s
Pericles, 26.4.

66. A woman who one of them, Achilles, had personally reduced to
slavery. Briseis was from the Trojan town of Lyrnessus, and after
Achilles killed her husband and three brothers in the Greek attack on
the town, she was awarded to him as a prize. (On learning of this, her
father later hanged himself.) In the Iliad, Achilles insists he loves
her. Briseis’ opinions were not considered worth recording, though later
poets, uncomfortable with the idea that the greatest epic of antiquity
was a celebration of simple rape, concocted a story whereby Briseis had
actually long been in love with Achilles from afar, and somehow
manipulated the course of events so as to cause the battle to begin
with.

67. Homeric warriors weren’t really aristocrats at all, or if they were,
as Calhoun puts it (1934:308) they were aristocrats “only in the loosest
sense of the word.” Mostly they were just a collection of local
chieftains and ambitious warriors.

68. See Kurke 1997:112–13, 1999:197–98 for Greek elaborations on the
theme. So too Seaford: “Whereas the Homeric _gift_ is invested with the
personality of its heroic donor, the only kind of person that _money_
resembles is the prostitute. For Shakespeare it is ‘the common whore of
all mankind’ ” (2002:156, emphasis in the original. For what it’s worth,
Seaford is slightly off here: Shakespeare described the _earth_ as the
“common whore of all mankind,” whose womb produces gold, which is money
_[Timon of Athens_ 4.3.42–45].)

69. Seaford 2002 in his review of Kurke notes that Greek sources
regularly go back and forth on this.

70. In the _Odyssey_ (11.488–91), famously, Achilles, when trying to
invoke the lowest and most miserable person he can possibly imagine,
invokes not a slave but a _thete_, a mere laborer unattached to any
household.

71. Free _porne_ were always the daughters of foreigners or resident
aliens. So, incidentally, were the aristocrats’ courtesans.

72. The reader will observe that even in the anecdotes that follow,
women simply don’t appear. We have no idea who Polemarchus’ wife was.

73. Recall here that pederasty was technically against the law. Or, to
be more exact, for a man to submit to the passive role in sodomy was
illegal; one could be stripped of one’s citizenship for having done so.
While most adult men were involved in love affairs with boys, and most
boys with men, all did so under the pretense that no intercourse was
actually taking place; as a result, almost anyone could be accused of
former impropriety. The most famous case here is Aeschines’ _Against
Timarchus_ (see van Reden 2003:120–23, also Dillon 2003:117–28.) Exactly
the same dilemmas resurface in Rome, where Cicero, for instance, accused
his rival Marc Antony of having once made his living as a male
prostitute (Philippics 2.44–45), and Octavian, the later Augustus, was
widely reputed to have “prostituted” himself, as a youth, to Julius
Caesar, among other powerful patrons (Suetonius _Augustus_ 68).

74. The most famous cases were Athens, Corinth, and Megara (Asheri 1969;
St. Croix 1981; Finley 1981:156–57.)

75. The law was called the _palintokia_ and is known mainly from
Plutarch _(Moralia_ 295D, apparently drawing on a lost Aristotelian
_Constitution of the Megarians.)_ Almost everything about it is at issue
in current scholarship (Asheri 1969:14–16; Figueria 1985:149–56,
Millettt 1989: 21–22; Hudson 1992:31; Bryant 1994:100–044). Hudson for
instance argues that since the event is said to have happened around 540
bc, at a time when interest-bearing loans might not even have existed,
the whole story is likely to be later propaganda. Others suggest that it
really happened much later. It’s interesting that all Greek sources
treat this as a most radical and outrageous populist measure—despite the
fact that similar measures became standard Catholic policy during most
of the European Middle Ages.

76. It is entirely unclear whether loans at interest even existed in
this early period, since the first apparent reference to interest is
from roughly 475 bc, and the first utterly clear ones from the later
part of that same century (Bogaert 1966, 1968; Finley 1981; Millett
1991a: 44–45; Hudson 1992).

77. Compare for example Leviticus 25:35–37, which stipulates that it is
permissible to make an impoverished “fellow countryman” a client or
tenant, but _not_ to give him an interest-bearing loan.

78. As Hesiod emphasizes in _Works and Days_ (II 344–63); he’s our main
source on such matters. Paul Millett (1991a:30–35) provides a close
reading of this passage, to illustrate the ambiguities between gifts and
loans. Millett’s book _Lending and Borrowing in Ancient Athens_ (op cit)
is the basic work on that topic. Scholarship on the Greek economy has
long been preoccupied by what’s still (rather anachronistically) called
the Primitivist-Modernist debate; Millett takes a strong Primitivist
position and has taken predictable heat from the other side (e.g., Cohen
1995, Shipley 1997, 2001). Most of the debate, though, turns on the
prevalence of commercial lending, which is tangential to my present
concerns.

79. The story is so striking because Nasruddin almost never elsewhere
behaves in a way that a contemporary audience would consider unfair or
exploitative. Those stories that do always focus on his relations with
his neighbor the miser—the listener is presumed to know that being a
miser, he must, necessarily, be up to no good.

80. “Against Nicostratus” (Demosthenes 53). My version largely follows
Millet (1991a:53–59) but also draws on Trevett 1992, Dillon 2002:94–100,
Harris 2006:261–63). The interpretation of Nicostratus’ motives is my
own; Dillon, for example, suspects that the entire story of his
kidnapping and ransom at Aegina was made up—though if that were the
case, one would imagine Apollodorus would have eventually found out and
told the jurors. The text doesn’t explicitly say that Nicostratus was an
aristocrat, but this seems the most plausible explanation of why someone
might have a comfortable country estate but no money. Apollodorus,
though, was known, from other contexts, to have feared that his fellow
citizens would have contempt for his lowly background, and tried to
compensate by lavish—and some felt, over-lavish—generosity (see Ballin
1978; Trevett 1992).

81. Athenians when trying to be high-minded at least spoke as if fellow
citizens should behave this way to one another; to loan money at
interest to a citizen in dire need was treated as obviously
reprehensible behavior (Millett 1991a:26). All philosophers who touched
on the subject, starting with Plato _(Laws_ 742c, 921c) and Aristotle
_(Politics_ 1258c) denounced interest as immoral. Obviously not everyone
felt that way. Here as in the Middle East, from whence the custom had
spread (Hudson 1992), the dilemma was that charging interest made
obvious sense in the case of commercial loans, but easily became abusive
in the case of consumer loans.

82. It’s not clear whether debt slavery, or at least debt peonage, was
anywhere entirely eliminated, and debt crises continued to occur at
regular intervals in cities other than Athens (Asheri 1969; St. Croix
1981). Some (Rhodes 1981:118–27; Cairns 1991; Harris 2006:249–80)
believe that debt bondage was not even entirely eliminated in Athens.
Millett (1991a:76) is probably right to say that imperial capitals like
Athens, and later Rome, fended off the dangers of debt crises and
resulting unrest less by forbidding the practice than by funneling
tribute money into social programs that provided a constant source of
funds for the poor, making usury largely unnecessary.

83. Millett 1991b:189–92. The same was true in Roman Galilee (Goodman
1983:55), and presumably in Rome as well (Howgego 1992:13).

84. the Furies, who pursue Orestes to avenge his killing of his mother,
insist that they are collecting a debt due in blood (Aeschylus,
Eumenides 260, 319.) Millett (1991a:6–7) compiles a number of examples.
Korver (1934, cf. Millet 1991:29–32) demonstrates that there was never
any formal distinction between “gift” and “loan”; the two continually
shaded into each other.

85. The two were seen to be connected: Herodotus, famously, argued that
for the Persians, the greatest crime was to lie, and that they therefore
forbade the loaning of money at interest since it would necessarily give
rise to untruthful behavior (1.138).

86. Plato _Republic_ 331c.

87. Plato Republic 345d. My reading is strongly influenced here by that
of Marc Shell (1978). Shell’s essay is important, but sadly neglected,
as Classicists only seem to cite each other (at least, on the subject of
the Classics).

88. What Polemarchus is invoking of course is the logic of the heroic
gift, and of the feud. If someone helps or harms you, you pay them back
the same or better. Polemarchus actually says that there are two
circumstances when it’s easiest to do this: in war, and in banking.

89. The Republic was written in 380 bc, and these events took place in
388/7. See Thesleff 1989:5, DuBois 2003:153–54, for the dates and
references to ancient and contemporary scholarship on the issue, which
concur that these events did take place. It’s not entirely clear if
Plato was taken in an act of piracy, sold on the orders of an angry
ex-patron, or seized as a prisoner of war (Aegina—Plato’s birthplace,
incidentally—was then at war with Athens.) But the lines blurred.
Curiously, Diogenes the Cynic, a younger contemporary of Plato, was also
captured by pirates on a trip to Aegina around the same time. In his
case no one came to his aid (unsurprising considering that he rejected
all worldly attachments and tended to insult everyone he met). He ended
up spending the rest of his life as a slave in Corinth (Diogenes
Laertius, 4.9). Plato, Aristotle, and Diogenes were the three most
famous philosophers of the fourth century; the fact that two of the
three had the experience of standing on an auction block demonstrates
that such things really could happen to anyone.

90. Plato recounts the events in his _Seventh Letter to Dion_, but
Annikeris only appears in Diogenes Laertius 3.19–20.

91. Ihering 1877.

92. Rights _“in rem,”_ or “in the thing,” are considered to be held
“against all the world,” since “a duty is incumbent on all persons
whatsoever to abstain from acts injurious to the right”—this is opposed
to rights “_in personem,”_ which are held against a specific individual
or group of individuals (Digby & Harrison 1897:301). Garnsey
(2007:177–178) notes that Proudhon (1840) was correct in insisting that
the “absolute” nature of property rights in the French Civil Code and
other paradigmatic modern legal documents goes back directly to Roman
law, _both_ to the notion of absolute private property, and to that of
the emperor’s absolute sovereignty.

93. The idea that Roman property was not a right goes back to Villey
(1946), and became mainstream in English scholarship with Tuck
(1979:7–13) and Tierney (1997), though Garnsey (2007:177–95) has
recently made a convincing case that Roman jurists did see property as a
right _(ius)_ in the sense that one had a right of alienation, and to
defend one’s claims in court. It’s an interesting debate, largely
turning on one’s definition of “right,” but somewhat tangential to my
own argument.

94. “The paradigmatic relation between a person and a thing is that of
ownership, yet the omans themselves seemed never to have defined it. To
them, it was a power relation—a form of _potestas—_directly exercised
over the physical thing itself” (Samuel 2003:302).

95. In earliest Roman law (the Twelve Tablets of c450 bc) slaves were
still people, but of diminished worth, since injuries against them
counted as 50 percent those of a free person (Twelve Tablets VIII.10).
By the late Republic, around the time of the emergence of the concept of
dominium, slaves had been redefined as _res_, things, and injuries to
them had the same legal status as injuries to farm animals (Watson
1987:46)

96. Patterson: “it is difficult to understand why the Romans would want
to invent the idea of a relation between a person and a thing (an almost
metaphysical notion, quite at variance with the Roman way of thinking in
other areas) … unless we understand that, for most purposes, the ‘thing’
on their minds was a slave” (1982:31).

97. It does not appear in the Twelve Tablets or early legal documents.

98. _Dominus_ first appears in 111 bc, _dominium_, sometime later (Birks
1985:26). Keith Hopkins (1978) estimates that by the end of the
Republic, slaves made up between 30 and 40 percent of the Italian
population, perhaps the highest proportion of any known society.

99. _Digest_ 9.2.11 pr., Ulpian in the 18^(th)book on the Edict.

100. The examples are from _Digest_ 47.2.36 pr., Ulpian in the 41^(st)
book on Sabinus, and _Digest_ 9.2.33 pr, Paulus’ second book to
Plautius, respectively.

101. See Saller (1984) on _domus_ versus _familia_. The word _familia_,
and its various later European cognates, _famille_ in French, _family_
in English, and so on, continued to refer primarily to a unit of
authority and not necessarily of kinship until at least the 18th century
(Stone 1968, Flandrin 1979, Duby 1982:220–23, Ozment 1983; Herlihy 1985)

102. Westbrook 1999:207 goes through the three known cases of this
really happening. It would seem that the father’s authority here was
considered identical to that of the state. If a father was found to have
executed his child illegitimately, he could be punished.

103. Or to enslave them. In fact the Law of the Twelve Tablets (III.1)
itself seems to be an attempt to reform or moderate even harsher
practices, as al-Wahid (Elwahed 1931:81–82) was perhaps the first to
point out.

104. Finley notes that the sexual availability of slaves “is treated as
a commonplace in the Graeco-Roman literature” (1980:143; see Saller
1987:98–99, Glancey 2006:50–57).

105. There is a lively debate about whether breeding slaves was ever
extensively practiced in Rome: one common theory of slavery (e.g.,
Meillassoux 1996, Anderson 1974) arguing that it is never profitable to
do so, and when a supply of new slaves is cut off, slaves will
ordinarily be converted into serfs. There seems no reason to weigh in on
this here, but for a summary, see Bradley 1987.

106. True, Roman citizens could not legally enslave one another; but
they could be enslaved by foreigners, and pirates and kidnappers rarely
put too fine a point on such things.

107. The Chinese emperor Wang Mang was so fastidious on this point, for
instance, that he once ordered one of his own sons put to death for the
arbitrary murder of a slave (Testart 1998:23.)

108. The _lex Petronia_. Technically it bans owners from ordering slaves
to “fight the wild beasts,” a popular public entertainment: “fight,”
though, is usually a euphemism, since those fighting hungry lions were
not provided with weapons, or obviously inadequate ones. It was only a
century later, under Hadrian (117–138 ad), that owners were forbidden to
kill their slaves, maintain private dungeons for them or practice other
cruel and excessive punishments. Interestingly, the gradual limitation
of the power of slave-owners was accompanied by increasing state power,
expansion of citizenship, but also the return of various forms of
debt-bondage and the creation of dependent peasantry (Finley 1972:92–93;
1981:164–65).

109. Thus Livy (41.9.11) notes in 177 bc the senate actually passed a
law to prevent Italians who were not Roman citizens from selling
relatives into slavery in this way in order to become citizens.

110. The phrase is preserved in the work of the elder Seneca
_(Controversias_ 4.7) and noted by Finley (1980:96), among others. There
is a detailed discussion in Butrica 2006:210–23.

111. Wirszubski 1950. On the etymology, see Benveniste 1963:262–72.
Similarly Kopytoff and Miers (1977) emphasize that in Africa, “freedom”
always meant incorporation into some kin group—only slaves were “free”
(in our sense) of all social relations.

112. Florentius in Justinian’s Institutes (1.5.4.1). Some suggest that
the word “natural” in the first sentence was only inserted in later
editions, perhaps in the fourth century. The position that slavery is a
product of force enshrined in law, contrary to nature, however, goes
back at least to the fourth century bc, when Aristotle (Politics
1253b20–23) explicitly takes issue with it (see Cambiano 1987).

113. Already in the that century, lawyers like Azo and Bracton began
asking: If this is true, wouldn’t that mean a serf is a free man too?
(Harding 1980:424 note 6; see also Buckland 1908:1, Watson 1987).

114. Ulpian wrote that “everyone was born free under the law of nature”
and that slavery was a result of the _ius gentium_ (“law of nations”),
the common legal usages of mankind. Some later jurists added that
property was originally common and the _ius gentium_ was responsible for
kingdoms, property, and so on (Digest 1.1.5). As Tuck notes (1979:19),
these were really scattered ideas, only systematized by Church thinkers
like Gratian much later, during the twelfth-century revival of Roman
law.

115. _Princeps legibus solutus est_ (“the sovereign is not bound by the
laws”), a phrase initially coined by Ulpian and repeated by Justinian
(1.3 pr.) This was a very new notion in the ancient world; the Greeks,
for instance, had insisted that while men could do as they liked with
their women, children, and slaves, any ruler who exploited their own
subjects in the same way was the definition of a tyrant. Even the basic
principle of modern sovereignty, that rulers hold the ultimate power of
life and death over their subjects (which modern heads of state still
hold in their power to grant pardons), was looked on with suspicion.
Similarly, under the Republic, Cicero argued that rulers who insisted on
holding the power of life and death were by definition tyrants, “even if
they prefer to be called kings” (De _Re Publica_ 3.23, Westbrook
1999:204.)

116. In the Chronicle of Walter of Guisborough (1957:216); see Clanchy
1993:2–5.

117. Aylmer 1980.

118. To be fair, a classical liberal would insist that this is the
logical conclusion with starting out from the notion of freedom as
active instead of passive (or as philosophers put it, that there are
“subjective rights”)—that is, seeing freedom not just as others’
obligations to allow us to do whatever the law or custom says we can do,
but to do anything that is not specifically forbidden, and that this has
had tremendous liberating effects. There is certainly truth in this. But
historically, it has been something of a side effect, and there are many
other ways to come to the same conclusion that do not require us to
accept the underlying assumptions about property.

119. Tuck 1979:49, cf. Tully 1993:252, Blackburn 1997:63–64.

120. Note here that in this period, the justification was not based on
any assumption of racial inferiority—racial ideologies came later—but
rather on the assumption that African laws were legitimate and should be
considered binding, at least on Africans.

121. I’ve made the argument that wage labor is rooted in slavery
extensively in the past—see e.g., Graeber 2006.

122. This is the reason, as C.B. MacPherson (1962) explained, that when
“human rights abuses” are evoked in the newspapers, it is only when
governments can be seen as trespassing on some victim’s person or
possessions—say, by raping, torturing, or killing them. The Universal
Declaration of Human Rights, like just about all similar documents, also
speaks of universal rights to food and shelter, but one never reads
about governments committing “human rights abuses” when they eliminate
price supports on basic foodstuffs, even if it leads to widespread
malnutrition, or for razing shantytowns or kicking the homeless out of
shelters.

123. One can trace the notion back as least as far back as Seneca, who
in the first century ad, argued that slaves could be free in their
minds, since force only applied to the “prison of the body” _(De
ben-eficiis_ 3.20)—this appears to have been a key point of transition
between the notion of freedom as the ability to form moral relations
with others, and freedom as an internalization of the master’s power.

124. See Roitman 2003:224 for one author who explicitly relates this to
debt. For objects as unique points in a human history, there is a vast
literature, but see Hoskins 1999, Graeber 2001.

125. One can tell how unusual slavery was by informants’ assumptions
that slaves would have no idea that this was to be their fate.

126. Significantly, at the very moment when his social existence was the
only existence he had left. The mass killing of slaves at the funerals
of kings, or grandees, has been documented from ancient Gaul, to Sumer,
China, and the Americas.

127. _Iliad_ 9:342–44.

128. Evans-Pritchard 1948:36; cf., Sahlins 1981. For a good example of
identification of kings and slaves, Feeley-Harnik 1982. Obviously,
everyone is well aware that kings do have families, friends, lovers,
etc—the point is that this is always seen as something of a problem,
since he should be king to all his subjects equally.

129. Regarding the influence of Roman law on the liberal tradition, it
is fascinating to note that the very earliest author we have on record
who laid out something like Smith’s model, where money, and ultimately
coinage, is invented as an aid to commerce, was another Roman jurist,
Paulus: _Digest_ 18.1.1.

130. But it has by no means been eliminated. (If anyone is inclined to
doubt this, I recommend they take a stroll through their neighborhood
ignoring all property rights, and see just how long it takes for the
weapons to come out.)


Chapter Eight

1. “Debt, n. An ingenious substitute for the chain and whip of the
slavedriver,” wrote the notorious cynic Ambrose Bierce (The _Devil’s
Dictionary_, 1911:49). Certainly for those Thai women who appeared at
Neil Bush’s door, the difference between having been sold by one’s
parents, and working off one’s parents’ debt contract, was as much a
technicality as it would have been two thousand years ago.

2. One of the few authors I know who’s confronted the question head-on
is Pierre Dockés (1979), who makes a convincing statement that it has to
do with the power of the state: at least, slavery as an institution was
briefly revived under the Carolingian empire and then vanished again
afterward. It is certainly interesting that since the nineteenth century
at least, the “transition from feudalism to capitalism” has become our
historical paradigm for epochal social change, and no one much addresses
the transition from ancient slavery to feudalism, even though there is
reason to believe that whatever is happening now may much more closely
resemble it.

3. Robin Blackburn makes this argument quite convincingly in _The Making
of New World Slavery_ (1997). There were some exceptions, notably the
Italian city-states. The story is of course more complicated than I’m
representing it: one reason for the hostility was that during much of
the Middle Ages, Europeans were largely victims of slave-raiders rather
than their beneficiaries, with many captives marketed in North Africa
and the Middle East.

4. The Aegean coins were stamped; the Indian, punched; and the Chinese,
cast. This suggests that we are not talking about diffusion here.
Speaking of Indian coins, for instance, one historian remarks: “If there
is one thing that seems clear from a punch-marked coin, it is that the
person who thought it up had never seen a Greek coin—or if he had seen
one, it had not impressed him. The punch-marked coin is made by an
entirely different metallurgical process” (Schaps 2006:9).

5. Pruessner (1928) was perhaps the first to point this out.

6. They appear to have been widely used by Old Assyrian merchants
operating in Anatolia (Veenhof 1997).

7. Powell (1978, 1979, 1999:14–18) provides an excellent assessment of
the evidence, emphasizing that Babylonians did not produce scales
accurate enough to measure the tiny amounts of silver they would have
had to use to make ordinary household purchases like fried fish or cords
of firewood in cash. He concludes that silver was largely used in
transactions between merchants. Market vendors therefore presumably
acted as they do in small-scale markets in Africa and Central Asia,
today, building up lists of trustworthy clients to whom they could
extend credit over time (e.g., Hart 1999:201, Nazpary 2001).

8. Hudson 2002:21–23, who hypothesizes that the time element was
important as merchants would presumably otherwise delay to employ the
funds as long as possible. See Renger 1984, 1994; Meiroop 2005.

9. I’m referring here to _Qirad_ and _Mudaraba_ arrangements, similar to
the ancient and Medieval Mediterranean _Commenda_ (Udovitch 1970, Ray
1997).

10. Herodotus 1.138.

11. Herodotus 3.102–5.

12. Mieroop 2002:63, 2005:29. He notes that Enmetena’s total grain
income in any one year was roughly 37 million liters, making the sum he
claims to be owed more than one thousand times his own palace’s annual
revenue.

13. Lambert 1971; Lemche 1979:16.

14. Hudson 1993 provides the most detailed overview of this literature.

15. Hudson 1993:20.

16. Grierson 1977:17, citing Cerny 1954:907.

17. Bleiberg 2002

18. One authority states categorically: “I do not know of debt-annulment
decrees issued by any Pharaoh” (Jasnow 2001:42), and adds that there is
no evidence for debt-bondage until the very late Demotic period. This is
the same period when Greek sources begin to speak of both.

19. VerSteeg 2002:199; see Lorton 1977:42–44.

20. This in certain ways resembles the legal loopholes created in both
the Medieval Christian and Islamic worlds, where interest was formally
banned: see chapter 10 below.

21. Diodorus Siculus 1.79. See Westermann 1955:50–51 for a comparison of
Greek and Egyptian sources on the subject.

22. The history of the dissemination of interest-bearing debt is only
beginning to be reconstructed. It does not yet appear in Ebla (c. 2500
bc), in Old or Middle Kingdom Egypt, or in Mycenaean Greece, but it
eventually becomes common in the Levant in the late Bronze Age, and also
in Hittite Anatolia. As we’ll see, it came quite late to Classical
Greece, and even later to places like Germany.

23. In Chinese historiography, in fact, this whole epoch is known as
“the feudal period.”)

24. The _Guanzi_, cited in Schaps 2006:20.

25. Yung-Ti (2006) has recently argued that they weren’t, though we
wouldn’t really know. Thierry (1992:39–41) simply assumes they were,
providing much evidence of their use both as units of account and means
of payment, but none of their use for buying and selling.

26. At any rate, cowries were definitely being used as the equivalent of
coins in later periods, and the government periodically either
suppressed their use or reintroduced them (Quiggin 1949, Swann 1950,
Thierry 1992:39–41, Peng 1994.) Cowrie money survived, alongside tally
sticks, as a common form of currency in Yunnan province in the far south
until relatively recent times (B. Yang 2002), and detailed studies
exist, but—as far as I can tell—only in Chinese.

27. Scheidel 2004:5.

28. Kan 1978:92, Martzloff 2002:178. I note in passing that a study of
the Inca _khipu_ system itself would itself be quite fascinating in this
regard; the strings were used to record both obligations we would
consider financial, and others we would consider ritual, since as in so
many Eurasian languages, the words “debt” and “sin” were the same in
Quechua as well (Quitter & Urton 2002:270).

29. L. Yang (1971:5) finds the first reliable literary reference to
loans at interest in the fourth century bc. Peng (1994:98–101) notes
that the earliest surviving records (the oracle bones and inscriptions)
do not mention loans, but there’s no reason they would; he also
assembles most of the available literary references, finds many
references to loans in early periods, and concludes that there’s no way
to know whether to take them seriously. By the Warring States period,
however, there is abundant evidence for local usurers, and all the usual
abuses.

30. _Yan tie lun I_ 2/4b2–6, in Gale (1967):12.

31. Guanzi (73 12), Rickett (1998:397)

32. So around 100 bc, “when flood and drought come upon them … those who
have grain sell at half value, while those who have not borrow at
exorbitant usury. Then paternal acres change hands; sons and grandsons
are sold to pay debts; merchants make vast profits, and even petty
tradesmen set up business and realize unheard of gains” (in Duyvendak
1928:32). Loans at interest are first documented in the fourth century
bc in China but may have existed before that (Yang 1971:5). For a
parallel case of child-selling for debt in early India, Rhys Davids
1922:218.


Chapter Nine

1. Jaspers 1949.

2. Parkes 1959:71.

3. Or, if one must be even more precise, we should probably end it in
632 ad, with the death of the Prophet.

4. Obviously Vedic Hinduism is earlier; I am referring to Hinduism as a
self-conscious religion, which is generally seen as having taken shape
in reaction to Buddhism and Jainism around this time.

5. The date used to be set much earlier, at 650 or even 700 bc, but
recent archaeology has called this into question. Lydian coins still
seem to be the earliest, though, as most of the others have been seem to
be the earliest though.

6. Prakash & Singh 1968, Dhavalikar 1974, Kosambi 1981, Gupta & Hardaker
1995. The latest accepted dates for the appearance of coinage in India,
based on radiocarbon analysis, is circa 400 bc (Erdosy 1988:115,
1995:113).

7. Kosambi (1981) notes that there seems to be a direct connection
between the first of these and Bronze Age Harappan cities: “even after
the destruction of Mohenjo Daro, which is entirely a trade city as shown
by its fine weights and poor weapons, the traders persisted, and
continued to use the very accurate weights of that period.” (ibid:91).
Given what we know of Mesopotamia, with which the Harappan civilization
was in close contact, it also seems reasonable to assume that they
continued to employ older commercial techniques, and, indeed,
“promissory notes” do appear as familiar practices in our earliest
literary sources, such as the Jakatas (Rhys Davids 1901:16, Thapar
1995:125, Fiser 2004:194), even if these are many centuries later. Of
course, in this case, the marks were presumably meant to confirm the
accuracy of the weight, to show that it hadn’t been further trimmed, but
the inspiration of earlier credit practices seems likely. Kosambi later
confirms this: “The marks would correspond to modern countersignatures
on bills or cheques cleared through business houses.” (1996:178–79)

8. Our first literary record of coinage in China is of a kingdom that
reformed its currency system in 524 bc—which means that it already had a
currency system, and presumably had for some time (Li 1985:372).

9. Schaps 2006:34. For a similar recent argument, Schoenberger 2008.

10.Of course the very first coins were of fairly high denominations and
quite possibly used for paying taxes and fees, and for buying houses and
cattle more than for everyday purchases (Kraay 1964, Price 1983, Schaps
2004, Vickers 1985). A real market society in Greece, for instance,
could only be said to exist when, as in the fifth century, ordinary
citizens went to the market carrying minuscule coins of stamped silver
or copper in their cheeks.

11. First proposed by Cook (1958), the explanation has since lost favor
(Price 1983, Kraay 1964, Wallace 1987, Schaps 2004:96–101; though cf.
Ingham 2004:100)—largely, on the argument that one cannot pay soldiers
with coins unless there are already markets with people willing to
accept the coins. This strikes me as a weak objection, since the absence
of coinage does not imply the absence of either money or markets; almost
all parties to the debate (e.g., Balmuth [1967, 1971, 1975, 2001) who
argues that irregular pieces of silver were already in wide use as
currency, and Le Rider (2001), Seaford (2004:318–37) or for that matter
Schaps (2004:222–35), who argue that they were not numerous enough to be
a viable everyday currency, seem to give much consideration to the
possibility that most market trade took place on credit. Anyway, as I’ve
noted earlier, it would be easy enough for the state to ensure that the
coins became acceptable currency simply by insisting that they were the
only acceptable means of payment for obligations to the state itself.

12. Most of the earliest known Greek bankers were of Phoenician descent,
and it’s quite possible that they first introduced the concept of
interest there (Hudson 1992).

13. Elayi & Elayi 1992.

14. Starr 1977:113; see Lee 2000.

15. It’s interesting to note that, to our knowledge, the great trading
nations did not produce much in the way of great art or philosophy.

16. The great exception was of course Sparta, which refused to issue its
own coinage but developed a system whereby aristocrats adopted a strict
military lifestyle and trained permanently for war.

17. Aristotle himself noted the connection when he emphasized that the
constitution of a Greek state could be predicted by the main army of its
military: aristocracies if they relied on cavalry (since horses were
very expensive), oligarchies in the case of heavy infantry (since armor
was not cheap), democracy in the case of light infantry or navies (since
anyone could wield a sling or row a boat) _(Politics_ 4.3.1289b33–44,
13.1297b16–24, 6.7.1321a6–14).

18. Keyt (1997:103) summarizing _Politics_ 1304b27–31.

19. Thucydides (6.97.7) claimed that 20,000 escaped from the mines in
421 bc, which is probably exaggerated, but most sources estimate at
least 10,000 for most of that century, generally working shackled and
under atrocious conditions (Robinson 1973).

20. Ingham 2004:99–100.

21. MacDonald 2006:43.

22. On Alexander’s armies monetary needs, Davies 1996:80 in turn, 83; on
his logistics more generally, Engels 1978. The figure 120,000 includes
not only actual troops but servants, camp-followers, and so forth.

23. Green 1993:366.

24. The Roman institution was called _nexum_, and we don’t know entirely
how it worked: i.e., whether it was a form of labor contract, whereby
one worked off the debt for a fixed term, or something more like African
pawn systems, where the debtor—and his or her children—served in
conditions roughly like those of a slave until redemption (see Testart
2002 for the possibilities). See Buckler 1895, Brunt 1974, Cornell
1994:266–67, 330–32.

25. Hence, most of the scandalous stories that sparked uprisings against
debt bondage centered on dramatic cases of physical or sexual abuse; of
course, once debt bondage was abolished and household labor was instead
supplied by slaves, such abuse was considered normal and acceptable.

26. The first bronze coins paid to soldiers seem to have been coined
around 400 bc (Scheidel 2006), but this was the traditional date
according to Roman historians.

27. What I am arguing flies in the face of much of the conventional
scholarly wisdom, summed up best perhaps by Moses Finley when he wrote
“in Greece and Rome the debtor class rebelled; whereas in the Near East
they did not”—and therefore reforms like those of Nehemiah were at least
minor, temporary palliatives. Near Eastern rebellion took a different
form; moreover, Greek and Roman solutions were both more limited and
more temporary than he supposed.

28. Ioannatou 2006 for a good example. Cataline’s conspiracy of 63 bc
was an alliance of indebted aristocrats and desperate peasants. On
continued Republican debt and land redistribution campaigns: Mitchell
1993.

29. Howgego makes this point: “If less is heard of debt under the
Principate it may well be because political stability removed the
opportunity for the expression of discontent. This argument is supported
by the way in which debt re-emerges as an issue at times of open revolt”
(1992:13).

30. Plutarch, _Moralia_, 828f—831a.

31. There is, needless to say, a vast and conflicting literature, but
probably the best source is Banaji (2001). He emphasizes in the late
empire, “debt was the essential means by which employers enforced
control over the supply of labour, fragmenting the solidarity of workers
and ‘personalizing’ relations between owners and employees” (ibid:205),
a situation he compares interestingly to India.

32. Kosambi 1966, Sharma 1968, Misra 1976, Altekar 1977:109–38.
Contemporary Indian historians, who refer to them as gana-sanghas
(“tribal assemblies”), tend to dismiss them as warrior aristocracies
supported by populations of helots or slaves, though of course, Greek
city-states could be described the same way.

33. In other words, they looked more like Sparta than like Athens. The
slaves were also collectively owned (Chakravarti 1985:48–49.) Again, one
has to wonder how much this was really the general rule, but I yield to
the predominant scholarly opinion on such matters.

34. _Arthasastra_ 2.12.27. See Schaps 2006:18 for a nice comparative
commentary.

35. Thapar 2002:34, Dikshitar 1948.

36. There were also taxes, of course, usually ranging from 1/6 to 1/4 of
total yield (Kosambi 1996:316; Sihag 2005), but taxes also served as a
way to bring goods to the market.

37. So Kosambi 1966:152–57.

38. And wage labor, two phenomena that, as so often in the ancient
world, largely overlapped: the common phrase for workers used in texts
from the period was _dasa-karmakara_, “slave-hireling” with the
assumption that slaves and laborers worked together and were barely
distinguishable (Chakravarti 1985). On the predominance of slavery, see
Sharma 1958, Rai 1981. The extent is contested, but early Buddhist texts
do seem to assume that any wealthy family would normally have domestic
slaves—which certainly wasn’t true in other periods.

39. Punch-marked coins were also eventually replaced, after Alexander’s
brief conquest of the Indus Valley and his establishment of Greek
colonists in Afghanistan, by Aegean-style coins, ultimately causing the
entire Indian tradition to disappear (Kosambi 1981, Gupta & Hardaker
1985.)

40. It’s referred to as the “Pillar Edict” (Norman 1975:16).

41. There’s a good deal of debate as to when: Schopen (1994) emphasizes
there is little evidence for substantial Buddhist monasteries until the
first century ad, perhaps three centuries later. This has a great deal
of bearing on monetarization too, as we’ll see.

42. “The private trader was regarded as a thorn _(kantaka)_, a public
enemy just short of a national calamity, by Arth. 4.2, taxed and fined
for malpractices of which many are taken for granted” (Kosambi
1996:243).

43. Those wishing to become monks had to first affirm that they were not
themselves debtors (just as they also had to promise they weren’t
runaway slaves); but there was no rule saying the monastery itself could
not lend money. In China, as we’ll see, providing easy credit terms for
peasants came to be seen as a form of charity.

44. Similarly, Buddhist monks are not allowed to see an army, if they
can possibly avoid it (Pacittiya, 48–51).

45. Lewis 1990.

46. Wilbur 1943, Yates 2002. The state of Qin, during the Warring States
period, not only allowed for army officers to be allocated slaves by
rank, but for merchants, craftsmen, and the “poor and idle” to
themselves be “confiscated as slaves” (Lewis 1990:61–62).

47. Scheidel (2006, 2007, 2009) has considered the matter at length and
concluded that Chinese currency took the unusual form that it did for
two maibn reasons: (1) the historical coincidence that Qin (which used
bronze coins) defeated Chu (which used gold) in the civil wars, and
subsequent conservatism, and (2) the lack of a highly paid professional
army, which allowed the Chinese state to act like the early Roman
republic, which also limited itself to bronze coins for peasant
conscripts—but unlike the Roman republic, was not surrounded by states
accustomed to other forms of currency.

48. Pythagoras was, as far as we know, the first to take the latter
course, founding a secret political society that for a while had control
over the levers of political power in the Greek cities of southern
Italy.

49. Hadot 1995, 2002. In the ancient world, Christianity was recognized
as a philosophy largely because it had its own forms of ascetic
practice.

50. On the Tillers: Graham 1979, 1994:67–110. They seem to have
flourished around the same time as Mo Di, the founder of Mohism (roughly
470–391 bc). The Tillers ultimately vanished, leaving behind mainly a
series of treatises on agricultural technology, but they had a
tremendous influence on early Taoism—which, in turn, became the favorite
philosophy for peasant rebels for many centuries to come, starting with
the Yellow Turbans of 184 ad. Eventually, Taoism was displaced by
messianic forms of Buddhism as the favorite ideology of rebellious
peasants.

51. Wei-Ming 1986, Graham 1989, Schwartz 1986.

52. Legend has it that after one Pythagorean mathematician discovered
the existence of irrational numbers, other members of the sect took him
on a cruise and dropped him overboard. For an extended discussion of the
relation of early Pythagoreanism (530–400 bc) to the rise of a cash
economy, see Seaford 2004:266–75).

53. At least if my own experience in Madagascar is anything to go on.

54. War is quite similar: it’s also an area in which it’s possible to
imagine everyone as playing a game where the rules and stakes are
unusually transparent. The main difference is that in war one does care
about one’s fellow soldiers. On the origins of our own notion of
“self-interest,” see chapter 11 below.

55. Not to be confused with the unrelated Confucian term _li_, meaning
“ritual” or “etiquette.” Later, _li_ became the word for “interest”—that
is, not only “self-interest,” but also “interest payment” (e.g., Cartier
1988:26–27). I should note that my argument here is slightly
unconventional. Schwartz (1985:145–51) notes that in Confucius, “profit”
has a purely pejorative meaning, and he argues that it was subversively
reinterpreted by Mo Di. I find it unlikely that Confucius represents
conventional wisdom at this time; while his writings are the earliest we
have on the subject, his position was clearly marginal for centuries
after his death. I am assuming instead that the Legalist tradition
reflected the common wisdom even before Confucius—or certainly, Mencius.

56. _Zhan Guo Ce_ (“Strategies of the Warring States”) no. 109, 7.175

57. _Annuals of Lü Buwei_, 8/5.4.

58. See Ames (1994) for a discussion of key terms: _si li_
(self-interest), _shi_ (strategic advantage), and _li min_ (public
profit).

59. Book of Lord Shang 947–48, Duyvendak 1928:65.

60. Kosambi’s translation (1965:142); the Encyclopedia Britannica
prefers “handbook on profit” (entry for “CĀrvĀka”); Altekar (1977:3),
“the science of wealth.”

61. Nag & Dikshitar 1927:15. Kosambi argues that the Mauryan polity was
thus based on a fundamental contradiction: “a moral law-abiding
population ruled by a completely amoral king” (1996:237). Yet such a
situation is hardly unusual, before or since.

62. Thucydides 5.85-113 (cf. 3.36–49). The event took place in 416 bc,
around the same time that Lord Shang and Kautilya were writing.
Significantly, Thucydides’ own objections to such behavior are not
explicitly moral but center on showing that it was not to the “long-term
profit” of the empire (Kallet 2001:19). On Thucydides’ own utilitarian
materialism more generally, see Sahlins 2004.

63. Mozi 6:7B, in Hansen 2000:137

64. Mencius 4.1, in Duyvendak 1928:76–77. He appears to be referring to
a distinction originally made by Confucius himself: “the superior person
understands what is right while the inferior person only understands
what is personally profitable” _(Analects_ 7.4.16).

65. The Mohist path—overtly embrace financial logic—was the less well
trodden. We’ve already seen how in India and Greece, attempts to frame
morality as debt went nowhere: even the Vedic principles are ostensibly
about liberation from debt, which was also, as we’ve seen, a central
theme in Israel.

66. Leenhardt 1979:164.

67. This interpretation does fly fairly directly in the face of the main
thrust of scholarship on the issue, which tends instead to emphasize the
“transcendental” nature of Axial Age ideas (e.g., Schwartz 1975,
Eisenstadt 1982, 1984, 1986, Roetz 1993, Bellah 2005).

68. The Greek system actually began with Fire, Air, and Water, and the
Indian with Fire, Water, and Earth, though in each case there were
numerous elaborations. The Chinese elemental system was fivefold: Wood,
Fire, Earth, Metal, Water.

69. In Christianity, at least in the Augustinian tradition, this is
quite explicit: the material world does not in any sense partake of God;
God is not in it; it was simply made by Him _(De civitate dei_ 4.
12)—this radical separation of spirit and nature being—according to
Henri Frankfort (1948:342–44)—a peculiarity of the Judaeo-Christian
tradition. That same Augustinian tradition, though, also drew on Plato
to insist that reason, on the other hand—the abstract principle which
allows us to understand such things, and which is entirely separate from
matter_—does_ partake of the divine (see Hoitenga 1991:112–14, for the
conflict in Augustine’s own ideas here).

70. Shell’s essay “The Ring of Gyges” (1978) has already been cited in
the last chapter, in my discussion of Plato; Seaford 1998, 2004.

71. This is based on the fact that Miletus was one of the cities, if not
the first city, to produce coins of small enough denominations that they
could be used for everyday transactions (Kraay 1964:67).

72. Heraclitus was from the nearby Ionian city of Ephesus and Pythagoras
originally from the Ionian island of Samos. After Ionia was incorporated
into the Persian empire, large numbers of Ionians fled to southern
Italy, which then became the center of Greek philosophy, again, at just
the period when the Greek cities there became thoroughly monetarized.
Athens became the center of Greek philosophy only in the fifth century,
which is also when Athens was militarily dominant and the Athenian “owl”
coinage became the main international currency of the Eastern
Mediterranean.

73. Or as Seaford (2004:208) puts it, echoing Anaximander’s description
of his primal substance, “a distinct, eternal, impersonal,
all-embracing, unlimited, homogeneous, eternally moving, abstract,
regulating substance, destination for all things as well as their
origin” (or, at least, “all things” that were available for purchase.)

74. Seaford 2004:136–46; see Picard 1975; Wallace 1987; Harris 2008a:10.
Purely “fiduciary” money is of course what a metallist would call “fiat”
or “token” money, or a Keynesian, “chartal money.” Despite Finley’s
arguments to the contrary (1980:141, 196), just about all ancient money
was fiduciary to some extent. It’s easy to see why coins would
ordinarily circulate at a higher face value than their weight in gold or
silver, since the price of the latter would tend to fluctuate, but the
moment the coin’s face value was lower than that of its metal content,
there would be no reason not to melt it down.

75. In the case of truly large states like the Roman or Mauryan empires,
inflation did eventually result, but the full effects were not felt for
at least a century (see Ingham 2002:101–4, Kessler & Temin 2008, Harris
2008b for some good discussions of the Roman situation.)

76. Seaford 2004:138–39.

77. I am partly inspired here by Marcel Mauss’s arguments about of the
concept of substance (Allen 1998).

78. Hence, as we’ll see Aristotle’s position that a coin was only a
social convention _(Nicomachean Ethics_ 1133a29–31) remained very much a
minority view in the ancient world. It did become the predominant view
later, in the Middle Ages.

79. He is known as PĀyĀsi in the Buddhist scriptures, Paesi in the Jaina
(see Bronkhorst 2007:143–159 for a good discussion of these earliest
Indian materialists; for the later materialist school, to which Kautilya
is said to belong, see Chattopadhyaya 1994. Jaspers (1951:135), writing
of India, notes the appearance of “all philosophical trends, including
skepticism and materialism, sophistry and nihilism”—a significant list,
since it’s obviously not a list of “all” philosophical trends at all,
but only the most materialist.

80. In _The Republic_ it is rejected out of hand. In India, as I’ve
argued, the Hindu tradition only appears to embrace it. Buddhists,
Jains, and other oppositional philosophies didn’t use the term at all.

81. Philo of Alexandria, writing around the time of Christ, says of the
Essenes: “not a single slave is to be found among them, but all are
free, exchanging services with each other, and they denounce the owners
of slaves, not merely for their injustice in outraging the law of
equality, but also for their impiety in annulling the statute of nature”
_(Quod omnis probus liber sit_ 79). The Therapeutae, another Jewish
group, group rejected all forms of property, but looked on slavery “to
be a thing absolutely and wholly contrary to nature, for nature has
created all men free” (De _Vita Contemplativa_ 70). The similarity to
Roman law ideas is notable. Jewish groups are unusually well documented;
if similar sects existed in, say, Thrace, or Numidia, we probably
wouldn’t know.

82. Later legend had it that his father was a king and he grew up in a
palace, but the Sakya “king” of the time was in fact a elected and
rotating position (Kosambi 1965:96).


Chapter Ten

1. Coins produced by the barbarian successor states generally did not
have a great deal of gold or silver in them; as a result they tended to
circulate only within the principality of the king or baron who issued
them and were largely useless for trade.

2. Dockés (1979:62–70) provides a good overview of the
situation—literally, since current understandings of the extent of Roman
slave estates in France are based largely on aerial photography. Over
time even the free communities largely ended up in debt peonage of one
sort or another, or bound to the land as serfs (in Latin, _coloni)_.

3. As we’ve seen, Kosambi saw Magadha as a peak of monetarization. R.S.
Sharma (2001:119–62) argues that coinage remained commonplace under the
Guptas (280 to 550 ad) but then abruptly disappeared almost everywhere
thereafter. However, even if he is right that the total number of coins
in circulation did not diminish until then, he himself points out
(ibid:143) that the total population of the Ganges Plain almost tripled
over this period, so even this would mark a steady decline.

4. For an overview: R.S. Sharma 1965, Kane 1968 III:411–61, Chatterjee
1971. Schopen (1994) especially emphasizes that the techniques grow more
sophisticated over the course of the Middle Ages, for instance,
developing bookkeeping techniques for combining compound interest with
partial repayments.

5. Documents on the regulation of monastic affairs pay a great deal of
attention to the details: how when the money was lent out, contracts
would be signed, sealed, and deposited in the temple before witnesses;
how a surety or pledge worth twice the amount of the loan should be
turned over, how “devout lay brothers” should be assigned to manage the
investment, and so forth (Schopen 1994).

6. From the Arab _dinar_, which in turn derives from the Roman
_denarius_. It is unclear whether such sums were actually paid in coins
at this point: one early monastic manual, for example, speaking of
objects that might be relegated to the Inexhaustible Treasuries and thus
put out at interest, mentions “gold and silver, whether in the form of
coins, finished or raw, in large or small quantities, pure or alloyed,
or whether in the form of utensils, finished or unfinished”
(MahĀsĀmghika Vinaya, in Gernet 1956 [1995:165]).

7. Fleet 1888: 260–62, as translated in Schopen 1994:532–33. One need
hardly remark on the irony of this emphasis on eternity emerging within
Buddhism, a religion founded on the recognition of the impermanence of
all worldly attachments.

8. The commercial loans are documented from an inscription at the West
Indian monastery at Karle (Levi 1938: 145; Gernet 1956 [1995:164];
Barreau 1961:444–47), the assemblies from later Tamil temples (Ayyar
1982:40–68, R.S. Sharma 1965.) It is not clear whether some of these
were commercial loans, or more like the later Buddhist custom of _jisa_
still current in Tibet, Bhutan, and Mongolia, where an individual, or
collective, or group of families wishing to support a specific ceremony
or, say, an educational project might receive a 500-rupee loan “in
perpetuity” and then be expected to provide 800 rupees a year to
organize the ceremony. The responsibilities are then inherited, though
the “loan” can be transferred (Miller 1961, Murphy 1961).

9. Kalhana, _Rajatarangini_ 7.1091–98; see Basham 1948, Riepe
1961:44n49.) The monks were apparently Ajivkas, who still existed at
this time.

10. Naskar 1996, R.S. Sharma 2001:45–66, on the Puranic description of
the “Kali age,” which seems to be the way later Brahmins referred to the
period from roughly Alexander’s reign to the early Middle Ages, a period
of insecurity and unrest when foreign dynasties ruled much of India, and
caste hierarchies were widely challenged or rejected.

11. Manusmrti 8.5.257. Significantly, the debt to other humans vanishes
entirely in these texts.

12. Manusmrti 8.5.270–72. A Sudra’s tongue would also be cut off for
insulting a member of the twice-born castes (8.270).

13. R.S. Sharma 1958, 1987, Chauhan 2003.

14. “A Sudra, though emancipated by his master, is not released from a
state of servitude, for a state which is natural to him, by whom can he
be divested?” (Manusmrti, YĀjñavalkya Smrti 8.5.419), or even “Sudras
must be reduced to slavery, either by purchase or without purchase,
because they were created by God for the sake or serving others
(8.5.413).

15. Kautilya allowed 60 percent for commercial loans, 120 percent “for
enterprises that involve journeys through forests,” and twice that for
those that involve shipping goods by sea _(Arthasastra_ 3.11; one later
code, YĀjñavalkya Smrti 2.38 follows this.)

16. YĀjñavalkya Smrti 2.37, Manusmrti 8.143, Visnusmrti 5.6.2, see Kane
1968 III:421.

17. R.S. Sharma 1965:68. Similarly, early law-codes specified that
anyone who defaulted on a debt should be reborn as a slave or even a
domestic animal in their creditor’s household: one later Chinese
Buddhist text was even more exact, specifying that for each eight wen
defaulted, one must spend one day as an ox, or for each seven, one day
as a horse (Zhuang Chun in Peng 1994:244n17)

18. Dumont (1966).

19. Gyan Prakash (2003:184) makes this point for the colonial period:
when one-time caste hierarchies began to be treated instead as matters
of debt bondage, subordinates turned into persons who had equal rights,
but whose rights were temporarily “suspended.”

20. To be fair, one could also argue that indebted peasants are also
likely to be in command of more resources, and thus be more capable of
organizing a rebellion. We know very little about popular insurrections
in Medieval India (though see Guha (1999). Palat (1986, 1988:205–15;
Kosambi 1996:392–93), but the total number of such revolts seems to have
been relatively low in comparison to Europe and certainly in comparison
to China, where rebellion was almost ceaseless.

21. “No one knows just how many rebellions have taken place in Chinese
history. From the official record there were several thousand incidents
within just three years from 613 to 615 ad, probably one thousand events
a year (Wei Z. ad 656: ch. “Report of the Imperial Historians”).
According to Parsons, during the period 1629–44, there were as many as
234,185 insurrections in China, averaging 43 events per day, or 1.8
outbreaks per hour” (Deng 1999:220).

22. Following Deng (1999).

23. Huang 1999:231.

24. These loans appear to have been an extension of the logic of the
state granaries, which stockpiled food; some to sell at strategic
moments to keep prices low, some to distribute free in times of famine;
some to loan at low interest to provide an alternative to usurers.

25. Huang op cit; cf. Zhuoyun & Dull 1980:22–24. For his complex
currency reforms: Peng 1994:111–14.

26. Generally, interest rates were set at a maximum of 20 percent and
compound interest was banned. Chinese authorities eventually also
adopted the Indian principle that interest should not be allowed to
exceed the principal (Cartier 1988:28; Yang 1971:92–103).

27. Braudel 1979; Wallerstein 1991, 2001.

28. I am here especially following the work of Boy Bin Wong (1997, 2002;
also Mielants 2001, 2007.) Granted, most Braudelans only see later
dynasties like the Ming as fully embodying this principle, but I think
it can be projected backwards.

29. So, for instance, while markets themselves were considered
beneficial, the government also systematically intervened to prevent
price fluctuations, stockpiling commodities when they were cheap and
releasing them if prices rose. There were periods of Chinese history
when rulers made common cause with merchants, but the result was usually
a major popular backlash (Deng 1999:146).

30. Pommeranz 1998, Goldstone 2002 for an introduction to the vast
literature on comparative standards of living. India was actually doing
rather well also for most of its history.

31. Zürcher 1958:282.

32. Gernet 1956 (1999: 241–42); for the following discussion see Gernet
1960, Jan 1965, Kieschnick 1997, Benn 1998, 2007.

33. Tsan-ning (919-1001 ad) quoted in Jan 1965:263. Others appealed to
the history of bodhisattvas and pious kings who had made gifts of their
own bodies, such as the king who, in time of famine, leapt to his death
to be transformed into a mountain of flesh, replete with thousands of
heads, eyes, lips, teeth, and tongues, which for ten thousand years only
grew larger no matter how much of it humans and animals ingested (Benn
2007:95, 108; cf. Ohnuma 2007).

34. Tu Mu, cited in Gernet 1956 (1995:245).

35. This might come as something of a surprise, since the phrase is used
so often in contemporary Western popular usage, “karmic debt” becoming
something of a New Age cliché. But it seems to strike a much more
intuitive chord with Euro-Americans than it ever did in India. Despite
the close association of debt and sin in the Indian tradition, most
early Buddhist schools avoided the concept—largely because it implied a
continuity of the self, which they saw as ephemeral and ultimately
illusory. The exception were the Sammitiya, called “personalists” as
they did believe in an enduring self, who developed the notion of
aviprĀāśa, whereby the results of good or bad actions—karma—“endure like
a sheet of paper on which a debt is inscribed” as an unconscious element
of the self that passes from one life to another (Lamotte 1997:22–24,
86–90; Lusthaus 2002:209–10). The idea might have died with that sect
had it not been taken up by the famous Mahayana philosopher NĀgĀrjuna,
who compared it to an “imperishable promissory note” (Kalupahana
1991:54–55, 249; Pasadika 1997). His MĀdhyamaka school in turn became
the Sanlun or “Three Treatise” school in China; the notion of karmic
debt was taken up in particular by the “Three Stages” or “Three Levels”
school created the monk Hsin-Hsing (540–94 ad) (Hubbard 2001).

36. _Commentary on the Dharma of the Inexhaustible Storehouse of the
Mahayana Universe_, as translated by Hubbard (2001:265), with a few
changes based on Gernet (1956 [1995:246]).

37. In Hubbord 2001:266.

38. Dao Shi, in Cole 1998:117. Cole’s book provides an excellent summary
of this literature (see also Ahern 1973, Teiser 1988, Knapp 2004, Oxfeld
2005). Some Medieval texts focus exclusively on the mother, others on
parents generally. Interestingly, the same notion of an infinite and
unpayable “milk-debt” to one’s mother also appears in Turkey (White
2004:75–76).

39. _Sutra for the Recompense of Gratitude_ cited in Baskind 2007:166.
My “four billion years” translates “kalpa,” which is technically 4.32
billion years. I also changed “them” for parents to “her” for mother
since the context refers to a man who cut his own flesh specifically for
his mother’s sake.

40. Chinese Buddhists did not invent the pawnshop, but they appear to
have been the first to sponsor them on a large scale. On the origins of
pawnbroking in general, see Hardaker 1892, Kuznets 1933. On China
specifically: Gernet 1956 [1995:170–73], Yang 1971:71–73, Whelan 1979.
In a remarkable parallel, the first “formal” pawnshops in Europe also
emerged from monasteries for similar purposes: the _monti di pieta_ or
“banks that take pity” created by the Franciscans in Italy in the
fifteenth century. (Peng 1994:245, also makes note of the parallel.)

41. Gernet 1956 [1995:142–86], Ch’en 1964:262–65; Collins 1986:66–71;
Peng 1994:243–45. It would seem that Taoist monasteries, which also
multiplied in this period, banned making loans (Kohn 2002:76), perhaps
in part to mark a distinction.

42. Gernet 1956 [1995:228], where he famously wrote, “the donors to the
Inexhaustible Treasuries were shareholders, not in the economic domain
but that of religion.” As far as I know, the only contemporary scholar
who has fully embraced the premise that this was indeed an early form of
capitalism is Randall Collins (1986) who sees similar monastic
capitalism in later Medieval Europe as well. The accepted Chinese
historiography has tended to see the first “shoots of capitalism”
developing later, in the Song, which was much less hostile to merchants
than other dynasties, followed by a full embrace of the market—but firm
rejection of capitalism—in the Ming and Qing. The key question is the
organization of labor, and in Tang times this remains somewhat opaque,
since even if statistics were available, which they’re not, it’s
difficult to know what terms like “serf,” “slave,” and “wage-laborer”
actually meant in practice.

43. Gernet 1956 [1995:116–39], Ch’en 1964:269–71, on land reclamation
and monastic slaves.

44. “It is claimed that the purpose of this generosity is to relieve the
poor and orphans. But in fact there is nothing to it but excess and
fraud. This is not a legitimate business” Gernet 1956 (1995:104–5, 211).

45. Gernet 1956 [1995:22].

46. See Adamek 2005, Walsh 2007.

47. This is probably why abstractions like Truth, Justice, and Freedom
are so often represented as women.

48. Marco Polo observed the practice in the southern province of Yunnan
in the thirteenth century: “But when they have any business with one
another, they take a round or square piece of stick, and split it in
two; and one takes one half and the other takes the other half. But
before they split it, they make two or three notches in it, or as many
as they wish. So, when one of them comes to pay another, he gives him
the money or whatever it is, and gets back the piece of stick the other
had” (Benedetto 1931:193). See also Yang 1971:92, Kan 1978, Peng
1994:320, 330, 508, Trombert 1995:12–15. Tallies of this sort seem,
according to Kan, to have preceded writing; and one legend claims that
the same man, a minister to the Yellow Emperor, invented both writing
and tally contracts simultaneously (Trombert 1995:13).

49. Graham 1960:179.

50. Actually the similarity was noticed in antiquity as well: Laozi
_(Daodejing_ 27) speaks of those who can “count without a tally, secure
a door without a lock.” Most famously, he also insisted “when wise men
hold the left tally pledge, they do not press their debtors for their
debts. Men of virtue hold on to the tally; men lacking virtue pursue
their claims” (stanza 79).

51. Or one might better say, turning them at one snap from monetary
debts to moral ones, since the very fact that we know the story implies
he was eventually rewarded (Peng 1994:100). It is probably significant
that the word _fu_, meaning “tally,” also could mean “an auspicious omen
granted to a prince as a token of his appointment by Heaven” (Mathews
1931:283). Similarly, Peng notes a passage from _Strategems of the
Warring States_, about a lord attempting to win popular support: “Feng
hurried to Bi, where he had the clerks assemble all those people who
owed debts, so that his tallies might be matched against theirs. When
the tallies had been matched, Feng brought forth a false order to
forgive these debts, and he burned the tallies. The people all cheered”
(ibid:100n9). For Tibetan parallels, see Uebach 2008.

52. Similar things happened in England, where early contracts were also
broken in half in imitation of tally sticks: the phrase “indentured
servant” derives from this practice, since these were contract laborers;
the word actually derives from the “indentations” or notches on the
tally stick used as a contract (Blackstone 1827 I:218).

53. L. Yang 1971:52; Peng 1994:329–31. Peng perceptively notes “this
method of matching tallies to withdraw cash was actually an outgrowth of
the process used in borrowing money, except that the movement over time
of loans was transformed into a movement over space” (1994:330).

54. They were called “deposit shops”—and L. Yang (1971:78–80) calls them
“proto-banks.” Peng (1994:323–27) notes something along these lines was
already operating, at least for merchants and travelers, under the Tang,
but the government had strict controls preventing bankers from
reinvesting the money.

55. The practice began in Sichuan, which had its own peculiar form of
cash, in iron, not bronze, and therefore much more unwieldy.

56. Peng 1994:508, also 515, 833. All this is very much like the token
money that circulated in much of Europe in the Middle Ages.

57. The most important scholarly exponent of this view is von Glahn
(1994, though Peng [1994] holds to something close), and it seems the
prevailing one among economists, popular and otherwise.

58. Diagram from MacDonald 2003:65.

59. One of the favorite images employed when remembering the rule of the
Legalists, under the much-hated First Dynasty, was that they constructed
great brass cauldrons, in which each law was openly and explicitly
spelled out—then used them to boil criminals alive.

60. See Bulliet 1979 (also Lapidus 2003:141–46) on the process of
conversion. Bulliet also emphasizes (ibid:129) that the main effect of
mass conversion was to make the ostensible justification of government,
as protector and expander of the faith, seem increasingly hollow. Mass
popular support for caliphs and political leaders only reemerged in
periods, like the Crusades or during the _reconquista_ in Spain, when
Islam itself seemed under attack; as of course, for similar reasons, it
has in much of the Islamic world today.

61. “Most of the time the lower circles paid their taxes through their
heads, and looked after themselves. Similarly the government received
the taxes and provided some sort of security, and apart from this,
occupied itself with matters of concern to itself: external war,
patronage of learning and the arts, a life of luxurious ostentation”
(Pearson 1982:54).

62. The proverb appears, attributed to the Prophet himself, in
al-Ghazali’s _Ihya’, kitab al-’Ilm_, 284, followed by a long list of
similar statements: “Sa’id Bin Musaiyab said, ‘When you see a religious
scholar visiting a prince, avoid him, for he is a thief.’ Al-Auza’i
said, ‘There is nothing more detestable to Allah than a religious
scholar who visits an official’ …” etc. This attitude has by no means
disappeared. A strong majority of Iranian ayatollahs, for example,
oppose the idea of an Islamic state, on the grounds that it would
necessarily corrupt religion.

63. Lombard 1947, Grierson 1960. This is often represented as a wise
policy of refusal to “debase” the coinage, but it might equally be read
as meaning that the caliph’s signature added no additional value. An
experiment with Chinese-style paper money in Basra in 1294 failed, as no
one was willing to accept money backed only by state trust (Ashtor
1976:257).

64. MacDonald 2003:64. Gradually this became unsupportable and Muslim
empires adopted the more typically Medieval _iqta’_ system, whereby
soldiers were granted the tax revenues from specific territories.

65. Neither have slaves been employed as soldiers since, except in
temporary and anomalous circumstance (e.g., by the Manchus, or in
Barbados).

66. It seems significant that (1) the “inquisition” of 832, the failed
Abbasid attempt to take control of the ulema; (2) the most important
mass conversion of the Caliphate’s subjects to Islam, peaking around
825–850; and (3) the definitive ascent of Turkish slave soldiers in
Abbasid armies, often dated to 838, all roughly corresponded in time.

67. Elwahed 1931:111–35. As he puts it (ibid:127), “the _inalienability
of liberty_ is one of the fundamental and uncontested principles of
Islam.” Fathers do not have the right to sell their children, and
individuals do not have the right to sell themselves—or at least, if
they do, no courts will recognize any resultant ownership claims. I note
that this is the diametrical opposite of the “natural law” approach that
later developed in Europe.

68. There is a certain controversy here: some scholars, including some
contemporary Muslim scholars opposed to the Islamic economics movement,
insist that _riba_, which is unequivocally condemned in the Koran, did
not originally refer to “interest” in general, but to a pre-Islamic
Arabian practice of fining late payment by doubling the money owed, and
that the blanket condemnation of interest is a misinterpretation (e.g.,
Rahman 1964, Kuran 1995). I am in no position to weigh in but, if true,
this would suggest that the ban on usury really emerged in Iraq itself
as part of the process of the creation of grassroots Islam, which would
actually reinforce my general argument.

69. The best records we have are actually from a community of Jewish
merchants in Geniza, in twelfth-century Egypt, who observed the ban on
interest even in dealings with one another. The one area where we
regularly hear of interest being charged is the one area where coercion
was also regularly employed: that is, in dealings with kings, viziers,
and officials, who often borrowed large sums of money at
interest—especially, but not exclusively, from Jewish or Christian
bankers—to pay their troops. Obliging a request for such an illegal loan
was a dangerous business, but refusing even more so (for Abbasid
examples, see Ray 1997:68–70, mainly drawing from Fischel 1937).

70. There were also a whole host of legal subterfuges (called _hiyal)_
that one might undertake if one were absolutely determined to charge
interest: for instance, buying one’s debtor’s house for the amount of
the loan, charging them rent for it, and then allowing them to buy it
back for the same sum; having one’s debtor agree to buy a certain
product monthly and sell it to one at a discount, and so forth. Some
schools of Islamic law banned these outright; others merely disapproved.
It used to be assumed that these methods were widely employed, since
most economic historians assumed interest to be a necessary element of
credit, but recent research provides no evidence that they were
especially common (for the older view: Khan 1929, for the new: Ray
1997:58–59).

71. Mez 1922:448, quoted in Labib 1969:89. Note that Basra, the city
where everyone in the market paid by check, was also the city where, a
century later, Mongol attempts to introduce government-issue paper money
were so doggedly resisted. The word _sakk_ is incidentally the origin of
the English “check.” The ultimate origins of _sakk_ are contested:
Ashtor (1972:555) suggests they were Byzantine; Chosky (1988), Persian.

72. Goitein (1966, 1967, 1973) provides a detailed summary of financial
practices among Jewish merchants in twelfth-century Egypt. Almost every
transaction involved credit to some degree. Checks, remarkably similar
even in appearance to the kind used today, were in common usage—though
sealed bags of metal coins were even more common in everyday
transactions.

73. Though apparently governments sometimes paid wages by check (Tag
El-Din 2007:69.) I am no doubt underplaying the government role in all
this: there were, for instance, attempts to set up central government
banks, and certainly usually a commitment in principle that the
government should enforce commercial standards and regulations. It
seems, however, that this rarely came to much in practice.

74. Udovitch 1970:71–74.

75. Sarakhsi in Udovitch 1975:11, who has a good discussion of the
issues involved. Likewise Ray 1997:59–60.

76. This should surely also be of interest to students of Pierre
Bourdieu, who made a famous argument, based on his study of Kabyle
society in Algeria, that a man’s honor in such a society is a form of
“symbolic capital,” analogous to but more important than economic
capital, since it is possible to turn honor into money but not the other
way around (Bourdieu 1977, 1990). True, the text above does not quite
say this, but one does wonder how much this is Bourdieu’s own insight,
and how much simply reflects the common sense of his informants.

77. Following K.N. Chaudhuri (1985:197). The expansion of Islam was
spearheaded by both Sufi brotherhoods and legal scholars; many merchants
doubled as either or both. The scholarly literature here is unusually
rich. See, for instance: Chaudhuri 1985, 1990; Risso 1995; Subrahmanyam
1996; Barendtse 2002; Beaujard 2005.

78. In Goody 1996:91.

79. M. Lombard 2003:177–79.

80. Burton’s translation; 1934 IV:2013.

81. And what’s more, officials employed their own person bankers, and
themselves made extensive use of credit instruments such as _suftaja_
both for transfer of tax payments, and the secreting away of ill-gotten
gains (Hodgson 1974 I:301, Udovitch 1975:8, Ray 1994:69–71.)

82. “For Mohammed this natural regulation of the market corresponds to a
cosmic regulation. Prices rise and fall as night follows day, as low
tides follow high, and price imposition is not only an injustice to the
merchant, but a disordering of the natural order of things” (Essid
1995:153).

83. Only very limited exceptions were made, for instance in times of
disaster, and then most scholars insisted it was always better to
provide direct relief to the needy than to interfere with market forces.
See Ghazanfar & Islahi 2003, Islahi 2004:31–32; for a fuller discussion
of Mohammed’s views on price formation, see Tuma 1965, Essid 1988, 1995.

84. Hosseini 1998:672, 2003:37: “Both indicate that animals, such as
dogs, do not exchange one bone for another.”

85. Hosseini 1998, 2003. Smith says he visited such a factory himself,
which may well be true, but the example of the eighteen steps originally
appears in the entry “Épingle” in Volume 5 of the French _Encyclopedie_,
published in 1755, twenty years earlier. Hosseini also notes that
“Smith’s personal library contained the Latin translations of some of
the works of Persian (and Arab) scholars of the medieval period”
(Hosseini 1998:679), suggesting that he might have lifted them from the
originals directly. Other important sources for Islamic precedents for
later economic theory include: Rodison 1978, Islahi 1985, Essid 1988,
Hosseini 1995, Ghazanfar 1991, 2000, 2003, Ghazanfar & Islahi 1997,
2003. It is becoming more and more clear that a great deal of
Enlightenment thought traces back to Islamic philosophy: Decartes’
_cogito_, for example, seems to derive from Ibn Sina (a.k.a. Avicenna),
Hume’s famous point that the observance of constant conjunctions does
not itself prove causality appears in Ghazali, and I have myself noticed
Immanuel Kant’s definition of enlightenment in the mouth of a magic bird
in the fourteenth-century Persian poet Rumi.

86. Tusi’s _Nasirean Ethics_, in Sun 2008:409.

87. Ghazanfar & Islahi 2003:58; Ghazanfar 2003:32–33.

88. So for example among Ghazali’s ethical principles, we find “the
buyer should be lenient when bargaining with a poor seller and strict
when transacting with a rich seller,” and “a person should be willing to
sell to the poor who do not have the means and should extend credit to
them without the expectation of repayment” (Ghazali _Ihya Ulum al Din
II_:79–82, cited in Ghazanfar & Islahi 1997:22)—the latter of course
recalling Luke 6:35.

89. Ghazali in Ghazanfar & Islahi 1997:27.

90. Ibid:32.

91. Ibid:32.

92. Ibid:35. On postmen in Medieval Islam: Goitein 1964. Ghazali’s
position here recalls and is no doubt influenced by Aristotle’s
_Nicomachean Ethics_ (1121b): that since money is a social convention
meant to facilitate exchange, diverting it into usury defies its
purpose; but its ultimate thrust is quite different, closer to Thomas
Aquinas’ argument that money is basically a measure and that usury
distorts it, and Henry of Ghent’s argument that “money is a medium in
exchange and not a terminus”—unsurprisingly, since Aquinas was likely
directly influenced by him (Ghazanfar 2000).

93. It’s hard to overstate this. Even the famous “Laffer Curve,” by
which the Reagan Administration in the 1980s tried to argue that cutting
taxes would increase government revenue by stimulating economic
activity, is often called the Khaldun-Laffer curve because it was first
proposed, as a general principle, in Ibn Khaldun’s 1377 _Muqaddimah_.

94. Goitein 1957 for the rise of the “Middle Eastern bourgeoisie.”

95. “Crying down” acted as a de facto tax increase, since one would now
need to pay more ecus to make up a tax rate fixed in shillings. Since
wages were fixed in pounds, shillings, and pence, this also had the
effect of raising their value, and hence it was usually popular. “Crying
up” by contrast had the effect of lowering the effective value of the
units of account. This could be useful to reduce a king’s—or his
allies’—personal debt measured in such units, but it also undercut the
income of wage-earners and those on any sort of fixed income and so was
often protested.

96. Langholm 1979, Wood 2002:73–76.

97. On the patristic literature on usury: Maloney 1983; Gordon 1989;
Moser 2000; Holman 2002:112–26; Jones 2004:25–30.

98. Matthew 5:42

99. St Basil of Caesarea, _Homilia II in Psalmum XIV_ (PG 29, 268–69).

100. op cit.

101. op cit.

102. Ambrose _De Officiis_ 2.25.89.

103. Ambrose _De Tobia_ 15:51. See Nelson 1949:3–5, Gordon 1989:114–118.

104. Though not entirely. It’s worthy to note that the main supply of
slaves to the empire at this time came from Germanic barbarians outside
the empire, who were acquired _either_ through war or debt.

105. “If each one,” he wrote, “after having taken from his personal
wealth whatever would satisfy his personal needs, would leave what was
superfluous to those who lack every necessity, there would be no rich or
poor” _(In Illiud Lucae_ 49D)—Basil himself had been born an aristocrat,
but he had sold off his landed estates and distributed the proceeds to
the poor.

106. _Homilia II in Psalmum XIV_ (PG 29, 277C). The reference is to
Proverbs 19.17.

107. _Summa_ 8.3.1.3: “since grace is freely given, it excludes the idea
of debt … In [no] sense does debt imply that God owes anything to
another creature.”

108. Clavero (1986) sees this as a basic conflict over the nature of the
contract, and hence the legal basis of human relations in European
history: usury, and by extension profit, was denounced, but rent, the
basis of feudal relations, was never challenged.

109. Gordon 1989:115. “What is commerce,” wrote Cassiodorus (485–585),
“except to want to sell dear that which can be bought cheap? Therefore
those merchants are detestable who, with no consideration of God’s
justice, burden their wares more with perjury than value. Them the Lord
evicted them from the Temple saying, ‘Do not make my Father’s house into
a den of thieves” (in Langholm 1996:454).

110. On the Jewish legal tradition concerning usury, see Stein 1953,
1955; Kirschenbaum 1985.

111. Poliakov 1977:21.

112. Nelson (1949) assumed that the “Exception” was often held to apply
to relations between Christians and Jews, but Noonan (1957:101–2)
insists that it was mainly held to apply only to “heretics and infidels,
particularly the Saracens,” and by some, not even to them.

113. Up to 52 percent with security, up to 120 percent without (Homer
1987:91).

114. Debtor’s prisons, in the sense of prisons exclusively for debtors,
existed in England only after 1263, but the imprisonment of debtors has
a much longer history. Above all, Jewish lenders seem to have been
employed as the means of transforming virtual, credit money into
coinage, collecting the family silver from insolvent debtors, and
turning it over to royal mints. They also won title to a great deal of
land from defaulting debtors, most of which ended up in the hands of
barons or monasteries (Singer 1964; Bowers 1983; Schofield & Mayhew
2002).

115. Roger of Wendower, _Flowers of History_ 252–53. Roger doesn’t name
the victim; in some later versions his name is Abraham, in others,
Isaac.

116. Matthew Prior, in Bolles 1837:13.

117. Or even, for that matter, Nietzsche’s fantasies of the origins of
justice in mutilation. Where one was a projection onto Jews of
atrocities actually committed against Jews, Nietzsche was writing in an
age where actual “savages” were often punished by similar tortures and
mutilations for failure to pay their debts to the colonial tax
authorities, as later became a most notorious scandal in Leopold’s
Belgian Congo.

118. Mundill (2002), Brand (2003).

119. Cohn 1972:80.

120. Peter Cantor, in Nelson 1949:10–11.

121. It was a firm from Cahors, for instance, who received the property
of the English Jews when the latter were finally expelled in 1290.
Though for a long time, Lombards and Cahorsins were themselves dependent
on royal favor and hardly in much better position than the Jews. In
France, the kings seemed to expropriate and expel Jews and Lombards
alternately (Poliakov 1977:42).

122. Noonan 1957:18–19; Le Goff 1990:23–27.

123. There are two sorts of wealth-getting, as I have said; one is a
part of household management, the other is retail trade: the former
necessary and honorable, while that which consists in exchange is justly
censured; for it is unnatural, and a mode by which men profit from one
another. The most hated sort, and with the greatest reason, is usury,
which makes a profit out of money itself, and not from the natural
object of it. For money was intended to be used in exchange, but not to
increase at interest. And this term “interest” _(tokos)_, which means
the birth of money from money, is applied to the breeding of money
because the offspring resembles the parent. “Wherefore of all modes of
getting wealth this is the most unnatural” (Aristotle, _Politics_
1258b). The Nicomachean Ethics (1121b) is equally damning. For the best
general analysis of the Aristotelean tradition on usury: Langholm 1984.

124. Noonan 1957:105–12; Langholm 1984:50.

125. The technical term for the lost income is _lucrum cessans:_ see
O’Brien 1920: 107–10, Noonan 1957:114–28, Langholm 1992:60–61; 1998:75;
Spufford 1989:260.

126. As German merchants also did in the Baltic cities of the Hanseatic
alliance. On the Medici bank as a case in point, see de Roover 1946,
1963, Parks 2005.

127. The situation in Venice, a pioneer in these matters, is telling:
there was no merchant guild, but only craft guilds, since guilds were
essentially created as protection against the government, and in Venice,
the merchants _were_ the government (MacKenney 1987; Mauro 1993:259–60).

128. They were accused of both heresy and sodomy: see Barber 1978.

129. One cannot “prove” the Islamic inspiration of European bills of
exchange, but considering the amount of trade between the two sides of
the Mediterranean, denying it seems bizarre. Braudel (1995:816–17)
proposes that the idea must have reached Europe through Jewish
merchants, who we know to have long been using them in Egypt.

130. On bills of exchange: Usher 1914; de Roover 1967; Boyer-Xambeu,
Deleplace, and Gillard 1994; Munro 2003b:542–46; Denzel 2006. There were
innumerable currencies, any of which might at any time be “cried up,”
“cried down,” or otherwise fluctuate in value. Bills of exchange also
allowed merchants to effectively engage in currency speculation, and
even get around usury laws, once it became possible to pay for one bill
of exchange by writing a different bill of exchange, due in several
months’ time, for a slightly higher sum. This was called “dry exchange”
(de Roover 1944), and over time the Church became increasingly
skeptical, causing yet another round of financial creativity to get
around the laws. It’s worthy of note that the rates of interest on such
commercial loans were generally quite low: twelve percent at the
highest, in dramatic contrast to consumer loans. This is a sign of the
increasingly lower risk of such transactions (see Homer 1987 for a
history of interest rates).

131. Lane 1934.

132. “In very many respects, such as the organization of slave labor,
management of colonies, imperial administration, commercial
institutions, maritime technology and navigation, and naval gunnery, the
Italian city-states were the direct forerunners of the Portuguese and
Spanish empires, to the shaping of which the Italians contributed so
heavily, and in the profits of which they so largely shared” (Brady
1997:150).

133. They appear to have used Greek serfs at first, and sometimes Arabs
captured in the Crusades, and only later, Africans. Still, this was the
economic model that was eventually transported by Portuguese merchants
to Atlantic islands like the Canaries, then eventually to the Caribbean
(Verlinden 1970, Phillips 1985:93–97, Solow 1987, Wartburg 1995).

134. Scammell 1981:173–75.

135. Spufford 1988:142

136 On the notion of adventure: Auerbach 1946, Nerlich 1977.

137. Duby (1973) makes this point. The “round table” was originally a
type of tournament, and especially in the 1300s, it became common to
make such tournaments explicit imitations of King Arthur’s court, with
knights entering the contests taking on roles from them: Galahad,
Gawain, Bors, etc.

138. Also at a time when technological changes, especially the invention
of the crossbow and the rise of professional armies, were beginning to
render knights’ role in combat increasingly irrelevant (Vance 1973).

139. Kelly 1937:10.

140. See Schoenberger 2008 for a recent and compelling take: comparing
the role of war mobilization in creating markets in Greece and Rome to
Western Europe in the High Middle Ages.

141. Wolf 1954.

142. A point originally made by Vance (1986:48). The similarity is more
obvious in the German poet Wolfram von Eschenbach’s _Parzifal_, written
perhaps twenty years later, in which knights “roam freely over Spain,
North Africa, Egypt, Syria, to Baghdad, Armenia, India, Ceylon” (Adolf
1957:113)—and Islamic references are legion (Adolf 1947, 1957)—that is,
areas known to Europeans of the time only through trade. The fact that
actual merchants, on those rare occasions when they appear, are never
sympathetic characters has little bearing.

143. Wagner, _Die Wibelungen: Weltgeschichte aus der Sage_ (1848)—which
in English is “World History as Told in Saga.” I am taking my account of
Wagner’s argument from another wonderful, if sometimes extravagant,
essay by Marc Shell called “Accounting for the Grail” (1992:37–38).
Wagner’s argument is really more complicated: it centers on the failed
attempt by the Holy Roman Emperor Frederick Barbarossa to subdue the
Italian city-states and the abandonment of his principle that property
can only flow from the king; instead, we have the rise of mercantile
private property, which is echoed by financial abstraction.

144. Shell sees the Grail as a transformation of the older notion of the
cornucopia or inexhaustible purse in an age “just beginning to be
acquainted with checks and credit”—noting the connection of the legend
with the Templars, and fact that Chretien—whose name means
“Christian”—was likely, for that reason, to have been a converted Jew.
Wolfram also claimed that he got the legend from a Jewish source (Shell
1992:44–45).

145. Even China was often split and fractured. Just about all the great
empire-building projects of the Middle Ages were the work not of
professional armies, but of nomadic peoples: the Arabs, Mongols, Tatars,
and Turks.

146. _Nicomachean Ethics_ 1133a29–31.

147. He compares money not only to a postman, but also, to a “ruler,”
who also stands outside society to govern and regulate our interactions.
It’s interesting to note that Thomas Aquinas, who might have been
directly influenced by Ghazali (Ghazanfar 2000), did accept Aristotle’s
argument that money was a social convention that humans could just as
easily change. For a while, in the late Middle Ages, this became the
predominant Catholic view.

148. As far as I know, the only scholar to have pointed out the
connection is Bernard Faure, a French student of Japanese Buddhism:
Faure 1998:798, 2000:225.

149. Later still, as cash transactions became more common, the term was
applied to small sums of cash offered as down-payment, rather in the
sense of English “earnest money.” On _symbola_ in general: Beauchet
1897; Jones 1956:217; Shell 1978:32–35.

150. Descat 1995:986.

151. Aristotle _On Interepretation_ 1.16–17. Whitaker (2002:10) thus
observes that for Aristotle, “the meaning of a word is fixed by
convention, just as the importance attached to a tally, token, or ticket
depends on agreement between the parties concerned.”

152. _Nicomachean Ethics_ 1133a29–31.

153. But they believed that these formulae summed up or “drew together”
the essence of those secret truths that the Mysteries
revealed—“symbolon,” being derived the verb _symballein_, meaning “to
gather, bring together, or compare.”

154. Müri 1931, Meyer 1999. The only knowledge we have of such _symbola_
comes from Christian sources; Christians later adopted their own
symbolon, the Creed, and this remained the primary referent of the term
“symbol” throughout the Middle Ages (Ladner 1979).

155. Or pseudo-Dionysius, since the real Dionysius the Areopagite was a
first-century Athenian converted to Christianity by St. Paul.
Pseudo-Dionysius’ works are an attempt to reconcile neo-Platonism, with
its notion of philosophy as the process of the liberation of the soul
from material creation and its reunification with the divine, with
Christian orthodoxy. Unfortunately, his most relevant work, _Symbolic
Theology_, has been lost, but his surviving works all bear on the issue
to some degree.

156. In Barasch 1993:161.

157. Pseudo-Dionysius, _On the Celestial Hierarchy_ 141A–C. On
Dionysius’ theory of symbolism in general, and its influence, see
Barasch 1993:158–80, also Goux 1990:67, Gadamer 2004:63–64.

158. He calls them, like communion, “gifts that are granted to us in
symbolic mode.” _On the Celestial Hierarchy_ 124A.

159. Mathews 1934:283. Compare the definition of symbolon:

A. _tally_, i.e. each of two halves or corresponding pieces of a
knucklebone or other object, which two guest friends, or any two
contracting parties, broke between them, each party keeping one piece,
in order to have proof of the identity of the presenter of the other.

B. of other devices having the same purpose, e.g. a seal-impression on
wax,

1. any token serving as proof of identity

2. guarantee

3. token, esp. of goodwill After Liddell and Scott 1940:1676–77, without
the examples, and with the Greek words for “knucklebone” and
“guest-friend” rendered into English.

160. Rotours 1952:6. On _fu_ (or _qi_, another name for debt tallies
that could be used more generally for “tokens”) more generally: Rotours
1952, Kaltenmark 1960, Kan 1978, Faure 2000:221–29: Falkenhausen 2005.

161. There is a curious tension here: the will of heaven is also in a
certain sense the will of the people, and Chinese thinkers varied on
where they placed the emphasis. Xunzi, for instance, assumed that the
authority of the king is based on the confidence of the people. He also
argued that while confidence among the people is maintained by contracts
ensured by the matching of tally sticks, under a truly just king, social
trust will be such that such objects will become unnecessary (Roetz
1993:73–74).

162. Kohn 2000:330. Similarly in Japan: Faure 2000:227.

163. In the _Encyclopedia of Taoism_ they are described as “diagrams,
conceived as a form of celestial writing, that derive their power from
the matching celestial counterpart kept by the deities who bestowed
them” (Bokenkamp 2008:35). On Taoist _fu:_ Kaltenmark 1960; Seidel 1983;
Strickmann 2002:190–91; Verellen 2006; on Buddhist parallels, see Faure
1998; Robson 2008.

164. Sasso 1978; the origins of the yin-yang symbol remain obscure and
contested but those Sinologists I’ve consulted find this plausible. The
generic word for “symbol” in contemporary Chinese is _fúhào_, which is
directly derived from fu.

165. Insofar as I’m weighing in on the “Why didn’t the Islamic world
develop modern capitalism?” debate, then, it seems to me that both
Udovitch’s argument (1975:19–21) that the Islamic world never developed
impersonal credit mechanisms, and Ray’s objection (1997:39–40) that the
ban on interest and insurance was more important, carry weight. Ray’s
suggestion that differences in inheritance laws might play a role also
deserves investigation.

166. Maitland 1908:54.

167. Davis 1904.

168. In the Platonic sense: just as any particular, physical bird we
might happen to see on a nearby fruit tree is merely a token of the
general idea of “bird” (which is immaterial, abstract, angelic), so do
the various physical, mortal individuals who join together to make up a
corporation become an abstract, angelic Idea. Kantorowicz argues that it
took a number of intellectual innovations to make the notion of the
corporation possible: notably, the idea of the aeon or aevum, eternal
time, that is, time that lasts forever, as opposed to the Augustinian
eternity which is outside of time entirely and was considered the
habitation of the angels, to the revival of the works of Dionysius the
Areopagite (1957:280–81).

169. Kantorowicz 1957:282–83.

170. Islamic law, for instance, not only did not develop the notion of
fictive persons, but steadfastly resisted recognizing corporations until
quite recently (Kuran 2005).

171. Mainly Randall Collins (1986:52–58), who also makes the comparison
with China; cf. Coleman 1988.

172. See Nerlich 1987:121–24.


Chapter Eleven

1. On English wages, see Dyer 1989; on English festive life, there is a
vast literature, but a good recent source is Humphrey 2001. Silvia
Federici (2004) provides a compelling recent synthesis.

2. For a very small sampling of more recent debates over the “price
revolution,” see Hamilton 1934, Cipolla 1967, Flynn 1982, Goldstone
1984, 1991, Fisher 1989, Munro 2003a, 2007. The main argument is between
monetarists who continue to argue that increase in the amount of specie
is ultimately responsible for the inflation, and those who emphasize the
role of rapid population increase, though most specific arguments are
considerably more nuanced.

3. Historians speak of “bullion famines”—as most active mines dried up,
such gold and silver that wasn’t sucked out of Europe to pay for eastern
luxuries was increasingly hidden away, causing all sorts of difficulties
for commerce. In the 1460s, the shortage of specie in cities like Lisbon
had been so acute that merchant ships visiting with cargoes full of
wares often had to return home without selling anything (Spufford
1988:339–62).

4. Brook 1998. Needless to say, I’m simplifying enormously: another
problem was the growth of landlordism, with many smallholders falling in
debt to landlords for inability to pay. As members of the
ever-increasing royal family and other favored families gained tax
exemptions from the state, the tax burden on smallholders became so
heavy that many felt forced to sell their lands to the powerful families
in exchange for tenancy agreements to free those lands from taxes.

5. Chinese historians count 77 different “miners’ revolts” during the
1430s and ‘40s (Harrison 1965:103–4; cf. Tong 1992:60–64; Gernet
1982:414). Between 1445 and 1449 these became a serious threat as silver
miners under a rebel leader named Ye Zongliu made common cause with
tenant farmers and the urban poor in overpopulated Fujian and Shaxian,
sparking an uprising that spread to a number of different provinces,
seizing a number of cities and expelling much of the landed gentry.

6. Von Glahn (1996:70–82) documents the process. Gernet (1982:415–16)
documents how between 1450 and 1500, most taxes became payable in
silver. The process culminated in the “single lash of the whip” method:
tax reforms put into place between 1530 and 1581 (Huang 1974, see
Arrighi, Hui, Hung and Seldon 2003:272–73).

7. Wong 1997, Pomeranz 2000, Arrighi 2007, among many others who make
this point.

8. Pomeranz 2000:273.

9. The value of silver in China (as measured in gold) remained, through
the sixteenth century, roughly twice what it was in Lisbon or Antwerp
(Flynn & Giráldez 1995, 2002).

10. von Glahn 1996b:440; Atwell 1998.

11. Chalis 1978:157.

12. China had its own “age of exploration” in the early fifteenth
century, but it was not followed by mass conquest and enslavement.

13. It’s possible that they were wrong. Generally populations did
decline by 90 percent even in areas where no direct genocide was taking
place. But in most places, after a generation or so, populations started
recovering; in Hispaniola and many parts of Mexico and Peru, around the
mines, the ultimate death rate was more like 100 percent.

14. Todorov 1984:137–38; for the original, Icazbalceta 2008:23–26.

15. One historian remarks: “By the close of the sixteenth century
bullion, primarily silver, made up over 95 percent of all exports
leaving Spanish America for Europe. Nearly that same percentage of the
indigenous population had been destroyed in the process of seizing those
riches” (Stannard 1993:221).

16. Bernal Díaz 1963:43.

17. Bernal Díaz: the quote is a synthesis of the Lockhart translation
(1844 II:120) and Cohen translation (1963:412), though these appear to
be based on slightly different originals.

18. Bernal Díaz op cit.

19. Cortés 1868:141.

20. Most of the conquistadors had similar stories. Balboa came to the
Americas to flee his creditors; Pizarro borrowed so heavily to outfit
his expedition to Peru that after early reverses, it was only the fear
of debtor’s prison that prevented his return to Panama; Francisco de
Montejo had to pawn his entire Mexican possessions for an
eight-thousand-peso loan to launch his expedition to Honduras; Pedro de
Alvarado too ended up deeply in debt, finally throwing everything into a
scheme to conquer the Spice Islands and China—on his death, creditors
immediately tried to put his remaining estates to auction.

21. e.g., Pagden 1986.

22. Gibson 1964:253. All this is disturbingly reminiscent of global
politics nowadays, in which the United Nations, for example, will urge
poor countries to make education free and available to everyone, and
then the International Monetary Fund (which is, legally, actually a part
of the United Nations) will insist that those same countries do exactly
the opposite, imposing school fees as part of broader “economic reforms”
as a condition of refinancing the country’s loans.

23. Following William Pietz (1985:8), who studied early merchant
adventurer’s accounts of West Africa; though Todorov (1984:129–31) on
the very similar perspective of the conquistadors.

24. Some did go bankrupt—for instance, one branch of the Fuggers. But
this was surprisingly rare.

25. Martin Luther, _Von Kaufshandlung und Wucher_, 1524, cited in Nelson
1949:50.

26. In Luther’s time the main issue was a practice called _Zinskauf_,
technically rent on leased property, which was basically a disguised
form of interest-bearing loan.

27. In Baker 1974:53–54. The reference to Paul is in Romans 13:7.

28. He argued that the fact that Deuteronomy allows usury under any
circumstances demonstrates that this could not have been a universal
“spiritual law,” but was a political law created for the specific
ancient Israeli situation, and therefore, that it could be considered
irrelevant in different ones.

29. And in fact, this is what “capital” originally meant. The term
itself goes back to Latin _capitale_, which meant “funds, stock of
merchandise, sum of money, or money carrying interest” (Braudel
1992:232). It appears in English in the mid–sixteenth century largely as
a term borrowed from Italian bookkeeping techniques (Cannan 1921,
Richard 1926) for what remained when one squared property, credits, and
debts; though until the nineteenth century, English sources generally
preferred the word “stock”—in part, one suspects, because “capital” was
so closely associated with usury.

30. Nations that, after all, also practiced usury on one another: Nelson
1949:76.

31. Ben Nelson emphasized this in an important book, _The Idea of Usury:
From Tribal Brotherhood to Universal Otherhood_.

32. Midelfort 1996:39.

33. Zmora 2006:6–8. Public financing at this period largely meant
disguised interest-bearing loans from the minor nobility, who were also
the stratum from which local administrators were drawn.

34. On church lands: Dixon 2002:91. On Casimir’s gambling debts: Janssen
1910 IV:147. His overall debt rose to half a million guilders in 1528,
and over three quarters of a million by 1541 (Zmora 2006:13n55.)

35. He was later accused of conspiring with Count Wilhelm von Henneburg,
who had gone over to the rebels, to become secular Duke of the
territories then held by the Bishop of Wurzburg.

36. From “Report of the Margrave’s Commander, Michel Gross from
Trock-au,” in Scott & Scribner 1991:301. The sums are based on a promise
of 1 florin per execution, ½ per mutilation. We do not know if Casimir
ever paid this particular debt.

37. For some relevant accounts of the revolt and repression: Seebohm
1877:141–45; Janssen 1910 IV:323–26; Blickle 1977; Endres 1979; Vice
1988; Robisheaux 1989:48–67, Sea 2007. Casimir is said to have
ultimately settled into exacting fines, eventually demanding some
104,000 guldens in compensation from his subjects.

38. Linebaugh (2008) makes a beautiful analysis of this sort of
phenomenon in his essay on the social origins of the Magna Carta.

39. It is telling that despite the endless reprisals against commoners,
none of the German princes or nobility, even those who openly
collaborated with the rebels, was held accountable in any way.

40. Muldrew 1993a, 1993b, 1996, 1998, 2001; cf. MacIntosh 1988; Zell
1996, Waswo 2004, Ingram 2006, Valenze 2006, Kitch 2007. I find myself
strongly agreeing with most of Muldrew’s conclusions, only qualifying
some: for instance, his rejection of MacPherson’s possessive
individualism argument (1962) strikes me as unnecessary, since I suspect
that the latter does identify changes that are happening on a deeper
structural level less accessible to explicit discourse (see Graeber
1997).

41. Muldrew (2001:92) estimates that in c. 1600, eight thousand London
merchants might have possessed as much as one-third of all the cash in
England.

42. Williamson 1889; Whiting 1971; Mathias 1979b; Valenze 2006:34–40.

43. Gold and silver were a very small part of household wealth:
inventories reveal on average fifteen shillings of credit for every one
in coin (Muldrew 1998).

44. This principle of a right to livelihood is key to what E.P. Thompson
famously called “moral economy of the crowd” (1971) in
eighteenth-century England, a notion that Muldrew (1993a) thinks can be
applied to these credit systems as a whole.

45. Stout 1742:74–75, parts of the same passage are cited in Muldrew
1993a:178, and 1998:152.

46. To be more precise, either piety (in the Calvinist case) or good
natured sociality (in the case of those that opposed them in the name of
older festive values)—in the years before the civil war, many parish
governments were divided between the “godly” and “good honest men” (Hunt
1983:146)

47. Shepherd 2000, Walker 1996; for my own take on “life-cycle service”
and wage labor, see, again, Graeber 1997.

48. Hill 1972:39–56, Wrightson & Levine 1979, Beier 1985.

49. Muldrew 2001:84.

50. For a classic statement on the connection of Tudor markets,
festivals, and morality, see Agnew (1986).

51. Johnson 2004:56–58. On the two conceptions of justice: Wrightson
1980. Bodin’s essay was widely read. It drew on Aquinas’ view of love
and friendship as prior to the legal order, which, in turn, harkens back
to Aristotle’s _Nicomachean Ethics_, which reached Europe through Arab
sources. Whether there was also a direct influence from the Islamic
sources themselves we do not know, but considering the degree of general
mutual engagement (Ghazanfar 2003) it seems likely.

52. Gerard de Malynes’s _Maintenance of Free Trade_ (1622), cited in
Muldrew 1998:98, also Muldrew 2001:83.

53. Chaucer is full of this sort of thing: the Wife of Bath has much to
say about conjugal debts (e.g., Cotter 1969). It was really in the
period of about 1400–1600 that everything came to be so framed as debt,
presumably reflecting the first stirrings of possessive individualism,
and attempts to reconcile it to older moral paradigms. Guth (2008), a
legal historian, thus calls these centuries “the age of debt,” one which
was then replaced after 1600 by an “age of contract.”

54. Davenant 1771:152.

55. Marshall Sahlins (1996, 2008) has been emphasizing the theological
roots of Hobbes for some time. Much of the following analysis draws on
his influence.

56. Hobbes himself doesn’t use the term “self-interest” but does speak
of “particular,” “private,” and “common” interests.

57. _De L’Esprit_ 53, cited in Hirschman 1986:45. Exploring the contrast
between Shang’s “profit” and Helvétius’ “interest” would be a telling
history in itself. They are not the same concept.

58. “Interest” (from _interesse)_ comes into common usage as a euphemism
for usury in the fourteenth century, but it only comes to be used in its
more familiar, general sense in the sixteenth. Hobbes doesn’t use
“self-interest,” though he speaks of “private” and “common” interests;
but that term was already current, having appeared in the work of
Machiavelli’s friend Francesco Guicciadini in 1512. It becomes
commonplace in the eighteenth century (see Hirschman 1977, 1992,
especially chapter 2, “on the concept of interest”; Dumont 1981; Myers
1983, Heilbron 1998).

59. Sée (1928:187) notes that until around 1800, “interesse” was the
common word for “capital” in French; in English the preferred word was
“stock.” It is curious to note that Adam Smith, for one, actually
returns to the Augustinian usage, “self-love,” in his famous passage
about the butcher and the baker _(Wealth of Nations_ 1.2.2).

60. Beier 1985:159–63; cf. Dobb 1946:234. Consorting with gypsies was
also a capital crime. In the case of vagrancy, justices found it so
difficult to find anyone willing to press charges against vagrants that
they were eventually forced to reduce the penalty to public whipping.

61. In Walker 1996:244.

62. Helmholtz 1986, Brand 2002, Guth 2008.

63. Helmholz 1986, Muldrew 1998:255, Schofield & Mayhew 2002, Guth
2008).

64. Stout 1742:121.

65. “The horrors of the Fleet and Marshalsea were laid bare in 1729. The
poor debtors were found crowded together on the ‘common side,’—covered
with filth and vermin, and suffered to die, without pity, of hunger and
jail fever … No attempt was made to distinguish the fraudulent from the
unfortunate debtor. The rich rogue—able, but unwilling to pay his
debts—might riot in luxury and debauchery, while his poor unlucky
fellow-prisoner was left to starve and rot on the ‘common side’ ”
(Hallam 1866 V:269–70.)

66. I do not want to argue that the more familiar narrative of
“primitive accumulation,” of the enclosure of common lands and rise of
private property, the dislocation of thousands of one-time cottagers who
became landless laborers, is false. I simply highlight a less familiar
side of the story. It’s especially helpful to highlight it because the
degree to which the Tudor and Stuart periods were actually marked by a
rise of enclosures is a heated matter of debate (e.g., Wordie 1983). The
use of debt to split communities against themselves is meant in the same
vein as Silvia Federici’s (2004) brilliant argument about the role of
witchcraft accusations in reversing popular gains of the late Middle
Ages and opening the way to capitalism.

67. “Personal credit received a bad press in the eighteenth century. It
was frequently said that it was wrong to go into debt simply to pay for
everyday consumption goods. A cash economy was celebrated and the
virtues of prudent housekeeping and parsimony extolled. Consequently
retail credit, pawnbroking, and moneylending were all attacked, with
both borrowers and lenders the targets” (Hoppit 1990:312–13.)

68. _Wealth of Nations_ 1.2.2.

69. Muldrew makes this point: 1993:163.

70. _Theory of Moral Sentiments_ 4.1.10.

71. “The man who borrows in order to spend will soon be ruined, and he
who lends to him will generally have occasion to repent of his folly. To
borrow or to lend for such a purpose, therefore, is in all cases, where
gross usury is out of the question, contrary to the interest of both
parties; and though it no doubt happens sometimes that people do both
the one and the other; yet, from the regard that all men have for their
own interest, we may be assured that it cannot happen so very frequently
as we are sometimes apt to imagine” _(Wealth of Nations_ 2.4.2). He does
occasionally acknowledge the existence of retail credit, but he grants
it no significance.

72. Reeves 1999. Reeves, like Servet (1994, 2001) shows that many were
aware of the variability of money-stuffs: Puffendorf, for example, made
a long list of them.

73. When we attribute value to gold, then, we simply recognize this. The
same argument was usually invoked to solve the old Medieval puzzle about
diamonds and water: Why is it that diamonds are so expensive, though
useless, and water, which is useful in all sorts of ways, hardly worth
anything at all? The usual solution was: diamonds are the eternal form
of water. (Galileo, who objected to the entire premise, at one point
suggested that those who make such claims should really be turned into
statues. That way, he suggested, in inimitable Renaissance style,
everyone would be happy, since (1) they would be eternal, and (2) the
rest of us would no longer have to listen to their stupid arguments.)
See Wennerlind 2003, who notes, interestingly, that most European
governments employed alchemists in the seventeenth century in order to
manufacture gold and silver for coins; it’s only when these schemes
definitively failed that the governments moved to paper currency.

74. Kindleberger 1984; Boyer-Xambeu, Deleplace, & Gillard 1994; Ingham
2004:171. Rather, this path eventually led to the creation of stock
markets: the first public bourses, in fifteenth-century Bruges and
Antwerp, began not by trading shares in joint-stock ventures, which
barely existed at the time, but by “discounting” bills of exchange.

75. Usher (1934, 1944) originally introduced the distinction between
“primitive banking,” where one simply lends out what one has, and
“modern banking,” based on some sort of fractional reserve system—that
is, one lends more than one has, thus effectively creating money. This
would be another reason why we have now moved to something other than
“modern banking”—see below.

76. Spufford 1988:258, drawing on Usher 1943:239–42. While deposit notes
were used, private bank notes, based on credit, only appear quite
late—from London goldsmiths, who also acted as bankers, in the
seventeenth and eighteenth centuries.

77. See Munro 2003b for a useful summary.

78. MacDonald 2006:156.

79. Tomas de Mercado in Flynn 1978:400.

80. See Flynn 1979; Braudel 1992:522–23; Stein & Stein 2000: 501–05,
960–62; Tortella & Comín 2002. The number of _juros_ in circulation went
from 3.6 million ducats in 1516 to 80.4 million in 1598.

81. The most famous exponent of this position was Nicholas Barbon
(1690), who argued that “money is a value made by law” and a measure in
just the same manner as inches or hours or fluid ounces. He also
emphasized that most money was credit anyway.

82. Locke (1691:144) also cited in Caffentzis 1989:46–47, which remains
the most insightful summary of the debate and its implications. Compare
Perlman & McCann 1998:117–20; Letwin 2003:71–78; Valenze 2006:40–43.

83. We tend to forget that the materialism of the Marxist tradition is
not some radical departure—Marx was, like Nietzsche, taking bourgeois
assumptions (though in his case, different ones) and pushing them in
directions that would outrage their original proponents. Anyway, there
is good reason to believe that what we now call “historical materialism”
is really Engels’ addition to the project—Engels being himself nothing
if not bourgeois in background and sensibilities (he was a stalwart of
the Cologne stock exchange).

84. Macaulay 1886:485—the original essay was published in the Spectator,
March 1, 1711.

85. _Faust_ II, Act 1—see Shell 1992, Binswanger 1994 for a detailed
analysis. The connection with alchemy is revealing. When in 1300 Marco
Polo had remarked that the Chinese emperor “seemed to have mastered the
art of alchemy” in his ability to turn mere paper into something as good
as gold, this was clearly meant as a joke; by the seventeenth century
most European monarchs actually did employ alchemists to try to produce
gold from base metals; it was only their failure that led to the
adoption of paper money (Wennerlend 2003).

86. It’s not as if suspicions about money didn’t exist—but they tended
to focus, instead, on moral and metaphysical issues (e.g., “the theft of
time”).

87. Said to have been given at a talk at the University of Texas in
1927, but in fact, while the passage is endlessly cited in recent books
and especially on the internet, it cannot be attested to before roughly
1975. The first two lines appear to actually derive from a British
investment advisor named L.L.B. Angas in 1937: “The modern Banking
system manufactures money out of nothing. The process is perhaps the
most astounding piece of sleight of hand that was ever invented. Banks
can in fact inflate, mint and unmint the modern ledger-entry currency”
(Angas 1937:20–21). The other parts of the quote are probably later
inventions—and Lord Stamp never suggested anything like this in his
published writings. A similar line, “the bank hath benefit of all
interest which it creates out of nothing” attributed to William
Patterson, the first director of the Bank of England, is likewise first
attested to only in the 1930s, and is also almost certainly apocryphal.

88. Joint-stock corporations were created in the beginning of the
colonial period, with the famous East India Company and related colonial
enterprises, but they largely vanished during the period of the
industrial revolution and were mainly revived only at the end of the
nineteenth century, and then principally, at first, in America and
Germany. As Giovanni Arrighi (1994) has pointed out, the heyday of
British capitalism was marked by small family firms and high finance; it
was America and Germany, who spent the first half of the twentieth
century battling over who would replace Great Britain as hegemon, that
introduced modern bureaucratic corporate capitalism.

89. MacKay 1854:52.

90. MacKay 1854:53–54.

91. Spyer 1997.

92. Prakash 2003:209–16.

93. Hardenburg & Casement 1913; the story has been analyzed most
famously, and insightfully, by Mick Taussig (1984, 1987).

94. Encyclopedia Britannica, 11^(th) edition (1911): entry for
“Putumayo.”

95. As Taussig notes (1984:482), when the head of the company was later
asked what he actually meant by “cannibal” he said, simply, that it
meant the Indians refused to trade with anybody else.

96. This is a point demonstrated in great detail in an important book by
Yann Moulier-Boutang (1997), which unfortunately has never been
translated into English.

97. Davies 1975:59. “Indentured” comes from the “indentations” or
notches on a tally again, since these were widely used as contracts for
those who, like most indentured servants, couldn’t read (Blackstone 1827
I:218).

98. Immanuel Wallerstein (1974) provides the classic analysis of this
“second serfdom.

99. This was true, incidentally, across the class spectrum: everyone was
expected to do this, from lowly milkmaids and apprentices to “ladies in
waiting” and knight’s pages. This was one reason, incidentally, why
indentured-service contracts did not seem like much of a jump in the
seventeenth century: they were simply lengthening the term of contracted
employment from one to five or seven years. Even in Medieval times there
were also adult day-laborers, but these were often considered
indistinguishable from simple criminals.

100. The very word “proletariat” in a way alludes to this, as it’s taken
from a Roman term for “those who have children.”

101. C.L.R. James 1938; Eric Williams 1944.

102. “Many devices were available by which businessmen economized in the
use of cash in wage payments—payment could be made only at long
intervals; payment might consist in giving claims on others (truck
payment, tickets or vouchers to authorize purchasing from shops, etc.,
the provision of private notes and tokens)”—Mathias 1979a:95.

103. Actually the full list is: “cabbage, chips, waxers, sweepings,
sockings, wastages, blessing, lays, dead men, onces, primage, furthing,
dunnage, portage, wines, vails, tinge, buggings, colting, rumps, birrs,
fents, thrums, potching, scrapings, poake, coltage, extra, tret, tare,
largess, the con, nobbings, knockdown, boot, tommy, trimmings, poll,
gleanings, lops, tops, bontages, keepy back, pin money” (Linebaugh
1993:449; see also Linebaugh 1982, Rule 1986:115–17).

104. Tebbutt 1983:49. On pawnbroking in general: Hardaker 1892, Hudson
1982, Caskey 1994, Fitzpatrick 2001.

105. Linebaugh 1993: 371–404.

106. Usually in order to conclude that today, of course, we are living
in an entirely different world, because clearly that’s not true any
more. It might help here to remind the reader that Marx saw himself as
writing a “critique of political economy”—that is, of theory and
practice of economics of his day.

107. See the Lockhart translation of Bernal Díaz (Díaz 1844 II:396),
which gives several versions of the story, drawn from different sources.

108. Clenninden 1991:144.

109. It is on these grounds that Testart distinguishes slavery owing to
gambling, where the gambler stakes his own person, and debt slavery,
even if these are ultimately gambling debts. “The mentality of the
gambler who directly stakes his person in the game is closer to that of
the warrior, who risks losing his life in war or being taken into
slavery, than to that of the poor person willing to sell himself to
survive” (Testart 2002:180).

110. This is incidentally why complaints about the immorality of
deficits are so profoundly disingenuous: since modern money effectively
_is_ government debt, if there was no deficit, the results would be
disastrous. True, money can also be generated privately, by banks, but
there would appear to be limits to this. This is why U.S. financial
elites, led by Alan Greenspan, panicked in the late 1990s when the
Clinton administration began to run budget surpluses; the Bush tax cuts
appear to have been designed specifically to ensure that the deficit was
maintained.

111. Wallerstein 1989.

112. 1988:600.

113. Britain passed its first bankruptcy law in 1542.

114. This is no doubt what Goethe was getting at when he had Faust,
specifically, tell the emperor to pay his debts with IOUs. After all, we
all know what happened to him when his time came due.

115. Sonenscher (2007) gives a long and detailed history of these
debates.

116. One might trace a religious element here: in the time of Augustus,
a group of religious cultists in the Middle East conceived the idea that
fire was about to come from the sky and consume the planet. Nothing
seemed less likely at the time. Leave them in charge of a corner of the
world for two thousand years, they figure out a way to do it. But still,
this is clearly part of a larger pattern.


Chapter Twelve

1. I was first put on to the significance of the date by fellow
anthropologist Chris Gregory (1998: 265–96; also Hudson 2003a). U.S.
citizens had not been able to cash in dollars for gold since 1934. The
analysis that follows is inspired by both Gregory and Hudson.

2. One plausible-sounding version, which cites rather small amounts of
bullion, can be found at: www.rediff.com/money/2001/nov/17wtc.htm. For a
more entertaining, fictional version:
www.rense.com/general73/confess.htm.

3. “The Federal Reserve Bank of New York: the Key to the Gold Vault”
(newyorkfed.org/education/addpub/goldvaul.pdf).

4. As a minor aside, I remember from the time also reading news reports
noting that there were, in fact, a number of expensive jewelry shops in
the arcades directly beneath the Towers, and that all the gold in them
did in fact disappear. Presumably they were pocketed by rescue workers,
but considering the circumstances, it would seem there were no serious
objections—at least, I’ve never heard anything about the matter being
further investigated, let alone prosecuted.

5. It’s no coincidence, certainly, that William Greider decided to name
his great history of the Federal Reserve (1989) _The Secrets of the
Temple_. This is actually how many of its own officials privately
describe it. He quotes one: “The System is just like the Church … It’s
got a pope, the chairman; and a college of cardinals, the governors and
bank presidents; and a curia, the senior staff. The equivalent of the
laity is the commercial banks … We even have different orders of
religious thought like Jesuits and Franciscans and Dominicans only we
call them pragmatists and monetarists and neo-Keynesians” (ibid:54).

6. This is hardly a new claim, and it rests in part on the Braudelian
(world-systems) school, for instance, the recent work of Mielants
(2007). For a more classically Marxist version developing the connection
since Nixon’s time, see Custers 2007. For a more mainstream neoclassical
treatments of the connection, see MacDonald & Gastman 2001, MacDonald
2006.

7. Senator Fullbright, in McDermott 2008:190.

8. I note that this flies directly in the face of the intent of the
United States Constitution (1.8.5), which specifies that only Congress
was relegated the power “to coin money, [and] regulate the value
thereof”—no doubt at the behest of the Jeffersonians, who were opposed
to creating a central bank. The United States still observes the letter
of the law: United States coins are issued directly by the Treasury.
United States paper money, while signed by the head of the Treasury, is
not issued by the Treasury but by the Federal Reserve. They are
technically banknotes, though as with the Bank of England, one bank is
granted a monopoly in issuing them.

9. For those who don’t know how the Fed works: technically, there are a
series of stages. Generally the Treasury puts out bonds to the public,
and the Fed buys them back. The Fed then loans the money thus created to
other banks at a special low rate of interest (“the prime rate”), so
that those banks can then lend at higher ones. In its capacity as
regulator of the banking system, the Fed also establishes the fractional
reserve rate: just how many dollars these banks can “lend”—effectively,
create—for every dollar they borrow from the Fed, or have on deposit, or
can otherwise count as assets. Technically this is 10 to 1, but a
variety of legal loopholes allow banks to go considerably higher.

10. Which does raise the rather interesting question of what its gold
reserves are actually for.

11. Indeed, perhaps the greatest compromise to United States global
power in recent years is the fact that there is now one place—the region
of China facing Taiwan—where air defenses are now so dense and
sophisticated that the United States Air Force is no longer certain that
it can penetrate at will. The inability to blow up Osama bin Laden is,
of course, the most dramatic limit to this power.

12. Or, to put the money in the United States stock market, which
ultimately has a similar effect. As Hudson notes, “American diplomats
have made it clear that to buy control of U.S. companies or even to
return to gold would be viewed as an unfriendly act” (2002a:7), so,
unless they want to move out of dollars entirely, which would be
considered an even more unfriendly act, there is little alternative. As
to how “unfriendly” acts might be received: see below.

13. Hudson 2002a:12.

14. As many have remarked, the three countries that switched to the euro
around this time—Iraq, Iran, and North Korea—were precisely those
singled out by Bush as his “Axis of Evil.” Of course we can argue about
cause and effect here. It’s also significant that the core euro-using
states such as France and Germany uniformly opposed the war, while U.S.
allies were drawn from euro-skeptics like the UK.

15. For a few representative takes on the relation of the dollar and
empire: from a neoclassical economic perspective, Ferguson (2001, 2004),
from a radical Keynesian perspective, Hudson (2003a), from a Marxist
one, Brenner (2002).

16. Even the CIA now ordinarily refers to such arrangements as
“slavery,” though technically debt peonage is different.

17. Compare this to the deficit/military chart above, on page 366—the
curve is effectively identical.

18. See dailybail.com/home/china-warns-us-about-debt-monetization.html,
accessed December 22, 2009. The story is based on a piece from the _Wall
Street Journal_, “Don’t Monetize the Debt: The president of the Dallas
Fed on inflation risk and central bank independence” (Mary Anastasia
O’Grady, _WSJ_, May 23, 2009.) I should add that in popular usage
nowadays, “to monetize the debt” is generally used as a synonym for
“printing money” to pay debt. This usage has become almost universal,
but it’s not the original sense of the term, which is to turn the debt
itself into money. The Bank of England did not print money to pay the
national debt; it turned the national debt itself into money. Here too
there is a profound argument going on about the nature of money itself.

19. The arrangement is sometimes referred to as Bretton Woods II
(Dooley, Folkerts-Landau & Garber 2004, 2009): effectively, an agreement
since the 1990s at least to use various unofficial means to keep the
dollar’s value artificially high, and East Asian currencies—particularly
the Chinese—artificially low, in order to expedite cheap Asian exports
to the United States. Since real wages in the United States have either
stagnated or retreated continually since the 1970s, this, and the
accumulation of consumer debt, is the only reason living standards in
the United States have not precipitously declined.

20. On Zheng He, see Dreyer 2006, Wade 2004, Wake 1997. On the tribute
trade in general: Moses 1967, Yü 1967, Hamashita 1994, 2003; Di Cosmo &
Wyatt 2005.

21. The argument here follows Arrighi, Hui, Hung and Selden 2003, some
elements of which were echoed in Arrighi’s last work, _Adam Smith in
Beijing_ (2007).

22. Japan of course was something of an exception, since it had arguably
achieved something like First World status even before this.

23. Keynes 1936:345.

24. See www.irle.berkeley.edu/events/spring08/feller/

25. The key legislation was the “Depository Institutions Deregulation
and Monetary Control Act” of 1980, which struck down all federal usury
laws: ostensibly, in reaction to the rampant inflation of the late
1970s, though of course they were never restored when inflation was
brought back under control, as it has in the last quarter-century. It
left state interest ceilings in place, but institutions like credit-card
companies were allowed to observe the laws of the state in which they
are registered, no matter where they operated. This is why most are
registered in South Dakota, which has no maximum interest rate.

26. The first is from Thomas Friedman (1999) in a cocky and vacuous book
called _The Lexus and the OIive Tree_, the second from Randy Martin
(2002) in a book of the same name.

27. In America this “universal otherness” is accomplished above all
through racism. This is why most small retailing in the United States is
conducted on ethnic lines: say, Korean grocers or dry-cleaners, who pool
credit with one another, whose clients, however, are sufficiently
socially distant that there is no question of extending credit outside,
or even expecting basic relations of trust—since they themselves
ordinarily expect electricians, locksmiths, contractors of various sorts
who provide services to at least attempt to shaft them. Essentially the
market across racial or ethnic lines becomes one where everyone is
assumed to be Amalek.

28. Gilder 1981:266, cited in Cooper 2008:7. Cooper’s essay is a
brilliant exploration of the relation between debt imperialism—a phrase
she seems to have coined, inspired by Hudson—and evangelical
Christianity, and it is heartily recommended. See also Naylor 1985.

29. Robertson 1992:153. In Cooper again: op cit.

30. Atwood 2008:42.

31. This is, incidentally, also the best response to conventional
critiques of the poor as falling into debt because they are unable to
delay gratification—another way in which economic logic, with all its
human blind spots, skews any possible understanding of “consumers’ ”
actual motivations. Rationally, since CDs yield around 4 percent
annually, and credit cards charge 20 percent, consumers should save as a
cushion and only go into debt when they absolutely have to, postponing
unnecessary purchases until there’s a surplus. Very few act this way,
but this is rarely because of improvidence (can’t wait to get that
flashy new dress) but because human relations can’t actually be put off
in the same way as imaginary “consumer purchases”: one’s daughter will
only be five once, and one’s grandfather has only so many years left.

32. There are so many books on the subject that one hesitates to cite,
but a couple of outstanding examples are Anya Kamentz’s _Generation
Debt_ (2006), and Brett William’s _Social History of the Credit Trap_
(2004). The larger point about demands for debt as a form of class
struggle is in large part inspired by the Midnight Notes collective, who
argue that, however paradoxically, “neoliberalism has thrown open a new
dimension of struggle between capital and the working class within the
domain of credit” (2009:7). I have followed this analysis to a degree,
but tried to move away from the economistic framing of human life as
“reproduction of labor” that hobbles so much Marxist literature—the
emphasis on life beyond survival might be distantly Vaneigem-influenced
(1967), but largely falls back on my own work on value theory (Graeber
2001).

33. Elyachar 2002:510.

34. See for instance, “India’s micro-finance suicide epidemic,” Soutik
Biswas, BBC News South Asia, 16 December 2010,
http.bbc.co.uk/news/world-south-asia-11997571

35. I have observed this first hand on any number of occasions in my
work as an activist: police are happy to effectively shut down trade
summits, for example, just to ensure that there’s no possible chance
that protestors can feel they have succeeded in doing so themselves.

36. In practice, it mainly consists of “interest-free” banking
arrangements that pay lip service to the notion of profit-sharing but in
reality operate in much the same way as any other bank. The problem is
that if profit-sharing banks are competing with more conventional ones
in the same marketplace, those who anticipate that their enterprises
will yield high profits will gravitate toward the ones offering
fixed-interest loans, and only those who anticipate lower profits will
turn to the profit-sharing option (Kuran 1995:162). For a transition to
no-interest banking to work, it would have to be total.

37. Under the Caliphate, to guarantee the money supply; in China,
through systematic intervention to stabilize markets and prevent
capitalistic monopolies; later, in the United States and other North
Atlantic republics, through allowing the monetization of its own debt.

38. True, as I showed in chapter 5, economic life will always be a
matter of clashing principles, and thus might be said to be incoherent
to a certain extent. Actually I don’t think this is in any way a bad
thing—at the very least, it’s endlessly productive. The distortions born
of violence strike me as uniquely insidious.

39. von Mises 1949:540–41. The original German text was published in
1940 and presumably composed a year or two previous.

40. Ferguson 2007:iv.

41. I can speak with some authority here since I was myself born of
humble origins and have advanced myself in life almost exclusively
through my own incessant labors. I am well known by my friends to be a
workaholic—to their often justifiable annoyance. I am therefore keenly
aware that such behavior is at best slightly pathological, and certainly
in no sense makes one a better person.



BIBLIOGRAPHY


Abraham, Roy Clive. 1933. _The Tiv People_. Lagos: Government Printer.

Abu Lughod, Janet. 1989. _Before European Hegemony_ Oxford: Oxford
University Press.

Adamek, Wendi L. 2005. “The Impossibility of the Given: Representations
of Merit and Emptiness in Medieval Chinese Buddhism.” _History of
Religions_ 45 (2): 135-180.

Adams, Robert McC,. C. Lamberg-Karlovsky, William L. Moran. 1974. “The
Mesopotamian Social Landscape: The View from the Frontier.” _Bulletin of
the American Schools of Oriental Research. Supplementary Studies_ No.
20, Reconstructing Complex Societies: An Archaeological Colloquium, pp.
1-20.

Adkins, Arthur W. H. 1972. _Moral Values and Political Behaviour in
Ancient Greece: From Homer to the End of the Fifth Century_. New York:
Norton.

Adolf, Helen. 1947. “New Light on Oriental Sources for Wolfram’s
Parzival and Other Grail Romances.” PMLA 62 (2): 306-324.

_____. 1957. “Christendom and Islam in the Middle Ages: New Light on
‘Grail Stone’ and ‘Hidden Host.’ ” _Speculum_ 32 (1): 103-115.

Afigbo, Adiele Eberechukwu. 1971. “The Aro of southeastern Nigeria: a
socio-historical analysis of legends of their origins.” _African Notes_
6: 31-46.

Aglietta, M. and Orlean, A. 1992. _La Violence de la monnaie_. Paris:
Presses Universitaires de France.

_____. 1995. _Souveraineté, légitimité de la monnaie_. Paris:
Association d’Économie Financière (Cahiers finance, éthique, confiance).

_____. 1998. _La Monnaie souveraine_. Paris: Odile Jacob.

Aglietta, M., et al. 1998. “Introduction.” In: _La monnaie souveraine
(M_. Aglietta & A. Orléan, eds.), pp. 9–31. Paris: Odile Jacob.

Aglietta, M., & Orléan, A. (Eds.). 1995. _Souveraineté, légitimité de la
monnaie_. Paris: Association d’Économie Financière (Cahiers finance,
éthique, confiance).

Agnew, Jean-Christophe. 1986. _Worlds Apart: The Market and the Theater
in Anglo-American Thought_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Ahern, Emily. 1973. _The Cult of the Dead in a Chinese Village_.
Stanford: Stanford University Press.

Akiga Sai, B. 1939. _Akiga’s story; the Tiv tribe as seen by one of its
members. Translated and annotated by Rupert East_. London, New York,
Published for the International African Institute by the Oxford
University Press.

_____. 1954. “The ‘Descent’ of the Tiv from Ibenda Hill” (translated by
Paul Bohannan.) _Africa: Journal of the International African Institute_
24 (4): 295-310.

Akin, David and Joel Robbins,. 1998. “An Introduction to Melanesian
Currencies: Agencies, Identity, and Social Reproduction”. In _Money and
Modernity: State and Local Currencies in Melanesia_ (David Akin and Joel
Robbins, editor), pp. 1-40. Pittsburgh: University of Pittsburgh Press.

Alexander, John B. 1938. “A Babylonian Year of Jubilee?” _Journal of
Biblical Literature_ 57: 55-79.

Allen, N. J. 1998. “The category of substance: a Maussian theme
revisited.” In Marcel Mauss: A Centenary Tribute (Wendy James, N. J.
Allen, editors), pp. 175-191. London: Berghahn Books.

Altekar, Anant Sadashiv. 1977. _State and Government in Ancient India_.
Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass.

_____. 1983. _The Position of Women in Hindu Civilization_. Delhi:
Motilal Banarsidass.

Althabe, Gérard. 1968. “La circulation monétaire dans un village
Betsimisaraka.” _Tany Gasy_ 8: 35-46.

Ames, Roger. 1994. _The Art of Rulership: A Study of Ancient Chinese
Political Thought_. Albany: State University of New York Press.

Anderson, Perry. 1974. _Passages from Antiquity to Feudalism_. London:
Verso Press.

Angas, Lawrence Lee Bazley. 1937. _Slump Ahead in Bonds_. New York:
Somerset Pub. Co

Arnaud, Daniel. 1973. “La prostitution sacrée en Mésopotamie, un mythe
historique?” _Revue de l’histoire des religions_ 183: 111-115.

Arrighi, Giovanni. 1994. _The Long Twentieth Century: Money, Power, and
the Origins of Our Times_. London: Verso.

_____. 2007. _Adam Smith in Beijing: Lineages of the Twenty-First
Century_. London: Verso.

Arrighi, Giovanni, Po-Keung Hui, Ho-Fung Hung and Mark Selden,. 2003.
“Historical Capitalism, East and West”. In _The Resurgence of East
Asia:_ 500, 150, _and_ 50 _year perspectives_. (Giovanni Arrighi,
Takeshi Hamashita and Mark Selden, eds.) London: Routledge, pp. 259-333.

Asheri, David. 1969. “Leggi greche sul problema dei debiti.” _Studii
classici e orientali_ 18: 5-122.

Ashtor, Eliahu. 1972. “Banking instruments between the Muslim East and
the Christian West.” _Journal of European Economic History 1_: 559-573.

_____. 1976. _A Social and Economic History of the Middle East_.
Berkeley: University of California Press.

Assante, Julia. 2003. “From Whores to Hierodules: The Historiographic
Invention of Mesopotamian Female Sex Professionals.” In _Ancient Art and
Its Historiography_ (edited A.A. Donahue and Mark D. Fullerton), 13-47.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Atwood, Margaret. 2008. _Payback: Debt and the Shadow Side of Wealth_.
London: Blooms-bury.

Auerbach, Erich. 1946 [2003]. _Mimesis: The Representation of Reality in
Western Literature_. Princeton: Princeton University Press.

Aydan, Ertan. 2003. _The Peculiarities of Turkish Revolutionary Ideology
in the_ 1930_s: the ülüku version of Kemalism_, 1933-1936. Ph.D.
dissertation, Bilkent University, Ankara
(http://www.thesis.bilkent.edu.tr/0002416.pdf).

Aylmer, G. E. 1980. “The Meaning of Property in Seventeenth-Century
England.” _Past and Present_ 86: 87-97.

Ayyar, P. V. Jagadisa. 1982. _South Indian Shrines: Ilustrated_. New
Delhi: Apex.

Bahrani, Zainab. 2001. _Women of Babylon: Gender and Representation in
Mesopotamia_. London: Routledge.

Baker, J. Wayne. 1974. “Heinrich Bullinger and the Idea of Usury.” _The
Sixteenth Century Journal_ 5 (1): 49-70.

Baker, Jennifer. 2005. _Securing the commonwealth: debt, speculation,
and writing in the making of early America_. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins
University Press.

Ballin, Theodore N. 1978. ‘A Commentary on [Demosthenes] 50.’ Doctoral
Dissertation: University of Washington, Seattle.

Balmuth, Miriam S. 1967. “The Monetary Forerunners of Coinage in
Phoenicia and Palestine”, in Aryeh Kindler, ed., _International
Numismatic Convention, Jerusalem_, 27-31 _December_ 1963: _The Patterns
of Monetary Development in Phoenicia and Palestine in Antiquity,
Proceedings_ (Shocken, Tel Aviv, pp. 25-32.

_____. 1971. “Remarks on the Appearance of the Earliest Coins”, in David
G. Mitten, John Griffiths Pedley, and Jane Ayer Scott, eds., _Studies
Presented to George M. A. Hanfmann_ (Philipp von Zabern, Mainz), pp.
1-7.

_____. 1975. “The Critical Moment: the Transition from Currency to
Coinage in the Eastern Mediterranean.” _World Archeology_ 6: 293-9.

_____. 2001. Hacksilber to Coinage: New Insights into the Monetary
History of the Near East and Greece. _Numismatic Studies_ No. 24. New
York: American Numismatic Society,

Banaji, Jairus. 2001. _Agrarian change in late antiquity: gold, labour,
and aristocratic dominance_. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Barasch, Moshe. 1993. _Icon: studies in the history of an idea_. New
York: NYU Press.

Barber, Malcolm. 1978. _The Trial of the Templars_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Barendse, Rene J. 2002. _The Arabian Seas: The Indian Ocean World of the
Seventeenth Century_. Armonk: M. E. Sharpe.

Barnes, Robert Harrison and Ruth Barnes. 1989. “Barter and Money in an
Indonesian Village Economy.” _Man (New Series)_ 24 (3): 399-418

Barreau, Andre. 1961. “Indian and Ancient Chinese Buddhism: Institutions
Analogous to the Jisa.” _Comparative Studies in Society and History_ 3
(4): 443-451.

Barth, Frederick. 1969. “Economic Spheres in Darfur.” Themes in Economic
Anthropology, ASA Monographs no. 6, pp. 149-174. London: Tavistock.

Basham, Arthur Llewellyn. 1948. “Harsa of Kashmir and the Iconoclast
Ascetics.” _Bulletin of the School of Oriental and African Studies,
University of London_ 12 (3/4): 668-99.

Baskind, James. 2007. “Mortification Practices in the Obaku School.” In
_Essays on East Asian Religion and Culture, Festschrift in honour of
Nishiwaki Tsuneki on the occasion of his_ 65_th birthday_ (edited by
Christian Wittern and Shi Lishan). Kyoto: Kyoto University.

Bataille, George. 1993. “The Accursed Share Volume III, Sovereignty,
Part One: ‘What I Understand by Sovereignty;”, pp. 197-257. In _The
Accursed Share Volumes II & III_, New York: Zone Books.

Baxter, W. T. 1989. “Early accounting: The tally and checkerboard.”
_Accounting Historians Journal_ 16 (2): 43-83

Beard, Mary and John Henderson. 1997. “With This Body I Thee Worship:
Sacred Prostitution in Antiquity.” _Gender & History_ 9: 480-503.

Beattie, John. 1960. _Bunyoro: an African Kingdom_. New York: Holt,
Rinehart and Winston.

Beauchet, Ludovic. 1897. _Histoire du droit privé de la République
athénienne_. Paris: Chevalier-Maresoq.

Beaujard, Philippe. 2005. “The Indian Ocean in Eurasian and African
World-Systems before the Sixteenth Century.” _Journal of World History_
16 (4): 411-465.

Begg, David, Stanley Fischer, and Rudiger Dornbusch. 2005. _Economics_
(Eighth Edition). Maidenhead, Berkshire: McGraw-Hill

Beier, A. Lee. 1985. _Masterless men: the vagrancy problem in England_
1560-1640. London: Routledge.

Bell, Stephanie. 1999. “Do taxes and bonds finance government spending?”
_Journal of Economic Issues_ 34: 603-20.

_____. 2000. “The role of the state and the hierarchy of money.”
_Cambridge Journal of Economics_ 25: 149-63.

Bell, Stephanie and John F. Henry. 2001. “Hospitality versus Exchange:
the Limits of Monetary Economics.” _Review of Social Economics_ 54 (2):
203-226.

Bellah, Robert N. 2005. “What is Axial About the Axial Age?” _Archives
of European Sociology_ 46 (1): 69-87.

Belo, Jane. 1936. “A Study of the Balinese Family.” _American
Anthropologist_ 38 (1):12-31.

Benedetto, Luigi Foscolo. 1994. _The Travels of Marco Polo the Venetian_
(Aldo Ricci’s translation). London: Routledge.

Benn, James A. 1998. “Where Text Meets Flesh: Burning the Body as an
Apocryphal Practice in Chinese Buddhism.” _History of Religions_ 37 (4):
295-322.

_____. 2007. _Burning for the Buddha: Self-Immolation in Chinese
Buddhism_. Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press.

Benveniste, Emile. 1963. _Indo-European Language and Society_ (2
volumes). London: Faber & Faber.

_____. 1972. “Don et échange dans le vocabulaire indo-européen.” In
_Problèmes de linguistique générale_ (Paris: Galimard).

Berndt, Ronald M. 1951. “Ceremonial Exchange in Western Arnhem Land.”
_Southwestern Journal of Anthropology_ 7 (2): 156-176.

Binswanger, Hans Christoph. 1994. _Money and Magic: A Critique of the
Modern Economy in the Light of Goethe’s Faust_. Chicago: University of
Chicago Press.

Birks, Peter. 1985. “The Roman Law Concept of Dominium and the Idea of
Absolute Ownership.” _Acta Juridica_ 7: 1-37.

Bishop, Ryan and Lilian S. Robinson. 1998. _Night Market: Sexual
Cultures and the Thai Economic Miracle_. New York: Routledge.

Blackburn, Robin. 1997. _The Making of New World Slavery: From the
Baroque to the Modern_, 1492-1800. London: Verso.

Blackstone, Sir William. 1827. _Commentaries on the laws of England_.
London: E. Duyckinck.

Blanc, Louis. 1839. _L’organisation du travail_. Paris: Au Bureau de
Nouveau Monde.

Blau, Peter. 1964. _Exchange and Power in Social Life_. New York: Wiley.

Blaxter, Lorraine. 1971. _“Rendre service_ and _Jalouisie.”_ In _Gifts
and Poison_ (F. G. Bailey, editor). London: Basil Blackwell, pp.
119-130.

Bleiberg, Edward. 2002. “Loans, Credit and Interest in Ancient Egypt.”
In _Debt and Economic Renewal in the Ancient Near East_ (Hudson, Michael
and Marc Van de Mieroop, editors), pp. 257-276. Bethesda: CDL Press.

Blickle, Peter. 1977. _The Revolution of 1_525: _The German Peasant’s
War from a New Perspective_. (Thomas Brady and Erik Midelfort,
translators.) Baltimore: Johns Hopkins.

Bloch, Marc. 1961. _Feudal Society_. (2 volumes). Chicago: University of
Chicago Press.

Bogaert, Raymond. 1966. _Les Origines antiques de la banque de dépôt_.
Leiden: Sijthoff.

_____. 1968. _Banques et banquiers dans les cités grecques_. Leiden:
Sijthoff

Bohannan, Laura. 1952. “A Genealogical Charter.” _Africa: Journal of the
International African Institute_ 22:301-15.

_____. 1958. “Political Aspects of Tiv Social Organization.” In _Tribes
Without Rulers_ (John Middleton and David Tait, editors), pp. 33-66.
London: Routledge & Kegan Paul.

_____. 1964. _Return to Laughter, An Anthropological Novel_. (As
“Elenore Bowen Smith”). New York: Praeger.

Bohannan, Paul. 1954. “The Migration and Expansion of the Tiv.” _Africa:
Journal of the International African Institute_ 24 (1): 2-16.

_____. 1955. “Some Principles of Exchange and Investment among the Tiv.”
_American Anthropologist_ 57:60-67.

_____. 1957. _Justice and Judgment among the Tiv_. London: Oxford
University Press.

_____. 1958. “Extra-processual events in Tiv Political Institutions.”
_American Anthropologist_ 60:1-12

_____. 1959. “The Impact of Money on an African Subsistence Economy.”
_Journal of Economic History_ 19:491-503.

Bohannan, Paul and Laura Bohannan. 1953. _The Tiv of Central Nigeria_.
London: International African Institute.

_____. 1968. _Tiv Economy_. Evanston: Northwestern University Press.

_____. 1969. _A Source Notebook on Tiv Religion_. 5 volumes. New Haven:
Human Relations Area Files.

Boianovsky, Mauro. 1993. “Böhm-Baewerk, Irving Fisher, and the Term
‘Veil of Money.’ ” _History of Political Economy_ 25 (4):725-738

Bokenkamp, Stephen R. 2008. _“Fu:_ Talisman, Tally, Charm.” In _The
Encyclopedia of Taoism_ (Fabrizio Pregadio, editor), pp. 35-38. London:
Routledge.

Bolles, John Augustus. 1837. _A treatise on usury and usury laws_.
Boston: James Munroe.

Boon, James. 1975. _The anthropological romance of Bali_, 1597-1972:
_dynamic perspectives in marriage and caste, politics, and religion_.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Bottéro, Jean. 1961. “Desordre économique et annulation des dettes en
Mesopotamie à l’epoque paleo-babylonienne.” _Journal of the Economic and
Social History of the Orient_ 4:113-164.

_____. 1992. _Everyday Life in Ancient Mesopotamia_. (Translated by
Antonia Nevill.) Baltimore: Johns Hopkins.

Bourdieu, Pierre. 1965. “The Sentiment of Honor in Kabyle Society.” In
J. G. Peristiany, editor, _Honour and Shame: the Values of Mediterranean
Society_. London: Trinity Press, pp. 191-242.

_____. 1977. _Outline of a Theory of Practice_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

_____. 1990. _The Logic of Practice_ (Translated by Richard Nice.)
Cambridge: Polity Press.

Bowers, Richard H. 1983. “From Rolls to Riches: King’s Clerks and
Moneylending in Thirteenth-Century England.” _Speculum_ 58 (1): 60-71.

Boyer-Xambeu, Marie-Thérèse, Ghislain Deleplace, and Lucien Gillard.
1994. _Private Money & Public Currencies: the_ 16_th Century Challenge_.
(Azizeh Azodi, translator). Armonk: M. E. Sharpe.

Bradley, Keith R. 1987. “On the Roman Slave Supply and Slavebreeding.”
In _Classical Slavery_ (M. I. Finley, editor), pp. 42-64. London:
Routledge.

Brady, Thomas A., Jr. 1997. “The Rise of Merchant Empires, 1400-1700. A
European Counterpoint.” In _The political economy of merchant empires_
(James D. Tracy, editor), pp. 117-160. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Brand, Paul. 2002. “Aspects of the Law of Debt, 1189-1307.” In _Credit
and debt in medieval England, c.11_80-c.1350 (Schofield, Phillipp R. and
N. J. Mayhew, editors), pp. 19-41. London: Oxbow.

_____. 2003. “The Jewish Community of England in the Records of the
English Royal Government.” In _The Jews in medieval Britain: historical,
literary, and archaeological perspectives_ (Patricia Skinner, editor),
pp. 73-96. Woodbridge: Boyden and Brewer.

Braudel, Fernand. 1979. _Civilisation matérielle, économie et
capitalisme, XVe-XVIIIe siècle, 3: Le temps du monde_. Paris: A. Colin.

_____. 1992. _Civilization and Capitalism, 15th-18th Century: The wheels
of commerce_. Berkeley: University of California Press.

_____. 1995. _The Mediterranean and the Mediterranean world in the age
of Philip II_ (two volumes). Berkeley: University of California Press.

Brenner, Robert. 2002. _The Boom and the Bubble: The US in the World
Economy_. London and New York: Verso.

Briant, Paul. 2006. _From Cyrus to Alexander: A History of the Persian
Empire_. New York: Eisenbrauns.

Brock, Roger. 1994. “The Labour of Women in Classical Athens.” _The
Classical Quarterly_ (new series) 44 (2): 336-346.

Bronkhorst, Johannes. 2007. _Greater Magadha: Studies in the Culture of
Early India_. Leiden: Brill.

Brook, Timothy. 1998. _The Confusions of Pleasure: Commerce and Culture
in Ming China_. Berkeley: University of California Press.

Brunt, P. A. 1974. _Social Conflicts in the Roman Republic_. New York:
Norton.

Bryant, Joseph M. 1996. _Moral Codes and Social Structure in Ancient
Greece: A Sociology of Greek Ethics from Homer to the Epicureans and
Stoics_. Albany: SUNY.

Bücher, Karl. 1907. _Industrial Evolution_. (S. Morley Wickett, trans.)
New York: Holt.

Buckland, William Warwick. 1908. _The Roman Law of Slavery_. Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press.

Buckler, W. H. 1896. _The Origin and History of Contract in Roman Law
down to the End of the Republican Period_. London: C. J. Clay & Sons.

Bulliet, Richard W. 1979. _Conversion to Islam in the Medieval Period:
An Essay in Quantitative History_. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Burton, Sir Richard F. 1934. _The Book of a Thousand Nights and a Night_
(6 volumes). New York: Heritage Press.

Butrica, James L. 2006. “Some Myths and Anomalies in the Study of Roman
Sexuality.” In _Same-Sex Desire and Love in Greco-Roman Antiquity and in
the Classical Tradition of the West_ (Beert C. Verstraete and Vernon
Provencal, editors), pp. 209-270. Berkeley: University of California
Press.

Byrne, Frances. 1971. “Tribes and Tribalism in early Ireland.” _Ériu_
22: 128-166.

_____. 1973. _Irish Kings and High Kings_. London: Batsford.

Caffentzis, Constantine George. 1989. _Clipped Coins, Abused Words, and
Civil Government: John Locke’s Philosophy of Money_. New York:
Autonomedia.

Cairns, Francis. 1991. “The ‘Laws of Eretria’ (“IG” XII. 9 1273 and
1274): Epigraphic, Legal, Historical, and Political Aspects.” _Phoenix_
45 (4): 296-313

Calhoun, George W. 1934. “Classes and Masters in Homer.” _Classical
Philology_ 29:192-206, 301-316.

Cambiano, Guiseppe. 1987. “Aristotle and the Anonymous Opponents of
Slavery.” In _Classical Slavery_ (M. I. Finley, editor), pp. 28-53.
London: Frank Cass.

Campbell, John Kennedy. 1964. _Honour, family and Patronage: A Study of
Institutions and Moral Values in a Greek Mountain Community_. Oxford:
Oxford University Press.

Cannan, Edwin. 1921. “Early History of the Term Capital.” _Quarterly
Journal of Economics_ 35 (3): 469-81.

Cardascia, Guillaume. 1959. “L’adoption matrimonlale à Babylone et à
Nuzi.” _Revue historique de droit français et étranger_ 37: 1-16.

_____. 1969. _Les lois assyriennes_. Littératures Anciennes du
Proche-Orient 2. Paris: Cerf.

Cartier, Michel. 1988. “Dette et propriété en Chine.” In _Lien de Vie:
Noued Mortel: les representations de la dette en Chine, au Japan, et
dans le monde Indien_ (Charles Malamoud, editor), pp. 17-29. Paris:
Editions de l’Ecole des Hautes Études en Science Sociales.

Case, Karl E., Ray C. Fair, Manfred Gärtner, and Ken Heather. 1996.
_Economics_. London: Prentice Hall.

Caskey, John P. 1994. _Fringe Banking: Check-Cashing Outlets, Pawnshops,
and the Poor_. New York: Russell Sage Foundation.

Cerny, Jaroslav. 1954. “Prices and wages in Egypt in the Ramesside
period.” _Cahiers d’histoire mondiale_ 4: 903-921.

Chakravarti, Uma. 1985. “Of dasas and karmakaras: servile labor in
ancient India.” In _Chains of Servitude: Bondage and Slavery in India_
(Utsa Patnaik, Manjari Dingwaney, editors), pp. 35-75. Reno: University
of Nevada Press.

Chapman, Anne. 1980. “Barter as a Universal Mode of Exchange.” _L’Homme_
22 (3): 33-83.

Charles-Edwards, T. M. 1978. “Honour and Status in Some Irish and Welsh
Prose Tales.” _Eriu_ 29: 123-141.

_____. 1993. _Early Irish and Welsh kinship_. Oxford: Oxford University
Press.

Chatterjee, Heramba. 1971. _The Law of Debt in Ancient India_. Calcutta:
Sanskrit College.

Chattopadhyaya, Debiprasad. 1994. _Carvaka/Lokayata: An Anthology of
Source Materials and Some Recent Studies_. New Delhi: Mrinal Kanti
Gangopadhyaya.

Chaudhuri, Kirti N. 1985. _Trade and Civilisation in the Indian Ocean:
An Economic History from the Rise of Islam to_ 1750. Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press.

_____. 1990. _Asia Before Europe: Economy and Civilization of the Indian
Ocean from the Rise of Islam to_ 1750. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Chauhan, Gian Ghand. 2003. _An Economic history of early medieval
northern India_. New Delhi: Atlantic Publishers.

Ch’en, Kenneth K.S. 1964. _Buddhism in China: A Historical Survey_.
Princeton: Princeton University Press.

Choksy, Jamsheed K. 1988. “Loan and sales contracts in ancient and early
medieval Iran.” _Indo-Iranian Journal_ 31(3: 191-218.

Cipolla, Carlo M. 1967. _Money, Prices and Civilisation in the
Mediterranean World: Fifth to Seventeenth Centuries_. Princeton:
Princeton University Press.

Clanchy, M. T. 1993. _From memory to written record, England_ 1066-1307.
Oxford: Blackwell.

Clarence-Smith, William G. 2008. “Islamic Abolitionism in the Western
Indian Ocean from c. 1800.” Presented at the conference, _Slavery and
the Slave Trades in the Indian Ocean and Arab Worlds: Global Connections
and Disconnections_, Yale University, November 7-8, 2008.
http://www.yale.edu/glc/indian?ocean/clarence?smith.pdf.

Clavero, Bartolomé. 1986. “The jurisprudence on usury as a social
paradigm in the history of Europe.” In _Historische Soziologie der
Rechtswissenschaft_ (Erik Volkmar Heyen, editor), pp. 23-36. Frankfurt:
Vittorio Klostermann.

Codere, Helen. 1950. _Fighting with Property: A Study of Kwakiutl
Potlatching and Warfare_ 1792-1930. Monograph 18. New York: American
Ethnological Society.

Cohen, David. 1987. “Seclusion, separation and the status of women in
classical Athens.” _Greece and Rome_ 36.(1): 1-15

Cohen, Edward E. 1995. Review of ‘Lending and Borrowing in Ancient
Athens’, Bryn Mawr Classical Review 3 (4):

(http://hegel.lib.ncsu.edu/stacks/serials/bmcr/bmcr-v3n04-cohen-lending)

Cohn, Norman. 1972. _The pursuit of the millennium: revolutionary
millenarians and mystical anarchists of the Middle Ages_. New York:
Oxford University Press.

Cole, Alan. 1998. _Mothers and Sons in Chinese Buddhism_. Palo Alto:
Stanford University Press.

Coleman, Janet. 1985. “Dominium in 13th and 14th Century Political
Thought and its 17th Century Heirs: John of Paris and Locke.” _Political
Studies_ 33: 73-100.

_____. 1988. “Property and Poverty.” In _The Cambridge History of
Medieval Political Thought, c_1350-1450 (J. H. Barnes, editor), pp.
607-648. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Collins, Randall. 1986. _Weberian Social Theory_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

_____. 1989. _The Sociology of Philosophies: A Global Theory of
Intellectual Change_. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Cook, Robert Manuel. 1958. “Speculations on the Origins of Coinage.”
_Historia_ 7: 257-267.

Cooper, Frederick. 1979. “The Problem of Slavery in African studies.”
_Journal of African History_ 20:103-125.

Cooper, Jerrold S. 1986. _Sumerian and Akkadian Royal Inscriptions,
Volume_ 1: _Presargonic Inscriptions_. New Haven: American Oriental
Society.

_____. 2002. “Virginity in Ancient Mesopotamia.” _Compte rendu,
Rencontre Assyriologique Internationale_ 47: 91-112.

Cooper, Melinda. 2006. “The Unborn Born Again: Neo-Imperialism, the
Evangelical Right and the Culture of Life.” _Postmodern Culture_ (PMC)
17.1: #3.

_____. 2008. _Life as surplus: biotechnology and capitalism in the
neoliberal era_. Seattle: University of Washington Press.

Cornell, Tim. 1995. _The beginnings of Rome: Italy and Rome from the
Bronze Age to the Punic Wars (c_. 1000-264 _BC)_. London: Routledge.

Cortés, Hernan. 1868. _The fifth letter of Hernan Cortes to the Emperor
Charles V: containing an account of his expedition to Honduras_. London:
Hakluyt Society.

Cotter, James Finn. 1969. “The Wife of Bath and the Conjugal Debt.”
_English Language Notes_ 6: 169-72

Covarrubias, Miguel. 1937. _Island of Bali_. London: Kegan Paul.

Curtin, Phillip D. 1969. _The Atlantic Slave Trade: A Census_. Madison:
University of Wisconsin Press.

Curtin, Phillip D., and Jan Vansina,. 1964. “Sources of the Nineteenth
Century Atlantic Slave Trade.” _Journal of African History_ 5 (2):
185-208.

Custers, Peter. 2006. _Questioning Globalized Militarism: Nuclear and
Military Production and Critical Economic Theory_. Monmouth: Merlin
Press.

Dandamaev, Muhammed. 1984. _Slavery in Babylonia, from Nabopolasser to
Alexander the Great_ (626-331 _BC)_. De Kalb: Northern Illinois
University Press.

Darnton, Robert. 1984. _The Great Cat Massacre_. New York: Vintage
Books.

Davenant, Charles. 1771. “Discourses on the Public Revenues and on
Trade. Discourse II: Concerning Credit, and the Means and Methods by
which it may be restored.” In _The political and commercial works of
that celebrated writer Charles D’Avenant: relating to the trade and
revenue of England, the Plantation trade, the East-India trade and
African trade_ (Sir Charles Whitworth, editor), pp. 150-206. London: R.
Horsefeld.

Davidson, Paul. 2006. “Keynes and Money.” In _A Handbook of Alternative
Monetary Economics_ (Philip Arestis and Malcolm Sawyer, editors), pp.
139-153. Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.

Davies, Glynn. 1996. _A History of Money_. Cardiff: University of Wales
Press.

Davies, Kenneth Gordon. 1975. _The North Atlantic world in the
seventeenth century_. St. Paul: University of Minnesota Press.

Davis, John. 1904. _Corporations_. New York: Capricorn.

Delâge, Denys. 1993. _Bitter Feast: Amerindians and Europeans in
Northeastern North America_, 1600-64. Vancouver: University of British
Columbia Press.

Deleuze, Giles and Felix Guattari. 1972. _Anti-Oedipe_. Translated into
English as _Anti-Œdipus_. (Robert Hurley, Mark Seem and Helen R. Lane,
translators.) New York: Continuum, 2004

Deng, Gang. 1999. _The Premodern Chinese Economy: Structural Equilibrium
and Capitalist Stagnation_. London: Routledge.

Denzel, Markus A. 2006. “The European bill of exchange.” Paper presented
at the XIV International Economic History Congress, Helsinki, Finland,
21 to 25 August 2006.
http://www.helsinki.fi/iehc2006/papers1/Denzel2.pdf

Derrida, Jacques. 2000. _Of Hospitality: Anne Dufourmantelle Invites
Jacques Derrida to Respond_. (Trans. Rachel Bowlby), Stanford: Stanford
University Press.

_____. 2001. _Acts of Religion_. London: Routledge.

Descat, Raymond. 1995. “L’économie antique et la cité grecque: Un modèle
en question.” Annales. Histoire, Sciences Sociales, 50e Année, No. 5:
961-989.

Dhavalikar, Madhukar Keshav. 1975. “The Beginning of Coinage in India.”
_World Archaeology_ 6 (3):330-338.

Di Cosmo, Nicola & Don J. Wyatt, editors. 2005. _Political frontiers,
ethnic boundaries, and human geographies in Chinese history_. London:
Routledge Curzon.

Diakonoff, Igor. 1982. “The Structure of Near Eastern Society before the
Middle of the 2nd Millennium BC.” _Oikumene_ 3: 7-100.

Diaz, Bernal. 1844. _The memoirs of the conquistador Bernal Diaz del
Castillo, Written by Himself, Containing a True and Full Account of the
Discovery and Conquest of Mexico and New Spain_. (John Ingram Lockhart,
translator.) Boston: J. Hatchard and Son.

_____. 1963. _The Conquest of New Spain_. (J. M. Cohen, translator.) New
York: Penguin Books.

Digby, Kenelm Edward, and William Montagu Harrison. 1897. _An
Introduction to the History of the Law of Real Property with Original
Authorities_. Fifth Edition. Oxford: Clarendon Press.

Dighe, Ranjit, editor. 2002. _The historian’s Wizard of Oz: reading L.
Frank Baum’s classic as a political and monetary allegory_. Westport:
Greenwood Publishing Group.

Dike, K. Onwuka and Felicia Ekejiuba. 1990. _The Aro of south-eastern
Nigeria_, 1650-1980: _a study of socio-economic formation and
transformation in Nigeria_. Ibadan: University Press.

Dikshitar, V. R. Ramachandra. 1948. _War in Ancient India_. Delhi:
Motilal Banarsidass.

Dillon, John M. 2004. _Morality and Custom in Ancient Greece_.
Bloomington: Indiana University Press.

Dixon, C. Scott. 2002. _The Reformation and Rural Society: The Parishes
of Brandenburg-Ansbach-Kulmbach_, 1528-1603. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Dockés, Pierre. 1979. _Medieval Slavery and Liberation_ (Arthur
Goldhammer, translator). Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Doherty, Charles. 1980. “Exchange and Trade in Early Medieval Ireland.”
_Journal of the Royal Society of Antiquaries of Ireland_ 110: 67-89.

Donzelot, Jacques. 1994. _L’invention du social: essai sur le déclin des
passions politiques_. Paris: Seuil

Dorward, David C. 1976. “Precolonial Tiv Trade and Cloth Currency.”
_International Journal of African Historical Studies_ 9 (4):576-591.

Douglas, Mary. 1951. “A form of polyandry among the Lele of the Kasai.”
_Africa: Journal of the International African Institute_ 21 (1):1-12.
(As Mary Tew.)

_____. 1958. “Raffia Cloth Distribution in the Lele Economy.” _Africa:
Journal of the International African Institute_ 28 (2): 109-122.

_____. 1960. “Blood-Debts and Clientship Among the Lele.” _Journal of
the Royal Anthropological Institute of Great Britain and Ireland_ 90
(1): 1-28.

_____. 1962. “The Lele Compared with the Bushong: A Study in Economic
Backwardness.” In _Markets in Africa_ (Paul Bohannan and George Dalton,
editors), pp. 211-223. Chicago: Northwestern University Press.

_____. 1963. _The Lele of the Kasai_. London: Oxford University Press.

_____. 1964. “Matriliny and Pawnship in Central Africa.” _Africa:
Journal of the International African Institute_ 34 (4): 301-313.

_____. 1966. _Purity and Danger: An Analysis of Concepts of Pollution
and Taboo_. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul.

_____. 1982. _In the Active Voice_. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul.

_____. 1999. “Sorcery Accusations Unleashed: the Lele Revisited, 1987.”
_Africa: Journal of the International African Institute_ 69 (2):
177-193.

Downes, Rupert Major. 1933. _The Tiv Tribe_. Kaduna: Government Printer.

_____. 1977. _Tiv Religion_. Ibadan: Ibadan University Press.

Dreyer, Edward L. _. 2006. _Zheng He: China and the Oceans in the Early
Ming Dynasty_, 1405-1433. Library of World Biography (editor, Peter N.
Stearns). New York: Pearson Longman, 2006.

Driver, Godfrey Rolles. and John C. Miles. 1935. _The Assyrian Laws_.
Oxford: Clarendon Press.

Dubois, Page. 2003. _Slaves and Other Objects_. Chicago: University of
Chicago Press.

Duby, Georges. 1973. _Guerriers et paysans, VIIe–XIIe sècle: Premier
essor de l’économie européenne_. Paris: Gallimard.

_____. 1980. _The Three Orders: Feudal Society Imagined_ (translated by
Arthur Goldhammer). Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

_____. 1982. _Rural Economy and the Country Life in the Medieval West_.
New York: Routledge and Kegan Paul.

Duffy, Seán, Ailbhe MacShamhráin, and James Moynes, editors. 2005.
_Medieval Ireland: an encyclopedia_. Dublin: CRC Press.

Duggan, E. de C. 1932. “Notes on the Munshi Tribe.” _Journal of the
African Society_ 31: 173-82.

Dumont, Louis. 1966. _Homo Hierarchicus: Essai sur le système des
castes_. Paris: Gallimard.

_____. 1981. _From Mandeville to Marx: the Genesis and Triumph of
Economic Ideology_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

_____. 1992. _Essays on Individualism: Modern Ideology in
Anthropological Perspective_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Duyvendak, Jan Julius Lodewijk. 1928. _The Book of Lord Shang_. London:
Arthur Probsthain.

Dyer, Christopher. 1989. _Standards of living in the later Middle Ages:
social change in England, c_. 1200-1520. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Einaudi, Luigi. 1936. “The Theory of Imaginary Money from Charlemagne to
the French Revolution”, in F. C. Lane and J. C. Riemersma (eds.),
_Enterprise and Secular Change_, London: Allen & Unwin, 1956.

Einzig, Paul. 1949. _Primitive Money in its Ethnological, Historical,
and Ethnographic Aspects_. New York: Pergamon Press.

Eisenstadt, Shmuel N. 1982. “The Axial Age: The Emergence of
Transcendental Visions and the Rise of Clerics.” _European Journal of
Sociology_ 23(2):294–314.

_____. 1984. “Heterodoxies and Dynamics of Civilizations.” _Proceedings
of the American Philosophical Society_ 128 (2): 104-113.

_____. 1986. _The Origins and Diversity of Axial Age Civilizations_.
Albany: State University of New York Press.

Ekejiuba, Felicia Ifeoma. 1972. “The Aro trade system in the nineteenth
century.” _Ikenga 1_ (1):11-26, 1 (2):10-21.

Elayi, Josette and A. G. Elayi. 1993. _Trésors de monnaies phéniciennes
et circulation monétaire (Ve-IVe siècle avant J.-C.)_. Paris: Gabalda.

Ellis, Thomas Peter. 1926. _Welsh Tribal Law and Custom in the Middle
Ages_. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Eltis, David, Stephen D. Behrent, David Richardson, Herbert S. Klein.
2000. _The Transatlantic Slave Trade: A Database_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Elwahed, Ali Abd. 1931. _Contribution à une théorie sociologique de
l’esclavage. Étude des situations génératrices de l’esclavage. Avec
appendice sur l’esclavage de la femme et bibliographie critique_. Paris:
Éditions Albert Mechelinck.

Elyachar, Julia. 2002. “Empowerment Money: The World Bank,
Non-Governmental Organizations, and the Value of Culture in Egypt.”
_?Public Culture_ 14 (3): 493-513

_____. 2005. _Markets of Dispossession: NGOs, Economic Development, and
the State in Cairo_. Durham: Duke University Press.

Endres, Rudolf. 1979. “The Peasant War in Franconia.” In _The German
Peasant War of_ 1525—_New Viewpoints_ (Bob Scribner & Gerhard Benecke,
editors), pp. 63-83. London: Allen & Unwin.

Engels, Donald W. 1978. _Alexander the Great and the Logistics of the
Macedonian Army_. Berkeley: University of California Press.

Equiano, Olaudah. 1789. _The Interesting Narrative of the Life of
Olaudah Equiano: or, Gustavus Vassa, the African_. Modern Library
Edition, New York, 2004.

Erdosy, George. 1988. _Urbanisation in Early Historic India_. Oxford:
British Archaeological Reports.

_____. 1995. “City states in North India and Pakistan at the time of the
Buddha.” In _The archaeology of early historic South Asia: the emergence
of cities and states_ (Frank Allichin and George Erdosy, editors), pp.
99-122. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Essid, Yassine. 1988. “Islamic Economic Thought.” In _Preclassical
Economic Thought: From the Greeks to the Scottish Enlightenment_ (edited
by Todd Lowry), pp. 77-102. Boston: Kluwer.

_____. 1995. _A critique of the origins of Islamic economic thought_.
Leiden: E. J. Brill.

Evans-Pritchard, E. E. 1931. “An Alternative Term for ‘Bride-Price’.”
_Man_ 31: 36-39.

_____. 1940. _The Nuer: a Description of the Modes of Livelihood and
Political Institutions of a Nilotic People_. Oxford: Clarendon Press.

_____. 1948. _The Divine Kingship of the Shilluk of the Nilotic Sudan.
The Frazer Lecture for_ 1948. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 1951. _Kinship and Marriage among the Nuer_. Oxford: Clarendon
Press.

Falkenhausen, Lothar von. 2005. “The E Jun Qi Metal Tallies: Inscribed
Texts and Ritual Contexts.” In _Text and Ritual in Early China_ (edited
by Martin Kern), pp.79-123. Seattle: University of Washington Press.

Falkenstein, Adam. 1954. “La cité-temple sumérienne.” _Cahiers
d’histoire mondiale_ 1: 784-814.

Falola, Toyin and Paul E. Lovejoy, editors. 1994. _Pawnship in Africa:
Debt Bondage in Historical Perspective_. Boulder: University of Colorado
Press.

Fardon, Richard. 1985. “Sisters, Wives, Wards and Daughters: A
Transformational Analysis of the Political Organization of the Tiv and
their Neighbors. Part I: The Tiv. _Africa: Journal of the International
African Institute_ 54 (4): 2-21.

_____. 1986. “Sisters, Wives, Wards and Daughters: A Transformational
Analysis of the Political Organization of the Tiv and their Neighbors.
Part II: The Transformations.” _Africa: Journal of the International
African Institute_ 55 (1): 77-91.

Faure, Bernard. 1998. “The Buddhist Icon and the Modern Gaze.” _Critical
Inquiry_ 24 (3): 768-813.

_____. 2000. _Visions of Power: Imagining Medieval Japanese Buddhism_.
Princeton: Princeton University Press.

Fayazmanesh, Sasan. 2006. _Money and Exchange: Folktales and Reality_.
New York: Routledge.

Federal Reserve Bank of New York. 2008. “The Key to the Gold Vault.”
www.newyorkfed.org/education/addpub/goldvaul.pdf.

Federici, Silvia. 2004. _Caliban and the Witch: Women, the Body and
Primitive Accumulation_. New York: Autonomedia.

Feeley-Harnik, Gillian. 1982. “The King’s Men in Madagascar: Slavery,
Citizenship and Sakalava Monarchy.” _Africa: Journal of the
International African Institute_ 52 (2): 31-50.

Fenton, William N. 1978 “Northern Iroquois Culture Patterns.” In
_Handbook of the North American Indians, volume_ 15, _Northeast_ (W.
Sturtevant and B. Trigger, editors), pp. 296-321. Washington D.C.:
Smithsonian Institute Press.

Ferguson, Niall. 2001. _The Cash Nexus: Money and Power in the Modern
World_, 1700-2000. London: Allen Lane.

_____. 2004. _Colossus: the price of America’s empire_. London: Penguin.

_____. 2007. _The Ascent of Money: A Financial History of the World_.
London: Penguin.

Finkelstein, Jacob J. 1961. “Ammisaduqa’s Edict and the Babylonian ‘Law
Codes.’ ” _Journal of Cuneiform Studies_ 15: 91-104.

_____. 1965. “Some New Misharum Material and Its Implications.”
_Assyriological Studies_ 16: 233-46.

_____. 1966. “Sex Offenses in Sumerian Laws.” _Journal of the American
Oriental Society_ 86:355-372.

Finley, Moses I. 1954. _The World of Odysseus_. New York: Viking Press.

_____. 1960. _Slavery in classical antiquity: views and controversies_.
Cambridge: W. Heffer & Sons.

_____. 1963. _The ancient Greeks: an introduction to their life and
thought_. New York: Viking Press.

_____. 1964. “Between Slavery and Freedom” _Comparative Studies in
Society and History_ 6 (3): 233-249.

_____. 1974. _The Ancient Economy_. Berkeley: University of California
Press.

_____. 1980. _Ancient Slavery and Modern Ideology_. London: Penguin

_____. 1981. _Economy and Society in Ancient Greece_. New York: Penguin.

_____. 1983. _Politics in the Ancient World_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

_____. 1985. _Studies in land and credit in ancient Athens_, 500-200
_B.C.: the horos inscriptions_. New Brunswick: Transaction Publishers.

Firth, Raymond. 1959. _Economics of the New Zealand Maori_. Wellington,
New Zealand: R. E. Owen.

Fischel, Walter J. 1937. _Jews in the Economic and Political Life of
Medieval Islam_. London: Royal Asiatic Society.

Fiser, Ivo. 2004. “The Problem of the Setthi in Buddhist Jatakas.” In
_Trade in Early India_ (Ranabir Chakravarti, editor), pp. 166-198.
Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Fisher, Douglas. 1989. “The Price Revolution: A Monetary
Interpretation.” _Journal of Economic History_ 49 (1):884-902.

Fitzpatrick, Jim. 2001. _Three Brass Balls: the Story of the Irish
Pawnshop_. Dublin: Collins Press.

Flandrin, Jean-Louis. 1979. _Families in Former Times_. Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press.

Fleet, John Faithful. 1888. _Inscriptions of the Early Gupta Kings and
Their Successors, Corpus Inscriptionium Indicarum, vol. III_. Calcutta:
Government Printer.

Flynn, Dennis. 1978. “A New Perspective on the Spanish Price Revolution:
The Monetary Approach to the Balance of Payments.” _Explorations in
Economic History_ 15:388-406.

_____. 1979. “Spanish-American Silver and World Markets in the Sixteenth
Century.” _Economic Forum_ 10: 46-71.

_____. 1982. “The Population Thesis View of Sixteenth-Century Inflation
Versus Economics and History.” In _Munzpragung, Geldumlauf und
Wechselkurse/Mintage, Monetary Circulation and Exchange Rates. Akten der
C_7_-Section des_ 8_th International Economic History Congress Budapest_
1982. (F. Irsigler and E. H.G. Van Cauwenberghe, editors.), pp. 361-382.
Trier: THF-Verlag.

Flynn, Dennis and Arturo Giráldez. 1995. “Born with a ‘Silver Spoon’:
the Origin of World Trade in 1571.” _Journal of World History_ VI (2):
201-11.

_____. 2002. “Cycles of Silver: Global Economic Unity through the
Mid-Eighteenth Century.” _Journal of World History_, vol.13, no 2,
pp.391-427.

Forstater, Mathew. 2005. ‘Taxation and Primitive Accumulation: The Case
of Colonial Africa,’ _Research in Political Economy_, 22, 51-64.

_____. 2006. ‘Taxation: Additional Evidence from the History of Thought,
Economic History, and Economic Policy,’ in M. Setterfield (ed.),
_Complexity, Endogenous Money, and Exogenous Interest Rates_,
Chetlenham, UK: Edward Elgar.

Frankfort, Henri. 1948. _Kingship and the Gods: A Study of Ancient Near
Eastern Religion as the Integration of Society and Nature_. Chicago:
University of Chicago Press.

Freuchen, Peter. 1961. _Book of the Eskimo_. Cleveland, Ohio: World
Publishing Co.

Friedman, Thomas L. 1999. _The Lexus and the Olive Tree_. New York:
Farrar, Strauss and Giroux.

Gadamer, Hans-Georg. 2004. _Truth and Method_ (Joel Weinsheimer; Donald
G Marshall, translators). London: Continuum.

Gale, Esson McDowell. 1967. _Discourse on Salt and Iron: a debate on
state control of commerce and industry in ancient China_ (by Huan
K’uan). Taipei: Ch’eng-Wen.

Galey, Jean-Claude. 1983. “Creditors, Kings and Death: determinations
and implications of bondage in Tehri-Gathwal (Indian Himalayas).” In
_Debts and Debtors_ (Charles Malamoud, editor), pp. 67-124. London:
Vikas.

Gallant, Thomas W. 2000. “Honor, Masculinity, and Ritual Knife Fighting
in Nineteenth-Century Greece.” _American Historical Review_ 105 (2):
359-82.

Gardiner, Geoffrey. 2004. “The Primacy of Trade Debts in the Development
of Money.” In _Credit and State Theories of Money: The Contributions of
A. Mitchell Innes_ (L. Randall Wray, editor). Cheltingham, Edward Elgar.

Garnsey, Peter. 1996. _Ideas of Slavery from Aristotle to Augustine_.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 2008. _Thinking about Property: From Antiquity to the Age of
Revolution_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Gates, Hill. 1989. “The Commoditization of Women in China.” _Signs_ 14
(4): 799-832.

Geertz, Clifford. 1973. “Deep play: notes on the Balinese cockfight.” In
_The Interpretation of Culture_. New York: Basic Books.

Geertz, Hildred, and Clifford Geertz. 1975. _Kinship in Bali_. Chicago:
University of Chicago Press.

Gernet, Jacques. 1956. _Les aspects economiques du bouddhisme dans la
societe chinoise du Ve au Xe siècle_. Paris: Ecole francaise
d’Extreme-Orient. English version: _Centuries_ (Franciscus Verellen,
translator). New York: Columbia University Press, 1995.

_____. 1960. “Les suicides par le feu chez les bouddhiques chinoises de
Ve au Xe siecle,” _Melange publies par l’Institut des Hautes Études_ II:
527-558.

_____. 1982. _A History of Chinese Civilization_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Gerriets, Marilyn. 1978. _Money and Clientship in the Ancient Irish
Laws_. Ph.D. dissertation, University of Toronto.

_____. 1981. “The Organization of Exchange in Early Christian Ireland.”
_Journal of Economic History_ 41 (1): 171-176.

_____. 1985. “Money in Early Christian Ireland according to the Irish
Laws.” _Comparative Studies in Society and History_ 27 (2): 323-339.

_____. 1987. “Kinship and Exchange in Pre-Viking Ireland.” _Cambridge
Medieval Celtic Studies_ 13: 39-72.

Getz, Trevor R. 2003. “Mechanisms of Slave Acquisition and Exchange in
Late Eighteenth Century Anomabu: Reconsidering a Cross-Section of the
Atlantic Slave Trade.” _African Economic History_ 31: 75-89

Ghazanfar, Shaikh M.,. 1991. “Scholastic Economics and Arab Scholars:
The ‘Great Gap’ Thesis Reconsidered.” _Diogenes: International Review of
Humane Sciences;_ No.154: 117-33.

_____. 2000. “The Economic Thought of Abu Hamid Al-Ghazali and St.
Thomas Aquinas: Some Comparative Parallels and Links.” _History of
Political Economy_, 32 (4): 857-888.

_____. 2003. _“Medieval Islamic economic thought: filling the “great
gap” in European economics_. New York: Routledge.

Ghazanfar, Shaikh M., and Abdul Azim Islahi,. 1997. _The Economic
Thought of al-Ghazali_ (450-505 _A.H._ / 1058-1111 _A.D.)_ Jeddah:
Scientific Publishing Centre King Abdulaziz University.

_____. 2003. “Explorations in Medieval Arab-Islamic Thought: Some
Aspects of Ibn Taimiyah’s Economics.” In _Medieval Islamic economic
thought: filling the “great gap” in European economics_ (S. Ghazanfar,
editor), pp. 53-71. New York: Routledge.

Gibson, Charles. 1964. _The Aztecs under Spanish rule: a history of the
Indians of the Valley of Mexico_, 1519-1810. Stanford: Stanford
University Press.

Gilder, George. 1981. _Wealth and Poverty_. New York: Basic Books.

_____. 1990. _Microcosm: the quantum revolution in economics and
technology_. New York: Simon & Schuster.

Glahn, Richard Von. 1996a. _Fountain of Fortune: Money and Monetary
Policy in China_, 1000-1700. Berkeley: University of California Press.

_____. 1996b. “Myth and Reality of China’s Seventeenth Century Monetary
Crisis.” _Journal of Economic History_ 56, no 2, pp. 429-54.

Glancey, Jennifer A. 2006. _Slavery in Early Christianity_. Oxford:
Oxford University Press.

Gluckman, Max. 1971. _Politics, Law and Ritual in Tribal Society_.
London: Basil Blackwell.

Goldstone, Jack A. 1984. “Urbanization and Inflation: Lessons from the
English Price Revolution of the Sixteenth and Seventeenth Centuries.”
_American Journal of Sociology_ 89 (5): 1122-60.

_____. 1991. “Monetary Versus Velocity Interpretations of the ‘Price
Revolution’: A Comment.” _Journal of Economic History_ 51 (1): 176-181

_____. 2002. “Efflorescences and Economic Growth in World History:
Rethinking the ‘Rise of the West’ and the Industrial Revolution.”
_Journal of World History_ 13 (2): 323-89.

Goodman, Martin. 1983. _State and Society in Roman Galilee, A.D_.
132-212. London: Valentine Mitchell.

Goody, Jack. 1976. _Production and reproduction: a comparative study of
the domestic domain_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 1983. _Development of Marriage and the Family in Europe_.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 1990. _The Oriental, the Ancient, and the Primitive: Systems of
Marriage and the Family in the pre-Industrial Societies of Eurasia_.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 1996. _The East in the West_. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Goody, Jack and Stanley J. Tambiah. 1973. _Bridewealth and Dowry_.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Goitein, Shelomo Dov. 1954. “From the Mediterranean to India: Documents
on the Trade to India, South Arabia, and East Africa from the Eleventh
to Twelfth Centuries.” _Speculum_ 29: 181-97.

_____. 1957. “The Rise and Fall of the Middle Eastern bourgeoisie in
early Islamic times.” _Journal of World History_ 3: 583-603.

_____. 1964. “The commercial mail service in medieval Islam.” _Journal
of the American Oriental Society_ 84: 118-23.

_____. 1966. “Banker’s Accounts from the Eleventh Century A.D.” _Journal
of the Economic and Social History of the Orient_ 9: 28-66.

_____. 1967. _A Mediterranean Society, The Jewish Communities of the
Arab World as Portrayed in the Documents of the Cairo Geniza_. Berkeley:
University of California. Press.

_____. 1973. _Letters of Medieval Jewish Traders_. Princeton: Princeton
University Press.

Gordon, Barry. 1982. “Lending at interest: some Jewish, Greek, and
Christian approaches, 800 BC-AD 100.” _History of Political Economy_ 14
(3):406-426.

_____. 1989. _The economic problem in biblical and patristic thought_.
Leiden: E. J. Brill.

Gough, Kathleen. 1971. “Nuer Kinship: a Reexamination.” In _The
Translation of Culture: Essays to E. E. Evans-Pritchard_ (T. Beidelman,
editor), pp. 79-123. London: Tavistock Publications.

Goux, Jean-Joseph. 1990. _Symbolic Economies: After Marx and Freud_
(Jennifer Curtiss Gage, translator.) Ithaca: Cornell University Press.

Graeber, David. 1997. “Manners, Deference and Private Property: the
Generalization of Avoidance in Early Modern Europe.” _Comparative
Studies in Society and History_ 39 (4): 694-728.

_____. 2001. _Toward an Anthropological Theory of Value: The False Coin
of Our Own Dreams_. New York: Palgrave.

_____. 2005. “Fetishism and Social Creativity, or Fetishes are Gods in
Process of Construction.” _Anthropological Theory_ 5 (4): 407-438.

_____. 2006. “Turning Modes of Production Inside Out: Or, Why Capitalism
is a Transformation of Slavery (short version).” _Critique of
Anthropology_ 26 (1): 61-81.

_____. 2007. _Possibilities: Essays on Hierarchy, Rebellion and Desire_.
Oakland: AK Press.

_____. 2009. “Debt, Violence, and Impersonal Markets: Polanyian
Meditations.” In _Market and Society: The Great Transformation today_
(Chris Hann and Keith Hart, editors), pp. 106-132. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Graham, Angus Charles. 1960. _The Book of Lieh-Tzu_. London: John
Murray.

_____. 1979. “The Nung-Chia ‘School of the Tillers’ and the Origin of
Peasant Utopianism in China.” _Bulletin of the School of Oriental and
African Studies, University of London_, Vol. 42 no.1, pp. 66-100.

_____. 1989. _Disputers of the Tao: Philosophical Argument in Ancient
China_. La Salle, Illinois: Open Court Press.

_____. 1994. Studies in Chinese philosophy and philosophical literature.
_SUNY series in Chinese philosophy and culture. Albany: SUNY_.

Grahl, John. 2000. “Money as Sovereignty: the Economics of Michel
Aglietta.” _New Political Economy_ 5 (2): 291-316.

Grandell, Axel. 1977. “The reckoning board and tally stick.” _Accounting
Historians Journal_ 4 (1): 101-105.

Gray, Robert F. 1968. “Sonjo Bride-Price and the Question of African
‘Wife Purchase.’ ” _American Anthropologist_ 62: 34-47.

Greengus. Samuel. 1966. “Old Babylonian Marriage Ceremonies and Rites.”
_Journal of Cuneiform Studies_ 20: 57-72.

_____. 1969. “The Old Babylonian marriage contract.” _Journal_ of _the
American Oriental Society_ 89: 505-532.

_____. 1975. “Sisterhood Adoption at Nuzi and the ‘Wife-Sister’ in
Genesis.” _Hebrew Union College Annual_ 46: 5-31.

_____. 1990. “Bridewealth in Sumerian sources.” _Hebrew Union College
Annual_ 61: 25-88.

Gregory, Christopher A. 1982. _Gifts and Commodities_. New York:
Academic Press.

_____. 1998. _Savage Money: The Anthropology and Politics of Commodity
Exchange_. Amsterdam: Harwood Academic Publishers.

Green, Peter. 1993. _Alexander to Actium: the historical evolution of
the Hellenistic age_. Berkeley: University of California Press.

Greider, William. 1989. _Secrets of the Temple: How the Federal Reserve
Runs the Country_. New York: Simon & Schuster.

Grierson, Phillip. 1959. “Commerce in the Dark Ages: a critique of the
evidence.” _Transactions of the Royal Historical Society_, 5th series 9:
123-40.

_____. 1960. “The monetary reforms of ‘Abd al-Malik: their metrological
basis and their financial repercussions.” _Journal of the Economic and
Social History of the Orient_ 3: 241-264.

_____. 1977. _The Origins of Money_. London: Athlone Press.

_____. 1978. “The Origins of Money.” In _Research in Economic
Anthropology Vol. I_. Greenwich: Journal of the Anthropological
Institute Press.

_____. 1979. _Dark Age Numismatics_. London: Variorium Reprints.

Grosz, Katarzyna. 1983. “Bridewealth and Dowry in Nuzi.” In _Images of
Women in Antiquity_ (A. Cameron and A. Kuhrt, editors), pp. 193-206.
Detroit: Wayne State University Press.

_____. 1989. “Some aspects of the position of women in Nuzi.” In
_Women’s Earliest Records From Ancient Egypt and Western Asia_ (Barbara
S. Lesko editor), pp. 167-180. Atlanta: Scholar’s Press.

Gudeman, Stephen. 2002. _The Anthropology of Economy_. London:
Blackwell.

Guha, Ranjanit. 1999. _Elementary Aspects of Peasant Insurgency in
Colonial India_. Durham: Duke University Press.

Guisborough, William of. 1954. _The Chronicle of William of
Guisborough_. (H. Rothwell, editor.) London: Camden.

Gupta, Parameshwari Lal and T. R. Hardaker,. 1985. _Indian Silver
Punchmarked Coins: Magadha-Maurya Karshapana Series_. Nashik: Indian
Institute of Research in Numismatic Studies.

Guth, Delloyd J. 2008. “The Age of Debt: the Reformation and English
Law.” In _Tudor Rule and Revolution: Essays for G. R. Elton from His
American Friends_ (Delloyd J. Guth and John W. McKenna, editors), pp.
69-86. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Guyer, Jane I. 1994. “Brideprice.” In The Encyclopedia of Social History
(Peter N. Stearns, editor.), page 84. London: Taylor & Francis.

_____. 2004. _Marginal Gains: Monetary Transactions in Atlantic Africa_.
Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Hadot, Pierre. 1995. _Philosophy as a Way of Life: Spiritual Exercises
from Socrates to Foucault_. (Michael Chase, translator). Oxford:
Blackwell.

_____. 2002. _What Is Ancient Philosophy?_ Cambridge: Belknap Press.

Hallam, Henry. 1866. _The constitutional history of England, from the
accession of Henry VII to the death of George II_. London: Widdelton.

Halperin, David. 1990. “The Democratic Body: Prostitution and
Citizenship in Classical Athens.” In _One Hundred Years of Homosexuality
and Other Essays on Greek Love_ (David Halperin, editor), pp. 88-112.
New York: Routledge.

Hamashita, Takeshi. 1994. Tribute Trade System and Modern Asia.” In
_Japanese Industrialization and the Asian Economy_ (A. J. H. Latham and
H. Kawakatsu, editors), pp. 91-107. London and New York: Routledge.

_____. 2003 “Tribute and treaties: maritime Asia and treaty port
networks in the era of negotiations, 1800-1900. In _The resurgence of
East Asia:_ 500, 150 _and_ 50 _year perspectives_ (Giovanni Arrighi, et
al, editors), pp. 15-70. London; New York: Routledge.

Hamilton, Earl J. 1934. _American Treasure and the Price Revolution in
Spain_, 1501-1650. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Hardaker, Alfred. 1892. _A Brief History of Pawnbroking_. London:
Jackson, Ruston and Keeson.

Hardenburg, Walter Ernest, and Sir Roger Casement. 1913. _The Putumayo:
the devil’s paradise; travels in the Peruvian Amazon region and an
account of the atrocities committed upon the Indians therein_. London:
T. F. Unwin.

Harding, Alan. 1980. “Political Liberty in the Middle Ages.” _Speculum_
55 (3): 423-443.

Harrill, J. Albert. 1998. _The manumission of slaves in early
Christianity_. Tübingen: Mohr Siebek.

Harris, Edward M. 2006. _Democracy and the Rule of Law in Classical
Athens: Essays on Law, Society, and Politics_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Harris, William Vernon, editor. 2006. “A Revisionist View of Roman
Money.” _Journal of Roman Studies_ 96: 1-24.

_____. 2008a. “Introduction.” In _The monetary systems of the Greeks and
Romans_ (W. V. Harris, editor), pp. 1-12. Oxford: Oxford University
Press.

_____. 2008b. “The Nature of Roman Money.” In _The monetary systems of
the Greeks and Romans_ (W. V. Harris, editor), pp. 174-207. Oxford:
Oxford University Press.

Harris, Rosemary. 1972. “The History of Trade at Ikom, Eastern Nigeria.”
_Africa: Journal of the International African Institute_ Vol. 42 (2):
122-139.

Harrison, James P. 1965. . “Communist Interpretations of the Chinese
Peasant Wars.” _The China Quarterly_, no. 24. pp. 92-118.

Hart, Keith. 1986. “Heads or Tails? Two Sides of the Coin.” _Man_ (N.S.)
21: 637-56.

_____. 1999. _The Memory Bank: Money in an Unequal World_. London:
Perpetua Books.

Huang, Ray. 1974. _Taxation and Governmental Finance in
Sixteenth-Century China_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 1999. _Broadening the horizons of Chinese history: discourses,
syntheses, and comparisons_. Amonk: M. E. Sharpe.

Hawtrey, Ralph G. 1928. _Currency and Credit_. 3rd edition. London:
Longmans, Green and Co.

Hayward, Jack. 1959. “Solidarity: The Social History of an Idea in
Nineteenth Century France.” _International Review of Social History_ 4:
261-284.

Heady, Patrick. 2005. “Barter.” In _Handbook of Economic Anthropology_
(James Carrier, editor), pp. 262-274. Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.

Hébert, Jean-Claude. 1958. “La Parenté à Plaisanterie à Madagascar:
Étude d’Ethnologie Juridique.” _Bulletin de Madagascar_ No. 142-143
(April-May 1958): 122-258.

Heilbron, Johan. 1998. “French Moralists and the Anthropology of the
Modern Era: On the Genesis of the Notions of ‘Interest’ and ‘Commercial
Society.’ ” In _The rise of the social sciences and the formation of
modernity: conceptual change in context_, 1750-1850 (Björn Wiitrock,
Johan Heilbron, & Lars Magnusson, editors), pp. 77-106. Dordrecht:
Kluwer Academic Publishers.

Heinsohn, Gunnar and Otto Steiger. 1989. “The Veil of Barter: The
Solution to ‘The Task of Obtaining Representations of an Economy in
which Money is Essential.” In _Inflation and Income Distribution in
Capitalist Crisis: Essays in Memory of Sidney Weintraub_. Edited by J.
A. Kregel. New York: NYU Press, pp. 175-202.

Helmholz, Richard H. 1986. “Usury and the Medieval English Church
Courts.” _Speculum_ 56: 364-80

Herbert, Eugenia W. 2003. _Red Gold of Africa: Copper in Precolonial
History and Culture_. Madison: University of Wisconsin Press.

Herlihy, David. 1985. _Medieval Households_. Cambridge: Harvard
University Press.

Herzfeld, Michael. 1980. “Honour and Shame: Problems in the Comparative
Analysis of Moral Systems.” _Man_ 15:339-351.

_____. 1985. _The Poetics of Manhood_. Princeton: Princeton University
Press.

Hezser, Catherine. 2003. “The Impact of Household Slaves on the Jewish
Family in Roman Palestine.” _Journal for the Study of Judaism_ 34 (4):
375-424.

Hildebrand, Bruno. 1864. “Natural-, Geld- und Creditwirtschaft.”
_Jahrbuch Nationalökonomie_ 1864.

Hill, Christopher. 1972. _The World Turned Upside Down_. New York:
Penguin.

Hirschman, Albert 0. 1977. _The Passions and the Interests: Political
Arguments for Capitalism Before its Triumph_. Princeton: Princeton
University Press.

_____. 1992. _Rival views of market society and other recent essays_.
Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Hocart, Alfred M. 1936. _Kings and Councillors: an essay in the
comparative anatomy of human society_. Chicago: University of Chicago
Press.

Hodgson, Marshall G. S. 1974. _The Venture of Islam: Conscience and
History in a World Civilization_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Hoitenga, Dewey J. 1991. _Faith and reason from Plato to Plantinga: an
introduction to Reformed epistemology_. Albany: SUNY Press.

Holman, Susan R. 2002. _The hungry are dying: beggars and bishops in
Roman Cappadocia_. New York: Oxford University Press.

Homans, George. 1958. “Social Behavior as Exchange.” _American Journal
of Sociology_ 63 (6): 597-606.

Homer, Sydney. 1987. _A History of Interest Rates_ (2nd edition). New
Brunswick: Rutgers University Press.

Hopkins, Keith. 1978. _Conquerors and Slaves: Sociological Studies in
Roman History_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Hoppit, Julian. 1990. “Attitudes to Credit in Britain, 1680-1790.” _The
Historical Journal_ 33 (2): 305-322.

Hoskins, Janet. 1999. _Biographical Objects: How Things Tell the Stories
of People’s Lives_. New York: Routledge.

Hosseini, Hamid S. 1995. “Understanding the market mechanism before Adam
Smith: economic thought in Medieval Islam.” _History of Political
Economy_ 27 (3): 539-61.

_____. 1998. “Seeking the roots of Adam Smith’s division of labor in
medieval Persia.” _History of Political Economy_ 30 (4): 653-81.

_____. 2003. “Contributions of Medieval Muslim Scholars to the History
of Economics and their Impact: A Refutation of the Schumpeterian Great
Gap.” In _The Blackwell Companion to Contemporary Economics, III: A
Companion to the History of Economic Thought_ (Warren J. Samuels, Jeff
Biddle, and John Bryan Davis, editors), pp. 28-45. London:
Wiley-Blackwell.

Houston, Walter J. 2006. _Contending for Justice: Ideologies and
Theologies of Social Justice in the Old Testament_. London: T & T Clark.

Howel, King. 2006. _Ancient laws and institutes of Wales: Laws Supposed
to Be Enacted by Howel the Good_. Clark, New Jersey: The Lawbook
Exchange, Ltd.

Howell, Paul P. 1954. _A Manual of Nuer Law_. International Africa
Institute. London: Oxford University Press.

Howgego, Christopher. 1992. “The Supply and Use of Money in the Roman
World 200 B.C. to A.D. 300.” _Journal of Roman Studies_ 82: 1-31

Hubbard, Jamie. 2001. _Absolute Delusion, Perfect Buddhahood: The Rise
and Fall of a Chinese Heresy_. Honolulu: University of Hawaii.

Hubert, Henri and Marcel Mauss. 1964. _Sacrifice: Its Nature and
Function_. Translated by W.D. Halls. London: Cohen and West.

Hudson, Kenneth. 1982. _Pawnbroking: An Aspect of British Social
History_. London: The Bodley Head.

Hudson, Michael. 1992. “Did the Phoenicians Introduce the Idea of
Interest to Greece and Italy – And if So, When?” In _Greece Between East
and West: 10th?8th Centuries BC_ (Günter Kopcke and Isabelle Tokumaru,
editors), pp. 128-143. Mainz: Verlag Philipp von Zabern.

_____. 1993. “The Lost Tradition of Biblical Debt Cancellations.”
Research paper presented at the Hentry George School of Social Science,
1992
(http://www.michael-hudson.com/articles/debt/Hudson,LostTradition.pdf.)

_____. 2002. “Reconstructuring the Origins of Interest-Bearing Debt and
the Logic of Clean Slates.” In _Debt and Economic Renewal in the Ancient
Near East_ (Hudson, Michael and Marc Van de Mieroop, editors), pp. 7-58.
Bethesda: CDL Press.

_____. 2003a. _Super Imperialism: The Origins and Fundamentals of U.S
World Dominance_. London: Pluto Press.

_____. 2003b. “The creditary/monetarist debate in historical
perspective.” _The State, the Market, and Euro: chartalism versus
metallism in the theory of money_. (edited by Stephanie Bell and Edward
Nell), pp. 39-76. Cheltenham: Edward Elgar Press.

_____. 2004a. “The archeology of money: debt vs. barter theories of
money.” In _Credit and State Theories of Mone_y (Randall Wray, editor),
pp. 99-127. Cheltenham: Edward Elgar Press.

_____. 2004b. “The Development of Money-of-Account in Sumer’s Temples.”
In _Creating Economic Order: Record-Keeping, Standardization and the
Development of Accounting in the Ancient Near East_ (Michael Hudson and
Cornelia Wunsch, editors), pp. 303-329. Baltimore: CDL Press.

Hudson, Michael and Marc Van de Mieroop, editors. 2002. _Debt and
Economic Renewal in the ancient Near East_. Bethesda, MD: CDL Press.

Humphrey, Caroline. 1985. “Barter and Economic Disintegration.” _Man_
20: 48-72.

_____. 1994. “Fair Dealing, Just Rewards: the Ethics of Barter in
North-East Nepal.” In _Barter, Exchange, and Value: An Anthropological
Approach_ (Caroline Humphrey and Stephen Hugh-Jones, editors), pp.
107-141. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press

Humphrey, Chris. 2001. _The politics of carnival: festive misrule in
medieval England_. Manchester: Manchester University Press.

Hunt, William. 1983. _The Puritan moment: the coming of revolution in an
English county_. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Hutchinson, Sharon. 1996. _Nuer Dilemmas: Coping with Money, War, and
the State_. Berkeley: University of California Press.

Ibn Battuta. 1354 [1929]. _Travels in Asia and Africa_, 1325-1354
(translated by H. A. R. Gibb). London: Routledge and Kegan Paul.

Icazbalceta, Joaquin Garcia. 2008. Memoriales de Fray Toribio de
Motolinia. Charleston: BiblioBazaar.

Ihering, Rudolf von. 1877. _Geist des Romischen Rechts auf den
verschieden en Stufen seiner Entwicklung_. (Republished 2003 by Adamant
Media Corporation, Berlin.)

Ilwof, Franz. 1882. _Tauschhandel und Geldsurrogate in alter und neuer
Zeit_. Graz.

Ingham, Geoffrey. 1996. “Money as a Social Relation.” _Review of Social
Economy_ 54 (4): 507-29.

_____. 1999. “Capitalism, Money, and Banking: a critique of recent
historical sociology.” _British Journal of Sociology_ 5 (1): 76-96.

_____. 2000. “ ‘Babylonian Madness’: on the historical and sociological
origins of money.” in _What is Money?_ (edited by John Smithin), New
York: Routledge, pp. 16-41.

_____. 2004. _The Nature of Money_. Cambridge: Polity Press. Ingram,
Jill Phillips. 2006. _Idioms of Self-Interest: Credit, Identity and
Property in English Renaissance Literature_. New York: Routledge.

Inkori, Joseph E. 1982. “The Import of Firearms into West Africa, 1750
to 1807: a quantative analysis.” In _Forced Migration: The Impact of the
Export Slave Trade on African Societies_ (J. E. Inkori, editor), pp
126-153. London: Hutchinson University Library.

Innes, A. Mitchell. 1913. “What is Money?” _Banking Law Journal_
(May1913): 377-408.

_____. 1914. “The Credit Theory of Money.” _Banking Law Journal_
(January 1914): 151-168.

Ioannatou, Marina. 2006. _Affaires d’argent dans la correspondance de
Cicéron: l’aristocratie sénatoriale face à ses dettes_. Paris: De
Boccard.

Isichei, Elizabeth. 1976. _A History of the Igbo People_. London:
Basingstoke.

Islahi, Abdul Azim. 1985. “Ibn Taimiyah’s Concept of Market Mechanism.”
_Journal of Research in Islamic Economics_2 (2): 55-65.

_____. 2003. _Contributions of Muslim Scholars to Economic Thought and
Analysis_ (11-905 _A. H_./632-1500 _A.D.)_ Jeddah: Islamic Research
Center.

Jacob, Guy. 1987. “Gallieni et ‘l’impot moralisateur’ a Madagascar:
théorie, pratiques et conséquences (1901-1905).” _Revue Francaise
d’Histoire d’Outre-mer_ 74 (277): 431-473.

James, C. L. R. 1938. _The Black Jacobins: Toussaint L’Ouverture and the
San Domingo Revolution_. London: Secker and Warburg.

Jan, Yun-hua,. 1964. “Buddhist Self-Immolation in Medieval China.”
_History of Religions_ (4) 2: 243-268.

Janssen, Johannes. 1910. _A History of the German People at the Close of
the Middle Ages_. (A. M. Christie, translator.) London: Kegan Paul.

Jasnow, Richard Lewis. 2001. “Pre-demotic Pharaonic sources.” In
_Security for debt in Ancient Near Eastern law_ (Westbrook, R. & Jasnow,
R, editors), pp. 35-45. Leiden, Boston & Köln: Brill.

Jaspers, Karl. 1949. _Vom Ursprung und Ziel der Geschichte_. München:
Piper Verlag.

_____. 1951. _Way to Wisdom: An Introduction to Philosophy_. New Haven:
Yale University Press.

Jefferson, Thomas. 1988. _Political Writings_. (Joyce Oldham Appleby,
Terence Ball, editors). Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Jenkinson, C. Hilary. 1911. “Exchequer Tallies.” _Archaeologia_ 62:
367-380.

_____. 1924. “Medieval Tallies, Public and Private.” _Archaeologia_ 74:
289-324.

Jevons, W. Stanley. 1871. _Theory of Political Economy_. New York:
Macmillan & Co.

_____. 1875. _Money and the Mechanism of Exchange_. New York: Appleton
and Company.

Jobert, Bruno. 2003. “De la solidarité aux solidarités dans la
rhétorique politique française.” In C. Becc and G. Procacci, ed., _De la
responsabilité solidaire_, pp. 69-83. Paris: Syllepses.

Johnson, Lynn. 2004. “Friendship, Coercion, and Interest: Debating the
Foundations of Justice in Early Modern England.” _Journal of Early
Modern History_ 8 (1): 46-64.

Johnson, Simon. 2009. “The Quiet Coup.” Atlantic Monthly, May 2009,
http://www.the-atlantic.com/doc/200905/imf-advice.

Jones, David. 2004. _Reforming the morality of usury: a study of
differences that separated the Protestant reformers_. Lanham: University
Press of America.

Jones, G. I. 1939. “Who are the Aro?” _Nigerian Field_ 8: 100-103.

_____. 1958. “Native and Trade Currencies in Southern Nigeria during the
Eighteenth and Nineteenth Centuries.” _Africa: Journal of the
International African Institute_ 28 (1): 43-56.

_____. 1968. “The Political Organization of Old Calabar.” In _Efik
Traders of Old Calabar_ (D. Forde, editor). London: International
African Institute.

Jones, J. Walter. 1956. _The Law and Legal Theory of the Greeks_.
Oxford: Clarendon Press.

Jordan, Kay E. 2003. _From Sacred Servant to Profane Prostitute: A
History of the Changing Legal Status of Devadasis in India_, 1857-1947.
New Delhi: Manohar.

Just, Roger. 1989. _Women in Athenian Law and Life_. London: Routledge

_____. 2001. “On the Ontological Status of Honour.” In _An anthropology
of indirect communication_ (Joy Hendry, C. W. Watson, editors), pp.
34-50. ASA Monographs 37. London: Routledge.

Kahneman, Daniel. 2003. “A Psychological Perspective on Economics.”
_American Economic Review_ 93 (2): 162-168

Kallet, Lisa. 2001. _Money and the corrosion of power in Thucydides: the
Sicilian expedition and its aftermath_. Berkeley: University of
California Press.

Kaltenmark, Max. 1960. “Ling pao: Notes sur un terme du taoîsme
religieux.” _Mélanges publiés par l’Institut des Hautes Études
Chinoises_ 2: 559-88.

Kalupahana, David. 1991. _Mulamadhyamakakarika of Nagarjuna: the
Philosophy of the Middle Way_. Delhi: Motilal Banarsidas.

Kamentz, Anya. 2006. _Generation Debt: Why Now is A Terrible Time to Be
Young_. New York: Riverhead Books.

Kan, Lao. 1978. “The Early Use of the Tally in China.” In _Ancient
China: Studies in Early Civilization_ (edited by David T. Roy and
Tsuen-hsuin Tsien), pp. 91-98. Hong Kong: Chinese University Press.s

Kane, Pandurang Vaman,. 1968. _History of Dharmasastra Volume III_.
Poona: Bhandarkar Oriental Research Institute.

Kantorowicz, Ernst H. 1957. _The King’s Two Bodies: a Study in Medieval
Political Theology_. Princeton: Princeton University Press.

Karatani, Kojin. 2003. _Transcritique: On Kant and Marx_. Cambridge: MIT
Press.

Keil, Charles. 1979. _Tiv Song_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Keith, Arthur Berriedale. 1925. _The Religion and Philosophy of the Veda
and Upanishads_. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Kelly, Amy. 1937. “Eleanor of Aquitaine and Her Courts of Love.”
_Speculum_ 12 (1): 3-19

Kelly, Fergus. 1988. _A Guide to Early Irish Law_. Dublin: Dublin
Institute for Advanced Studies.

Kessler, David & Peter Temin. 2008. “Money and Prices in the Early Roman
Empire.” In _The monetary systems of the Greeks and Romans_ (W. V.
Harris, editor), pp. 137-160. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Keuls, Eva. 1985. _The Reign of the Phallus: Sexual Politics in Ancient
Athens_. Cambridge: Harper & Row.

Keynes, John Maynard. 1930. _A Treatise on Money_. London: MacMillan.

_____. 1936. The General Theory of Employment, Interest and Money.

Keyt, David. 1997. _Aristotle: Politics Books VII and VIII_. Oxford:
Clarendon Press.

Khan, Mir Siadat Ali. 1929. “The Mohammedan Laws against Usury and How
They Are Evaded.” _Journal of Comparative Legislation and International
Law_, Third Series 11 (4): 233-24

Kieschnick, John. 1997. _The eminent monk: Buddhist ideals in medieval
Chinese hagiography_. Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press.

Kim, Henry S. 2001. “Archaic Coinage as Evidence for the Use of Money,”
in, A. Meadows and K. Shipton, eds., Money and Its Uses in the Ancient
Greek World (Oxford: Oxford University Press), 7–21.

_____. 2002. “Small Change and the Moneyed Economy.” In _Money, Labour
and Land: Approaches to the economies of ancient Greece_ (Paul
Cartledge, Edward E. Cohen and Lin Foxhall, editors). New York:
Routledge.

Kindleberger, Charles P. 1984. _A Financial History of Western Europe_.
London: MacMillan.

_____. 1986. _Manias, Panics, and Crashes: A History of Financial
Crises_. London: MacMillan.

Kirschenbaum, Aaron. 1985. “Jewish and Christian Theories of Usury in
the Middle Ages.” _The Jewish Quarterly Review_ 75 (1): 270-89.

Kitch, Aaron. 2007. “The Character of Credit and the Problem of Belief
in Middleton’s City Comedies.” _Studies in English Literature_ 47 (2):
403–426.

Klein, Martin A. 2000. “The Slave Trade and Decentralized Societies.”
_Journal of African History_ 41 (1): 49-65.

Knapp, Georg Friedrich. 1905. _Staatliche Theorie des Gelde_. Leipzing:
Dunker and Humblot. [English edition, _The State Theory of Money_.
London: MacMillan, 1925.]

Knapp, Keith N. 2004. “Reverent Caring: the parent-son relation in early
medieval tales of filial offspring.” In _Filial Piety in Chinese Thought
and History_ (Alan Kam-leung Chan, and Sur-hoon Tan, editors), pp.
44-70. London: Routledge.

Ko, Dorothy, JaHyun Kim Haboush, and Joan R. Piggott, editors. 2003.
_Women and Confucian cultures in premodern China, Korea, and Japan_.
Berkeley: University of California Press

Kohn, Livia. 2000. _Daoism handbook_. Leiden: E. J. Brill.

_____. 2002. _Monastic life in medieval Daoism: a cross-cultural
perspective_. Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press.

Kopytoff, Igor and Suzanne Miers. 1977. “African ‘Slavery’ as an
Institution of Marginality.” In _Slavery in Africa: Historical and
Anthropological Perspectives_ (edited by Suzanne Miers and Igor
Kopytoff), pp. 1-84. Madison: University of Wisconsin Press.

Korver, Jan. 1934. _Die terminologie van het crediet-wezen en het
Grieksch_. Amsterdam: H. J. Paris.

Kosambi, Damodar Dharmanand. 1965. _The Culture and Civilisation of
Ancient India in Historical Outline_. London: Routledge & Kegan Paul.

_____. 1966. _Ancient India: A History Of Its Culture And Civilization_.
New York: Pantheon Books.

_____. 1981. _Indian Numismatics_. Hyderabad: Orient Longman.

_____. 1996. _An introduction to the study of Indian history_. Bombay:
Popular Prakashan.

Kraan, Alfons van der. 1983. “Bali: Slavery and Slave Trade.” In
_Slavery, Bondage and Dependence in Southeast Asia_ (Anthony Reid,
editor), pp. 315-340. New York: St. Martin’s Press

Kraay, Colin M. 1964. “Hoards, Small Change and the Origin of Coinage,”
_Journal of Hellenic Studies_, 84, pp. 76-91.

Kramer, Samuel Noah. 1963. _The Sumerians: Their History, Culture, and
Character_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

_____. 1969. _The Sacred Marriage: Aspects of Faith, Myth and Ritual in
Ancient Sumer_. Bloomington: Indiana University Press.

Kropotkin, Peter. 1902. _Mutual Aid: A Factor of Evolution_. London:
William Heinemann.

Kulischer, Joseph. 1926. _Allgemeine Wirtschaftsgeschichte des
Mittelalters und der Neuzeit_. Munich.

Kuran, Timur. 1995. “Islamic Economics and the Islamic Subeconomy.”
_Journal of Economic Perspectives_ 9 (4): 155-173.

_____. 2005. “The Absence of the Corporation in Islamic Law: Origins and
Persistence.” _American Journal of Comparative Law_ 53 (4): 785-834.

Kurke, Leslie. . 1995. “Pindar and the Prostitutes, or Reading Ancient
‘Pornography.’ ” _Arion_, Third Series 4 (2): 49-7.

_____. 1997. “Inventing the ‘Hetaira’: Sex, Politics, and Discursive
Conflict in Archaic Greece.” _Classical Antiquity_ 16 (1):106-150

_____. 2002. _Coins, bodies, games, and gold: the politics of meaning in
archaic Greece_. Princeton: Princeton University Press.

Kuznets, Solomon. 1933. “Pawnbroking.” In _Encyclopaedia of the Social
Sciences_ (Edwin R. A. Seligman, editor), VII:38. New York: MacMillan.

Labib, Subhi Y. 1969. “Capitalism in Medieval Islam.” _The Journal of
Economic History_ 29 (1): 79-96.

Ladner, Gerhardt B. 1979. “Medieval and Modern Understanding of
Symbolism: A Comparison.” _Speculum_ 54 (2): 223-256.

Lafitau, Joseph François. 1974. _Customs of the American Indians
Compared with the Customs of Primitive Times_ (edited and translated by
William N. Fenton and Elizabeth L. Moore). Toronto: Champlain Society.

LaFleur, William R,. 1986. _The karma of words: Buddhism and the
literary arts in medieval Japan_. Berkeley: University of California
Press.

Lafont, Bertrand. 1987. “Les filles du roi de Mari.” In _La femme dans
le Proche-orient antique_ (J -M. Durand, editor), pp. 113-123. Paris:
ERC.

Lambert, Maurice. 1971. “Une Inscription nouvelle d’Entemena prince de
Lagash.” _Revue du Louvre_ 21:231-236.

Lambert, Wilfried G. 1992. “Prostitution.” In _Aussenseiter und
Randgruppen: Beitrage zu einer Sozialgeschichte des Alten Orients_
(edited V. Haas), 127-157. Konstanz: Universitatsverlag

Lamotte, Etienne. 1997. _Karmasiddhi Prakarana: The Treatise on Action
by Vasubandhu_. Freemont: Asian Humanities Press.

Lane, Frederic Chapin. 1934. _Venetian ships and shipbuilders of the
Renaissance_. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins.

Langholm, Odd. 1979. _Price and Value in the Aristotelian Tradition_.
Oslo: Universitetsforlaget.

_____. 1984. _The Aristotelian Analysis of Usury_. Bergen:
Universitetsforlaget.

_____. 1992. _Economics in the Medieval Schools: Wealth, Exchange,
Value, Money and Usury According to the Paris Theological Tradition_,
1200-1350: 29 (Studien Und Texte Zur Geistesgeschichte Des
Mittelalters). Leiden: E. J. Brill.

_____. 1996. “The Medieval Schoolmen, 1200-1400.” In _Ancient and
Medieval Economic Ideas and Concepts of Social Justice_ (edited by S.
Todd Lowry and Barry Gordon), pp. 439-502. Leiden: E. J. Brill.

_____. 1998. _The Legacy of Scholasticism in Economic Thought:
Antecedents of Choice and Power_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 2002. _The Merchant in the Confessional: Trade and Price in the
Pre-Reformation Penitential Handbooks_. Leiden: E. J. Brill.

Lapidus, Ira. 1995. “State and Religion in Islamic Societies.” _Past and
Present 151_: 3-27.

_____. 2002. _A History of Islamic Societies_ (2nd edition.) Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press.

Larson, Pier. 2000. _History and Memory in the Age of Enslavement:
Becoming Merina in Highland Madagascar_, 1770-1822. Portsmouth:
Heinemann.

Latham, A. J. H. 1971. “Currency, Credit and Capitalism on the Cross
River in the Pre-colonial Era.” _Journal of African History_ 12 (4):
599-605.

_____. 1973. _Old Calabar_ 1600-1891: _The Impact of the International
Economy Upon a Traditional Society_. Oxford: Clarendon Press.

_____. 1990. “The Pre-Colonial Economy; The Lower Cross Region.” In _A
History of the Cross River Region of Nigeria_. (Monday B. Abasiattai,
editor), pp. 70-89. Calabar: University of Calabar Press.

Laum, Bernard. 1924. _Heiliges Geld: Eine historische Untersuchung ueber
den sakralen Ursprung des Geldes_. Tübingen: J. C. B. Mohr.

Law, Robin. 1994. “On Pawning and Enslavement for Debt in the
Pre-colonial Slave Coaast.” _Pawnship in Africa: Debt Bondage in
Historical Perspective_ (Falola, Toyin and Paul E. Lovejoy, editors),
pp. 61-82. Boulder: University of Colorado Press.

Le Guin, Ursula. 1974. _The Disposessed_. New York: Avon.

Leach, Edmund R. 1961. _Rethinking Anthropology_. London: Athlone Press.

_____. 1983. “The kula: an alternative view.” In _The Kula: New
Perspectives on Massim Exchange_ (Jerry Leach, editor), pp. 529-538.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Le Goff, Jacques. 1990. _Your Money or Your Life: Economy and Religion
in the Middle Ages_. (Translated by Patricia Ranum.) New York: Zone
Books.

Le Rider, George,. 2001. _La naissance de la monnaie: pratiques
monétaires de l’Orient ancient_. Paris: Presses universitaires de
France.

Lee, Ian. 2000. “Entella: the silver coinage of the Campanian
mercenaries and the site of the first Carthaginian mint, 410-409 BC.”
_Numismatic Chronicle_ 160: 1-66.

Leenhardt, Maurice. 1967. _Do Kamo: Person and Myth in the Melanesian
World_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Lemche, Niels Peter. 1975. “The ‘Hebrew Slave’: Comments on the Slave
Law, Ex. Xxi 2-11.” _Vetus Testamentum_ 25: 129-44.

_____. 1976. “The Manumission of Slaves: The Fallow Year, The Sabbatical
Year, The Jobel Year.” _Vetus Testamentum_ 26: 38-59.

_____. 1979. _Andurarum_ and _Misharum:_ Comments on the Problems of
Social Edicts and their Application in the Ancient Near East,” _Journal
of Near Eastern Studies_ 38:11-18.

_____. 1985. _Ancient Israel: A New History of Israelite Society_.
Sheffield: Sheffield Academic Press.

Lerner, Abba P. 1947. “Money as a Creature of the State.” _American
Economic Review, Papers and Proceedings_ 37 (2): 312-17.

Lerner, Gerda. 1983. “Women and Slavery.” _Slavery and Abolition: A
Journal of Comparative Studies_ 4 (3):173-98.

_____. 1980. “The Origin of Prostitution in Ancient Mesopotamia.” _Signs
11_ (2): 236-254.

_____. 1989. _The Creation of Patriarchy_. New York: Oxford University
Press.

Letwin, William. 2003. _Origins of Scientific Economics: English
Economic Thought_, 1660-1776. London: Routledge.

Lévi, Sylvain. 1898. _La Doctrine du Sacrifice dans les Brâhmanas_.
Paris: Ernest Leroux.

_____. 1938. _L’Inde civilisatrice_. Paris: Institut de Civilisation
Indienne.

Levi-Strauss, Claude. 1943. “Guerre et commerce chez les Indiens
d’Amérique du Sud.” _Renaissance_. Paris: Ecole Libre des Hautes Études,
vol, 1, fascicule 1 et 2.

_____. 1963. _Structural Anthropology_. (C. Jacobson and B. G. Schoepf,
translators.) New York: Basic Books.

Lévy-Bruhl, Lucien. 1923. _Primitive Mentality_. London: Allen & Unwin.

Lewis, Mark Edward. 1990. _Sanctioned Violence in Early China_. Albany:
State University of New York Press.

Li, Xueqin. 1985. _Eastern Zhou and Qin Civilizations_. (translated by
K. C. Chang). New Haven: Yale University Press

Liddell. Henry George and Robert Scott. 1940. _A Greek-English Lexicon,
revised and augmented throughout by Sir Henry Stuart Jones with the
assistance of Roderick McKenzie_. Oxford. Clarendon Press.

Lindholm, Charles. 1982. _Generosity and Jealousy: the Swat Pukhtun of
Northern Pakistan_. New York: Columbia University Press.

Linebaugh, Peter. 1982. “Labour History without the Labour Process: A
Note on John Gast and His Times.” _Social History_ 7 (3): 319-28.

_____. 1993. _The London Hanged: Crime and Civil Society in the
Eighteenth Century_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 2008. _The Magna Carta Manifesto: Liberties and Commons for All_.
Berkeley: University of California Press.

Littlefield, Henry. 1963. “The Wizard of Oz: Parable on Populism.”
_American Quarterly_ 16 (1): 47-98.

Llewellyn-Jones, Lloyd. 2003. _Aphrodite’s Tortoise: the veiled woman of
ancient Greece_. Swansea: Classical Press of Wales

Locke, John. 1680-1690. _Two Treatises on Government_. (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press edition, 1988).

_____. 1691. “Further Considerations Concerning Raising the Value of
Money.” In The Works of John Locke Volume 5, pp. 131-206. London: W.
Otridge & Son, 1812.

Loizos, Peter. 1977. “Politics and patronage in a Cypriot village,
1920-1970.” In Ernest Gellner and John Waterbury, editors, _Patrons and
Clients_ (London: Duckworth), pp. 115-135.

Lombard, Maurice. 1947. ‘Les bases monétaires d’une suprématie
économique: l’or musulman du VIIe au XIe siècle’, _Annales_ 2:143-60.

_____. 2003. _The Golden Age of Islam_. Princeton: Markus Wiener
Publishers.

Loraux, Nicole. 1993. _The Children of Athena: Athenian Ideas About
Citizenship and the Division Between the Sexes_. Princeton: Princeton
University Press.

Lorton, David. 1977. “The Treatment of Criminals in Ancient Egypt:
Through the New Kingdom.” _Journal of the Economic and Social History of
the Orient_ 20 (1): 2-64.

Lovejoy, Paul F. and David Richardson. 1999. “Trust, Pawnship, and
Atlantic History: The institutional foundations of the Old Calabar slave
trade.” _American Historical Review_ 104: 333-355.

_____. 2001. “The Business of Slaving: Pawnship in Western Africa, c.
1600-1810.” _Journal of African History_ 42 (1) 67-84.

_____. 2004. “ ‘This Horrid Hole’: Royal Authority, Commerce and Credit
at Bonny, 1690-1840.” _Journal of African History_ 45 (3): 363-392.

Lusthaus, Dan. 2002. _Buddhist phenomenology: a philosophical
investigation of YogĀcĀra Buddhism and the Ch?eng Wei-shih lun_. Volume
13 of Curzon critical studies in Buddhism. New York: Routledge.

Macaulay, Baron Thomas Babington. 1886. _The history of England, from
the accession of James the Second_. London: Longmans, Green and co.

MacDonald, James. 2006. _A free nation deep in debt: the financial roots
of democracy_. Princeton: Princeton University Press.

MacDonald, Scott B. and Albert L. Gastmann. 2001. _A History of Credit &
Power in the Western World_. New Brunswick: Transaction Publishers.

MacIntosh, Marjorie K. 1988. “Money Lending on the Periphery of London,
1300-1600.” _Albion_ 20 (4): 557-571

Mackay, Charles. 1854. _Memoirs of extraordinary popular delusions: and
the madness of crowds, Volumes_ 1-2. London: G. Routledge and sons.

MacKenney, Richard. 1987. _Tradesmen and Traders: The World of the
Guilds in Venice and Europe (c_. 1250_-c_. 1650). Totowa: Barnes &
Noble.

MacPherson, Crawford Brough. 1962. _The political theory of possessive
individualism; Hobbes to Locke_. Oxford: Clarendon Press.

Maekawa, Kazuya. 1974. “The development of the É-MÍ in Lagash during
Early Dynastic III.” _Mesopotamia_ 8–9: 77-144.

Maitland, Frederick William. 1908. _The Constitutional History of
England: A Course of Lectures Delivered_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Malamoud, Charles. 1983. “The Theology of Debt in Brahmanism.” In _Debts
and Debtors_ (Charles Malamoud, editor), pp. 21-40. London: Vices.

_____. 1988. “Présentation.” _In Lien de vie, noeud mortel. Les
représentations de la dette en Chine, au Japon et dans le monde indien_
(Charles Malamoud, editor), pp. 7-15. Paris: EHESS.

_____. 1998. “Le paiement des actes rituals dans l’Inde védique.” In _La
Monnaie Suzerain_ (Michael Aglietta and André Orlean, editors), pp.
35-54. Paris: Editions Odile Jacob.

Malinowski, Bronislaw. 1922. _Argonauts of the Western Pacific: An
Account of Native Enterprise and Adventure in the Archipelagoes of
Melanesian New Guinea_. London: Routledge.

Maloney, Robert P. 1983. “The Teaching of the Fathers on Usury: An
Historical Study on the Development of Christian Thinking.” _Vigiliae
Christianae_ 27 (4):241-65.

Mann, Bruce H. 2002. _Republic of Debtors: Bankruptcy in the Age of
American Independence_. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Martin, Randy. 2002. _The Financialization of Everyday Life_.
Philadelphia: Temple University Press.

Martzloff, Jean-Claude. 2006. _A history of chinese mathematics_.
Berlin: Springer Verlag.

Marx, Karl. 1853. “The British Rule in India.” _New-York Daily Tribune_,
June 25, 1853.

_____. 1857 [1973]. _The Grundrisse_. New York: Harper and Row.

_____. 1858 [1965]. _Pre-Capitalist Economic Formations_. (Jack Cohen,
trans.) New York: International Publishers.

_____. 1867 [1967]. _Capital_. New York: New World Paperbacks. 3
volumes.

Mathews, Robert Henry. 1931. _Mathews’ Chinese-English dictionary_.
Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Mathias, Peter. 1979a. “Capital, Credit, and Enterprise in the
Industrial Revolution.” In _The transformation of England: essays in the
economic and social history of England in the eighteenth century_ (Peter
Mathias, editor), pp. 88-115. London: Taylor & Francis.

_____. 1979b. “The People’s Money in the Eighteenth Century: The Royal
Mint, Trade Tokens and the Economy.” In _The transformation of England:
essays in the economic and social history of England in the eighteenth
century_ (Peter Mathias, editor), pp. 190-208. London: Taylor & Francis.

Maunder, Peter, Danny Myers, Nancy Wall, Roger LeRoy Miller,. 1991.
_Economics Explained (Third Edition)_. London: Harper Collins.

Mauro, Frédéric. 1993. “Merchant Communities, 1350-1750.” In _The Rise
of merchant empires: long-distance trade in the early modern world_,
1350-1750 (James D. Tracy, editor), pp. 255-286. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Mauss, Marcel. 1924. Essai sur le don. Forme et raison de l’échange dans
les sociétés archaïques.” _Annee sociologique_, 1 (series 2):30-186.

_____. 1925. “Commentaires sur un texte de Posidonius. Le suicide,
contre-prestation supreme.” _Revue celtique_ 42: 324-9.

_____. 1947. _Manuel d’ethnographie_. Paris: Payot.

Meillassoux, Claude. 1996. _The Anthropology of Slavery: The Womb of
Iron and Gold_ (Alide Dasnois, translator). Chicago: University of
Chicago Press.

Menefee, Samuel Pyeatt. 1981. _Wives for Sale: an Ethnographic Study of
British Popular Divorce_. Oxford: Blackwell.

Mendelsohn, Isaac. 1949. _Slavery in the Ancient Near East: A
Comparative Study of Slavery in Babylonia, Assyria, Syria and Palestine
from the Middle of the Third Millennium to the End of the First
Millennium_. Westport: Greenwood Press.

Menger, Karl. 1892. “On the origins of money.” _Economic Journal_ 2 no
6, pp. 239-55.

Meyer, Marvin W. 1999. _The ancient mysteries: a sourcebook: sacred
texts of the mystery religions of the ancient Mediterranean world_.
Philadelphia: University of Pennsylvania Press.

Midelfort, H. C. Erik. 1996. _Mad princes of renaissance Germany_.
Charlottesville: University of Virginia Press.

Midnight Notes Collective. 2009. “Promissory Notes: From Crises to
Commons.” (http://www.midnightnotes.org/Promissory_Notes.pdf)

Mielants, Eric. 2001. “Europe and China Compared.” _Review_ XXV, no. 4,
pp. 401-49.

_____. 2007. _The Origins of Capitalism and the “Rise of the West.”_
Philadelphia: Temple University Press.

Mieroop, Marc Van De. 2002. “A History of Near Eastern Debt?” In _Debt
and Economic Renewal in the Ancient Near East_ (Hudson, Michael and Marc
Van de Mieroop, editors), pp. 59-95. Bethesda: CDL.

_____. 2005. “The Invention of Interest: Sumerian Loans.” In _The
Origins of Value: The Financial Innovations That Created Modern Capital
Markets_ (William N. Goetzmann and K. Geert Rouwenhorst, editors), pp.
17-30. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Mez, Adam. 1932. _Die Renaissance des Islams_. Heidelberg: C. Winter.

Miller, Joseph. 1988. _Way of Death: Merchant Capitalism and the Angolan
Slave Trade_ 1730-1830. Madison: University of Wisconsin Press.

Miller, Robert J. 1961. “Monastic Economy: The Jisa Mechanism.”
_Comparative Studies in Society and History_ 3 (4): 427-438.

Miller, William. 1993. _Humiliation : and other essays on honor, social
discomfort, and violence_. Ithaca: Cornell University Press.

_____. 2006. _An Eye for an Eye_. Ithaca: Cornell University Press.

Millett, Paul. 1989. “Patronage and its Avoidance.” In _Patronage in
Ancient Society_ (A. Wallace-Hadrill, editor), pp. 15-47. London:
Routledge.

_____. 1991a. _Lending and Borrowing in Classical Athens_. Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press.

_____. 1991b. “Sale, Credit and Exchange in Athenian Law and Society.”
In _Nomos_ (P. Cartiledge, P. C. Millett and S. C. Todd, editors), pp.
167-194. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Millon, Frances. 1955. _When money grew on trees: a study of cacao in
ancient Mesoamerica_. Ph.D dissertation, Columbia University.

Mises, Ludwig von. 1949. _Human Action: A Treatise on Economics_. New
Haven: Yale University Press.

Misra, Shive Nandan. 1976. _Ancient Indian Republics: from the Earliest
Times to the_ 6_th Century A.D_. Delhi: Upper India Publishing House.

Mitamura, Taisuke. 1970. _Chinese eunuchs: the structure of an intimate
politics_. Rutland: Charles E. Tuttle Company.

Mitchell, Richard E. 1993. “Demands for Land Redistribution and Debt
Reduction in the Roman Republic.” In _Social Justice in the Ancient
World_ (K. D. Irani and Morris Silver, editors), pp. 199-214. Westport:
Greenwood Press.

Morgan, Lewis Henry. 1851. _League of the Ho-de-no-sau-nee, or
Iroquois_. Secaucus: Citadel Press.

_____. 1877. _Ancient Society_. New York: Henry Holt.

_____. 1881. _Houses and House-Life of the American Aborigines_. [1965
edition] Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Moser, Thomas. 2000. “The Idea of Usury in Patristic Literature.” In
_The canon in the history of economics: critical essays_ (edited by
Michalēs Psalidopoulos), pp. 24-44. London: Routledge.

Moses, Larry W. 1976. “T’ang tribute relations with the Inner Asian
barbarian.” In _Essays on T’ang society: the interplay of social,
political and economic forces_ (Perry, John C. and Bardwell L. Smith,
editors), pp. 61-89. Leiden: Brill.

Moulier-Boutang, Yann. 1997. _De l’esclavage au salariat: économie
historique du salariat bridé_. Paris : Presses universitaires de France.

Muhlenberger, Steven, and Phil Paine. 1997. “Democracy in Ancient
India.” World History of Democracy site,
[http://www.nipissingu.ca/department/history/histdem].

Muldrew, Craig. 1993a. “Interpreting the Market: The Ethics of Credit
and Community Relations in Early Modern England.” _Social History_ 18
(2): 163-183.

_____. 1993b. “Credit and the Courts: Debt Litigation in a
Seventeenth-Century Urban Community.” _The Economic History Review_, New
Series, 46 (1): 23-38.

_____. 1996. “The Culture of Reconciliation: Community and the
Settlement of Economic Disputes in Early Modern England.” _The
Historical Journal_ 39 (4): 915-942.

_____. 1998. _The Economy of Obligation: The Culture of Credit and
Social Relations in Early Modern England_. New York: Palgrave.

_____. 2001. “ ‘Hard Food for Midas’: Cash and its Social Value in Early
Modern England.” _Past and Present_ 170: 78-120.

Mundill, Robin R. 2002. _England’s Jewish Solution: Experiment and
Expulsion_, 1262-1290. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Munn, Nancy. 1986. _The Fame of Gawa: A Symbolic Study of Value
Transformation in a Massim (Papua New Guinea) Society_. Cambridge,
Cambridge University Press.

Munro, John H. 2003a. “The Monetary Origins of the ‘Price Revolution’:
South German Silver Mining, Merchant Banking, and Venetian Commerce,
1470-1540.” In _Global Connections and Monetary History_, 1470-1800 (D.
Flynn, A. Giráldez, and R. Von Glahn editors), pp. 1-34. Burlington:
Ashgate.

_____. 2003b. “The Medieval Origins of the Financial Revolution: Usury,
Rents, and Negotiability.” _International History Review_ 25 (3):
505-562.

_____. 2007. “Review of Earl J. Hamilton, _American Treasure and the
Price Revolution in Spain_, 1501-1650.” EH.Net Economic History
Services, Jan 15 2007. URL: http://eh.net/bookreviews/library/munro

Müri, Walter. 1931. _Symbolon: Wort- und sachgeschichtliche Studie_.
Bern: Beilage zum Jahresbericht über das städtische Gymnasium Bern.

Murphy, George. 1961. “[Buddhist Monastic Economy: The Jisa Mechanism]:
Comment.” _Comparative Studies in Society and History_ 3 (4): 439-42.

Myers, Milton L. 1983. _The Soul of Modern Economic Man: Ideas of
Self-Interest, Thomas Hobbes to Adam Smith_. Chicago: University of
Chicago Press.

Nag, Kalidas and V. R. Ramachandra Dikshitar. 1927. “The Diplomatic
Theories of Ancient India and the _Arthashastra.” Journal of Indian
History_ 6 (1): 15-35.

Nakamura, Kyōko Motomochi. 1996. _Miraculous stories from the Japanese
Buddhist tradition: the Nihon ry_ō_iki of the monk Ky_ō_kai_. London:
Routledge.

Naskar, Satyendra Nath. 1996. _Foreign impact on Indian life and culture
(c_. 326 _B.C. to c_. 300 _A.D.)_ New Delhi: Abhinav Publications.

Naylor, Robin Thomas. 1985. _Dominion of debt: centre, periphery and the
international economic order_. London: Black Rose Books.

Nazpary, Jomo. 2001. _Post-Soviet Chaos: Violence and Dispossession in
Kazakhstan_. London: Pluto.

Nelson, Benjamin. 1949. _The Idea of Usury: From Tribal Brotherhood to
Universal Otherhood_. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Nerlich, Michael. 1987. _Ideology of adventure: studies in modern
consciousness_, 1100-1750. (translation by Ruth Crowley). Minneapolis:
University of Minnesota Press.

Nicholls, David. 2003. _God and Government in an “Age of Reason.”_ New
York: Routledge.

Noah, Monday Efiong. 1990. “Social and Political Developments: The Lower
Cross Region, 1600-1900.” In _A History of the Cross River Region of
Nigeria_. (Abasiattai, Monday B., editor), pp. 90-108. Calabar:
University of Calabar Press.

Nolan, Patrick. 1926. _A Monetary History of Ireland_. London: King.

Noonan, John T. 1957. _The Scholastic Analysis of Usury_. Cambridge:
Harvard University Press.

Norman, K. R. 1975. “Aśoka and Capital Punishment: Notes on a Portion of
Aśoka’s Fourth Pillar Edict, with an Appendix on the Accusative Absolute
Construction.” _The Journal of the Royal Asiatic Society of Great
Britain and Ireland_ 1: 16-24.

North, Robert. 1954. _Sociology of the Biblical Jubilee_. Rome:
Pontifical Biblical Institute.

Northrup, David. 1978. _Trade Without Rulers: Pre-Colonial Economic
Development in South-Eastern Nigeria_. Oxford: Clarendon Press.

_____. 1995. _Indentured labor in the age of imperialism_, 1834-1922.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Nwaka, Geoffrey I. 1978. “Secret Societies and Colonial Change: A
Nigerian Example (Sociétés secrètes et politique coloniale: un exemple
nigerian).” Cahiers d’Études Africaines, Vol. 18(69/70): 187-200.

Nwauwa, Apollos Okwuchi. 1991. “Integrating Arochukwu into the Regional
Chronological Structure.” _History in Africa_ 18: 297-310.

O’Brien, George. 1920. _An Essay on Medieval Economic Teaching_. London:
Longmans, Green & Co.

Ohnuma, Reiko. 2007. _Head, eyes, flesh, and blood: giving away the body
in Indian Buddhist literature_. New York: Columbia University Press.

Olivelle, Patrick. 1992. _The Asrama System: The History and
Hermeneutics of a Religious Institution_. Oxford: Oxford University
Press.

_____. 2005. _Manu’s Code of Law: A Critical Edition and Translation of
the MĀnava-Dharma_ś_Āstra_. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

_____. 2006. “Explorations in the Early History of DharmaśĀstra.” In
_Between the Empires: Society in India_ 300 _BC to_ 400 _CE_ (Patrick
Olivelle, editor), pp. 169-190. New York: Oxford University Press.

_____. 2009. “DharmaśĀstra: A Literary History.” In _The Cambridge
Handbook of Law and Hinduism_ (T. Lubin and D. Davis, editors), pp.
112-143. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Oliver, Douglas. 1955. _A Solomon Island Society_. Cambridge: Harvard
University Press.

Onvlee, Louis. 1980. “The Significance of Livestock on Sumba.” In _The
Flow of Life: Essays on Eastern Indonesia_ (James J. Fox, editor), pp.
195-207. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Oppenheim, Leo. 1964. _Ancient Mesopotamia: Portrait of a Dead
Civilization_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Orléan, André. 1998. “La monnaie autoréférentielle.” In: M. Aglietta &
A. Orléan (editors), _La monnaie souveraine_, pp. 359–386. Paris: Odile
Jacob.

Orlove, Benjamin. 1986. “Barter and Cash Sale on Lake Titicaca: A Test
of Competing Approaches.” _Current Anthropology_ 27 (2): 85-106.

Orr, Leslie C. 2000. _Donors, Devotees, and Daughters of God: Temple
Women in Medieval Tamilnadu_. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Ottenberg, Simon. 1958. “Ibo Oracles and Intergroup Relations.”
_Southwestern Journal of Anthropology_ 14 (3): 295-317.

Ottenberg, Simon and Phoebe Ottenberg. 1962. “Afikpo Markets:
1900-1960.” In _Markets in Africa_ (Paul Bohannan and George Dalton,
editors), pp. 118-169. Chicago: Northwestern University Press.

Ottenberg, Simon and Linda Knudsen. 1985. “Leopard Society Masquerades:
Symbolism and Diffusion.” _African Arts_ 18 (2): 37-44.

Oxfeld, Ellen. 2004. “ ‘When You Drink Water, Think of its Source’:
Morality, Status, and Reinvention in Chinese Funerals.” _Journal of
Asian Studies_ 63 (4): 961-990.

Ozment, Steven. 1983. _When Fathers Ruled_. Harvard University Press,
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Pagden, Anthony. 1986. _The Fall of Natural Man: the American Indian and
the origins of comparative ethnology_. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Palat, Ravi Arvind. 1986. “Popular Revolts and the State in Medieval
South India: A Study of the Vijayanagara Empire (1360-1565),” _Bijdragen
tot de taal-, Land-, en Volkenkunde_, CXII, pp. 128-44.

_____. 1988. _From World-Empire to World-Economy: Southeastern India and
the Emergence of the Indian Ocean World-Economy_ (1350-1650). Ph. D.
Dissertation, State University of New York at Binghamton.

Parker, Arthur. 1926. _An Analytical History of the Seneca Indians_.
Researches and Transactions of the New York State Archaeological
Association. Rochester, NY.

Parker, David B. 1994. “The Rise and Fall of The Wonderful Wizard of Oz
as a ‘Parable on Populism.’ ” _Journal of the Georgia Association of
Historians_ 15: 49-63.

Parkes, Henry Bamford. 1959. _Gods and Men: The Origins of Western
Culture_. New York: Vintage Books.

Parkin, Michael and David King. 1995. _Economics (Second Edition)_.
London: Addison-Wesley Publishers.

Parks, Time. 2005. _Medici Money: Banking, Metaphysics, and Art in
Fifteenth-Century Florence_. New York: Norton.

Partridge, Charles. 1905. _Cross River Natives: Being Some Notes on the
Primitive Pagans of Obubura Hill District, Southern Nigeria_. London:
Hutchinson & Co.

Pasadika, Bhikkhu. 1997. “The concept of avipranĀśa in NĀgĀrjuna.” In
_Recent Researches in Buddhist Studies: Essays in Honour of Y.
Karunadasa_, pp. 516-523. Kuala Lumpur: Y. Karunadasa Felicitation
Committee. & Chi Ying Foundation.

Pateman, Carole. 1988. _The Sexual Contract_. Stanford: Stanford
University Press.

Patterson, Orlando. 1982. _Slavery and Social Death: A Comparative
Study_. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Pearson, Michael N. 1982. “Premodern Muslim Political Systems.” _Journal
of the American Oriental Societ_y vol. 102 (no. 1):47-58.

Peng, Xinwei. 1994. _A monetary history of China (Zhongguo Huobi Shi)_.
Two Volumes. (Edward H. Kaplan, translator). Bellingham: Western
Washington University.

Perlman, Mark and Charles Robert McCann. 1998. _The pillars of economic
understanding: ideas and traditions_. Ann Arbor: University of Michigan
Press.

Peters, E. L. 1967. “Some Structural Aspects of the Feud Among the
Camel-Herding Bedouins of Cyrenaica.” _Africa_ 37: 261-282.

Phillips, William D. 1985. _Slavery From Roman Times to the Early
Transatlantic Trade_. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press.

Picard, Olivier. 1975. “La ‘fiduciarité’ des monnaies métalliques en
Grèce.” _Bulletin de la Société Française de Numismatique_ 34 (10:
604-609.

Pietz, William. 1985. . “The Problem of the Fetish I.” _RES: Journal of
Anthropology and Aesthetics_ 9:5-17.

Pigou, Arthur Cecil. 1949. _The Veil of Money_. London: Macmillan.

Polanyi, Karl. 1949. The Great Transformation. New York: Rinehart.

_____. 1957a. “Aristotle Discovers the Economy.” In K. Polanyi, C.
Arensberg and H. Pearson (eds.), _Trade and Market in the Early
Empires_, pp. 64-94. Glencoe: The Free Press.

_____. 1957b. “The economy as an instituted process.” In K. Polanyi, C.
Arensberg and H. Pearson (eds.), _Trade and Market in the Early
Empires_, pp. 243-269 Glencoe: The Free Press.

_____. 1968. “The Semantics of Money Uses.” In _Primitive, Archaic, and
Modern Economies: Essays of Karl Polanyi_. (George Dalton, ed.) New
York: Anchor.

Poliakov, Léon. 1977. _Jewish bankers and the Holy See from the
thirteenth to the seventeenth century_. London: Routledge.

Pomeranz, Kenneth. 1998. _The Great Divergence: China, Europe, and the
Making of the Modern World Economy_. Princeton: Princeton University
Press.

Powell, Marvin A. 1978. “A Contribution to the History of Money in
Mesopotamia prior to the Invention of Coinage.” In _Festschrift Lubor
Matous_ (B. Hruska and G. Comoroczy, eds.) Budapest) II, pp. 211-43.

_____. 1979. “Ancient Mesopotamian Weight Metrology: Methods, Problems
and Perspectives.” In _Studies in Honor of Tom B. Jones_ (M. A. Powell
and R. H. Sack, editors), pp. 71-109. Amsterdam:
Kevelaer/Neukirchen-Vluyn.

_____. 1999. “Wir _mussen unsere nisch Nutzen:_ Monies, Motives and
Methods in Babylonian economics.” In _Trade and Finance in Ancient
Mesopotamia, Proceedings of the First Mos Symposium (Ledien_ 1997), (J.
G. Derksen, editior), pp. 5-24. Istanbul: Nederlands
Historich-Archeologisch Instiuut.

Prakash, Gyan. 2003. _Bonded Histories: Genealogies of Labor Servitude
in Colonial India_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Prakash, Satya and Rajendra Singh,. 1968. _Coinage in Ancient India_ New
Delhi: Research Institute of Ancient Scientific Studies.

Price, Jacob M. 1980. _Capital and Credit in British Overseas Trade: the
View from the Chesapeake_, 1700-1776. Cambridge: Harvard University
Press.

_____. 1989. “What Did Merchants Do? Reflections on British Overseas
Trade, 1660-1790.” _The Journal of Economic History_ 49 (2): 267-284.

_____. 1991. “Credit in the Slave Trade and Plantation Economies.” In
Barbara L. Solow, editor, _Slavery and the Rise of the Atlantic System_,
pp. 313-17. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Price, Martin Jessop,. 1983. “Thoughts on the beginnings of coinage.” In
_Studies in Numismatic Method Presented to Philip Grierson_ (C.N.L.
Brooke et al., editors,), pp. 1-10. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Proudhon, Pierre-Joseph. 1840. _Qu’est-ce que la propriété? Recherche
sur le principe du droit et du gouvernement. Premier mémoire_. Paris :
J.-F. Brocard.

Puett, Michael J. 2002. _To Become a God: Cosmology, Sacrifice, and
Self-Divinization in Early China_. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Quiggin, A. Hingston. 1949. _A Survey of primitive money; the beginning
of currency_ London: Methuen.

Quilter, Jeffrey and Gary Urton. 2002. _Narrative threads: accounting
and recounting in Andean Khipu_. Austin: University of Texas.

Radford, R. A. 1945. “The Economic Organization of a POW Camp.”
_Economica_ 12 (48): 189-201

Raglan, FitzRoy Richard Somerset, Baron. 1931. “Bride Price.” _Man_ 31:
75.

Rahman, Fashur. 1964. “Riba and Interest.” _Islamic Studies_ 3:1-43.

Rai, G. K. 1981. _Involuntary Labour in Ancient India_. Allahabad:
Chaitanya Press.

Ray, Nicholas Dylan. 1997. “The Medieval Islamic System of Credit and
Banking: Legal and Historical Considerations.” _Arab Law Quarterly_ 12
(1): 43-90.

Reden, Sitta von. 1997. “Money, Law and Exchange: Coinage in the Greek
Polis.” _Journal of Hellenic Studies_ 117: 154-176.

_____. 2003. _Exchange in Ancient Greece_. London: Duckworth.

Reeves, Eileen. 1999. “As Good as Gold: The Mobile Earth and Early
Modern Economics.” _Journal of the Warburg and Courtauld Institutes_ 62:
126-166.

Reid, Anthony. 1983. _Slavery, Bondage and Dependence in Southeast
Asia_. New York: St. Martin’s Press.

Renger, Johannes. 1983. “Patterns of Non-Institutional Trade and
Non-Commercial. Exchange in Ancient Mesopotamia at the Beginning of the
Second Millennium B.C.” In _Circulation of Goods in Non-palatial
Contexts in the Ancient Near East_ (A. Archi, editor), pp. 31-123. Rome:
Edizioni dell’Ateneo

_____. 1994. “On Economic Structures in Ancient Mesopotamia.”
_Orientalia_ 18:157-208.

Retours, Robert de. 1952. “Les insignes en deux parties (fou) sous la
dynastie des T’ang (618-907).” _T’oung Pao_ 41 (1/3): 1-148.

Rhys Davids, Caroline A. F. 1901. “Economic Conditions in Ancient
India.” _The Economic Journal_ 11 (43): 305-320

_____. 1922. “Economic Conditions According to Early Buddhist
Literature.” In _The Cambridge History of India Volume I: Ancient India_
(E. J. Rapson, editor), pp. 198-219. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Richard, R. D. 1926. “Early History of the Term Capital.” _Quarterly
Journal of Economics_ 40 (2): 329-38.

Richards, Audrey. 1939. _Land, Labour and Diet in Northern Rhodesia_.
London: Oxford University Press.

Richter, Daniel K. 1983. “War and Culture: the Iroquois Experience.”
_William and Mary Quarterly_, 3d Series, 40:528-559.

Rickett, W. Allyn. 1998. _Guanzi: Political, Economic, and Philosophical
Essays from Early China_ (2 volumes). Princeton: Princeton University
Press.

Riepe, Dale Maurice. 1961. _The Naturalistic Tradition in Indian
Thought_. Seattle: University of Washington Press

Risso, Patricia. 1995. _Merchants and Faith: Muslim Commerce and Culture
in the Indian Ocean_. Boulder: Westview Press.

Robertson, Pat. 1992. _The Secret Kingdom_. Dallas and London: Word
Publishing.

Robinson, Rachel Sargent. 1973. _The size of the slave population at
Athens during the fifth and fourth centuries before Christ_. Westport:
Greenwood Press.

Robisheaux, Thomas. 1989. _Rural society and the search for order in
early modern Germany_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Rockoff, Hugh. 1990. “The ‘Wizard of Oz’ as a Monetary Allegory.”
_Journal of Political Economy_ 98 (4): 739-760.

Rodinson, Maxine. 1978. _Islam and Capitalism_. Austin: University of
Texas Press.

Roetz, Heiner. 1993. _Confucian ethics of the axial age: a
reconstruction under the aspect of the breakthrough toward
postconventional thinking_. Albany: SUNY.

Rohrlich, Ruby. 1980. “State Formation in Sumer and the Subjugation of
Women.” _Feminist Studies_ 6 (1): 76-102.

Roitman, Janet. 2003. “Unsanctioned Wealth; or, the Productivity of Debt
in Northern Cameroon.” _Public Culture_ 15 (2): 211-237.

Roover, Raymond de. 1944. “What is Dry Exchange? A Contribution to the
Study of English Mercantilism.” _Journal of Political Economy_ 52:
250-66

_____. 1946. “The Medici Bank.” _Journal of Economic History_ 6: 24-52,
153-72.

_____. 1948. _Money, Banking, and Credit in Mediæval Bruges_. Cambridge:
Mediaeval Academy of America.

_____. 1963. _The Rise and Decline of the Medici Bank:_ 1397-1494. New
York: W.W. Norton.

_____. 1967. “The Scholastics, Usury and Foreign Exchange.” _Business
History Review_ 41 (3): 257-71.

Rospabé, Philippe. 1993. “Don Archaïque et Monnaie Sauvage.” In _MAUSS:
Ce Que Donner Vuet Dire: Don et Intéret_. Paris: Éditions la découverte,
pp. 33-59.

_____. 1995. _La Dette de Vie: aux origines de la monnaie sauvage_.
Paris: Editions la Découverte/MAUSS.

Rotours, Robert de. 1952. “Les insignes en deux parties (fou) sous la
dynastie des T’ang (618-907).” _T’oung Pao_ 41: 1-148.

Ruel, Malcolm. 1969. _Leopards and Leaders_. London: Tavistock

Rule, John. 1986. _The Labouring Classes in Early Industrial England_,
1750-1850. London: Longman.

Saggs, Henry William Frederick. 1962. _The Greatness That Was Babylon_.
New York: Mentor Books.

Sahlins, Marshall. 1972. _Stone Age Economics_. Chicago: Aldine.

_____. 1981. “The stranger-king or Dumézil among the Fijians.” _Journal
of Pacific History_ 16: 107-32.

_____. 1988. “Cosmologies of Capitalism.” _Proceedings of the British
Academy_ 74:1-51.

_____. 1996. “The Sadness of Sweetness: The Native Anthropology of
Western Cosmology.” _Current Anthropology_, Vol. 37 (3): 395-428.

_____. 2004. _Apologies to Thucydides: Understanding History as Culture
and Vice Versa_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

_____. 2008. _The Western Illusion of Human Nature_. Chicago: Prickly
Paradigm Press.

Saller, Richard P. 1984. “ ‘Familia, Domus’, and the Roman Conception of
the Family.” _Phoenix_ 38 (4): 336-355.

_____. 1987. “Slavery and the Roman family.” In _Classical Slavery_
(Moses Finley, editor), pp. 82-110. London: Frank Cass.

Samuel, Geoffrey. 2003. “Property, Obligations: Continental and
Comparative Perspectives.” In _New Perspectives on Property Law, Human
Rights, and the Home_ (Alastair Hudson, editor), pp. 295-318. London:
Cavendish Publications.

Samuelson, Paul A. 1948. _Economics_. New York: McGraw Hill.

_____. 1958. “An exact consumption-loan model of interest with or
without the social contrivance of money.” In _The Collected Scientific
Papers of Paul A. Samuelson_, volume 1 (J. Stiglitz, editor), pp.
219-33. Cambridge: MIT Press.

Sarthou-Lajous, Nathalie. 1997. _L’ethique de la dette_. Paris: Presses
Universitaires de France.

Sasso, Michael. 1978. “What is the Ho-Tu?” _History of Religions_ 17
(314): 399-416.

Scammel, Jeffrey Vaughan. 1981. _The world encompassed: the first
European maritime empires c_.800-1650. London: Taylor & Frances.

Schaps, David. 2004. _The Invention of Coinage and the Monetization of
Ancient Greece_. Ann Arbor : University of Michigan Press.

_____. 2006. “The Invention of Coinage in Lydia, in India, and in
China.” Helsinki: XIV International Economic History Congress.

Scheidel, Walter. 2006. “The Divergent Evolution of Coinage in Eastern
and Western Eurasia.” Princeton/Stanford Working Papers in Classics
(April 2006): www.princeton.edu/~pswpc/pdfs/scheidel/040603.pdf _____.
2007. “The Monetary Systems of the Han and Roman Empires.” (available at
http://www.princeton.edu/~pswpc/pdfs/scheidel/110505.pdf).

_____. 2009. _Rome and China: Comparative Perspectives on Ancient World
Empires_. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Schlemmer, Bernard. 1983. _Le Menabe: histoire d’une colonization_.
Paris: ORSTOM.

Schneider, Jane. 1971. “Of Vigilance and Virgins: Honor, Shame, and
Access to Resources in Mediterranean Societies.” _Ethnology_ 10:1-24.

Schoenberger, Erica. 2008. “The Origins of the Market Economy: State
Power, Territorial Control, and Modes of War Fighting.” _Comparative
Studies in Society and History_ 50 (3): 663-691.

Schofield, Phillipp R. and N. J. Mayhew, editors. 2002. _Credit and debt
in medieval England, c_.1180_-c_.1350. London: Oxbow.

Schopen, Gregory. 1994. “Doing Business for the Lord: Lending on
Interest and Written Loan Contracts in the MūelasarvĀstivĀda-vinaya.”
_Journal of the American Oriental Society_ 114 (4): 527-554.

_____. 1995. “Monastic Law Meets the Real World: A Monk’s Continuing
Right to Inherit Family Property in Classical India.” _History of
Religions_ 35 (2): 101-123.

_____. 1997. _Bones, stones, and Buddhist monks: collected papers on the
archaeology, epigraphy, and texts of monastic Buddhism in India_.
Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press.

_____. 2004. _Buddhist monks and business matters: still more papers on
monastic Buddhism in India_. Honolulu: University of Hawaii Press.

Schumpeter, Joseph. 1934. _History of Economic Analysis_. New York:
Oxford University Press.

Schwartz, Benjamin I. 1975. “The Age of Transcendence.” _Daedalus_
104:1-7.

_____. 1986. _The World of Thought in Ancient China_. Cambridge: Harvard
University Press.

Scott, Tom, and Bob Scribner, editors. 1991. _The German Peasants’ War:
A History in Documents_. Atlantic Highlands: Humanities Press.

Sea, Thomas F. 2007. “The German Princes’ Responses to the Peasants’
Revolt of 1525.” _Central European History_ 40 (2): 219-240.

Seaford, Richard. 1994. _Reciprocity and Ritual. Homer and Tragedy in
the Developing City-State_. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

_____. 1998. “Tragic Money.” _Journal of Hellenic Studies_ 110: 76-90.

_____. 2002. “Review: Reading Money: Leslie Kurke on the Politics of
Meaning in Archaic Greece.” _Arion_, Third Series 9 (3):145-165.

_____. 2004. _Money and the Early Greek Mind: Homer, Philosophy,
Tragedy_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Sée, Henri Eugène. 1928. _Modern capitalism: its origin and evolution_.
New York: Adelphi.

Seebohm, Frederic. 1877. _The Era of the Protestant Revolution_. London:
Longmans, Green.

Seidel, Anna. 1983. “Imperial Treasures and Taoist Sacraments: Taoist
Roots in Apocrypha.” In _Tantric and Taoist Studies in Honor of Rolf A.
Stein_ (Michel Strickmann, editor), II, pp. 291-371. Bruxelles:
Institute Belge des Hautes Études Chinoises.

Servet, Jean-Michel. 1981. “Primitive Order and Archaic Trade. Part I”
_Economy and Society_ 10 (4): 423-450.

_____. 1982. “Primitive Order and Archaic Trade. Part II.” _Economy and
Society 11_ (1): 22-59.

_____. 1994. “La fable du troc,” numero spécial de la revue _XVIIIe
siècle, Economie et politique_ (sous la direction Gerard Klotz,
Catherine Larrere et Pierre Retat), n°26: 103-115

_____. 1998. “Demonétarisation et remonétarisation en
Afrique-Occidentale et Équatoriale (XIXe-XXe siècles).” In _La Monnaie
souveraine_ (Aglietta and Orleans, editors), pp. 289-324. Paris: Odile
Jacob.

_____. 2001. “Le troc primitif, un mythe fondateur d’une approche
économiste de la monnaie.” _Revue numismatique_ 2001: 15-32.

Sharma, J. P. 1968. _Republics in Ancient India: c_ 1500 – _c_. 500 BC.
Leiden: E. J. Brill

Sharma, Ram Sharan. 1958. _Sudras in Ancient India_. Delhi: Mohtial
Banarsidas.

_____. 1965. “Usury in Medieval India (A.D. 400-1200).” _Comparative
Studies in Society and History_ 8 (1): 56-77.

_____. 1987. _Urban Decay in India c_. 300- _c_.1000. Delhi: Munshiram
Manoharlal.

_____. 2001. _Early medieval Indian society: a study in feudalisation_.
Hyderbad: Orient Longman.

Shell, Marc. 1978. _The Economy of Literature_. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins
University Press.

_____. 1992. _Money, Language, and Thought_. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins
University Press.

Sheridan, R. B. 1958. “The Commercial and Financial Organization of the
British Slave Trade, 1750-1807.” _The Economic History Review_, New
Series 11 (2): 249-263.

Silver, Morris. 1985. _Economic structures of the ancient Near East_.
London: Taylor & Francis.

Singer, Sholom A. 1964. “The Expulsion of the Jews from England in
1290.” _The Jewish Quarterly Review_, New Series, 55 (2): 117-136.

Skinner, Quentin. 1998. _Liberty before Liberalism_. Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press. Smith, Adam. 1761. _Theory of moral
sentiments_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press (2002 edition).

_____. 1762. _Lectures on Jurisprudence_. Glasgow Edition of the Works
and Correspondence of Adam Smith Vol. 5. Indianapolis: Liberty Fund
(1982 edition).

_____. 1776. _An Inquiry into the nature and causes of the wealth of
nations_. Oxford: Clarendon Press (1976 edition).

Smith, Edwin, and Andrew Murray Dale. 1968. _The Ila Speaking Peoples Of
Northern Rhodesia_. Two Volumes. London: Kessinger.

Smith, Timothy. 1983. “Wampum as Primitive Valuables.” _Research in
Economic Anthropology_ 5: 225-246.

Snell, F. J. 1919. _The Customs of Old Englan_d. London: Methuen.

Solow, Barbara. 1987. “Capitalism and Slavery in the Exceedingly Long
Run.” _Journal of Interdisciplinary History_ 17 (4): 711-737.

Sonenscher, Michael. 2007. _Before the Deluge: Public Debt, Inequality,
and the Intellectual Origins of the French Revolution_. Princeton:
Princeton University Press.

Spufford, Peter. 1988. _Money and Its Use in Medieval Europe_.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press

Spyer, Patricia. 1997. “The Eroticism of Debt: Pearl Divers, Traders,
and Sea Wives in the Aru Islands of Eastern Indonesia.” _American
Ethnologist_ 24 (3): 515-538.

Ste. Croix, Geoffrey Ernest Maurice De. 1981. _The Class Struggle in the
Ancient Greek World: from the Archaic Age to the Arab Conquests_.
Ithaca: Cornell University Press.

Stannard, David E. 1993. _American holocaust: the conquest of the New
World_. New York: Oxford University Press.

Starr, Chester G. 1977. _The Economic and Social Growth of Early
Greece_. 800-500 _BC_. New York: Oxford University Press.

Stein, Siegfried. 1953. “Laws of Interest in the Old Testament.”
_Journal of Theological Studies_ 4: 161-70.

_____. 1955. “The Development of the Jewish Law of Interest from the
Biblical Period to the Expulsion of the Jews from England.” _Historia
Judaica_ 17:3-40.

Stein, Stanley J., and Barbara H. Stein. 2000. _Silver, trade, and war:
Spain and America in the making of early modern Europe_. Baltimore:
Johns Hopkins.

Steinkeller, Piotr. 1980. “The Renting of Fields in early Mesopotamia
and the Development of the Concept of ‘Interest’ in Sumerian.” _Journal
of the Economic and Social History of the Orient_ 24: 113-145.

_____. 2003. “Money-Lending Practices in Ur III Babylonia: the question
of economic motivation.” In _Debt and Economic Renewal in the Ancient
Near East_ (Hudson, Michael and Marc Van de Mieroop, editors), pp.
109-137. Bethesda: CDL.

Stiglitz, Joseph, and John Driffill. 2000. _Economics_. New York: W. W.
Norton.

Stol, Marten. 1995. “Women in Mesopotamia.” _Journal of the Economic and
Social History of the Orient_ 38 (2): 123-144.

Stone, Lawrence. 1968. _The Family, Sex and Marriage in England_
1500-1800. London: Unwin.

_____. 1990. _Road to Divorce: England_ 1530-1987. Oxford: Oxford
University Press.

Stone, Willard E. 2005. “The Tally: An Ancient Accounting Instrument.”
_Abacus_ 11 (1): 49-57.

Stout, William. 1742 [1967]. _The Autobiography of William Stout of
Lancaster_ 1665-1752. (John Duncan Marshall, editor.) Manchester:
Manchester University Press

Strickmann, Michel. 2002. _Chinese magical medicine_. Stanford: Stanford
University Press.

Subrahmanyam, Sanjay. 1996. “Of Imarat and Tijarat: Asian Merchants and
State Power in the Western Indian Ocean, 1400 to 1750.” _Comparative
Studies in Society and History_ Vol. 37 no 4, pp. 750-780.

Sun, Guang-Zhen. 2008. “Fragment: Nasir ad-Din Tusi on social
cooperation and the division of labor: Fragment from The Nasirean
Ethics.” _Journal of Institutional Economics_ 4 (3): 403-413.

Sutton, David. 2004. “Anthropology’s value(s).” _Anthropological Theory_
4(3): 373-379.

Swann, Nancy Lee. 1950. _Food and Money in Ancient China: The earliest
economic history of China to A. D_. 25. _Han Shu_ 24 _with related
texts. Han Shu_ 91 _and Shih-chi_ 129. Princeton: Princeton University
Press.

Tag El-Din, Saif I. 2007. “Capital and Money Markets of Muslims: The
Emerging Experience in Theory and Practice.” Kyoto Bulletin of Islamic
Area Studies, 1-2: 54-71.

Tambiah, Stanley J. 1973. “Dowry and Bridewealth and the Property Rights
of Women in South Asia.” In _Bridewealth and Dowry_ (Jack Goody and S.
J. Tambiah, editors), pp. 59-169. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

_____. 1989. “Bridewealth and Dowry Revisited: The Position of Women in
Sub-Saharan Africa and North India.” _Current Anthropology_ 30 (4):
413-434.

Tambo, David C. 1976. “The Sokoto Caliphate Slave Trade in the
Nineteenth Century.” _International Journal of African Historical
Studies_ 9 (2): 187-217.

Taussig, Michael. 1984. “Culture of Terror—Space of Death. Roger
Casement’s Putumayo Report and the Explanation of Torture.” _Comparative
Studies in Society and History_ 26 (3): 467-497.

_____. 1987. _Shamanism, Colonialism, and the Wild Man_. Chicago:
University of Chicago Press.

Taylor, Quentin P. 2005. “Money and Politics in the Land of Oz.” _The
Independent Review_ 9 (3): 413-426.

Tebbutt, Melanie. 1983. _Making Ends Meet: Pawnbroking and Working-Class
Credit_. New York: St. Martin’s Press.

Teiser, Stephen F. 1988. _The Ghost Festival in Medieval China_.
Princeton: Princeton University Press.

Testart, Alain. 1997. “Le mise en gage de personnes: sociologie
comparative d’une institution.” _Archives Européenes de Sociologie_ 38:
38-67.

_____. 1998. “Pourquoi la condition de l’esclave s’ameliore-t-elle en
regime despotique?” _Revue française de sociologie_ 39 (1): 3-38

_____. 2000. “L’Esclavage pour dettes en Asie Orientale.” _Moussons_ 2:
3-29.

_____. 2001. _Esclave, la dette et le pouvoir: études de sociologie
comparative_. Paris : Errance

_____. 2002. “The extent and significance of debt slavery.” _Revue
Française de Sociologie_ 43: 173-204.

Testart, Alain, Valerie Lécrivain, Dimitri Karadimas and Nicolas
Govoroff. 2001. “Prix de la fiancée et esclavage pour dettes: Un exemple
de loi sociologique.” _Études rurales_ No. 159/160: 9-33.

Thapar, Romila. 1995. “The First Millennium BC in Northern India.” In
_Recent perspectives of early Indian history_ (R. Thapar, editor) pp.
87-150. New Delhi: Book Review Trust.

_____. 2002. “The Role of the Army in the Exercise of Power in Ancient
India.” In _Army and power in the ancient world. Volume_ 37 _of
Heidelberger althistorische Beiträge und epigraphische Studien_ (Ángelos
Chaniótis, Pierre Ducre, _editors), pp_. 25-39. _Heidelberg:_ Franz
Steiner Verlag.

Thesleff, Holgar. 1989. “Platonic Chronology.” _Phronesis_ 34 (1): 1-26.

Théret, Bruno. 1992. _Régimes économiques de l’ordre politique :
esquisse d’une théorie régulationniste des limites de l’Etat_. Paris:
Presses Universitaires de France,.

_____. 1995. _L’État, la finance et le social. Souveraineté nationale et
construction européenne_ (direction de publication). Paris: Éditions la
Découverte.

_____. 1999. “The Socio-Cultural Dimensions of the Currency:
Implications for the Transition to the Euro.” _Journal of Consumer
Policy_ 22: 51-79.

_____. 2007. _La monnaie dévoilée par ses crises_ (direction de
publication). Paris: Editions de l’EHESS, 2 volumes: volume 1, “Monnaies
métalliques, volume 2 “Monnaies autoréférentielles. Les autres monnaies
en Allemagne et en Russie au XXème siècle

_____. 2008. “Les trios états de la monnaie: approche interdisciplinaire
du fait monétaire.” Revue Economique 59 (4): 813-842.

Thierry, François. 1992. _Monnaies de Chine.Paris:_ Bibliothèque
nationale.

_____. 2001. “Sur les spécifités fondamentales de la monnaie chinoise.”
In _Aux origines de la monnaie_ (Alain Testart, editor), pp. 109-44.
Paris: Éditions Errance.

Thomas, Keith. 1972. _Religion and the Decline of Magic: Studies in
popular beliefs in sixteenth and seventeenth century England_. New York:
Scribners.

Thompson, Edward Palmer. 1971. “The Moral Economy of the English Crowd
in the 18th Century.” _Past & Present_ 50: 76-136.

Thurnwald, Richard C. 1916. “Banaro Society: Social Organization and
Kinship System of a Tribe in the Interior of New Guinea.” _Memoirs of
the American Anthropological Association_ 8:251-391.

Tierney, Brian. 1997. _The Idea of Natural Rights: Studies on Natural
Rights, Natural Law and Church Law 11_50–1625. (Emory University Studies
in Law and Religion, number 5). Atlanta: Scholars Press.

Todorov, Tzvetan. 1984. _The conquest of America: the question of the
other_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Tong, James W. 1989. _Disorder Under Heaven: Collective Violence in the
Ming Dynasty_. Stanford: Stanford University Press.

Tortella, Gabriel and Francisco Comîn. 2002. “Fiscal and Monetary
Institutions in Spain, 1600-1900.” In Transferring wealth and power from
the old to the new world: monetary and fiscal institutions in the 17th
through the 19th century (Michael D. Bordo and Robert Cortés Conde,
editors), pp. 140-186. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Trawick, Margaret. 1992. _Notes on Love in a Tamil Family_. Berkeley:
University of California Press.

Trevett, Jeremy. 1992. _Apollodoros the Son of Pasion_. Oxford:
Clarendon Press.

_____. 2001. “Coinage and Democracy at Athens,” in A. Meadows and K.
Shipton, eds., _Money and Its Uses in the Ancient Greek World_ (Oxford:
Oxford University Press), pp. 23–34

Trombert, Eric. 1995. _Le crédit à Dunhuang: Vie matérielle et société
en Chine médiévale_. Paris: Ihec/Inst.Hautes Etudes.

Tseayo, Justin Iyorbee. 1975. _Conflict and Incorporation in Nigera: the
Integration of the Tiv_. Zaria Nigeria: Gaskiya.

Tuck, Richard. 1979. _Natural rights theories: their origin and
development_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Tull, Herman Wayne. 1989. _The Vedic Origins of Karma: cosmos as man in
ancient Indian myth and ritual_. Albany: SUNY.

Tully, James. 1993. _An Approach to Political Philosophy: Locke in
Contexts_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Tuma, Elias. 1965. “Early Arab Economic Policies, 1st/7th–4th/10th
Centuries.” _Islamic Studies_ 4 (1): 1-23.

Uchendo, Victor. 1967. “Some Principles of Haggling in Peasant Markets.”
_Economic Development and Cultural Change_ 16 (1): 37-50.

Udovitch, Abraham L. 1970. _Partnership and Profit in Medieval Islam_.
Princeton: Princeton University Press.

_____. 1975. “Reflections on the Institutions of Credit and Banking in
the Medieval Islamic Near East.” _Studia Islamica_ 41: 5-21.

Uebach, Helga. 2008. “From Red Tally to Yellow Paper: the official
introduction of paper in Tibetan administration in 744/745.” _Revue
d’Etudes Tibétaines 1_4: 57-69.

Usher, Abbot Payson. 1914. “The Origin of the Bill of Exchange.”
_Journal of Political Economy_ 22: 566-76.

_____. 1934. “The Origins of Banking: The Primitive Bank of Deposit,
1200-1600.” _Economic History Review_ 4 (4): 399-428.

_____. 1943. _The Early History of Deposit Banking in Mediterranean
Europe_. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Valenze, Deborah M. 2006. _The social life of money in the English
past_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Valeri, Valerio. 1994. “Buying Women but no Selling Them: Gift and
Commodity Exchange in Huaulu Alliance.” _Man_ (n.s.) 29:1-26.

_____. 2001. “Feasts.” In _Fragments from Forests and Libraries_, pp.
1-27. Durham: Carolina Academic Press.

Van Der Toorn, Karel. 1989. “Female Prostitution in Payment of Vows in
Ancient Israel.” _Journal of Biblical Literature_ 108 (2): 193-205.

Vance, Eugene. 1973. “Signs of the City: Medieval Poetry as Detour.”
_New Literary History_ 4 (3): 557-574

_____. 1986. “Chrétien’s Yvain and the Ideologies of Change and
Exchange.” _Yale French Studies_ 70: 42-62.

Vaneigem, Raoul. 1967. _Traité de savoir-vivre à l’usage des jeunes
générations_. Paris, Gallimard.

Veenhof, Karl. 1997. “ ‘Modern’ Features in Old Assyrian Trade.”
_Journal of the Economic and Social History of the Orient_ 40: 336-366.

Verellen, Franciscus. 2006. “The Dynamic Design: Ritual and
Contemplative Graphics in Daoist Scriptures.” In _Daoism in History:
Essays in Honor of Liu Rs’un-yan_ (Quanlen Liu, Benjamin Penny,
editors), pp. 159-182. London: Routledge.

Verlinden, Charles. 1970. _The Beginnings of Modern Colonization: Eleven
Essays with an Introduction_. Ithaca: Cornell University Press.

VerSteeg, Russ. 2000. _Early Mesopotamian Law_. Durham: Carolina
Academic Press.

_____. 2002. _Law in Ancient Egypt_. Durham: Carolina Academic Press.

Veyne, Paul-Marie. 1979. “Mythe et réalité de l’autarcie à Rome.” _Revue
des études anciennes_ 81: 261-280.

Vice, Roy L. 1988. “Leadership and Structure of the Tauber Band during
the Peasants’ War in Franconia.” _Central European History_ 24 (2):
175-195.

Vickers, Adrian. 1996. _Bali: a paradise created_. Singapore: Periplus
Editions.

Vickers, Michael J. 1985. “Early Greek Coinage, a Reassessment.”
_Numismatic Chronicle_ 145:1-44.

Vijaisri, Priyadarshini. 2004. _Recasting the Devadadi: Patterns of
Sacred Prostitution in Colonial South India_. New Delhi: Kanishka.

Villey, Michel. 1946. “L’Idee du droit subjectif et les systemes
juridiques romains.” Revue historique de droit, series 4: 201-227.

Vondeling, Jan. 1961. _Eranos_ (with a summary in English). Amsterdam:
Gron.

Wade, Geoffrey. 2004. “The Zheng He Voyages: A Reassessment.” _Asia
Research Institute Working Paper Series_ No. 31, Oct 2004

Wake, Christopher. 1997. “The Great Ocean-going Ships of Southern China
in the Age of Chinese Maritime Voyaging to India, Twelfth to Fifteenth
Centuries,” _International Journal of Maritime History_ 9 (2): 51-81

Walker, Garthene. 1996. “Expanding the Boundaries of Female Honour in
Early Modern England.” _Transactions of the Royal Historical Society_,
Sixth Series, 8:235-245.

Walker, James Broom. 1875. “Notes on the Politics, Religion, and
Commerce of Old Calabar.” _The Journal of the Anthropological Institute
of Great Britain and Ireland_ 6: 119-124.

Wallace, Robert B. 1987. “The Origin of Electrum Coinage.” _American
Journal of Archaeology_ 91: 385-97.

Wallace-Hadrill, Andrew, editor. 1989. _Patronage in Ancient Society_
(Leicester-Nottingham Studies in Ancient Society, Volume 1). London:
Routledge.

Wallerstein, Immanuel. 1974. _The Modern World System, volume_ I. New
York: Academic Press

_____. 1989. “The French Revolution as a World-Historical Event.”
_Social Research_ 56 (1): 33-52.

_____. 1991. “Braudel on Capitalism, or Everything Upside Down.”
_Journal of Modern History_ 63 (2): 354-361.

_____. 2001. _The End of the World as We Know It: Social Science for the
Twenty-First Century_. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press.

Walsh, Michael J. 2007. “The Economics of Salvation: Toward a Theory of
Exchange in Chinese Buddhism.” _Journal of the American Academy of
Religion_ 75 (2): 353–382

Warburton, David. 2000. “Before the IMF: The Economic Implications of
Unintentional Structural Adjustment in Ancient Egypt.” _Journal of the
Economic and Social History of the Orient_ 43 (2): 65-131.

_____. 2001. “State and economy in ancient Egypt.” In _World System
History: the social science of long-term change_ (Robert Denemark,
Jonathan Friedman, Barry Gills, and George Modelski, editors), pp.
169-184. New York: Routledge.

Wartburg, Marie Louise von. 1995. “Production de sucre de canne à
Chypre.” In _Coloniser au Moyen Age_ (Michel Balard and Alain Ducellier,
editors), Paris: A. Colon, pp. 126-31.

Waswo, Richard. 1996. “Shakespeare and the Formation of the Modern
Economy.” _Surfaces_ Vol. 6. 217 (v.1.0A),
http://www.pum.umontreal.ca/revues/surfaces/
vol6/waswo.html.

_____. 2004. “Crises of Credit: Monetary and Erotic Economies in the
Jacobean Theater.” In _Plotting early modern London: new essays on
Jacobean City comedy_ (Dieter Mehl, Angela Stock, Anne-Julia Zwierlein,
editors), pp. 55-74. London: Ashgate Publishing.

Watson, Alan. 1987. _Roman Slave Law_. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins
University Press.

Watson, James L. 1980. “Transactions in People: The Chinese Market in
Slaves, Servants, and Heirs.” In _Asian and African Systems of Slavery_
(James L. Watson, editor), pp. 223-250. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Weber, Max. 1924. _Gesammelte Aufsätze zur Soziale- und
Wirtschaftegeschichte_. Tubingen. English version: _The Agrarian
Sociology of Ancient Civilizations_. (R. I. Frank, trans.) London:
Verso.

_____. 1961. _General Economic History_. New York: Collier Books.

_____. 1978. _Economy and Society: An Outline of Interpretive
Sociology_. (Ephrain Fischoff, trans.) Berkeley: University of
California Press.

Wennerlind, Carl. 2003. “Credit-money as the Philosopher’s Stone:
Alchemy and the Coinage Problem in Seventeenth-century England.”
_History of Political Economy_ 35:234-61.

Westbrook, Raymond. 1971. “Jubilee Laws.” _Israel Law Review_ 6: 209-26.

_____. 1984. “The enforcement of morals in Mesopotamian law.” _Journal
of the American Oriental Society_ 104: 753-756.

_____. 1988. _Old Babylonian Marriage Law_. Archlv für Orientforschung,
Beiheft 23. Horn: F. Burger.

_____. 1990. “Adultery in Ancient Near Eastern Law.” _Revue biblique_
97: 542-580

_____. 1991. _Property and the Family in Biblical Law_. Sheffield:
Sheffield Academic Press.

_____. 1995. “Slave and Master in Ancient Near Eastern Law.”
_Chicago-Kent Law Review_ 70: 1631-76.

_____. 1999. “Vitae Necisque Potestas.” _Historia: Zeitschrift für Alte
Geschichte_ 48 (2): 203-223.

Westenholz, Joan Goodnick. 1989. “Tamar, _Qedesa, Qadistu_, and Sacred
Prostitution in Mesopotamia.” _Harvard Theological Review_ 82: 245–265.

Westermann, William L. 1955. _The Slave Systems of Greek and Roman
Antiquity_. Philadelphia: American Philosophical Society.

Whelan, T. S. 1979. _The Pawnshop in China_. Ann Arbor: Centre for
Chinese Studies, University of Michigan Whitaker, C. W. A. 2002.
_Aristotle’s De interpretatione: contradiction and dialectic_. Oxford:
Oxford University Press.

White, Jenny Barbara. 2004. _Money makes us relatives: women’s labor in
urban Turkey_. London: Routledge.

Whiting, John Roger Scott. 1971. _Trade Tokens: A Social and Economic
History_. London: Newton Abbot.

Wiedemann, Thomas. 1981. _Greek and Roman Slavery_. New York: Routledge.

Wiener, Margaret J. 1995. _Visible and invisible realms: power, magic,
and colonial conquest in Bali_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Wilbur, C. Martin. 1943. _Slavery in China during the Former Han
Dynasty_. Anthropological Series, volume 34. Chicago: Chicago Field
Museum of Natural History.

Wilcke, Claus. 1985. “Familiengründung im alten Babylonien.” In
_Geschlechtsreife und Legitimation zur Zeugung_ (E.W Müller, ed.), pp.
213-317. Freiburg and München: Alber.

Williams, Brett. 2004. _Debt for Sale: A Social History of the Credit
Trap_. Philadelphia: University of Pennsylvania Press.

Williams, Carl O. 1937. _Thraldom in Ancient Iceland: A Chapter in the
History of Class Rule_. Chicago: University of Chicago Press.

Williams, Eric. 1944. _Capitalism and Slavery_. Chapel Hill: University
of North Carolina Press.

Williamson, George Charles. 1889. _Trade tokens issued in the
seventeenth century in England, Wales, and Ireland, by corporations,
merchants, tradesmen, etc. Illustrated by numerous plates and woodcuts,
and containing notes of family, heraldic, and topographical interest
respecting the various issuers of the tokens_. London: E. Stock.

Wilson, Monica Hunter. 1951. “Witch Beliefs and Social Structure.” _The
American Journal of Sociology_ 56 (4): 307-31

Wink, André. 2002. _Al-Hind: Early medieval India and the expansion of
Islam_, 7_th_-11_th centuries_. Leiden: E. J. Brill.

Wirszubski, Chaim. 1950. _Libertas as a Political Ideal at Rome During
the Late Republic and Early Principate_. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.

Wolf, Robert L. 1954. “The Mortgage and Redemption of an Emperor’s Son:
Castile and the Latin Empire of Constantinople.” _Speculum_ 29: 45-85.

Wong, Roy Bin. 1997. _China Transformed: Historical Change and the
Limits of European Experience_. Ithaca: Cornell University Press.

_____. 2002. “Between Nation and World: Braudelian Regions in Asia.”
_Review_ 26 (1): 1-45.

Wood, Diana. 2002. _Medieval Economic Thought_. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.

Wordie, J. R. 1983. “The Chronology of English Enclosure, 1500-1914.”
Economic History Review, 2nd ser. 26:483-505.

Wray, L. Randall. 1990. _Money and Credit in Capitalist Economies_.
Aldershot: Edward Elgar.

_____. 1998. _Understanding Modern Money: the key to full employment and
price stability_. Edward Elgar: Cheltenham.

_____. 1999. “An Irreverent Overview of the History of Money from the
Beginning of the Beginning to the Present.” _Journal of Post Keynesian
Economics_. 21 (4): 679-687

_____. 2000. _Credit and State Theories of Money_. Cheltenham: Edward
Elgar.

Wright, David P. 2009. _Inventing God’s Law: How the Covenant Code of
the Bible Used and Revised the Laws of Hammurabi_. Oxford: Oxford
University Press.

Wrightson, Keith. 1980. “Two concepts of order: justices, constables and
jurymen in seventeenth-century England,” in _An Ungovernable People: The
English and their Law in the Seventeenth and Eighteenth Centuries_ (John
Brewer and John Styles, editors), pp. 21-46. London: Hutchinson.

Wrightson, Keith, and David Levine. 1979 _Poverty and Piety in an
English Village_. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Xu, Zhuoyun, and Jack L. Dull. 1980. _Han agriculture: the formation of
early Chinese agrarian economy_, 206 _B.C.-A.D_. 220. Seattle:
University of Washington Press.

Yang, Bin. 2002. “Horses, Silver, and Cowries: Yunnan in Global
Perspective.” _Journal of World History_, vol. 15 no 3:281-322.

Yang, Lien-sheng. 1971. _Money and Credit in China: A Short History_.
Harvard-Yenching Institute Monographs 12. Cambridge: Harvard University
Press.

Yates, Robin D. S. 2002. “Slavery in Early China: A Socio-Cultural
Approach.” _Journal of East Asian Archaeology_ 3 (1/2): 283-331.

Yoffee, Norman. 1998. “The Economics of Ritual at Late Babylonian Kish.”
_Journal of the Economic and Social History of the Orient_ 41 (3):
312-343.

Yü, Ying-shih. 1967. _Trade and Expansion in Han China. A Study in the
Structure in Sino-Barbarian Economic Relations_. Berkeley: University of
California Press.

Yung-Ti, Li. 2006. “On the Function of Cowries in Shang and Western Zhou
China.” _Journal of East Asian Archaeology_ 5: 1-26.

Zell, Michael. 1996. “Credit in the Pre-Industrial English Woollen
Industry.” _The Economic History Review_, New Series, 49 (4): 667-691

Zmora, Hillay. 2006. “The Princely State and the Noble Family: Conflict
and Co-operation in the Margraviates Ansbach-Kulmbach in the Early
Sixteenth Century.” _The Historical Journal_ 49: 1-21.

Zürcher, Erik. 1958. _The Buddhist conquest of China: the spread and
adaptation of Buddhism in early medieval China_. Volume 11 of Sinica
Leidensia. Leiden: E. J. Brill.
